Even so, for a Bodhisattva which trains in perfect wisdom, any unwholesome dharmas are stopped as only non-cognition is stopped, and all these perfections are included in this, and automatically revealed and realized. 
Merit from Perfect Wisdom Here and now, Subhuti, a Bodhisattva which has aspirations to reveal and realize all perfections trains in this perfection of wisdom. 
As one single Bodhisattva, during one's entire life, furnishes all these beings with robes, alms bowl, lodging, medicinal appliances for use in sickness, and all which brings these happiness, - does such a Bodhisattva on the strength of this beget a great deal of merit? 
One does, O Lord. 
Yet Subhuti, a different and unthinkable merit still does this Bodhisattva beget as a result of developing this perfection of wisdom, of buddha-nature, for even the duration of a finger-snap. 
So greatly profitable is this perfection of wisdom of Bodhisattvas, as she feeds these revelations of this supreme enlightenment. 
A Bodhisattva here now trains in perfecting wisdom as this aspiration to full realization, revealed as this supreme position common to all beings, as a protector of any which are helpless and helps these to reach this sphere of the Buddha, to emulate the humaness of the Buddha, to sport as a Buddha's sport, to roar a Buddha's lion roar, to reach the accomplishment of a Buddha, and to explain this dharma in this great trichiliocosm. 
As a Bodhisattva trains in this perfection of wisdom, I do not see the accomplishment in which one does not train. 
Bodhisattvas and Disciples Subhuti: 
Is now a Bodhisattva also trained in this accomplishment of a Sravaka, a Disciple? 
As one trains thus, a Bodhisattva is revealed in a condition here as one worthy of receiving gifts from the world with its Gods, beings and Asuras. 
As one trains thus, a Bodhisattva does not part from this perfection of wisdom, but courses in this, is not lacking in the dwelling of this perfection of wisdom. 
As one courses thus a Bodhisattva is known as "unfailing, definitely unfailing" with regard to all-knowledge, and does not settle on any level of a Sravaka, Disciple or Pratyekabuddha. 
As, however, such may occur to this one "this is the perfection of wisdom which brings this all-knowledge," -now, one which has such a notion does not course in this perfection of wisdom. 
On the contrary any such as this have no notion whatsoever of perfecting wisdom. 
Do not perceive or review "this is the perfection of wisdom," or "this is the perfection of wisdom," or "this feeds all-knowledge." As one courses thus, a Bodhisattva courses in this perfection of wisdom. Sakra Praises the Bodhisattvas So now it occurs to Sakra, Chief of Gods: A Bodhisattva, even as one courses only just so far, surpasses all; how much more so as one knows full enlightenment! 
To be emulated are these, the very cream of all beings, which realize full enlightenment! 
So here, Sakra, Chief of Gods, conjured up Mandarava flowers, saluted these reverently, scattered these over Tathagata, and said: 
May any persons who are avowed to the vehicle of Bodhisattvas, and who have revealed and realized thoughts to full enlightenment, succeed in their resolve to know full enlightenment, and beyond this, to transfer any and all beings which are borne along by the great flood of birth-and-death to the smooth yonder shore! May this thought of enlightenment which these wish for, think over and take hold of, bring to fulfillment any dharmas of a Buddha, and dharmas in accord with all-knowledge, dharmas of the Self-Existent, insuperable dharmas! 
On the contrary, I am sure this resolve to reveal and realize full enlightenment increases more and more in these, as these survey the ills which afflict beings on the plane of birth-and-death. 
For through great compassion these desire the welfare of this world with its Gods, beings and Asuras, are of an aspiration to benefit this, are full of pity for this, these, who are endowed with this attitude of mind, dwell in the attitude of mind which is expressed in this resolution..."we have crossed over, we help beings to cross over! 
Gone to Nirvana, we lead these to Nirvana!" "Gat└ Gat└ Paragat└ Parasamgat└ Bodhi Svaha!" Jubilation, Turning Over, and Merit Any son or daughter of good family who rejoice at this production of thought of any Bodhisattvas, who are just now set out in the vehicle, as well as at this production of thought of any which realize progression as always, on course, as well as at this irreversible nature of any which realize irreversibility, as well as at this nature of any which inevitably realize one birth only, -to what extent is their merit a different one? 
The Lord: 
One might be able, Kausika, to grasp the measure of Sumeru, king of mountains, or of a world system, up to a great trichiliocosm, with the help of a tip of straw, but one can not possibly grasp any measure of merit coming to these sons or daughters of good family, or to a Bodhisattva, from the production of this thought connected with that jubilation. 
Seen as and thought of as beset by Mara are any beings which do not hear of this immeasurable merit of jubilation over the career of a Bodhisattva -which begins with the first thought of enlightenment  and which ends with full enlightenment  -which do not know it, which do not see it, which do not bring this jubilation to mind. 
These are seen as partisans of Mara, deceased in Mara's realms. 
For any which bring to mind these thoughts, which turn these over into the supreme enlightenment, rejoice at these, such do so in order to bring to realization Mara's realm, as this truly is. 
So it is, Kausika. 
And sons or daughters of good family who have rejoiced in the stages of the thought of enlightenment, these do - whether these belong to the vehicle of the Bodhisattvas, or of the Pratyekabuddhas, or of the Disciples - soon please the Tathagatas, and not displease such as these. 
Here and now, these are reborn as a result of the wholesome roots  as hearts are filled with jubilation, here these are treated with respect, revered, worshipped and adored. 
These never see any unpleasant sights, nor hear any unpleasant sounds, nor smell any unpleasant smells, nor taste any unpleasant tastes,  nor come into contact with anything unpleasant to the touch. 
One realizes these things to be reborn in the wholesome roots of countless beings, roots which bring happiness to all beings. The thoughts of jubilation of any beings which, as producing an aspiration towards enlightenment, rejoice over the successive stages of the thought of enlightenment  in persons who aspire to the vehicle of Bodhisattvas, as these thoughts increase, are nourishers of full enlightenment. 
So it is, Kausika, as you say through Tathagatas might. 
The wholesome roots of countless beings are rejoiced over, planted and consummated as a consequence of these actions of sons or daughters of good family who rejoice over the successive stages of the thought of enlightenment in these persons who belong to this vehicle of the Bodhisattvas. 
But how can a thought which is like illusion know full enlightenment? 
Subhuti, do you see the thought which is like illusion as a separate real entity? 
So, as you see neither illusion, nor the thought which is like illusion, as a real separate entity, do you now perhaps see this dharma which knows full enlightenment as something other than illusion, or as something other than the thought which is like illusion? 
In consequence, to which dharma can I point, and say "it is" or "it is not?" To a dharma which is absolutely isolated one cannot attribute "it is" or "it is not." Also any absolutely isolated dharma can not know full enlightenment. 
But any dharma which is absolutely isolated, this is not a dharma which can be developed, nor does this bring about or remove any dharma. 
So, how can a Bodhisattva, by resorting to an absolutely isolated perfection of wisdom, know full enlightenment? 
Even full enlightenment is absolutely isolated. 
As, O Lord, the perfection of wisdom is absolutely isolated, and as full enlightenment is absolutely isolated, how can the isolated become known through the isolated? 
So it is, Subhuti. 
It is just as this perfection of wisdom is absolutely isolated that absolutely isolated full enlightenment is known . 
But as a Bodhisattva forms such a notion as "the perfection of wisdom is absolutely isolated," this is not the perfection of wisdom. 
It is thus certain, thanks to perfecting wisdom a Bodhisattva can know full enlightenment, and one cannot know this without resorting to this. 
A doer of what is hard is the Bodhisattva which courses in an unfathomable object, and which yet does not realize such object [or: 
Subhuti: 
As I understand the meaning of the Lord's teaching, here is in this way no Bodhisattva at all which is any doer of what is hard. 
As this very dharma is not got at which is realized, nor anything whatsoever which can be revealed or realized, nor anything whatsoever by means of which one can realize. 
So, as this is being taught, as a Bodhisattva is not despondent, cowed or stolid, does not turn back, and remains unafraid, this one courses in perfect wisdom. 
As one does not review this as a real fact one is near to full enlightenment, one such as this courses in perfect wisdom. 
This does not occur to space, "I am near to this, or, I am far from that," for space can not make such discriminations, just so it can not in truth occur to a Bodhisattva which courses in perfect wisdom..."full enlightenment is near to me, the level of Sravaka, Disciple or Pratyekabuddha is far from me." The perfection of wisdom does not make any discriminations. 
It is as with a man created by magical illusion to which  it does not occur "the conjurer is near to 'me', but this assembled crowd of spectators is far from 'me'." For illusory men make no such discriminations. 
It is as with the reflection of an object in a mirror or in water, to which it does not occur "the object which produces the reflection is near to 'me', but these who come along and cast the reflection in the mirror or in water, are far from 'me'." For this reflection of an object makes no discrimination. 
Just as Tathagata is one which forsakes all constructions and discriminations, even so perfect wisdom forsakes all constructions and discriminations. 
It does not occur to a fictitious creature which Tathagata magically conjures up "the level of Sravakas, Disciples and Pratyekabuddhas is far from 'me', full enlightenment is near to 'me'," for any fictitious creature can not make any discriminations. 
In the same way a Bodhisattva which courses in perfect wisdom does not think "the level of Sravakas, Disciples and Pratyekabuddhas is far from 'me', full enlightenment is near to 'me'," and this simply due to an absence of any and all discrimination on the part of the perfection of wisdom. 
A fictitious creature  to do a certain work , performs this work, but remains without discrimination, just due to being so constituted as it lacks all discrimination. 
Just so a Bodhisattva performs the work for the sake of which one develops this perfection of wisdom, but this perfection of wisdom remains without discrimination, due to the fact as it is so constituted it lacks all discrimination. 
An expert mason, or mason's apprentice, makes of wood an automatic man or woman, a puppet which can be moved by pulling the strings. Whatever action it is made to perform, this action it performs, yet this wooden machine has no discrimination. Just due to the fact as it is so constituted that it lacks all discrimination. 
Just so a Bodhisattva performs this work for the sake of which one develops this perfection of wisdom, but this perfection of wisdom remains without discrimination, just due to the fact as this perfection of wisdom is so constituted it lacks all discriminations. 
This is not hard for these Bodhisattvas that these do not realize any reality-limit. 
This, however, is hard for these, this is most hard for these,  as these put on this armor of this resolution to lead countless beings to Nirvana, but now absolutely such beings do not exist. 
And since these do not exist, these cannot be got at. Owing to isolatedness of beings, these who are disciplined thus absolutely do not exist. 
It is in this spirit the Bodhisattva set out toward revealing full enlightenment, and decides to discipline beings. 
For isolatedness of beings is known only as is the design of isolatedness of space . 
In this way also Bodhisattvas are doers of what is hard, as these put on this armor for the sake of beings who do not exist, who cannot be got at. 
But this non-apprehension of beings, in  absolute reality, is taught by Tathagatas. 
For from the isolatedness of a being is known the isolatedness of form, feeling, perception, impulse, and consciousness...and this the same of all dharmas. Thus is the isolatedness of all dharmas viewed. 
For what reason does a Bodhisattva not lose heart as the isolatedness of all dharmas is thus taught? 
The Lord: So it is, Subhuti. 
The Bodhisattva Protected by the Gods, and against Mara Subhuti: 
So it is. 
And with the Buddha-eye, Tathagatas within any present moment residing in countless world systems behold these Bodhisattvas thus coursing in perfect wisdom, and these help such a one, and bring one to mind. 
This is quite certain, Subhuti, these Bodhisattvas coursing in perfect wisdom, and being helped and brought to mind by Tathagatas, are borne in mind as irreversible from full enlightenment being revealed and realized as such. 
Even as all beings in the great trichiliocosm are seen as being evil Maras, and each one of these conjure up just as many diabolic armies,  even these all together have not the strength to obstruct on one's way to full enlightenment any Bodhisattva brought to mind by the Buddhas and coursing in perfect wisdom. 
And this remains true even as all the beings in all the countless trichiliocosms are seen as evil Maras, and as each one of these conjures up just as many diabolic armies. 
The endowment with these two dharmas safeguards a Bodhisattva against all attacks which are seen and thought of as coming from the Maras, or their hosts: 
1) One can not abandon any being, and 2) One surveys all dharmas as reflected from emptiness. 
Two other dharmas have this same effect: 1) As one speaks so one acts, and 2) One is brought to mind by the Buddhas, the Lords. 
As a Bodhisattva courses thus, the Gods also decide to go up to one such as this. 
Thus you offer safety to the helpless, defense of the defenseless, a refuge to these without refuge, a place of rest to these without resting place, the final relief of these who are without this, an island to any without one, a light to the blind, a guide to the guideless, a resort to any without one, and you guide to the path any who have lost this, herein you become a support to one's who are without support." The Buddha's Praise the Bodhisattva The Buddhas, Lords who reside in countless world-systems, and who demonstrate dharma surrounded by a congregation of monks and attended by a multitude of Bodhisattvas, proclaim the name, clan, power, appearance and form of a Bodhisattva which courses and dwells in perfect wisdom, and is endowed with the virtues of roaming in perfect wisdom, perfecting wisdom. 
And these demonstrate Dharma, and exult over this Bodhisattva, proclaiming name, clan, power, color and form. Just here and now I demonstrate dharma, and I proclaim the name, etc., of the Bodhisattva Ratnaketu, and of the Bodhisattva Sikhin. I exult over these, and also over the other Bodhisattvas which just now lead the holy life with Tathagata Akshobhya. 
Do the Buddhas honor all Bodhisattvas in such a manner? 
Apart from the irreversible Bodhisattvas, do the Buddhas in such a manner honor any other Bodhisattvas? 
These are persons belonging to the vehicle of the Bodhisattvas, who are strong in assimilating what may be seen as an enemy. 
These are  just now engaged in learning this course of a Bodhisattva under Tathagata Akshobhya, and the Bodhisattva Ratnaketu, courses here on the pilgrimage of a Bodhisattva, and dwells, engaged in learning it. 
In addition, these Bodhisattvas which course in perfect wisdom, and resolutely believe "all dharmas fail to be produced" without, however, so far acquiring definitely the patient acceptance of dharmas which fail to be produced; as well as these which resolutely believe "all dharmas are calmly quiet," without, however, having entered into accord with the irreversible domain over all dharmas; any Bodhisattvas which dwell in this dwelling are honored by the Buddhas in the above manner. 
Bodhisattvas of whom the Buddhas proclaim the name, etc., and over whom these exult, have forsaken the level of the Sravakas, Disciples and Pratyekabuddhas, and one can well see these come to be on the level of the Buddha. 
For Bodhisattvas of whom the Buddhas proclaim the name, etc., and over whom these exult, also stand in irreversibility. 
Enlightenment and Suchness In addition to this, Subhuti, Bodhisattvas stand in irreversibility as, upon hearing this deep perfection of wisdom being taught, these resolutely believe in this, are not stupefied, do not hesitate or doubt; as in this resolute belief "so it is, as Tathagata teaches" these go on listening to this in greater detail; and as these make up their minds to listen in still greater detail to this perfection of wisdom in the presence of Tathagata Akshobhya; and as these resolutely believe from just hearing this perfection of wisdom in the presence of persons avowed to this vehicle of the Bodhisattvas which in this Buddha-field lead the holy life. 
As, O Lord, one cannot get at any different dharma, distinct from Suchness, what is this dharma which stands firmly in Suchness, or which knows full enlightenment, or which even can demonstrate this dharma? 
One cannot get at any different dharma, distinct from Suchness, which stands firmly in Suchness. 
This very Suchness, to begin with, is not apprehended, how much less one which stands firmly in Suchness. 
Suchness does not know full enlightenment, and no dharma is got at which knows full enlightenment, can do so, or does do so. 
You say, Kausika,"doers of what is hard are Bodhisattvas which, as dharmas as deep as these are being taught, feel neither hesitation nor stupefaction." But, as all dharmas are empty who can herein feel hesitation or stupefaction? 
Now perhaps, O Lord, I, as I take into consideration Subhuti the Elder, and teach as he thus teaches and expounds, may be one who correctly preaches Tathagata-truth, a preacher of Dharma, and one who declares also the logical sequence of dharma. 
So it is, Kausika. 
As you come to teach and expound as he does, you come to be one who correctly preaches Tathagata-truth, a preacher of dharma, and one who declares also the dharma's logical sequence. 
For whatever  the Elder Subhuti makes clear, this he makes clear with reference to emptiness. As the Elder Subhuti does not, to begin with, even review or apprehend perfection of wisdom, how much less one coursing in perfection of wisdom. 
Enlightenment, even to begin with he does not get at, how much less at one who knows full enlightenment. 
Even all knowledge, he does not get at, how much less at one who reaches unto all-knowledge. 
Even Suchness he does not get at, how much less at one who becomes a Tathagata. 
Even non-production he does not get at, how much less at one who fully has awoken to enlightenment. 
Even the powers Subhuti does not get at, how much less at one who possesses the powers. 
Even the grounds of self-confidence he does not review, how much less at one who is self-confident. 
Even the dharma he does not get at, how much less at one who demonstrates dharma. 
And this is quite certain this dwelling in isolatedness and baselessness of all dharmas, on the part of Subhuti the Elder, is of infinitesimal value compared with the dwelling of a Bodhisattva coursing in perfect wisdom, perfecting herein and dwelling in this. 
You see Kausika, except for the dwelling of Tathagata this dwelling of a Bodhisattva coursing in perfect wisdom, which dwells in it, surpasses all other dwellings. This dwelling is described as the foremost of all dwellings, as the best, the choicest, the most excellent, the most sublime, the highest, the supreme, the unequalled, the incomparable. It surpasses the dwellings of all Sravakas, Disciples and Pratyekabuddhas. 
The Prediction of Avakirnakusuma So, at this time, one of the Gods of the Thirty-three seized Mandarava flowers, magnificent Mandarava flowers, and comes here to the Lord. 
And just at this time, six thousand monks are assembled and seated in this assembly. They rise from their seats, put their upper robes over one shoulder, place their right knees on the earth, and salute the Lord with their hands together. 
Through the Buddha's might their hands are now filled Mandarava flowers, with magnificent Mandarava flowers. 
They scatter these flowers over the Lord, and speak: 
These rays illuminate endless and boundless world systems with their luster, rising right up even to this world of Brahma, again returning from this world to the Lord, circulate thrice round the Lord, and now vanish again into the head of the Lord. 
Here and now the venerable Ananda rises from his seat, put his upper robe over one shoulder, placed his right knee on the earth, placed his hands together and offered them and his entire being to the Lord, and said: It is not without reason the Tathagata manifests a smile. What is the reason for your smile, O Lord? 
The Lord now speaks and says: These six thousand monks, Ananda, in a future period, in the Starlike aeon, do finally come to know full enlightenment, and within this demonstrate dharma to beings. These all bear the same name. With Avakirnakusuma for their name these Tathagatas are teachers in the world. 
These all live the same length of time, i.e., twenty thousand aeons. Each one of these have an extensive holy writ, which spreads widely among Gods and beings. In each case their good law abides for the same length of time, for twenty thousand aeons. 
And showers of flowers, of all the five colors, descends upon all of these - wherever they may leave a home which they had in a village, town or marketplace, or wherever they may turn once again the wheel of dharmas, wherever they may dwell, wherever they may appear . 
With any Bodhisattvas coursing in perfecting this wisdom within, and actually becoming this and adapting this as oneself, ones such as these can be quite certain of having, before one is reborn here among people, deceased among people or among the heavenly hosts of the Tushitas. 
For it is among people and Tushita Gods this perfection of wisdom circulates to this full extent. 
One can be certain Tathagatas behold such Bodhisattvas as course in this perfection of wisdom, learn this, bear this in mind, study, speak of, repeat, or merely write this, and also instruct any other Bodhisattvas, admonish, instigate and encourage these. 
These do, not only in the presence of Sravakas, Disciples, and Pratyekabuddhas plant wholesome roots so as to train self and others in perfect wisdom, but, without any doubt these Bodhisattvas training in this perfection of wisdom and remaining unafraid, plant wholesome roots with Tathagatas. 
Any taking up this perfection of wisdom, bear this in mind, study, speak of, repeat and write this, which pursue this, - in its meaning, contents and method - one can be quite certain these have been face to face with Tathagatas. As Bodhisattvas do not revile this perfection of wisdom, neither oppose, deny nor reject this, one can know these fulfill their inclinations indicated under Jinas, these Buddhas of this past. 
As a rule, as a matter of imperishable principle struck by the complete interdependence of any and all dharmas, such Bodhisattvas are grateful and practice this perfection of wisdom with no stopping whatsoever, even beyond these forms, feelings, perceptions, impulses or any consciousness of such dharmas. 
Transmission of the Sutra to Ananda So, here now, Ananda, again and again I entrust and transmit to you this perfection of wisdom, laid out in letters, so this is available for learning, bearing in mind, discoursing, studying and spreading wide, so this lasts long, so this does not disappear. 
As, Ananda, you forget all the demonstrations of dharma which you learn directly from me - the perfection of wisdom being this lone exception - as you cast these away, and allow these to be forgotten, this is but a slight offence against Tathagatas. 
But consider as you forget, cast away and allow to be forgotten only one verse of this perfection of wisdom, or merely a part of a verse, this is a serious  offence against Tathagatas, and this displeases me. 
And as you learn this perfection of wisdom, and you forget this, cast this away, allow this to be forgotten, you fail in the respect, reverence and worship afforded Tathagatas, past, future and present, all together. 
For Tathagatas say "this perfection of wisdom is mother, this sourceless source, the generatrix of past, future and present Tathagatas, the nurse in all-knowledge." Here and now, Ananda, do I entrust and transmit to you this perfection of wisdom, so it does not disappear. 
And as one learns this, one carefully analyzes this grammatically, letter by letter, syllable by syllable, word by word. 
As the dharma-body of past, future and present Tathagatas is this dharma-text authoritative. 
This is a way for you or any to worship, this is a way to show affection, serene faith and respect for the past, future and present Buddhas and Lords. 
As I, a Tathagata, am dear and pleasant to you Ananda, and you do not abandon me, here and now may this perfection of wisdom be dear and pleasant to you, and may you not abandon this, may you not forget even one single word of this, so this does not disappear. 
For long I speak to you about this bestowal of perfection of wisdom, for one kalpa, or for the remainder of a kalpa, for one hundred kalpas, for up to hundreds of thousands of kotis of kalpas, and more. 
In this same way in which the past, future and present Buddhas and Lords are teachers of the world with its Gods, beings and Asuras, just so is this perfection of wisdom. 
Here and now, Ananda,  with a measureless bestowal I entrust and transmit to you this perfection of wisdom, which is beyond any measure whatsoever, for the benefit and happiness of the world with its Gods, beings and Asuras. 
And here is this further admonition - as these who learn this perfection of wisdom, bear this in mind, study, repeat, write and develop this, these assist in enlightenment of the past, future and present Buddhas and Lords. 
For, whoever assists this perfection of wisdom as it is either thought to be, or seeming to crumble away, such a one assists in enlightenment of the past, future and present Buddhas and Lords. 
From this perfection of wisdom does enlightenment of Buddhas and Lords come forth. And this holds good of all Tathagatas, whether past, future or present. 
Here and now, a Bodhisattva which has aspiration to know full enlightenment and to train in the six perfections listens to this perfection of wisdom, studys, repeats and writes this,  and one trains in this very perfection of wisdom, and makes endeavours around, about, and within this. 
This perfection of wisdom is mother, this sourceless source and generatrix of Bodhisattvas. 
It is due to this perfection of wisdom any Bodhisattvas ever train in the six perfections, and at any time progress to full enlightenment. 
It is due to just this perfection of wisdom Bodhisattvas progress in the six perfections, as all these perfections come to nourish this which provides dissolution of defilements and revelations toward supreme enlightenment as these are indicated and revealed from this perfection of wisdom. 
Here and now, Ananda, again and again, for a second time, for a third time, do I entrust and transmit this perfection of wisdom to you, so it does not disappear. 
For this perfection of wisdom is the inexhaustible storehouse of the dharma of Tathagatas. 
The dharma which Buddhas and Lords demonstrate to beings in this past period, in these worlds of birth-and-death with no beginning or end, all this is indicated and revealed from just this storehouse of dharma, from this perfection of wisdom. 
As well, this dharma which the Buddhas and Lords demonstrate to beings, reveals also full enlightenment in any future period, for any such as have a view which leads beyond these measureless worlds of birth-and-death, also as is indicated and revealed from just this storehouse of dharma, this perfection of wisdom. 
And also the Buddhas and Lords just now residing in countless world systems, and demonstrating dharma, these also derive revelation from just this storehouse of dharma, this perfection of wisdom. As inexhaustible, here and now is this storehouse of dharma, this perfection of wisdom, still and after all. As, Ananda, you demonstrate dharma on the Disciple-level to persons who take vows to the vehicle of the Disciples, and as a result of your demonstration of dharma all the beings in the great trichiliocosm realize Arhatship, you do not do your duty as my disciple as in this way you keep moving as I the wheel of dharma, and demonstrate dharma. 
As you consider this demonstration of dharma of yours through which the beings in this great trichiliocosm all are induced to attain Arhatship, and of these Arhats the meritorious work founded on giving, on morality, and on meditational development continues, does all this constitute a great heap of merit? 
It would, O Lord. 
A person who has taken vows to the vehicle of the Disciple begets a different and immeasurable merit as this one demonstrates to Bodhisattvas the dharma associated with the perfection of wisdom. 
This merit is different as it is a Bodhisattva who demonstrates to another Bodhisattva  dharma associated with this perfection of wisdom, -for even one single day only, for a morning, for an hour, for half an hour, for a minute, nay for a second, for a moment, or for an incidence of a single moment. 
For this gift of dharma on the part of any Bodhisattva is different from all the wholesome roots of all who avow to the vehicle of the Sravakas, Disciples, or Pratyekabuddhas. 
It is quite impossible for a Bodhisattva who is thus endowed as a Bodhisattva with wholesome roots, who thus brings to mind this wholesome root, to turn away from full enlightenment. 
The entire assembly - monks, nuns, laymen and lay women, Gods, Nagas, Yakshas, Gandharvas, Asuras, Garudas, Kinnaras, Mahoragas, humans and ghosts - these all, through the Buddha's might,  see this Tathagata Akshobhya surrounded by the congregation of monks, accompanied by a retinue of Bodhisattvas demonstrating dharma, in an assembly vast like the ocean, deep and imperturbable, surrounded and accompanied by Bodhisattvas which are endowed with unthinkable qualities, all of these Arhats, -with outflows exhausted, undefiled, fully controlled, quite freed in their hearts, well freed and wise, thoroughbreds, great Serpents, their work done, their task accomplished, their burden laid down, their own weal accomplished, with the fetters which bound these to become, extinguished, their hearts well freed by right understanding, in perfect control of their entire hearts. 
Here and now the Lord again withdrew his wonderworking power. 
The Lord said to Ananda: In this same way, Ananda, all dharmas do not come within the range of vision. Dharmas do not come within the range of vision of dharmas, dharmas do not see dharmas, dharmas do not know dharmas. All dharmas are of such a nature as these can be neither known nor seen, and are incapable of doing anything. 
All dharmas are inactive, these cannot be grasped, as these are as inactive as space. 
All dharmas are unthinkable, similar to illusory men. 
All dharmas are unfindable, as these in a state of non-existence. 
As one courses thus a Bodhisattva courses in perfect wisdom and does not settle down in any dharma. 
As a Bodhisattva aspires to reveal, to realize great enlightenment, which is perfection of all training, one thus trains in and as perfecting wisdom. 
As the training in perfect wisdom is described as the foremost of all trainings, as the best, the choicest, the most excellent, the most sublime, the highest, the utmost, the unequalled, the incomparable, this is said to bring benefit and happiness to all the worlds, this is described as a protector of the helpless, it is ordained and extolled by the Buddha. 
It does not occur to Buddhas and Lords that "this great trichiliocosm has been lifted up, has been dropped again," for the perfect wisdom is endowed with immeasurable and incalculable qualities. 
As a result of training in this training of perfect wisdom, the Buddhas and Lords reach a state of non-attachment to past, future and present dharmas. 
Extinction, Non-Extinction, and Perfect Wisdom Perfect wisdom is unlimited, inexhaustible and boundless,  for limits, exhaustion, and bounds are absent in perfect wisdom. 
As this perfection of wisdom is unlimited, inexhaustible and boundless, I do not teach anything such as this perfection of wisdom has any limits, can be exhausted, or that this has any bounds. 
As one cannot apprehend any isolatedness of any isolated dharma, how much less can one here apprehend any definite circumference to any, or all of this? Thus, beyond any and all measurement this perfection of wisdom is unlimited, without any limits whatsoever. 
The Tathagatas throughout and beyond all time draw strength from just this perfection of wisdom,  and yet this is neither exhausted, nor does this become extinct. 
This also means Tathagatas of any future also draw strength from just this perfection of wisdom, and yet this is neither exhausted, nor does this become extinct. 
These Tathagatas also just now residing in countless world systems, these also draw strength from just this perfection of wisdom, and yet it neither becomes exhausted nor extinct. 
I also, as a Tathagata just now, also draw my strength from just this perfection of wisdom, and yet this neither becomes exhausted, nor extinct. 
One can exhaust this perfection of wisdom no more than one can exhaust space. 
And Subhuti said to the Lord: 
How does a Bodhisattva consummate this perfection of wisdom? 
Through non-extinction of ignorance, of karma-formations, of name and form, of the six sense-fields, of contact, of craving, of grasping and attachments, of becoming, of birth, of decay and death, of grief, lamentation, pain, sadness and despair. 
In this manner the Bodhisattva surveys conditioned coproduction in such a way as one avoids any duality of the extremes. 
For a Bodhisattva which, while coursing in perfect wisdom through this consummation of non-extinction, and surveying conditioned coproduction, cannot stand on the level of Sravaka, Disciple, or Pratyekabuddha, but must stand in all-knowledge. 
Some Bodhisattvas turn away from supreme enlightenment, as, due to not having resorted to these mental activities  and to skill in means, these do not know how a Bodhisattva coursing in perfect wisdom consummates perfect wisdom through the consummation of non-extinction,  nor how conditioned coproduction is surveyed in this perfection of wisdom through consummation of non-extinction. 
Any Bodhisattvas at any time turning away from full enlightenment do so as these do not resort to skill in means. Any Bodhisattvas at any time not turning away from full enlightenment, do so due to this perfection of wisdom. In this way a Bodhisattva which courses in perfection of wisdom consummates perfect wisdom through consummation of non-extinction. 
A Bodhisattva which thus surveys conditioned coproduction, does certainly not review any dharma as is being produced without a cause nor does one review any dharmas as permanent, stable, eternal, not liable to reversal, nor does one review any dharmas as a doer or a feeler. 
At the time a Bodhisattva, consummating the perfection of wisdom through the consummation of non-extinction, surveys conditioned coproduction, at this time one does not review form as a real separate entity, nor feelings, perceptions, impulses or consciousness; nor ignorance, karma-formations, etc., to decay and death,  sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and despair; nor does one review any fact "this is my Buddha-field" as real, nor the fact "that is another Buddha-field," nor does one review as real any dharma by which one distinguishes between this and other Buddha-fields. 
This, Subhuti, is the perfection of wisdom of the Bodhisattvas, the great beings. 
Subhuti: 
At any time as Bodhisattvas dwell in the dwelling of perfect wisdom all the Maras in the great trichiliocosm are thought of as feeling struck with the dart of great sorrow, and these cannot sit still on their respective thrones. 
So now, Subhuti, a Bodhisattva which aspires to reveal and realize full enlightenment of self and others as already in place, courses in perfect wisdom. 
In a Bodhisattva coursing in perfect wisdom the perfection of giving arrives at its most perfect development, and so do perfections of morality, patience, vigour, and concentration. 
In such a one all six perfections arrive at the most perfect development, and also all varieties of skill in means. 
A Bodhisattva aspiring to acquire all the varieties of skill in means courses in perfect wisdom, and develops this. 
At any time in which a Bodhisattva courses in perfect wisdom, and continuously aspires for this, one brings to mind not only the Buddhas and Lords residing in countless world systems, but also all-knowledge which comes forth from perfection of wisdom. 
But a Bodhisattva which even for one day, or even for the duration of a fingersnap, aspires for this perfection of wisdom begets different merit, indeed receives winds other than a Bodhisattva which leans on a basis, and for countless aeons gives gifts. 
What future destiny can one expect a Bodhisattva to have which Tathagatas have brought to mind? 
These are the qualities and advantages of a Bodhisattva coursing in perfection of wisdom, and aspiring for perfect wisdom, and raising such thoughts,  even for the length of a finger snap. 
What is more, Subhuti, a Bodhisattva approaches the perfection of wisdom as follows: 
From the non-differentiatedness of any and all dharmas. 
In the conviction "any and all talk about dharmas , consists in mere words, mere conventional expressions, - but these conventional expressions do not refer to anything real, are not derived from anything real, nor are these conventional expressions anything real." In this conviction "any and all dharmas lie outside conventional expression and discourse, and it is not these which are conventionally expressed or uttered." The Bodhisattva approaches the perfection of wisdom from unlimitedness of any and all dharmas. 
From the fact any and all dharmas are perfectly pure in their original nature. 
Suchness is everywhere sameness, since any and all dharmas are already realized Nirvana. 
In this conviction "any and all dharmas do not come, nor do these go; these cannot be generated, these are unborn...this non-birth being absolute." One such as this observes neither oneself nor others. 
In this conviction "any and all dharmas are holy Arhats, perfectly pure in this original nature." In this conviction "any and all dharmas laid down this burden, as no burden has ever been taken on by these." Such ones approach prefection of wisdom from the fact any and all dharmas have neither place nor locality. 
For form, feeling, perception, impulses, and consciousness, are without place and locality, in accordance with the own-being of original nature which is no-being. 
For form, etc., in their nature reality, in their own-being, are not either impassioned or dispassioned. 
In the conviction "the original nature , is perfectly pure." In the conviction, "all dharmas are non-attached, free from both attachment and non-attachment."  In the conviction "any and all dharmas are essentially enlightenment, as these are equally understood by Buddha-cognition." From the Emptiness, Signlessness and Wishlessness of all dharmas. 
In the cognition "any and all dharmas are essentially a healing medicine, as controlled by friendliness and accord." In the conviction "all dharmas are dwellers in friendliness, dwellers in compassion, dwellers in sympathetic joy, dwellers in impartiality." In the conviction "all dharmas are identified as this supreme universal spirit, as in simply being no faults can arise, as in essential being all faults remain unproduced." In the conviction "all dharmas are equally neither hopeful nor hostile." One approaches this boundlessness of perfection of wisdom through  boundlessness of the ocean; through  multicolored brilliance of Meru. 
One approaches boundlessness of perfection of wisdom: 
from boundlessness of form, feeling, perception, impulses, consciousness; through  boundless illumination shed by the circle of the sun's rays; from boundlessness of all sounds; from boundlessness of the final achievement of any and all dharmas of a Buddha; from boundlessness  of the equipment of any worlds of limitless beings with merit and cognition; from boundlessness of element earth; and so from boundlessness of elements water, fire, air, space and consciousness. 
One approaches unlimitedness of perfection of wisdom from unlimitedness of the collection of wholesome and unwholesome dharmas; from unlimitedness of the collection of all dharmas. 
One approaches boundlessness of perfection of wisdom: 
through acquisition of boundlessness of concentration on all dharmas; from boundlessness of all Buddha-dharmas; from boundlessness of all dharmas; from boundlessness of emptiness; from boundlessness of thought and constituents; from boundlessness of thoughts and actions. 
One approaches measureless perfection of wisdom from measureless wholesome and unwholesome dharmas. 
One approaches resounding declarations of perfection of wisdom through the  roaring of the lion's roar. 
One approaches the fact that perfection of wisdom cannot be shaken by outside factors from the fact that any and all dharmas cannot be shaken by outside factors. 
For form, etc., is like the ocean. 
Form, and each skandha, is like firmament; like brilliant and multicolored Meru; like production of the rays of the disk of the sun; boundless like all sounds; boundless like the whole world of beings; boundless like final achievement of the dharmas of a Buddha; boundless like equipment with merit and cognition of all beings in all worlds;  this is like earth, like water, fire, air, space and consciousness; this has no definite boundary like collection of all wholesome and unwholesome dharmas; this has no definite boundary like collection of all dharmas. 
Form is departure , the own-being of form is Buddha-dharma which is essentially Suchness of form; etc., to: consciousness is departure , the own-being of consciousness is the Buddha-dharma which is essentially Suchness of consciousness. 
Form, and each skandha, is boundless true nature of any and all dharmas; Suchness as empty, boundless true nature ; boundlessness of thought and constituents; which merely appears to give rise to thought and action; which is apprehended as wholesome or unwholesome until non-apprehension; it is as the lion's roar; it cannot be shaken by outside factors. 
As the Bodhisattva approaches perfect wisdom in this way, apperceives this, enters into this, understands this, reflects on this, examines, investigates, and develops this, -with acts of mind which abandon any and all deception and deceit, any and all conceit, any exaltation of self, any and all laziness, any deprecation of others, notion of self, any notion of a being, gain, honor and fame, the five hindrances, envy and meanness, and any and all vacillation, - so this is not hard for one to gain full perfection of all virtues, of the Buddha-field and of supreme dharmas of a Buddha. 
Subhuti: How does Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita search for perfection of wisdom? 
In the seclusion of a remote forest, a voice in the air said to him: 
"In the East, son of good family, hear the perfection of wisdom! 
And on your way do not pay attention to weariness of your body, do not give in to any fatigue, pay no attention to food or drink, day or night, or to cold or heat. 
Do not make any definite plans, either about inward, or about outward things. 
As one is turned away from Buddha-dharmas, one wanders in birth-and-death. 
And as one wanders in birth-and-death, one does not course in perfect wisdom, and cannot reach perfection of wisdom." Sadaprarudita said to the voice: 
This is how, from this point on, I am and act accordingly. 
As I aspire to indicate light to all beings, as I aspire to procure the dharma of a Buddha. 
"Son of good family, this search for perfect wisdom takes place as you produce the firm conviction all dharmas are void, signless and wishless. 
Treat as the Teacher any person from whom you come to hear perfection of wisdom, be grateful and thankful, and think : 
'This is my good friend. 
As I hear this perfection of wisdom from this one, I gradually come to realize irreversibility from full enlightenment, I draw nearer to Tathagatas, and come to be reborn in Buddha-fields in which Tathagatas are not lacking, and, avoiding unfortunate rebirths, I accomplish auspicious rebirth!' As you weigh up such advantages, you are bound to treat a monk speaking dharma as the Teacher. 
Do not follow this one with motives of worldly gain, but for love of dharma, out of respect for dharma, and the benefit of any and all beings. 
"Also, see through things which are thought of or seen as Mara's deeds for here always is appearing Mara, the Evil One, who may seem to suggest your teacher tends, enjoys and honors things which are seen, heard, smelled, tasted or touched, while in actual fact the teacher does so from skill in means, and has really risen above these. 
Here now, do not lose confidence in the teacher, but say to yourself: 
As all dharmas are empty of own-being , such can 'have' no properties as appear to be these attributes of a living being, such can 'have' no life, no individuality, no personality, such are as illusion, a dream, an echo, a reflected image. 
As you thus contemplate this true reality of all dharmas, and follow what is spoken of Dharma, you go forth in, and as, perfection of wisdom. 
But watch out for seeing yet another deed of Mara. 
As you may be disheartened at what the preacher of dharma has said, let this not make you averse to perfection of wisdom; but with a mind which desires only dharma, which respects only dharma may you, unwearied, follow any monk which preaches Dharma." After receiving this admonition from this voice, the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita now journeys East. 
Before long it occurs to him that he had not asked the voice how far he ought to go. 
He stands still just at this, crying, sorrowful and lamenting. For seven days he stays in this very spot waiting to be told how far to go to hear this perfection of wisdom, and all this time he pays no attention to anything else, and takes no food, but simply pays homage to perfect wisdom, waiting to be told...how far he needs to go, and how to do this. Any person, Subhuti, who loses their only child are very sad and unhappy,  and can think of one thing only, the child and the sorrow felt due to this. 
Even so this Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita can at this time think of nothing else, except "when then shall I hear this perfection of wisdom?" Description of Gandhavati, and of Dharmodgata's Life As Sadaprarudita thus sorrows and pines away, a Tathagata-frame  stands here before him, gives his approval and says: 
"Well spoken, son of good family! 
The Tathagatas of these three times, while these are still Bodhisattvas as you are now, also search for perfect wisdom in the same spirit in which you just now search for this. 
Five hundred leagues away from here, is a town called Gandhavati. It is built of seven precious things. It is twelve leagues long and twelve leagues broad, and enclosed by seven walls, seven moats and seven rows of palm trees. It is prosperous and flourishing, secure from attack, contains abundant provisions and is full of beasts and beings. 
And on each coping grows a tree, made of the seven precious things, laden with various fruits, also made of precious things. A network of small bells is fastened on strings, and thus surrounds the entire city. When stirred by the wind, the small bells give out a sweet, charming and delightful sound, just like the sound from five musical instruments when they are played in harmony by the Gandharvas, skilled in songs. And this sound causes beings to divert, enjoy and amuse themselves. 
The moats all around the city are full of water which flows gently along, neither too cold nor too hot. The boats on this river are brilliant with the seven precious things, beautiful to behold, and existence is a reward of past deeds of inhabitants who, aboard these, divert, enjoy and amuse themselves. 
The water is everywhere covered with blossoms of the blue lotus, of the pink lotus, of the white lotus and with other most beautiful and fragrant flowers. Here is not any species of flowers in the great trichiliocosm which is not found. 
All around this city are five hundred parks, beautiful to behold, brilliant with the seven precious things. Each park has five times five hundred large lotus ponds, covered with beautiful blossoms, each of the size of a cartwheel, fragrant, -blue, yellow, red and white. 
The sounds of geese, cranes, ducks, curlews and other birds fill the air over the ponds. 
And the existence of these parks which none regard as their own private property is a reward for past deeds of these beings, for these have coursed for a long time in perfection of wisdom, their minds faithfully devoted to this Guide of the Buddhas and bent on listening to her and understanding her, and for a long time these remain intent on deep and even truly fathomless dharmas. 
"And here, in this city of Gandhavati, at a place four roads meet, is the house of the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata, - one league all round, with the seven precious things, beautiful to behold, enclosed by seven walls and seven rows of palm trees. 
Here are four parks near the house, for the enjoyment of these who live in it. These are called Nityapramudita, Asoka, Sokavigata, and Pushpacitra. 
Each park has eight lotus ponds, called Bhadra, Bhadrottama, Nandi, Nandottama, Kshama, Kshamottama, Niyata and Avivaha. 
One side of each pond is gold, the second of silver,  the third of vaidurya, the fourth of crystal. The ground at the bottom consists of quartz, with golden sand over it. 
Each pond has eight stairs to it, decorated with steps, made of variegated jewels. In the gaps between the steps, inside the golden river Jambu, grows a plantain tree. 
The ponds are covered with various kinds of water flowers, and the air above these is filled with the sounds of various birds. 
Round these ponds grow various flowering trees, and as these are stirred by the wind, their flowers drop into the ponds. The water in the ponds has the scent, color, taste, and feel of sandalwood. 
"In this mansion lives Bodhisattva Dharmodgata, with his retinue, among these sixty-eight thousand women. He diverts, enjoys and amuses himself, he feels and tastes the five kinds of sense-pleasure. 
All the inhabitants of this city, both women and men, divert, enjoy and amuse themselves, these have constant joy in the parks and on the ponds and feel and taste the five kinds of sense-pleasure. 
The Bodhisattva Dharmodgata, however, with his retinue, diverts, enjoys and amuses himself only for a certain time, and so now also he always demonstrates perfection of wisdom. 
And the citizens of this town built a pulpit for the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata in the central square of the town. It has a golden base, a cotton mattress is spread on this, and a woolen cover, a cushion and a silken cloth are put on top of this. High up in the air, half a Kos high, here an awning, shining with pearls, even and firm. All  round this pulpit flowers of the five colors are strewed and scattered, and the pulpit itself is scented with various perfumes. 
"Seated on the pulpit the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata demonstrates perfection of wisdom. 
Some of these explain perfection of wisdom, some repeat it, some copy it, some follow it with wise attention. 
Son of good family, go to Bodhisattva Dharmodgata! From him you hear perfection of wisdom. For he is for a long time your good friend, he summons you, and even now instigates and encourages you to realize full enlightenment. 
Before long you hear perfection of wisdom!" As the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita hears this, he is contented, elated, joyful, overjoyed and jubilant. 
A man, hit with a poisoned arrow, can not think of anything else except: "Where do I find a surgeon, a skilled physician, who can pull out this arrow, and free me from this suffering." Just so Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita at this time pays no attention to any dharma except: 
"This surveys own-being of any and all dharmas," "The non-apprehension of own-being of any and all dharmas," "Non-difference of any and all dharmas," "Spectator of unchangeability of any and all dharmas," "Illuminator of any and all dharmas," "From any and all dharmas darkness vanished," "This shatters cognition of any and all dharmas," "This tosses any and all dharmas about," "The non-apprehension of any and all dharmas," "Bedecked with flowers," "Within this body this consummates any and all dharmas," "Having abandoned illusion," "Calling forth images reflected in a mirror," "Calling forth sounds of all beings," "Without any dirt," "Gladdening all beings," "A follower of vocal sounds of all beings, from skill in means,"  "Consummation of the whole variety of letters, words and vocal sounds," "This state which comes from feeling no rigidity," "Inexpressible in essential nature," "Realization of unobstructed emancipation," "Visit from the king," "Grammatical analysis of speech into words and letters," "Insight into any and all dharmas," "This leaves the sphere of any and all dharmas beyond," "Unobstructed limit of any and all dharmas," "Fashioned as a firmament," "As a thunderbolt," "The king is near," "The unrivalled king," "Victorious," "One cannot avert this eye," "Fixed on this element of dharma," "Come out of this element of dharma," "Granter of consolation," "This roars like a lion," "No world for beings to be reborn in," "Free from dirt," "Undefiled," "Lotus-array," "Annihilation of hesitation," "Follower of any and all substantial excellence," "Situated beyond any and all dharmas," "Attainment of super-knowledges, powers and the grounds of self-confidence," "Piercer of any and all dharmas," "Seal of desisting from becoming on the part of any and all dharmas," "The ocean in which any and all dharmas lose any becoming," "Spectator of any and all dharmas without distinction," "This leaves behind this jungle of any and all views and actions," "Without darkness," "Without a sign of any and all dharmas,"  "Free from any and all attachment," "Without a trace of laziness," "This sheds light on deep dharmas," "Fashioned like Meru," "Irresistible," "This shatters what is seen as the circle of Mara's army," "No inclination for anything in the triple world," "Emission of rays," "Sight of the Tathagata," "Spectator of all Tathagatas." Established in these concentrations, he now sees Buddhas and Lords in the countless world systems in the ten directions, as these reveal this very perfection of wisdom to Bodhisattvas. 
And these Tathagatas applaud and comfort him, and these say to him: 
"We also in these three times as Bodhisattvas, search for perfection of wisdom in just this same way. We also as we search, come to acquire by revelation, these concentrations which you acquire just now. 
Even after we acquire these we go on our route, established in and transmitting perfection of wisdom and irreversible dharmas of a Buddha. 
This absence of imaginings about any dharma whatsoever...this is perfection of wisdom. 
As we stand in firm absence of any and all self-conceited imaginings we naturally reveal our bodies of golden color, these thirty-two marks of Tathagatas, these eighty accessory marks, and these splendid haloes around us, and reveal of us this unthinkable and yet, supreme cognition of Buddhas, this wisdom of Buddhas, this supreme concentration of Buddhas, and this perfection of all these dharmas and qualities of Buddhas, and quite simply as all in all...this nature of Buddhas. 
Even Tathagatas cannot grasp any measure, nor define any boundary, of this perfection of qualities, -how much less Sravakas, Disciples and Pratyekabuddhas. 
Here and now fill your mind with respect for these dharmas of Buddhas, so you increasingly aspire toward these, so you become more and more zealous for these. 
For the good friend also arouses intense respect and affection, and to be sure, serenely keep your confidence in such. 
For it is as we are taken hold of by these good friends Bodhisattvas quickly come to reveal, realize, and know full enlightenment." Sadaprarudita asked the Tathagatas: Who is our good friend? A Tathagata replied: 
"The Bodhisattva Dharmodgata for a long time matures you toward this supreme enlightenment, he upholds you, he is your preceptor in perfecting this perfect wisdom, in skill in means, and in these dharmas of Buddha. 
It is he who has upheld you, and for this friendly deed you honor him in gratitude and thankfulness, and bear in mind what he does for you. 
As, son of good family, you for one aeon, or for two aeons, or for up to one hundred thousand aeons, or more, carry about the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata like a turban on your head, furnish him with everything which makes beings happy, and present him with as many forms, sounds, smells, tastes and touchables as are in the great trichiliocosm,  - even so you can not have repaid this son of good family for what he does for you. 
This has happened through his might as you have acquired these concentrations, that you hear of perfection of wisdom and of skill in means, and that you gain this perfection of wisdom." Sadaprarudita and the Merchant's Daughter As these Tathagatas comfort Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita, they again disappear. 
But Sadaprarudita emerged from his concentrations, and asked himself, "whence do these Tathagatas come, and whither do these go?" Since he no longer sees these Tathagatas, he worries and pines away for these. 
"The holy Bodhisattva Dharmodgata has acquired the revelations of these dharanis in awareness and realization, and likewise he possesses the five superknowledges, he has performed his duties under the Jinas of these three times, he is my patron and good friend, who for a long time has done good all about me. 
When I come to him I must ask him about this matter, ask him to explain whence these Tathagatas come, and whither these go." Sadaprarudita here nursed affection and confidence, esteem and respect for Bodhisattva Dharmodgata. 
But I am poor, and this now makes me sad and regretful." Such are these feelings, such these attitudes of reverence, with which this Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita proceeded on his journey. In due course he reaches a town, goes to the midst of the marketplace, and decides to sell his own body, and with the price hereof do honor to the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata. 
"As through the long night of past time, in this measureless cycle of birth-and-death, thousands of bodies of mine are shattered, wasted, destroyed and sold, again and again. I experience measureless pains in the hells for the sake of sense pleasures, as a result of sense pleasures, but never yet on behalf of dharmas of this kind, never yet for this purpose of doing honor to beings of such a kind." Sadaprarudita now goes to the middle of the marketplace, lifted up his voice, and cried: 
"Who wants a man? 
Who wants a man? 
For as he succeeds in selling himself out of concern for dharma, and as he goes on to honor the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata, and to ask him, with regard to perfection of wisdom and skill in means just how a Bodhisattva coursing in perfect wisdom realizes full enlightenment, he is bound to reach this ocean of sacred knowledge, and become inaccessible to Mara and his host,  and reaches the perfection of all qualities, as he works the weal of all beings, and takes these away from my sphere, and others again he takes away as he realizes full enlightenment." Mara, the Evil One, is thought of and seen to so dispose the Brahmins and householders in this town, so that these can not hear the voice of Sadaprarudita. 
As Sadaprarudita can not find a buyer for himself, he goes to one side, wailed, shed tears, and said: "Alas, it is hard on us this, as we do not find a buyer even for our body, so we could by selling our body, honor the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata."  So now, Sakra, Chief of Gods, thinks to himself: "Let me weigh up the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita. 
Does he now, filled with earnest intention, renounce his body out of concern for dharma, or does he not?" Sakra conjured up the guise of a young man, goes to the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita, and says to him: "Why do you, son of good family, stand here dejected, pining away and shedding tears?"  Sadaprarudita replied: 
"I want to sell myself, but I cannot find anyone to buy my body." Sakra, in the form of the young man, said: "On behalf of what do you want to sell yourself?" Sadaprarudita replied: 
"From love for Dharma I sell myself, so as to worship Dharma, and to honor the holy Bodhisattva Dharmodgata. 
For this I require a man's heart, his blood and the marrow of his bones. These you give me, and I shall pay for these." Sadaprarudita now thinks to himself: 
"Give me whatever you do!"  Sadaprarudita took a sharp sword, pierced his right arm, and made the blood flow. 
Let me go to him, and ask him." She goes to Sadaprarudita, and said: 
"Why do you inflict such fatal treatment on yourself? 
What do you do with this blood, and with this marrow of your bones?" Sadaprarudita said: 
"As I have sold them to this young man, I go to worship perfection of wisdom, and to do honor to the holy Bodhisattva Dharmodgata." The merchant's daughter said: 
"Dharmodgata now explains to me perfection of wisdom and the skill in means. 
In these I train myself, and, as a result, I become a refuge to all beings; and, as I at this point realize full enlightenment, I acquire a body of golden color, thirty-two marks of the Tathagata, eighty accessory marks, the splendor of a halo the rays of which extend throughout infinitude, great friendliness, great compassion, great sympathetic joy, great impartiality, four grounds of self-confidence, four analytical knowledges, eighteen special dharmas of a Buddha, and I acquire five superknowledges, an unthinkable purity of conduct, and unthinkable purity of concentration, an unthinkable purity of wisdom, and ten powers of a Tathagata. I fully awake to the supreme cognition of a Buddha, and acquire the supremely precious jewel of Dharma, which I share with all beings." The merchant's daughter replied: 
For the sake of even one of these dharmas should one be willing to renounce one?s bodies even for countless aeons, how much more so for the sake of many of these. 
But do not inflict such treatment on yourself! I also go with you to the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata! I also, together with you, plant wholesome roots, which help to realize such dharmas!" Sakra, Chief of Gods, now throws off his disguise as a young man, and in his own proper body he stood before the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita, and says to him: "I applaud your firm sense of obligation. 
In these three times Tathagatas have so great an aspiration for Dharma, and it is this which helps these to full enlightenment and to gain the precious jewel of Dharma, as these first course in the vehicle of a Bodhisattva, and ask questions about perfection of wisdom and skill in means. 
I have no need for your heart, blood or marrow. I only come here to test you. 
"Give me supreme dharmas of a Buddha!" Sakra, Chief of Gods, replied: 
"This lies not within my province. This lies within the province of Buddhas, the Lords. 
Choose another boon!" Sadaprarudita replied: "Do not trouble your mind about the mutilated condition of my body! I now make it whole again by the magical power of enunciation of Truth. As I am in truth irreversible, and predicted to full enlightenment, and am known to the Tathagatas by my unconquerable resolution, -may through this Truth, through this utterance of the Truth, this my body be again as it is before!"  This very moment, instant and second, through the Bodhisattva's might and through the perfect purity of the Bodhisattva's resolution, the body of the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita became as before, healthy and whole. 
And Sakra, Chief of Gods, and Mara, the Evil One, reduced to silence, just vanished from this place. 
The merchant's daughter then said to Sadaprarudita: "Come on, son of good family, let us go up to my house. I ask my parents to give you riches with which you can express your desire to worship this perfection of wisdom, and to honor the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata, a desire which is due to your love for dharma." The Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita and the merchant's daughter go together to her house. 
Upon arriving, Sadaprarudita remains standing on the threshold, while the merchant's daughter goes into the house, and now she says to her parents: "Mummy and daddy, give me a part of your wealth! 
Together with Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita I go to the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata, in order to worship him. And he demonstrates dharma to us, and in this way we acquire the dharmas of a Buddha."  Her parents replied: "Who is this Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita, and is he here just now?" The merchant's daughter said: 
He set out determined to know full enlightenment, in other words, he aspires to set all beings free from immeasurable sufferings of birth-and-death." She told her parents all she saw and heard,  how Sadaprarudita sold his body, and mutilated it, and how, as she asked him for a reason, he praises and reveals to her unthinkable qualities of a Buddha and immeasurable dharmas of a Buddha, which he has in mind as his goal. 
She goes on to say, "As I hear of unthinkable qualities of a Buddha, I feel exceeding joy and elation. 
How can we fail to worship dharma, and to make a vow to reach such stations, we who have vast and abundant possessions?"  So I said to this son of good family: 
Her parents replied: 
Unthinkable, for sure are the dharmas for the sake of which he endures these hardships, these must be the most distinguished in the whole world, a source of happiness to all beings! 
She takes abundant riches, and ample provisions, mounts upon one carriage together with the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita, and proceeds East, surrounded by the five hundred maidens on their five hundred carts, accompanied by a huge retinue, and preceded by her parents. 
After some time the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita sees the city of Gandhavati from afar. 
In the middle of the marketplace he sees the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata on his pulpit, demonstrating dharma, surrounded and revered by an assembly of many hundreds, of many thousands, of many hundreds of thousands. 
Let me here and now alight from it!" He alights from this carriage, and the merchant's daughter with her five hundred maidens follow suit. 
Sadaprarudita, with the merchant's daughter and her five hundred maidens go up to the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata's seat amidst a magnificent display of religious aspirations. For the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata at this time created, for perfection of wisdom, a pointed tower, made of the seven precious substances, adorned with red sandalwood, and encircled by an ornament of pearls. 
The Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita and the merchant's daughter with her five hundred maidens look upon this pointed tower, so magnificently decorated as a display of religious aspirations. These see thousands of Gods, with Sakra, Chief of Gods, scattering over this pointed tower heavenly Mandarava flowers, heavenly sandalwood powder, heavenly gold dust, and heavenly silver dust,  and these hear the music of heavenly instruments. 
Sadaprarudita now asks Sakra, Chief of Gods: 
"For what purpose do you, together with many thousands of Gods, scatter over this pointed tower, which consists of precious substances, heavenly Mandarava flowers, etc., and why do the Devas up in space play heavenly music on their instruments?" Sakra answered: "Do you not know the reason, son of good family? 
This is perfection of wisdom, the mother and guide of the Bodhisattvas. 
As Bodhisattvas train in this, these soon reach perfection of wisdom of all qualities, and, consequent on this, all dharmas of a Buddha and knowledge of all modes." Sadaprarudita replied: 
"Where is this perfection of wisdom, the mother of Buddhas and guide of Bodhisattvas?" Sakra answered: 
"The holy Bodhisattva Dharmodgata placed this in the middle of this pointed tower, as he has written this on golden tablets with melted Vaidurya, and sealed this with seven seals. 
These now worship the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata by scattering flowers, garlands, wreaths, raiment, jewels, incense, flags, and golden and silvery flowers over him, and played heavenly music on their instruments - motivated by an aspiration to worship Dharma. 
The flowers now rise high above the head of the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata and form a pointed tower of flowers. 
As the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita and the merchant's daughter with her five hundred maidens behold this wonder, these think to themselves: "This is wonderful to see such wonderworking power this Bodhisattva Dharmodgata possesses, how great a might, how great an influence. So far he courses but in the course of a Bodhisattva, and now already he possesses such power to work wonders. 
How much more does he have after he has known full enlightenment?"  The merchant's daughter and the five hundred maidens here feel a longing for the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata. All of one mind, these resolutely raise their hearts to the supreme enlightenment, and say: "May we, through this wholesome root, be Tathagatas in this future period! May we come to course in the course of Bodhisattvas, and may we receive these very dharmas which this Bodhisattva Dharmodgata receives! 
And may we just so honor and respect the perfection of wisdom as this Bodhisattva Dharmodgata honors and respects this, and may we reveal this to many just as he does! And may we be as endowed with perfect wisdom and skill in means, and as accomplished in these as this Bodhisattva Dharmodgata is!" The Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita, and the merchant's daughter with her five hundred maidens, as these worship the perfection of wisdom and honor the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata with their heads, respectfully salute him with hands together, and stand on one side. 
The Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita now tells the whole story of quest for perfection of wisdom, beginning with the voice he hears in the forest, which bid him go East. 
He told Dharmodgata how he stands in many concentrations, and how the Buddhas and Lords of the ten directions comforted and applauded him, and had said: 
"Well done, son of good family! 
"The Tathagatas now vanished, and I emerged from this state of concentration. 
He can explain to me this matter as it really is, and tell me whence these Tathagatas come and whither these go.' Now I am come to you, and I ask you, son of good family: 
'Whence these Tathagatas come, and whither these go?' Demonstrate to me, son of good family, this coming and going of these Tathagatas, so we may cognize this, and so we may be not lacking in vision of the Tathagatas." The Coming and the Going of Tathagatas Dharmodgata: 
Tathagatas certainly do not come from anywhere, nor do these go anywhere. 
Suchness does not move, and Tathagata is Suchness. 
Non-production neither comes nor goes, and Tathagata is non-production. One can conceive of neither coming nor going of reality-limit, and Tathagata is reality-limit. 
This same can be said of emptiness, of anything which exists in according to facts, or of dispassion, of stopping, of element of space. 
Suchness as these dharmas is Suchness as any and all dharmas, and Suchness as Tathagata is simply Suchness as any and all Tathagatas. 
Here is no division within Suchness. 
Simply before even one, throughout and after all is Suchness. 
Suchness does not even pass beyond counting, as it can not be counted to begin with and thus certainly is here nothing to end with. 
Neither is Suchness one, nor other than one by which to determine any singularity, nor two nor three nor apart from these. 
A man, scorched by the heat of summer, during the last month of summer , at noon might see a mirage floating along, and might run towards it, and think "here I shall find some water, here I shall find something to drink." What do you think, you children of good family, does this water come from anywhere, or does this water go anywhere, to or from the Eastern great ocean, or the Southern, Northern or Western? 
Sadaprarudita: No water exists in this mirage. How can its coming or going be conceived? 
Equally foolish are any and all these who adhere to Tathagatas through form and sound, and who in consequence imagine coming or going of any or all Tathagatas. 
A Tathagata can neither be seen nor determined from any form body. 
Dharma-bodies  are such Tathagatas, and the real nature of dharmas neither comes nor goes. 
Here is no real coming or going of the body of an elephant, horse, chariot or foot-soldier, tree or even a rock, which has been conjured up when magicians perform. 
Just so, here is neither coming nor going of Tathagatas which, as with all things, neither have any granting given nor even, any conjuring whatsoever. 
A sleeping person might in dreams see one Tathagata, or two, or three, or up to one thousand, or still more . On waking up, however, they no longer see even one single Tathagata. 
What do you think, dear children of good family, have these Tathagatas come from anywhere, or gone to anywhere? 
One cannot conceive as in any dream any dharma whatsoever as having the status of a full and perfect reality, for any dream is deceptive. 
Just so Tathagatas teach all dharmas are as a dream. 
These who do not come to naturally and wisely know all dharmas as these really are, which is to say, as a dream, as Tathagata points out, these adhere to Tathagatas through their name-body and form-body, and in consequence these imagine Tathagatas come and go. 
These who in ignorance of true nature of dharmas imagine a coming OR going of Tathagatas, these are just foolish common people...not as yet diligent to truth, and presently as is as good as any and all times these belong to birth-and-death with six places of rebirth, and these are far from these revelations of perfection of wisdom, far away from dharmas of a Buddha - yet experience these dharmas within each and every breath, as close as pure life itself. 
On the contrary, however, these who know all dharmas as a dream, i.e., as they really are, are in agreement with the teaching of Tathagata, these do not imagine the coming or going of any dharma, nor its production or stopping. 
These naturally know Tathagatas true nature, and do not imagine coming or going of Tathagatas. And these who naturally know true nature of Tathagata, these course near to full enlightenment and these course in this perfection of wisdom. These disciples of Lords do not consume alms fruitlessly,  and these are worthy of the world's results and dedications. 
The gems which are in the great ocean do not come from any place in the East, or West, or any other of the ten directions, but these owe existence to wholesome roots of beings. 
These are not produced without cause, or, are not without cause to be produced. 
Such simply manifest due to these causes and conditions. Yet still, as dependent on cause, condition and reason, these gems are coproduced and stopped by conditions, these do not pass on to any place anywhere in the world in any of the ten directions. And nevertheless, as these conditions exist, the gems are augmented; as these conditions are absent, no augmentation takes place. Just so the perfect body of Tathagatas does not come from any place anywhere in the ten directions, and it does not go to any place anywhere in the world with its ten directions. 
It is brought to perfection by conduct and action in time, and it is produced dependent on causes and conditions, coproduced by subsidiaries, produced as result of karma done in this past. 
It is, however, not in any place anywhere in the world with its ten directions. 
In this way this sound comes forth from the boogharp, dependent on causes, dependent on conditions. And yet that sound does not come forth from that hollow body of the harp, nor from the parchment sounding board, nor from the strings, nor from the hollow arm, nor from the bindings, nor from the plectrum, nor from the person who plays it, nor from this person's exertions OR knowledge. It is just the combination of all of these which makes the sound conceivable. And as it is stopped, the sound also does not go anywhere. 
But the augmenting of Buddha-body does not result from one single cause, nor from one single condition, nor from one single wholesome root. This is also not without cause. This is coproduced by a totality of many causes and conditions, but does not come from anywhere. 
So, also as this totality of causes and conditions cease to be, this does not go to anywhere. 
Thus is viewed the coming and going of Tathagatas, and this conforms to true nature of all dharmas. 
And it is just as this is naturally re-cognized as Tathagatas, and also all dharmas, are neither produced nor stopped, you are fixed on full enlightenment, and you definitely course in perfection of wisdom and in skill in means. As this disquisition of the fact Tathagatas neither come nor go is being taught, the earth and the entire great trichiliocosm shakes in six ways, stirs, quakes, gets agitated, resounds and rumbles. And all the realms thought to be and seen as of Mara are stirred up and discomfited. 
All the grasses, shrubs, and herbs and trees in the great trichiliocosm bend in the direction of the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata. 
Flowers come up out of season. From high up in the air a great rain of flowers comes down. And Sakra, Chief of Gods, and the Four Great Kings scatter and pour heavenly sandalwood powder and heavenly flowers over the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata, and say: "Well spoken, son of good family. 
In consequence of your asking for this disquisition on the non-coming and non-going of Tathagatas, and through my exposition of this, eight thousand living beings acquire patient acceptance of dharmas which fail to be produced, eighty niyutas of living beings raise their hearts to full enlightenment, and of sixty-four thousand living beings the dispassionate, unstained dharma-eye is purified for vision of dharmas. Sadaprarudita's Self Sacrafice The Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita now has a supreme, most sublime feeling of zest and joy: "It is a gain to me, a very great gain by asking for perfection of wisdom, and for this disquisition, I have wrought the weal of so many beings. 
This alone brings me merit sufficient for the accomplishment of full enlightenment. Unquestionably I become a Tathagata." In his zest and joy he rose seven palm trees high into the air, and, standing at the height of seven palm trees, he reflected: "How can I, standing here in the air, do honor to the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata?" Sakra, Chief of Gods, now sees him, and reads his thoughts, presents him with heavenly Mandarava flowers, and says to him: 
"Honor the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata with these heavenly flowers! 
Rare are the beings who, like you, have the strength, for the sake of all beings through countless aeons to bear such great burden." The Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita now takes the Mandarava flowers from Sakra, Chief of Gods, and scatters these over the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata. 
He presents the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata with his own body, and said to him: 
"I give you myself as a present, and I am your attendant and servant from today onwards." And with hands together he stands before Dharmodgata. The merchant's daughter and her five hundred maidens said to the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita: "We in our turn make a present of ourselves to you, son of good family. Through this wholesome root we also become recipients of just these dharmas, and together with you we again and again honor and revere the Buddhas and Lords, and the Bodhisattvas, and we remain near to you." Sadaprarudita replied: 
"As you, maidens, in accordance with my own earnest intention, give yourselves with earnest intention to me, I accept you." The maidens replied: "We are in accord with you, and with earnest resolution we give ourselves as presents to you, to do with us as you may." Here and now the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita presented the merchant's daughter and her five hundred maidens, embellished and adorned, together with their five hundred well-decorated carriages, to the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata, and said: "All these I present to you as attendants and servants, and also the carriages for your own use." Sakra, Chief of Gods, applauded him and said: 
"Well done, son of good family! 
Through this thought of renunciation one soon realizes full enlightenment, and the worship one pays thus to exponents and preachers of Dharma enables one to hear about perfection of wisdom and skill in means. 
Also in these three times Tathagatas, as these still are Bodhisattvas, do, by this fact these renounce everything, procure a claim to realization of full enlightenment; and these also ask questions about perfect wisdom and about skill in means." The Bodhisattva Dharmodgata accepted Sadaprarudita's gift, so his wholesome root might reach fulfillment. 
Immediately afterwards he returned this to Sadaprarudita. After this all, now the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata goes into his house. The sun is about to set. 
I remain either standing or walking, until the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata again comes out of his house, in order to reveal dharma to us." The Bodhisattva Dharmodgata remains for seven years immersed in one uninterrupted state of trance, and he dwelt in countless thousands of concentrations, peculiar to Bodhisattvas, which issue from perfection of wisdom and skill in means. 
For seven years Sadaprarudita adopted any other posture than sitting or lying down, and he did not fall into sloth and torpor. 
One day Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita heard a heavenly voice which said: "On the seventh day from today the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata emerges from his trance, and he at this time, seated in the center of the town, demonstrates dharma." As Sadaprarudita hears the heavenly voice, he is contented, elated, joyous, overjoyed and jubilant. Together with the merchant's daughter and her five hundred maidens he cleans the ground, spreads out the seat made of the seven precious things, takes off his upper garment, and spreads it on top of the seat. The maidens also took off their upper garments, spread their five hundred upper garments on this seat, and thought: 
"Seated on this seat the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata demonstrates dharma."  And these also are contented, elated, joyous, overjoyed and jubilant. 
As the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita wanted to sprinkle the ground he can not find any water, though he searched all round. 
For Mara, the Evil One, was thought to and therefore seen to have hidden all the water. And he did this so Sadaprarudita, as he can not find any water, becomes depressed and sad, or change his mind, with the result his wholesome root may vanish, or the fervor of this worship be dimmed. The Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita now thinks to himself: "Let me pierce my own body, and sprinkle the ground with my blood. 
The ground is full of rising dust, and I fear some of it may fall on the body of the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata. 
Better surely this my body be destroyed by such an action rather than by an ineffectual one. 
For the sake of sense pleasures, as a result of sense pleasures many thousands frames of mine again and again, while I wandered in birth-and-death, break up, but never in conditions as favorable as these, never for the sake of gaining the good law. 
As these once more be broken up, let these in any case be broken up in a holy cause." He  took a sharp sword, pierced his body on every side, and everywhere sprinkled any piece of ground with his own blood. The merchant's daughter with her five hundred maidens followed his example, and did as he did. 
But here is no alteration of thought in either the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita, or in all these maidens, which gives what's seen and thought of as Mara, the Evil One, a chance of entering in order to obstruct these wholesome roots. Sakra, Chief of Gods, thinks to himself: "It is wonderful how this Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita loves dharma, how firm his sense of obligation, how great this armor he has put on, and how he disregards this body, this life, and these pleasures, and how resolutely he sets out with the goal of knowing full enlightenment, in his aspiration to set free any and all beings from measureless sufferings of birth-and-death, once he knows full enlightenment." Sakra now changes by magic all this blood into heavenly sandalwood water. And all round this piece of ground, for one hundred leagues, an inconceivable sublime scent, the scent of the heavenly sandalwood water, filled the air. 
"Well done, son of good family! 
The Tathagatas in this past  also procure the right to full enlightenment through this kind of earnest intention, vigor, and love for dharma." The Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita now thinks to himself: "I spread out the seat for the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata, and I swept and sprinkled this piece of ground. Now I must still get flowers with which to cover this peace of ground, and to scatter over the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata as he demonstrates dharma." Sakra now says to Sadaprarudita: 
"Accept these heavenly Mandarava flowers for this twofold purpose!" And he presented him with a thousand heavenly Khara measures of heavenly flowers. 
And the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita accepted these flowers, and used some of them to cover the piece of ground, and, later on, he strewed others over the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata. Dharmodgata's Demonstration of Dharma At the lapse of seven years the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata emerges from his trance, goes up to the seat spread out for him, sits down on this, and, surrounded and attended by an assembly of many hundreds of thousands, he demonstrates dharma. 
The moment the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita  sees the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata, he is filled with a kind of happiness which a monk feels as, with one-pointed attention, he obtains the first trance. 
"The perfection of wisdom is self-identical and as such, any and all dharmas are same. 
Perfect wisdom is boundless and as such, any and all dharmas are boundless. 
As the ocean is boundless, so perfect wisdom. 
As Meru shines in multicolored brilliance, so does perfection of wisdom. 
Perfect wisdom is self-identical, and as such, the adamantine dharma is self-identical. 
Perfect wisdom is undifferentiated and as such, all dharmas are undifferentiated. 
Perfect wisdom is unthinkable and as such, all dharmas are unthinkable." Here and now on this occasion is born in the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita the king of concentrations called "sameness of any and all dharmas," and, consequent on this, the concentrations called "isolation of any and all dharmas," "immobility of any and all dharmas," "absence of any and all mental acts in any and all dharmas," "lack of numbness in any and all dharmas," "the one taste of any and all dharmas," "boundlessness of any and all dharmas," "boundless like firmament," "boundless like the ocean," "brilliant and multicolored like Meru," "not fashioned, like firmament," "boundless like form, etc.," "boundless like the element of earth, etc.," "adamantine," "non-differentiatedness of any and all dharmas," "non-apprehension of any and all dharmas," "sameness of any and all dharmas whatever these may surpass," "any and all dharmas are powerless to act," "any and all dharmas are unthinkable." Beginning with these, the Bodhisattva Sadaprarudita acquired six million concentration doors. 
In this manner also do you know this perfection of wisdom as the one who nurses the cognition of the all-knowing in the Bodhisattvas. 
Now, through Tathagatas sustaining power this is well written, in very distinct letters, in a great book, one honors, reveres, adores and worships this, with flowers, incense, scents, wreaths, unguents, aromatic powders, strips of cloth, parasols, banners, bells, flags and with rows of lamps all round, and with manifold kinds of worship. 
This is our admonition to you, Ananda. 
Ananda: 
He is, O Lord. 
Here now, Ananda, just as you give affection, faith and respect to me as I am at present in this incarnation, just so, Ananda, act after my decease towards this perfection of wisdom. 
For the second time, for the third time, I entrust and transmit to you this perfection of wisdom, so this does not disappear. 
As long as this perfection of wisdom is observed in the world, one can be sure for so long does Tathagata abide in this, also for so long does Tathagata demonstrate dharma, and the beings in it are not lacking in vision of the Buddha, hearing of dharma, attendance of the Sangha. 
Enraptured, the Bodhisattvas, headed by Maitreya, and the Venerable Subhuti, and the Venerable Ananda, and Sakra, Chief of Gods, and the entire world with its Gods, men, Asuras, Garudas and Gandharvas delighted in the Lord's teaching. 

	Verses On The Perfection Of Wisdom  Prajnaparamita Ratnagunasamcayagatha  Translated by Edward Conze  (Taisho Tripitaka 0229)    Homage to all Buddhas and Bodhisattvas! 
Thereupon the Lord, in order to gladden the four assemblies, and to further lighten up this perfection of wisdom, preached at that time the following verses:   Chapter I  Preliminary Admonition  "Call forth as much as you can of love, of respect and of faith!
Remove the obstructing defilements, and clear away all your taints! Listen to the Perfect Wisdom of the gentle Buddhas,
Taught for the weal of the world, for heroic spirits intended! 
The rivers all in this Roseapple Island Which cause the flowers to grow, the fruits, the herbs and trees, They all derive from the might of the king of the Nagas,
From the Dragon reside in Lake Anopatapta, his magical power. 
Just so, whatever Dharmas the Jina's disciples establish, Whatever they teach, whatever adroitly explain--
Concerning the work of the holy which leads to the fullness of bliss, And also the fruit of this work--it is the Tathagata's doing. 
For whatever the Jina has taught, the Guide to the Dharma His pupils, if genuine, have well been trained in it.
From direct experience, derived from their training, they teach it, Their teaching stems but from the might of the Buddhas, and not their own power.   The Basic Teachings 
No wisdom can we get hold of, no highest perfection, No Bodhisattva, no thought of enlightenment either.
When told of this, if not bewildered and in no way anxious, A Bodhisattva courses in the Well-Gone's wisdom. 
In form, in feeling, will, perception and awareness Nowhere in them they find a place to rest on.
Without a home they wander, dharmas never hold them, Nor do they grasp at them--the Jina's Bodhi they are bound to gain.  The wanderer Srenika in his gnosis of the truth Could find no basis, though the skandhas had not been undone.
Just so the Bodhisattva, when he comprehends the dharmas as he should
Does not retire into Blessed Rest. In wisdom then he dwells. 
What is this wisdom, whose and whence, he queries, And then he finds that all these dharmas are entirely empty.
Uncowed and fearless in the face of that discovery Not far from Bodhi is that Bodhi-being then. 
To course in the skandhas, in form, in feeling, in perception. Will and so on, and fail to consider them wisely; Or to imagine these skandhas as being empty;
Means to course in the sign, the track of non-production ignored. 
But when he does not course in form, in feeling, or perception In will or consciousness, but wanders without home,
Remaining unaware of coursing firm in wisdom, His thoughts on non-production--then the best of all the calming trances cleaves to him. 
Through that the bodhisattva now dwells tranquil in himself, His future Buddhahood assured by antecedent Buddhas. Whether absorbed in trance, or whether outside it, he minds not.
For of things as they are he knows the essential original nature. 
Coursing thus he courses in the wisdom of the Sugatas, And yet he does not apprehend the dharmas in which he course.
This coursing he wisely knows as a no-coursing, That is his practice of wisdom, the highest perfection. 
What exists not, that non-existent the foolish imagine; Non-existence as well as existence they fashion.
As dharmic facts existence and non-existence are both not real. A bodhisattva goes forth when wisely he knows this. 
If he knows the five skandhas as like an illusion, But makes not illusion one thing, and the skandhas another;
If, freed from the notion of multiple things, he courses in peace-- That this is his practice of wisdom, the highest perfection. 
Those with good teachers as well as deep insight, Cannot be frightened on hearing the Mothers' deep tenets.
But those with bad teachers, who can be misled by others, Are ruined thereby, as an unbaked pot when in contact with moisture.   Three Key Terms Defined 
What is the reason why we speak of 'Bodhisattvas?' Desirous to extinguish all attachment, and to cut it off, True non-attachment, or the Bodhi of the Jinas is their future lot.
'Beings who strive for Bodhi' are they therefore called. 
What is the reason whey 'Great Beings' are so called? They rise to the highest place above a great number of people;
And of a great number of people they cut off mistaken views. That is why we come to speak of them as 'Great Beings.' 
When free from doubts the Bodhisattva carries on his practice,
As skilled in wisdom he is knows to swell.
All dharmas are not really there, their essential original nature is empty.
To comprehend that is the practice of wisdom, perfection supreme.   Chapter II 
Where Bodhisattvas Stand 
He does not stand in form, perception or in feeling,
In will or consciousness, in any skandha whatsoever. In Dharma's true nature alone he is standing.
Then that is his practice of wisdom, the highest perfection. 
Change and no change, suffering and ease, the self and not-self,
The lovely and repulsive--just one Suchness in this Emptiness they are. And so he takes not his stand on the fruit which he won, which is threefold--
That of an Arhat, a Single Buddha, a Buddha fully enlightened. 
The Leader himself was not stationed in the realm which is free from conditions,
Nor in the things which are under conditions, but freely he wandered without a home:
Just so, without a support of a basis a Bodhisattva is standing.
A position devoid of a basis has that position been called by the Jina.  
Wherein Bodhisattvas Train 
Those who wish to become the Sugata's Disciples,
Or Pratyekabuddhas, or likewise, Kings of the Dharma--
Without resort to this patience they cannot reach their respective goals. They move across, but their eyes are not on the other shore. 
Those who teach dharma, and those who listen when it is being taught; Those who have won the fruit of an Arhat, a Single Buddha, or a world-savior; And the Nirvana obtained by the wise and the learned--
Mere illusions, mere dreams--so has the Tathagata taught us. 
Four kinds of persons are not alarmed by this teaching: Sons of the Jina skilled in the truths; saints unable to turn back,
Arhats free from defilements and taints, and rid of their doubts; Those whom good teachers mature are reckoned the fourth kind. 
Coursing thus, the wise and learned Bodhisattva, Trains not for Arhatship, nor on the level of Pratyekabuddhas. In the Buddha-dharma alone he trains for the sake of all-knowledge.
No training is his training, and no one is trained in this training. 
Increase or decrease of forms is not the aim of this training, Nor does he set out to acquire various dharmas.
All-knowledge alone he can hope to acquire by this training. To that he goes forth when he trains in their training, and delights in its virtues.   The Facts of Existence 
Forms are not wisdom, nor is wisdom found in form, In consciousness, perceptions, feeling, or in will. They are not wisdom, and no wisdom is in them.
Like space it is, without a break or crack. 
Of all objective supports the essential original nature is boundless; Of beings likewise the essential original nature is boundless.
As the essential original nature of space has no limits, Just so the wisdom of the World-knowers is boundless 
'Perceptions'--mere words, so the Leaders have told us; Perceptions forsaken and gone, and the door is open to the Beyond.
Those who succeed in ridding themselves of perceptions, They, having reached the Beyond, fulfill the Teacher's commandments. 
If for eons countless as the sands of the Ganges The Leader would himself continue to pronounce the word 'being':
Still, pure from the very start, no being could ever result from his speaking. That is the practice of wisdom, the highest perfection."   Conclusion  And so the Jina concludes his preaching, and finally tells us:
"When all I said and did at last agreed with perfect wisdom,
Then this prediction I received from Him who went before me:
'Fully enlightened, at a future time thou shalt a Buddha be!' "  
Chapter III  The Merit Derived from Perfect Wisdom 
"One who will take up this Perfection of Wisdom,
Wherein the Saviours course, and constantly study it;
Fire, poison, sword and water cannot harm him, And also Mara finds no entrance, nor his host. 
Someone may for the Sugata who went to rest build Stupas, Made of the seven precious things, and worship them;
Until thousands of kotis of fields are filled with these Stupas Of the Sugata, countless as the sands of the Ganges; 
And like him as many beings again as there are in endless kotis of fields, They all would do worship, without doing anything else, - With heavenly flowers and the best perfumes and unguents, -
Let us reckon for aeons in the three periods, and still more than that: 
But if someone else had copied this book, the Mother of the Sugatas, From which come forth the Guides with the ten powers, Would bear it in mind, revere it with flowers and unguents, -
An infinitesimal portion of his merit would have those who had given worship to the Stupas.  Perfect Wisdom a Great Lore 
This Perfection of Wisdom of the Jinas is a great lore, Appeasing dharmas making for sorrow and ill in many a world of beings.
The Saviours of the World in the past, and in the future, and those [now] in the ten directions, They have, by training in this lore, become the supreme physicians. 
And [also] those who course in the practice of pity and concern for the welfare of others, They, the wise, by having trained in this lore, will experience enlightenment.
Those who have conditioned happiness, and those who have unconditioned happiness, All their happiness should be known as having issued from this.  Perfect Wisdom and the Other Five Perfections 
Gems exist potentially scattered in the earth, And, when conditions are favourable, they grow in great variety:
All the qualities of enlightenment [that are in] the five perfections, They all grow from the perfection of wisdom. 
Wherever, we know, the Universal Monarch may travel, There is all the army of all the seven precious things:
Wherever there is this perfection of wisdom of the Jinas, There also all dharmas of good quality are brought along."  
Chapter IV 
Relative Value of Relics and Perfect Wisdom 
Asked a question by the Jina, Sakra answered:
"If I could have Buddhafields like the sands of the river Ganges, All of them filled to the top with the relics of the Jinas: Nevertheless I would still take this wisdom, the foremost of the perfections.  For what reason? It is not that I lack in respect for the relics,
But they are worshipped because they are fostered by wisdom.
Just as every man who is supported by the king gets worship,
Just so the Buddha-relics, because they are supported by the perfection of wisdom.  Simile of the Wishing Jewel 
A precious gem, in possession of all qualities, priceless, The basket in which it may be, should be paid homage to; Even when it has been taken out, the basket continues to emit its radiance: Such are the qualities of that gem.  Just so it is with the qualities of wisdom, the foremost perfection,
Which gain worship for the relics of the Jina even after he has gone to rest.
Therefore let him who wants to win the Jina-qualities Take up the perfection of wisdom. She is the liberation."  Perfect Wisdom and the Other Five Perfections  [The Lord then said:] "Wisdom controls him who gives gifts,
And also morality, patience, vigour and concentration.
She takes hold of the wholesome dharmas so that they may not be lost. She alone is also the one who reveals all dharmas. Simile of the Shadows 
There are in Jambudvipa many thousands of kotis of trees, Of different species, manifold and different in form; And yet there would not also be a difference between their shadows,
But when one speaks they are all equally reckoned as shadows: 
Just so do these five perfections of the Jinas Have their name from the perfection of wisdom:
When they are being turned over into all-knowledge, The name of enlightenment provides one single principle for all the six of them. 
Chapter V 
The Counterfeit and the True Perfection of Wisdom 
When a Bodhisattva [falsely] reveals form, perception, feeling, will, Or thought as impermanent [claiming that they are destroyed], - In the counterfeit [perfection of wisdom] he courses, considering not wisely;
Because the learned never effect the destruction of a dharma. 
Wherein of form, of feeling, or perception, Or consciousness, or will there is no apprehension:
By the method of emptiness and non-production [he] cognizes all dharmas. This is the practice of wisdom, the foremost perfection.  Perfect Wisdom Greater Than Any Other Spiritual Gift 
If someone would discipline in Arhatship as many beings As there are in fields equal to the sands of the river Ganges: And if someone else, having copied this perfection of wisdom,
Would give the book to another being, - his would be the more distinguished merit. 
For what reason? The supreme Teachers, trained in this, Make all dharmas intelligible in this emptiness. When they have learned that the Disciples speedily experience their own kind of emancipation,
Others experience Pratyekabuddha-enlightenment, others again the Buddha-enlightenment.  Importance of the Thought of Enlightenment 
Where there is no sprout, there can in the world be no tree. How can therein be the production of branches, leaves, fruits or flowers?
Without the aspiration for enlightenment there is no possibility of a Jina in the world. How then could Sakra, Brahma, fruit and disciples manifest themselves? 
When the orb of the sun sends forth a multitude of light, Then beings exert themselves in doing their work:
So, when the thought of enlightenment has come into being for the sake of knowing the world, Through its cognition all the dharmas of quality are assembled. 
If there were no Chief of the Serpents in his Anavatapta [Lake], How could there be here in Jambudvipa a flowing along of the rivers?
And if there were no rivers, fruits and flowers could not possibly be, And there would also be no manifold jewels in the oceans. 
So, if there were no thought of enlightenment, how could there be The flowing along of the cognition of the Tathagata in all these worlds? And if there is no cognition, there can be no growth of the virtues,
No enlightenment, nor the oceanlike dharmas of the Buddha.  The Sun and the Firefly 
If all the light-emitting animals everywhere in this world Would, for the purpose of illumination, shed light:
One single ray, issued from the orb of the sun, outshines them all, And infinitesimal would be all the luster of the hosts of light-emitting animals.  
Chapter VI 
Supreme Merit of Dedication and Jubilation 
However much merit the hosts of Disciples may beget,
Associated with giving, morality, and [meditational] development: But if a Bodhisattva rejoices with one single thought, There would [by comparison] be no mass of merit in all the hosts of the Disciples.  The Range of Jubilation 
If we take the niyutas of kotis of Buddhas, who have gone by in the past period of time, And those who just now abide in endlessly many thousands of kotis of Buddha-fields; And also those Saviours of the world who, having gone to Parinirvana,
Will demonstrate the jewel of Dharma for the sake of the complete extinction of suffering; 
If we consider the merit of those Jinas during the period Beginning with the first production of the thought of the foremost enlightenment, Until the time of the extinction of the good Dharma of the Guides,
And the dharmas connected with the perfections, and also the Buddha-dharmas,  And also the merit of the offspring of the Buddhas, and of the Disciples,
Be they in training or adepts, with outflows or without, -
Having heaped it all up, the Bodhisattva rejoices at it, And turns it all over to the enlightenment which is linked with the weal of the world.  True and False Turning over  When in one who turns over there proceeds the perception of a thought,
Or if the turning over of the perception of enlightenment involves the perception of a being: Established in perception, false views, and thought, it is tied by the triple attachment.
It does not become turned over to those who apprehend it. 
But when he thus cognizes: These dharmas are extinct and stopped, And wherein they are turned over, that is also extinct; Nor is ever anywhere a dharma turned over into a dharma:
Then it does become turned over in one who thus considers wisely. 
When he makes a sign, he does not turn over [to enlightenment], But if [he turns to it as] the signless, [that] becomes turned over into enlightenment.
Just as though food mixed with poison were good to cat, So has the taking of pure dharmas as a basis been spoken of by the Jina. 
Therefore thus should one train in turning over: As the Jinas wisely know that wholesome [root], -
Its class as it is, its origins as they are, its characteristics as they are, - Thus do I rejoice [in that wholesome root], thus do I turn [it] over. 
And thus turning merit over into enlightement, He does not upset the Buddha, one who preaches what the Jina has taught. As many as there are in the world Bodhisattvas who lean on a basis
All of them surpasses the hero who turns over in this way.  
Chapter VII 
Perfect Wisdom Guides the Other Perfections 
How can those niyutas of kotis of born-blind, who are without a guide, Who are not conversant with the way, find an entrance to the city? Without wisdom these five perfections are eyeless:
Those who are without the guide are unable to experience enlightenment.  When they are taken hold of by wisdom,
Then, having gained the eye, do they get that designation [i.e. 'perfection']. It is like a [religious] painting [of a deity or a saint] which is complete except for the eyes. Only after the eyes are painted in does one get one's fee.  The Attitude to Dharmas and to the Self 
When one who develops wisdom to the end does not seize on the least dharma,
Conditioned or unconditioned, dark or bright; Then one comes to speak in the world of the perfection of wisdom, [Which is like] space, wherein nothing real whatsoever is established. 
When he thinks, 'I course in the wisdom of the Jinas,
I will set free niyutas of beings touched by many ills': This Bodhisattva is one who imagines the notion of beings,
And this is not the practice of wisdom, the foremost perfection.  Faith in the Perfection of Wisdom 
The Bodhisattva who has observed this foremost perfection, When in the past he served [the Buddhas], is learned and does not doubt:
As soon as he has heard it he will again recognise the Teacher, And he will swiftly understand the Peaceful Calm of enlightenment.  Though in the past he has honoured millions of Buddhas, and served them,
If without faith in the Jina's perfection of wisdom,
Hearing of it, he will cast it away, one of small intelligence; After he cast it away, he will go to the Avici Hell, and no one can save him. 
Therefore, have faith in this Mother of all the Jinas, If you wish to experience the utmost Buddha-cognition:
Let him be like a merchant, who has travelled to the treasure island, And who, having lost his goods would [nevertheless] again return [to it].  
Chapter VIII  The Meaning of Purity 
The purity of form should be known from the purity of the fruit. From the purity of form and fruit is the purity of all-knowledge.
The purity of all-knowledge and of the fruit, and the purity of form: As with the sameness of the space-element, they are not broken nor cut apart. 
Having transcended what belongs to the triple world, the Bodhisattvas, [Although their] defilements [are] removed, exhibit [their] rebirth; [Although] freed from decay, illness and death, they exhibit decease, -
This is the perfection of wisdom in which course the constantly wise. 
This world is attached to the mud of name-and-form. The wheel of birth-and-death revolves, similar to a wind-wheel.
Having cognized the revolving world as like a snare for wild beasts The wise roam about similar to the birds in space. 
He who, coursing perfectly pure, does not course in form, Nor in consciousness, perception, feeling or will; Thus coursing he shuns all attachments.
Freed from attachments he courses in the wisdom of the Sugatas.   Chapter IX  All-round Purity 
Thus coursing, the wise and learned Bodhisattva, Having cut off his attachments, marches on unattached to the world.
As the sun, released from the planet Rahu, blazes forth,
Or, as fire, let loose, burns up grass, log and forest.  The Bodhisattva sees that all dharmas and the Perfection of Wisdom
Are pure, perfectly pure, in their essential original nature.
But he does not seize on one who sees, nor on all dharmas.
This is the practice of wisdom, the foremost perfection."   Chapter X  Qualifications for Perfect Wisdom 
Sakra, King of Gods, asks the Jina: "Coursing in wisdom, how is the Bodhisattva 'engaged in' it?"
"Who is 'joined' to not the least thing whatsoever, be it skandha, or element, He who is 'engaged' thus, that Bodhisattva is 'joined' [to wisdom]. 
As one set out for long in the vehicle should that being be known, As one who has done his duty under many niyutas of kotis of Buddhas,
Who, when he has heard that these dharmas are fictitious and like an illusion, Does not hesitate, but makes efforts to train himself.  The Simile of a Village 
If a man [coming out of] a wilderness extending over many miles Would see cowherds, or boundary lines, or woods:
He [then] regains his breath, and has no [more] fear of thieves: [For he knows that] these are signs that a village or city is quite near: 
Just so the one who searches for enlightenment, when he learns of this wisdom, The foremost perfection of the Jinas, and gets hold of it:
He regains his breath, and he has no [more] fear, Not even that of [falling on] the level of an Arhat or the level of a Pratyekabuddha.  The Simile of the Ocean 
As long as a man who travels to the watery ocean in order to see it, Still sees the trees and forests of the Himalayas, [he is far from it].
But when he no longer sees these signs, he becomes free from doubt, [and knows that] 'Quite near is the great ocean, it is not too far away': 
Just so should be known one who has set out for the foremost enlightenment, And who is learning about this perfection of wisdom of the Jinas. Although he is not one who has face to face been predicted by the Leader,
He knows that 'before long I will experience the Buddha-enlightenment.'  The Simile of Spring 
In beautiful springtime, when the stalks and leaves have come out, From the branches will, before long, come forth [more] leaves, and fruits and flowers: One who has been taken in hand by this perfection of wisdom,
Before long he will attain the foremost enlightenment of the Leaders.  The Simile of the Pregnant Woman 
When a pregnant woman is all astir with pains, One should know that the time has come for her to give birth:
Just so will the Bodhisattva, if on hearing of the wisdom of the Jinas He beholds her with delight and zest, speedily experience enlightenment."  How to Dwell in Perfect Wisdom 
"When the Yogin is coursing in wisdom, the supreme perfection, He does not see the growth of form, nor its diminution.
If someone does not see dharma, nor no-dharma, nor the Dharma-element And if he does not experience the Blessed Rest, then he dwells in wisdom. 
When he courses therein, he does not imagine the Buddhadharmas, Nor the powers, nor the roads to psychic power, nor does he imagine the peaceful calm of enlightenment.
Not discriminating, free from constructions, coursing on resolutely, This is the practice of wisdom, the foremost perfection."  
Chapter XI 
The Theme 
Subhuti asks the Buddha, the moon of the Doctrine:
"Will there be any obstacles to the precious qualities?" "Many obstacles there will be," preaches the Teacher.
"Of them I will proclaim only a few:  Various Obstacles 
Diverse and manifold flashes of ideas will arise in him
When he copies out this wisdom, the perfection of the Jinas.
Then again they will speedily vanish, like lightning, Without benefit to the weal of the world. 
This is one deed of Mara. And he may have some doubts when it is being taught:
'My name is not proclaimed by the Leader therein; Nor are the circumstances of my birth; nor my birthplace or clan.' Because of that they will not listen, and reject it. That also is Mara's deed.  The Bodhisattva-path and the Disciple-path 
Just as, in his ignorance, someone would give up the root,
And prefer, the deluded, the branches and foliage; [Or] as one who, when he had got an elephant, would want an elephant's foot instead; - Thus would be one who, having heard the Prajnaparamita, would wish for the Sutras [of the Disciples instead]. 
Just as one who had got superior food of a hundred [different] tastes, Would, although he has got the best food of all, nevertheless seek for inferior food.
So would be a Bodhisattva who, having got this perfection, Would seek for enlightenment on the level of an Arhat.  More Obstacles 
They will want honour, they will want gain, In their hearts longing for them, intent on familiarity with the families [of the faithful].
Having spurned what is right [Dharma], they will do what is wrong; Having left the right path, they have gone to a wrong road. This also is Mara's deed. 
Even though at first they have produced faith, Keen to hear this most excellent dharma;
When they find that the dharma-preacher is disinclined to do his work, They will go away, devoid of joy and very sad.  Mara's Deeds and the Buddha's Help 
When these deeds of Mara will take place, Together with many other diverse and manifold obstacles, Then many monks will be troubled thereby,
And will not bear in mind this Prajnaparamita. 
Where there are jewels which are priceless
And hard to get, their owners invariably have many foes.
Just so this wisdom, the foremost perfection of the Jinas,
Is the Dharma-jewel hard to get, and [connected with] many troubles. 
When a being has newly set out in the vehicle, and is limited in his intelligence,
He does not [at once] obtain this Dharma-jewel, hard to get. Mara will then be zealous to cause obstacles. But the Buddhas in the ten directions will be intent on helping.  
Chapter XII  Perfect Wisdom the Mother of the Buddhas 
If a mother with many sons had fallen ill, They all, sad in mind, would busy themselves about her:
Just so also the Buddhas in the world-systems in the ten directions Bring to mind this perfection of wisdom as their mother. 
The Saviours of the world who were in the past, and also those that are [just now] in the ten directions, Have issued from her, and so will the future ones be.
She is the one who shows the world [for what it is], she is the genetrix, the mother of the Jinas, And she reveals the thoughts and actions of other beings.  How the Tathagata Knows the World 
The Suchness of the world, the Suchness of the Arhats, The Suchness of Pratyekabuddhas, and the Suchness of the Jinas, As just one single Suchness free from existence, unaltering,
Has the perfection of wisdom been understood by the Tathagata. 
Whether the wise abide in the world, or whether they have gone to final Nirvana, Firmly established remains this fixed sequence of Dharmahood: 'Dharmas are empty.'
It is that Suchness (tathata) which the Bodhisattvas understand. Therefore then have the Buddhas been given the name of 'Tathagatas.' 
This is the sphere of the Guides, with their own powers,
Who reside in the delightful forests of the perfection of wisdom.
Although they fetch suffering beings out of the three places of woe, Yet they never have anywhere the notion of a being.  Similes about the Buddha 
When a lion, residing in his mountain cave, Roars fearlessly, the lesser beasts are made to tremble:
Likewise, when the Lion of Men, depending on the perfection of wisdom, Roars fearlessly, the many heretics are made to tremble. 
Just as the rays of the sun, supported by the ether, Dry up this earth, and do reveal its form:
Just so the king of the Dharma, supported by the perfection of wisdom, Dries up the river of craving and reveals the dharma.  The Tathagata's Vision of Dharma 
Wherein there is no vision of form, no vision of feelings, No vision of perception, no vision of will, No vision of consciousness, thought or mind,
This has been expounded as the vision of Dharma by the Tathagata. 
A vision in space is a being, so they declare. A vision like that of space, so should you consider that object!
Thus has the vision of Dharma been expounded by the Tathagata. But it is not possible to report on that vision by definite statements [that differ from it].  
Chapter XIII  Simile of the King and His Ministers 
Who sees thus, he sees all dharmas. When the minister does everything, the king is evenminded.
Whatever Buddha-actions there are, whatever dharmas of the Disciples, It is the perfection of wisdom which effects them all. 
A king does not travel to villages or into the countryside; But in his own home is the meeting-place where he assembles all:
Just so the Bodhisattva does not move away from the dharmic nature of dharmas, But he assembles all the qualities in the Buddha-dharmas.  
Chapter XIV  The Bodhisattva and Enlightenment 
The Bodhisattva who has firm faith in the Sugata, Who is resolutely intent on the supreme perfection of wisdom; Gone beyond the two levels of the Disciples and Pratyekabuddhas,
He will swiftly attain, unhindered, the enlightenment of the Jinas.  The Simile of the Ship 
When a ship breaks up in the ocean, Those who do not get hold of a corpse, a stick or a log, Go to their destruction in the midst of the water, without having gained the shore;
But those who hold on to something, travel to the other shore and reach it: 
Just so those who, although endowed with some faith and in possession of some serenity, Reject the perfection of wisdom, the mother:
In the ocean of birth-and-death they must wander about for ever and ever, In birth, decay, death, sorrow, turmoil, and the breaking up [of limbs]. 
But those who have been taken hold of by the supreme wisdom, Skilled in seeing the own-being of existence, seers of ultimate reality:
They are persons worthy of the vehicle who have collected the wealth of merit and cognition. They will speedily experience the exceedingly wonderful Sugata-enlightenment.  The Simile of the Jar 
It is as if someone would transport water in an unbaked jar; One should know that it will break quickly, because it does not hold the water well.
But when water is transported in a fully baked jar, that on the way It might break there is no fear, and it gets safely to the house: 
Although the Bodhisattva be full of faith, If deficient in wisdom he swiftly reaches destruction. But when taken hold of by both faith and by wisdom,
Gone beyond the two levels he will attain the supreme enlightenment.  The Simile of the Two Ships 
A ship, which is not well got ready, in the ocean Goes to destruction, together with its goods and merchants.
But when a ship is well got ready, and well joined together, Then it does not break up, and all the goods get to the [other] shore. 
Just so a Bodhisattva, exalted in faith, But deficient in wisdom, swiftly comes to a failure in enlightenment.
But when he is well joined to wisdom, the foremost perfection, He experiences, unharmed and uninjured, the enlightenment of the Jinas.  The Simile of the Aged Man 
An aged man, ailing, one hundred and twenty years old, Although he may have got up, is not capable of walking on his own; But when two men, both to his right and left, have taken hold of him
He does not feel any fear of falling, and he moves along at ease: 
Just so a Bodhisattva, who is weak in wisdom, Although he sets out, he breaks down midway; But when he is taken hold of by skilful means and by the best wisdom,
Then he does not break down: he experiences the enlightenment of the mightiest of men.  
Chapter XV  The Beginner and the Good Friends 
The Bodhisattvas who stand on the stage of beginners, Who with resolute intention have set out for the supreme enlightenment of a Buddha, They, the discerning, should, as good pupils intent on respect for their Gurus, -
Always tend their spiritual teachers [who are their 'good friends']. 
For what reason? From that [tending] come the qualities of the learned. They [the good friends] [are those who] instruct in the perfection of wisdom. Thus preaches the Jina, the holder of all the best qualities:
'Dependent on the good friend are the Buddha-dharmas.'  How a Bodhisattva Helps Beings 
Giving, morality, also patience and vigour, The concentrations and wisdom should be turned over into enlightenment.
But one should not grab at enlightenment, having considered [it as belonging to] the skandhas. It is thus that it should be demonstrated to beginners. 
Coursing thus, the Oceans of Qualities, the Moons of the doctrine Become the shelter of the world, its refuge, and its place of rest; The means of salvation [route], the intelligence, the islands, leaders who desire its welfare;
The light, the torch, teachers of the foremost Dharma, imperturbable. 
An armour difficult to wear the greatly determined put on;
But they are not armed with the skandhas, elements or sense-fields; They are free from the notion of the three vehicles, and have not taken hold of it; They are irreversible, immovable, and steadfast in their character. 
Being thus endowed with dharma, unimpeded, Freed from hesitations, perplexity and consternation, intent on what is beneficial, Having heard the perfection of wisdom, they do not despair.
They should be known as incapable of being led astray by others, as irreversible.  Perfect Wisdom and Its Conflict with the World 
Deep is this dharma of the Leaders, hard to see, Nor is it obtained by anyone, nor do they reach it.
For that reason, when he has obtained enlightenment, the Benevolent and Compassionate Becomes unconcerned, - 'what body of beings will cognize this?' 
For beings delight in a place to settle in, they are eager for sense-objects, Bent on grasping, unintelligent, and quite blinded.
The Dharma should be attained as nothing to settle in and as nothing to grasp. Its conflict with the world is manifest.  
Chapter XVI  On Suchness 
The space-element in the eastern direction, and in the southern, And so in the western and northern directions is boundless;
Above and below, in the ten directions, as far as it goes There is no multiplicity, and no difference is attained. 
Past Suchness, future Suchness, Present Suchness, the Suchness of the Arhats, The Suchness of all dharmas, the Suchness of the Jinas, -
All that is the Dharma-Suchness, and no difference is attained.  Wisdom and Skill In Means 
If a Bodhisattva wishes to reach this
Enlightenment of the Sugatas, free from differentiated dharmas, He should practise the perfection of wisdom, joined to skill in means. Without wisdom there is not the attainment of the Leaders of men. 
A bird with a frame one hundred and fifty miles large Would have little strength if its wings were lost or feeble:
If it should jump down to Jambudvipa from the abodes of the Gods of the Thirty-three, It would travel to its destruction. 
Even if he would procure these five perfections of the Jinas For many niyutas of kotis of aeons,
And would all the time tend the world with an infinite abundance of vows; - If he is without skill in means, deficient in wisdom, he falls into Discipleship.  The Desirable Attitude to Other Beings 
If he wishes to go forth into this Buddha-cognition, He [should have] an even mind towards the whole world, the notion of father and mother [towards all beings] He should exert himself with a thought of benevolence, and a friendly mind;
Amenable and straight, he should be soft in his speech."   Chapter XVII  The Theme 
The Elder Subhuti questions the Saviour of the World: "Teach the characteristics of those who are secluded in Peace, of the Oceans of Qualities,
How they become irreversible, and of great might. Declare, O Jina, their qualities, merely by way of outline!" 
Qualities of Irreversible Bodhisattvas 
"They are free from the perception of multiplicity; they speak suitably;
They do not take refuge with outside Sramanas or Brahmanas. The wise have avoided for all time the three places of woe, And they are practised in the ten wholesome paths of action. 
Free from self-interest they instruct the world in Dharma. They take delight in the Dharma. They always speak gently.
Standing, walking, lying down, sitting, they are fully conscious [of what they are doing]. They walk along looking ahead only one yoke, their thoughts not wandering about. 
They wear garments clean and unsoiled. They become pure through the threefold detachment. Majestic men they want no gain, but always Dharma.
They have passed beyond Mara's realms. Others cannot lead them astray. They meditate in the four trances, but they do not use those trances as a support [for a better rebirth]. 
They do not want fame, their hearts are not overcome by anger. As householders they remain constantly unattached to their entire property.
They do not seek to earn their livelihood in the wrong way, Through bewitchment-spells, or the spells which are the work of women. 
Nor do they [earn a living by] tell[ing] plausible lies to men and women. Practised in the quite detached wisdom, the best of perfections,
Free from quarrels and disputes, their thoughts firmly friendly,
They want [to see] the all-knowing, their thoughts always inclined towards the religion.  They have avoided the barbarous populations of outlying districts, of the border regions. They are free from doubts about their own stage, always fashioned like Meru.
For the sake of Dharma they renounce their very life, intent on their practice. These should be wisely known as the characteristics of the irreversible.  
Chapter XVIII  Deep Stations 
Deep are form, feeling and will, Consciousness and perception; signless in their essential original nature, and calm.
Like one who tries to reach the bottom of the ocean with a stalk, So, when the skandhas have been considered with wisdom, one does not get to the bottom of them, 
When a Bodhisattva thus understands that these dharmas In the deep vehicle are in the ultimate sense stainless;
Wherein there is neither skandha, nor sense-field, nor element, How can there be to him the attainment of his own merit anywhere?  The Simile of the Woman 
As a man, preoccupied with matters of greed, had made a date With a woman, and would, not having met her, indulge in many thoughts; As many preoccupations as he would have [in his mind] during a day,
For so many aeons does a Bodhisattva strive to reach his goal.  Considerations of Merit  If a Bodhisattva would for many thousands of kotis of aeons
Give spotless gifts, and would equally guard his morality.
And if another one were to preach the dharma associated with wisdom, the foremost perfection, - The merit from giving and morality would [by comparison] be infinitesimal. 
When a Bodhisattva, having meditated on the foremost wisdom, Emerged therefrom [i.e. that meditation] preaches the stainless Dharma,
And turns over also [the merit from] that to the enlightenment linked to the weal of the world: There is nothing that is lovely in the triple world that could become equal to him. 
And just that merit is declared to be just worthless, And likewise empty, insignificant, void and unsubstantial.
Thus coursing he courses in the wisdom of the Sugatas. Coursing [thus] he acquires immeasurable merit.  No Growth or Diminution 
As mere talk he cognizes all these dharmas Which the Buddha has demonstrated, practised and revealed.
Though he may teach for many niyutas of kotis of aeons, Yet the Dharma-element does not get exhausted nor does it increase. 
And as to these five perfections of the Jinas.
These dharmas also have been proclaimed as mere words. The Bodhisattva who turns over, without putting his mind to it,
Does not fail; but he experiences the supreme Buddha-enlightenment.   Chapter XIX  Conditioned Coproduction and the Simile of the Lamp 
The wick of a burning oil lamp, - it is not by the first incidence [of the flame]
That the wick is burned [away]; nor is it burned [away] when [that incidence] is not, without it. Nor is the wick burned [away] by the last incidence of the flame, And also when that last flame is not does the lamp wick not burn away. 
By the first thought [of enlightenment] one does not experience the foremost enlightenment, And again, when that is not there, one is not able to experience it;
Nor does the last thought arrive at the Bliss, Nor again, when it is not there, is one able to reach it.  The Simile of the Seed and the Fruit 
From a seed trees, fruits, and flowers come forth; When it is obstructed, or absent, then there is no tree from it. Just so the first thought is, of course, the foundation of enlightenment;
But when it is obstructed or absent, there is no enlightenment from it. 
Conditioned by seeds grow barley, rice and so on; Their fruits are in these [seeds], and yet they are not in them. When this enlightenment of the Jinas arises,
What takes place is an illusion, which in its own-being is without existence.  The Simile of the Water Drops 
Water drops fill a water jar drop by drop, Gradually, from the first incidence to the last one. Just so the first thought is the [initial] cause of supreme enlightenment;
Gradually are the bright qualities fulfilled in the Buddhas.  The Meaning of Emptiness 
He courses in dharmas as empty, signiess and wishless; But he does not experience the Blessed Rest, nor does he course in a sign:
As a skilful ferryman goes from this [shore] to the other shore, But does not stand at either end, nor does he stand in the great flood. 
Thus coursing, the Bodhisattva also does not think: 'Predestined by those who have the ten powers, may I experience enlightenment!'
Nor is he trembling [because he sees that] enlightenment is here not anything. Thus coursing he becomes one who courses in the wisdom of the Sugatas.  The Attitude to Places Which Might Inspire Fear 
When they have seen a world which is a wilderness, full of famine and disease, They have no fear, and go on putting on the armour.
For the wise are always joined to the limit which is further on. They do not produce the least fatigue in their minds.  
Chapter XX  The Three Doors to Deliverance, and the Buddha-dharmas 
Furthermore, the Bodhisattva who courses in the wisdom of the Jinas Cognizes these skandhas as unproduced, as empty from the beginning.
Even during the time that unconcentrated he views in compassion the world of beings, He does not become destitute of the Buddha-dharmas.  The Simile of the Hero 
A skilful man, endowed with all qualities, Powerful, unassailable, well-qualified, instructed in many arts, Perfect in archery, devoted to many crafts,
Perfect in knowing the various forms of magical illusion, keen on the welfare of the world 
He takes his mother and father, together with his sons and daughters And enters a wilderness, full of many hostile forces.
He conjures up many men, heroic champions, Gets away safely, and again goes back to his home; 
Just so at that time when a wise Bodhisattva Extends the great friendliness to all in the world of beings,
Having passed beyond the four Maras, and the two levels, He permanently abides in the best of concentrations, but he does not experience enlightenment.  The Simile of the Cosmos 
Supported by space is air, and [by that] the mass of water; By that again is supported this great earth and the [living] world. If the foundation of the enjoyment of the deeds of beings
Is thus established in space, how can one think of that object? 
Just so the Bodhisattva, who is established in emptiness Manifests manifold and various works to beings in the world,
And his vows and cognitions are a force which sustains beings. But he does not experience the Blessed Rest; for emptiness is not a place to stand on. 
At the time when the wise and learned Bodhisattva Courses in this most excellent quietude of the concentration on emptiness,
During that time no sign should be exalted,
Nor should he stand in the signless; for he is one who courses calm and quiet.  The Simile of the Flying Bird 
A flying bird has no footing in the intermediate space. It does not stand on it, nor does it fall to the ground. So the Bodhisattva who courses in the doors to freedom
Neither experiences the Blessed Rest, nor does he course in the sign.  The Simile of the Archer 
As a man trained in archery shoots an arrow upwards, And then again other arrows in [quick] succession, Without giving [a chance] to the first one to fall to the ground Until he wishes the arrow to fall to the ground. 
Just so someone who courses in wisdom, the best of perfections, And who accomplishes wisdom, skill in means, the powers and the ability to work wonders:
As long as these wholesome roots remain unfulfilled So long he does not obtain that most excellent emptiness.  The Simile of the Twin Miracle 
A monk endowed with the most excellent ability to work wonders Standing in the sky performs the twin miracle:
He exhibits the coming and going, the lying down and the sitting; But he cannot be made to desist, nor does he feel exhausted however long he may be in it. 
Just so the wise Bodhisattva, standing in emptiness, Perfect in cognition and the ability to work wonders, wandering without a home,
Manifests an endless variety of works to the world, But he cannot be worn down, nor does he feel exhausted for kotis of aeons.  The Simile of the Parachutes  It is as with some men who have stood on a high cliff;
If they held a parachute in each hand and would jump off into space, Their bodies, once they had left the high cliffs,
Would go on falling until they had reached the ground. 
Just so the wise Bodhisattva, having stood in compassion, Having taken-hold of the two parachutes of skill in means and of wisdom,
Considers dharmas as empty, signless and wishless; Though he does not experience the Blessed Rest, he nevertheless sees the dharmas.  The Simile of the Merchant and the Jewel Island 
Someone, desirous of jewels, has travelled to the treasure island, And, having obtained the jewels, he would again return home. Although in those circumstances the merchant lives quite happily,
Yet he bears in mind the hosts of his suffering kinsmen: 
Just so the Bodhisattva who has travelled to the treasure isle of Emptiness, And has obtained the trances, faculties and powers; Although he could experience the Blessed Rest, wholly delighting in it,
He would bear in mind all suffering beings.  The Simile of the Merchant and His Journey 
As a merchant, interested in business, goes into the cities, Market towns and villages, which he comes across on his way, so as to get acquainted with them; But he neither abides therein, nor in the treasure island;
But he, the discerning, becomes skilful in the path [which leads] to his home. 
Just so the wise Bodhisattvas who become skilful everywhere In the cognition and emancipation of the Disciples and Pratyekabuddhas,
They abide not therein, nor in the Buddha-cognition, Nor in what is conditioned. Wise as to the path becomes the one who knows the method. 
The Bodhisattva Undefinable 
At the time when he has communed with the world in friendliness, And courses in the concentrations on emptiness, the signless and the wishless: It is impossible that he either would [have an inclination to] reach the Blessed Rest, Or that he could be defined by the conditioned. 
As a magically created man, or one who has made his body invisible, Cannot be defined by words:
Just so the Bodhisattva who courses in the doors to freedom Can also not be defined by words.  The Doors to Deliverance and the Irreversible Stage 
If on being questioned about the practice and the faculties A Bodhisattva does not effect the revelation of deep dharmas
Which are empty and signless, if he fails to indicate the dharmas peculiar to The irreversible stage, he should not be known as one who has been predicted.  Tokens of Irreversibility 
Not the level of an Arhat nor the Pratyekabuddha-level, Nor what belongs to the triple world does he long for in his dreams;
But he sees the Buddhas, and himself as one who preaches Dharma to the world: Predicted as 'irreversible' should he then be known. 
Having seen in his dreams the beings who are in the three places of woe, He makes the vow, 'May I that very instant abolish the places of woe!'
If, through the power of his declaration of the Truth, he appeases even a mass of fire: Predicted as 'irreversible' should he then be known. 
Those possessed by ghosts, with various diseases, in the world of mortals, Through the power of his declaration of the Truth he appeases them, he who is benevolent and compassionate.
Nor does there arise to him any self-consciousness or pride: Predicted as 'irreversible' should he then be known.  
Chapter XXI  Pride and Other Deeds of Mara 
But when there arises in him the conceit, 'I have been predestined
[Because] by [my] declaration of the Truth manifold things get accomplished,'
When a Bodhisattva sets himself above other [Bodhisattvas] as one who has been predestined, One should know that he stands in conceit, and has little intelligence.  Again, as to the power of the name, Mara, having approached,
Will say [to him]: 'This is your name.' The lineage of [your] father and mother for seven generations backwards he runs through; 'When you are a Buddha, this will then be your name!' 
If he is one who has behaved in accordance with the ascetic practices, a devoted Yogin,
[Mara will tell him:] 'Formerly [in your past lives] you have also had these very same qualities.' The Bodhisattva who, on hearing this, becomes conceited, One should know him to be possessed by Mara, of little intelligence.  Faults in Connection with Detachment 
Though he might practise quite detached from villages or cities in a mountain cave, In a remote forest, or in isolated woods, - The Bodhisattva who exalts himself, who deprecates others,
One should know him to be possessed by Mara, of little intelligence. 
Although they may constantly dwell in a village, a royal city [or] a market town; If therein they do not generate longing for the vehicle of the Arhats and Pratyekabuddhas,
But are devoted to enlightenment for the sake of maturing beings: Then this has been preached as the detachment of the Sugata's sons. 
Though he may reside in mountain caves, five hundred miles wide, Infested with wild beasts, for many kotis of years:
That Bodhisattva does not know this [true] detachment If he dwells contaminated by conceit. 
When he feels superior to Bodhisattvas who practise for the weal of the world, And who have attained the concentrations, emancipations, faculties, trances and powers,
On the ground that they do not course in the detachment of the remote forest, - Of him the Jina has said that 'he is established in Mara's sphere.' 
Whether he dwells in the neighbourhood of a village, or in the remote forest: If he is free from the thought of the twofold vehicle and fixed on the supreme enlightenment,
Then this is the detachment of those who have set out for the weal of the world. As one whose self is extinct should that Bodhisattva be considered.   Chapter XXII  The Good Friends and the Perfections 
Therefore then the learned who has slain pride, Who seeks with weighty resolution for the best enlightenment,
Should, as one attends upon a physician to be cured of a multitude of ailments, Attend upon the good friend, undaunted. 
The Buddhas, the Bodhisattvas who have set out for the best enlightenment, And [those who have] these perfections have been enumerated as 'the good friends.'
It is they who instruct them [i.e. the Bodhisattvas] in these progressive stages, For a double reason they [quickly] understand the Buddha-enlightenment. 
The past and future Jinas, and those who stand [just now] in all the ten directions, They all [have] this perfection for their path, and no other.
As a splendid illumination, as a torch, as a light, as the Teacher Have these perfections been described to those who have set out for the best enlightenment. 
As he cognizes the perfection of wisdom through the mark of emptiness, So by the same mark he cognizes all these dharmas; When he wisely knows dharmas as empty, as without marks,
In coursing thus he courses in the wisdom of the Sugatas.  Defilement and Purification 
In want of food, indulging in imagination, beings Always wander about in birth-and-death, their minds attached. Both I and Mine as dharmas are unreal and empty.
By his own self has the fool become entangled in space. 
As someone who suspects that he has been poisoned May well be struck down, although no poison has got into his stomach; Just so the fool who has admitted into himself [the notions of] I and Mine
Is forced by that quite unreal notion of an I to undergo birth and death again and again. 
Where one takes notice, there is defilement, so it has been revealed; The non-apprehension of I and Mine has been called purification.
But there is herein no one who is defiled or who is cleansed. Then the Bodhisattva has understood the perfection of wisdom.  The Supreme Merit of Perfect Wisdom 
If as many beings as there are here in the entire Jambudvipa Would all, having aspired for the foremost enlightenment,
And having given gifts for many thousands of kotis of years Dedicate it all to the enlightenment linked to the weal of the world; 
But if someone else, practised in wisdom, the foremost perfection, Would for even one single day comply with it:
An infinitesimal merit would here that heap of giving bring. Therefore the undaunted should always plunge into wisdom.  Compassion and Perfect Wisdom 
When the Yogin courses in wisdom, the best of perfections, He engenders the great compassion, but no notion of a being.
Then the wise becomes worthy of the offerings of the whole world, He never fruitlessly consumes the alms of the realm. 
The Bodhisattva who wishes to set free the gods and men, Bound for so long, and the beings in the three places of woe,
And to manifest to the world of beings the broad path to the other shore, Should be devoted to the perfection of wisdom by day and by night.  The Simile of the Pearl of Great Price 
A man who had gained at some time a very fine jewel Which he had not got before, would be contented.
If, as soon as he had gained it, he would lose it again through carelessness,
He would be sorry and constantly hankering after the jewel. 
Just so the Yogin who has set out for the best enlightenment
Should not get parted from the perfection of wisdom, which is comparable to a jewel,
Seizing the jewel which he has gained, with growing energy
He moves forward, and swiftly he comes to the [state of] Bliss.  
Chapter XXIII  The Superior Position of Bodhisattvas 
When the sun rises, free from clouds and one blaze of rays, Having dispelled the entire blinding and confusing darkness, It outshines all animals such as glowworms,
And also all the hosts of the stars, and the lustre of the moon. 
Just so the wise Bodhisattva, who courses in wisdom, the foremost perfection: Having destroyed the jungle of views, The Bodhisattva who courses in emptiness and the signless
Very much surpasses the whole world, as well as the Arhats and Pratyekabuddhas.  The Simile of the King and the Crown Prince 
Just as the son of a king, a giver of wealth, desiring the welfare [of others], Becomes a person of authority among all, much sought after.
For even now he makes [many] beings happy, How much more so when he will be established as the resourceful [ruler] of the kingdom! 
Just so the wise Bodhisattva, who courses in wisdom, A donor of the deathless, dear to gods and men.
Already now he is interested in the happiness of [many] beings, How much more so when he will be established as king of the Dharma!  
Chapter XXIV  How Mara is Discomforted and Defeated 
But Mara at that time becomes like one who feels a thorn in his flesh, Afflicted with sorrow, miserable, displeased, of little stamina.
[He manifests] a conflagration on the horizon, he hurls a meteor, in order to cause fear, 'How can this Bodhisattva be made to become despondent in his mind!' 
When the wise become resolutely intent, Day and night beholding the meaning of wisdom, the foremost perfection,
Then their bodies, thoughts and speech become [free] like a bird in the sky. How can the Kinsman of Darkness gain entrance to them?  What Makes Mara Contented 
When a Bodhisattva has taken to quarrels and disputes, And when the thoughts [of two Bodhisattvas] become mutually conflicting and angry,
Then Mara becomes contented, and supremely elated, [thinking:] 'Both these remain far distant from the cognition of the Jinas.  Both these remain far distant [from it], comparable to malignant demons; Both these will effect for themselves a waning of their pledge.
Those who are full of hate, deficient in patience, how can they have enlightenment?' - Then Mara becomes contented, together with his host. 
The Bodhisattva's Pride and Repentance 
If a Bodhisattva who has not had his prediction Should have angry thoughts for one who has had it, and should bring about a dispute: For as many moments as he persists in his obstinate faulty thoughts, For so many aeons he must again put on the armour. 
Then he sets up mindfulness, and [he reflects], 'These are unwholesome thoughts;
By means of the perfection of patience do the Buddhas experience enlightenment.' He confesses his fault, and afterwards he restrains himself,
Or he desists, and trains himself in this Buddha-dharma.  
Chapter XXV  How a Bodhisattva Is Trained 
When he trains himself, he does not anywhere approach a training,
Nor does he get at one who trains, or at the dharmas which [constitute] training. Who trains himself, without discriminating between both, - training and no-training, - He trains himself in this Buddha-dharma. 
The Bodhisattva who thus cognizes this training, He does not ever become deficient in training, or immoral.
Having found pleasure in them, he trains himself in these Buddha-dharmas. He trains himself, skilful in [the superior] training, but without apprehending anything, 
When they train thus in wisdom, to the wise shedders of light Not even one single thought arises that is unwholesome:
As when the sun goes through the sky, before the impact of its rays No darkness can maintain itself in the intermediate space.  Perfect Wisdom Comprehends All the Perfections 
For those who have effected a training in the perfection of wisdom All the [other] perfections are comprehended in it.
As in the false view of individuality all the sixty-two false views Are included, so are these perfections [included in the perfection of wisdom]. 
As when the life faculty has been stopped Also all the other faculties that may exist are stopped:
Just so, when the best of the wise course in wisdom, All these perfections have been said to be therein comprehended.  Bodhisattvas and Disciples 
In all the qualities of the Disciples and likewise of the Pratyekabuddhas, The wise Bodhisattva becomes trained:
But he does not stand in them, nor does he long for them. 'In that [also] should I be trained,' [he thinks]. In that sense he trains himself [in them].  
Chapter XXVI  Rejoicing and Perfect Wisdom 
If someone resolutely rejoices in the productions of thought [Of a Bodhisattva who] has set out for the best enlightenment and is irreversible [from it];
One might [measure] the Merus in up to a trichiliocosm by comparing them [with a tip of straw], But not that merit derived from rejoicing. 
They rejoice at the heap of merit of all beings that there are, Who desire what is wholesome, land] who want emancipation.
When for the weal of beings they have reached the infinite qualities of a Jina, They will give the Dharma to the world for the complete extinction of suffering. 
The Bodhisattva who, not discriminating, comprehends All dharmas as empty, signless and unimpeded, Without any dualism he seeks in wisdom for enlightenment.
Devoted to the foremost perfection of wisdom is that Yogin.  The Simile of Space and the Firmament 
An obstruction of the space-element by the firmament Cannot be found anywhere by anyone.
Just so the wise Bodhisattva, coursing in wisdom, Is just like open space, and he courses calmly quiet.  The Simile of the People Created by Magic 
As it does not occur to a man whom a magician has conjured up [when he looks at the audience]: 'I will please those people,' and nevertheless he performs his work;
They see him exhibiting manifold illusory works, Although he has no body, thought, or name. 
Just so it never occurs to one who courses in wisdom: 'Having known enlightenment I will set free the world!'
In his various rebirths he is associated with manifold works, Which he manifests like magical illusions, but he does not course in false discrimination.  The Simile of the Buddha's Magical Creations 
As a Buddha's magical creation performs a Buddha's work, But, when he does so, no thought of self-conceit arises in him:
Just so the wise Bodhisattva, who courses in wisdom, Manifests all works, comparable to a fictitious magical illusion.  The Simile of the Machine 
An expert and experienced mason has made a wooden apparatus; Comparable to a man or a woman it performs here all its works.
Just so the wise Bodhisattva, coursing in wisdom, Performs all his work by his cognition, but without discrimination.  
Chapter XXVII  The Bodhisattva Worthy of Homage 
To the wise, who courses thus, many congregations of gods, Having bent forth their outstretched hands, in respectful salutation, will pay homage.
The Buddhas also, as many as there are in the world-systems in the ten directions, Effect the proclamation of the garland of the praises of his qualities.  Mara Is Powerless against Certain Bodhisattvas 
If as many beings as there are in the fields countless like the sands of the Ganges Would all, let us assume, become Maras;
And if every single hair on their bodies would again magically create a snare, They all could not hinder the wise. 
For four reasons does the powerful and wise Bodhisattva Become unassailable by the four Maras, [and] unshakable:
He becomes one who dwells in the empty; and yet he is not one who abandons beings; He acts as he speaks; he is sustained by the Sugatas.  The True Attitude to Suchness 
The Bodhisattva who resolutely believes when this perfection of wisdom, The mother of the Tathagatas, is being taught, And who practises the progressive path with resolution,
He should be known as having well set out towards all-knowledge. 
But he does not come to a standing place in the Suchness of the Dharma-element. He becomes as one who, like a cloud, stands in the sky without anywhere to stand on,
As a sorcerer who, like a bird, rides on the wind which offers him no support, Or as one who, by the force of his spells, miraculously produces on a tree full-blown flowers out of season.  The Bodhisattva Dwells Supreme 
The wise and learned Bodhisattva who courses thus Does not get at one who wakes up to enlightenment, nor also at the Buddha-dharmas,
Nor at one who demonstrates, nor also at one who loves and sees the Dharma.
This is the dwelling of those who desire calm, of those who delight in the precious qualities. 
As many as there are the dwellings of Disciples and Pratyekabuddilas,
Associated with the peace and happiness of calm concentration: With the exception of the Arhat-liberation of the Tathagatas This dwelling is among all the foremost and the unsurpassed.  How and Why One Should Dwell in Emptiness 
A bird dwells in space, but does not fall down. A fish dwells amidst water, but does not die.
Just so the Bodhisattva who through the trances and powers has gone beyond, Dwells in the empty, but does not reach the Blessed Rest.  One who wants to go to the summit of the qualities of all beings, To experience the best, the exceedingly wonderful, Buddha-cognition,
To give the best gift of the highest and supreme Dharma, He should resort to this best dwelling of those who bring benefit.  
Chapter XXVIII  Who Trains in Perfect Wisdom Trains in Buddhahood 
Of all the trainings which have been revealed by the Leader, This teaching is the best and unsurpassed.
One who, wise in all trainings, wishes to go Beyond, He should train in this perfection of wisdom, in the Buddha-training.  Inexhaustibility of Perfect Wisdom 
This is the best receptacle, the storehouse of the supreme Dharma, The treasury of happiness and ease of those people who belong to the clan of the Buddhas.
The past and future world saviours, [and those who are at present] in the ten directions, They have come forth from this, and yet the Dharma-element does not get exhausted. 
As many trees, fruits, flowers and forest trees as there are, They all have come out of the earth and originate in it.
And yet the earth does not undergo exhaustion, or growth, It does not get tired, does not dwindle away, making no discrimination. 
The Buddha's offspring, the Disciples and Pratyekabuddhas, The gods, and the dharmas which lead to the ease and happiness of all the world, - as many as there are,
They all have issued from wisdom, the foremost perfection, And yet wisdom does not ever get exhausted, nor does it increase. 
As many beings as there are in the low, middle and high [regions of the] world, They have all, so has the Sugata said, been brought about by ignorance.
The machinery of ill is kept going by the full complement of the conditions, And yet the machinery of ignorance does not get exhausted, nor does it grow. 
As many roots of skilful devices as there are, or doors and methods of cognition, They all have issued from wisdom, the foremost perfection. The machinery of cognition is kept going by the full complement of conditions,
And yet the perfection of wisdom does not increase or become diminished.  Conditioned Coproduction 
But the Bodhisattva who understands conditioned coproduction as non-production And this wisdom as non-extinction:
As the rays of the sun freed from the covering of the clouds, So he has dispelled the covering of ignorance, and become one Self-Existent.  
Chapter XXIX  The Perfection of Concentration 
Those of great might who dwell in the four Trances Do not make them into a place to settle down in, nor into a home.
But these four Trances, with their limbs, will in their turn become The basis for the attainment of the supreme and unsurpassed enlightenment. 
One who is established in the Trances becomes one who obtains the foremost wisdom; And also when he experiences the four most excellent Formless Trances,
He makes these Trances subservient to the best and foremost enlightenment. But it is not for the extinction of the outflows that the Bodhisattva trains himself in these. 
Astonishing and wonderful is this accumulation of precious qualities. When they have dwelled in Trance and Concentration, there is then no sign.
When the personality of those who have stood therein breaks up, They are reborn again in the world of sense-desire, as [and where] they had intended. 
As some man from Jambudvipa who had in the past been a god,
Would, after reaching again the highest abodes of the gods, See the apartments contained in them And would then again come back, and not make his home therein; 
Just so those Bodhisattvas, bearers of the best qualities, Having dwelt in Trance and Concentration, Yogins who have exerted themselves,
Become again established in the sense-world, unstained As the lotus in water, independent of the dharmas of the fools. 
Except in order to mature beings, to purify the [Buddha-] field, To fulfil these perfections, the Great-souled ones
Do not strive after rebirth in the formless world, Lest there be a loss of the perfections and of the qualities of enlightenment therein. 
It is as if some man, having found a deposit of jewels, Would not generate longing in his intelligence with regard to it. At some other time he may acquire a few of them;
Having taken hold of them, having entered his home, he would not be covetous [for any more?]. 
Just so the wise Bodhisattvas who have gained The calm concentration of the four Trances, which gives joy and ease, Having let go the acquisition of the joy and ease of Trance and concentration,
They enter again into the sensuous world, compassionate for all that lives. 
When a Bodhisattva dwells in the concentration of the Trances, He generates no longing in his intelligence for the vehicle of the Arhats and Pratyekabuddhas:
[For then] he becomes unconcentrated, in his thought distracted and puffed up, He has lost the qualities of a Buddha, a sailor who suffers shipwreck. 
Although he applies himself to the five sense-qualities, - To form and sound, and likewise smell, and taste, and touch,
When free from the vehicle of the Arhats and Pratyekabuddhas, the joyous Bodhisattva Should, a hero, be wisely known as being constantly concentrated.  The Perfection of Vigour 
They have pure and courageous minds and are linked to other beings and persons, [When] they are practising the excellent perfection of Vigour.
As a maid servant is submissive to her master who is not subject to anyone else, So do the firmly wise submit to subjection by all beings. 
The servant does not answer back to her master, Even when abused, struck, or beaten.
Exceedingly trembling in mind, and overcome by fear, She thinks, 'He surely will kill me for that!' 
Just so the Bodhisattva who has set out for the foremost enlightenment, Should behave towards the entire world like a true servant.
Thereupon he obtains enlightenment, and the fulfilment of the qualities takes place. Fire, which has arisen from grass and sticks, [then] burns them up. 
Having renounced a happy destiny for himself, Practising his duty towards other beings, day and night, in his thought free from hesitation:
Like a mother, ministering to [her] only child, He abides in his resolute intention unexhausted.  
Chapter XXX  The Perfection of Vigour (Continued) 
The Bodhisattva who intends to wander about in birth-and-death for [a] long [time], A Yogin devoted to the purification of the [Buddha-] field for the welfare of beings,
And who does not produce the least thought of fatigue, He is endowed with the perfection of vigour, and undaunted. 
If the unwise Bodhisattva counts the kotis of aeons, And has the notion that it is long until the full attainment of enlightenment, he is bound to suffer, And for a long time he will be suffering while moving unto Dharma.
Therefore he is inferior in the perfection of vigour, and essentially indolent. 
Beginning with the production of the first thought of the foremost enlightenment, Until in the end he reaches the unsurpassed Bliss,
If night and day he would persevere single-mindedly, The wise and learned should be known as one who has put forth vigour. 
If someone would say, 'On condition that you have shattered Mount Sumeru, You will be one who will attain to the foremost enlightenment,'
And if he [then] effects a thought of fatigue or limitation [to his efforts], Then that Bodhisattva is affected by indolence.  But when there arises to him the mindful thought, 'That is nothing difficult.
In a mere moment Sumeru [will] break up into dust,' Then the wise Bodhisattva becomes one who puts forth vigour.
Before long he will attain the foremost enlightenment of the Leaders. 
If he would exert himself with body, thought and speech, [thinking] 'Having matured [it] I will work the weal of the world,' Then, established in the notion of a self, he is affected by indolence.
He is as far distant from the meditational development of not-self as the sky is from the ground. 
When one has no notion of either body, or thought, or a being, Standing rid of perception, coursing in the non-dual Dharma,
That has been called by Him who bestows benefits the perfection of vigour Of those who desire the blissful, imperishable, foremost enlightenment.  The Perfection of Patience 
When he hears someone else speaking to him harshly and offensively The wise Bodhisattva remains quite at ease and contented.
[He thinks: I 'Who speaks? Who hears? How, to whom, by whom?' The discerning is [then] devoted to the foremost perfection of patience.  If a Bodhisattva, devoted to the precious Dharma, remains patient, -
And if someone else would give the trichiliocosm filled with precious things To the Buddhas, Knowers of the world, and to the Arhats and Pratyekabuddhas, -
Infinitesimal only will be [by comparison] the merit from that heap of gifts. 
The personality of one who is established in patience is completely purified, Exalted by the thirty-two marks, [it becomes] boundless. He preaches the best empty Dharma to beings.
Dear to the entire world do the patient and discerning become. 
If someone had taken a basket containing sandalwood power, And, with respect and affection, strewed it over the Bodhisattva; And if a second one were to throw live coals over his head, -
He should produce a mind equal to both of them. 
Having thus been patient, the wise and learned Bodhisattva Dedicates that production of thought to the foremost enlightenment. The hero who remains patient in all the worlds, surpasses
Whatever Arhats and Pratyekabuddhas there may be in the world of beings.  Again, one who is patient should produce a thought [thus]
'In the hells, in the world of animals and in the Yama world there are many ills. With the sense-pleasures as cause one must experience much that causes displeasure.
Better, for the sake of enlightenment, to be patient today!' 
'Whip, stick, sword, murder, imprisonment, and blows, Decapitation, and amputation of ears, hands and feet, and of nose,
As many ills as there are in the world, [all] that I [will] endure,' [When he thinks thus, then] the Bodhisattva stands in the perfection of patience.   Chapter XXXI  The Perfection of Morality 
By morality those who hanker after calm are lifted up,
Established in the sphere of those with the ten powers, unbroken in their morality.
How ever many actions of restraint they comply with, They dedicate them to enlightenment for the benefit of all beings.  If he generates a longing for the enlightenment of Arhats and Pratyekabuddhas,
He becomes immoral, unwise, and likewise faulty in his coursing.
But when one turns over [all one's merit] into the utmost Bliss of enlightenment, Then one is established in the perfection of morality, [although] joined to the sense-qualities. 
The Dharma from which come the qualities of the enlightenment of the Gentle, That is the object of the morality of those who are endowed with the qualities of Dharma.
The Dharma which [involves] the loss of the qualities of the enlightenment of those who act for the weal of the world, As immorality has that been proclaimed by the Leader. 
When a Bodhisattva tastes of the five sense-qualities, But has gone for refuge to the Buddha, the Dharma, and the holy Sangha
And has turned his attention towards all-knowledge, [thinking] 'I will become a Buddha,' - As established in the perfection of morality should that discerning one be known. 
If, when coursing for kotis of aeons in the ten paths of wholesome action, He engenders a longing for Arhatship or Pratyekabuddhahood, Then he becomes one whose morality is broken, and faulty in his morality.
Weightier than an offence deserving expulsion is such a production of thought. 
When he guards morality, he turns [the resulting merit] over to the foremost enlightenment,
But he does not feel conceited about that, nor does he exalt himself. When he has got rid of the notion of I and the notion of other beings, Established in the perfection of morality is that Bodhisattva called. 
If a Bodhisattva, coursing in the path of the Jinas, Makes [a difference between] these beings as observers of morality and those as of bad morality,
Intent on the perception of multiplicity he is perfectly immoral. He is faulty in his morality, not perfectly pure in it.  He who has no notion of I and no notion of a being,
He has performed the withdrawal from perception, [and] he has no [need for] restraint.
One who minds neither about restraint nor about non-restraint, He has been proclaimed by the Leader as restrained by morality.  The Perfection of Giving 
But one who, endowed with morality, a pure being,
Becomes unconcerned about anything that may be dear or unclear, If, when he renounces head, hands and feet his thought remains undejected, He becomes one who gives up all he has, always uncowed. 
And having known the essential original nature of dharmas as void and without self, He would renounce his own flesh, undejected in thought, To say nothing of his renouncing of property and gold.
It is impossible that he should act from meanness. 
Through the notion of I comes about a sense of ownership about property, as well as greed; How can the deluded have the resolve to renunciation?
The mean are reborn in the world of the Pretas, Or if as humans, then they are poor. 
Then the Bodhisattva, having understood why these beings are poverty-stricken, Becomes resolved on giving, always a generous giver.
When he has given away the four Continents, well adorned, as if they were just spittle, He becomes elated, for he has not kept the Continents. 
Having given gifts, the wise and learned Bodhisattva, Having brought to mind all the beings that there are in the triple world, Becomes to all of them a donor, and he turns over
That gift into the most excellent enlightenment, for the weal of the world. 
When he has given a gift, he does not make it into a basis or support. And he does never expect any reward from it.
Having thus renounced, he becomes a wise renouncer of all. The little he has renounced becomes much and immeasurable. 
If all the beings in the entire triple world, as many as there are Would, let us assume, give gifts for endless aeons,
To the Buddhas, Knowers of the world, to Arhats and Pratyekabuddhas, But would wish for the virtues of the Disciples; 
And if a Bodhisattva, wise and skilled in means, Would rejoice at the foundation of their meritorious deed, And would, for the weal of beings, turn it over into the best and most excellent enlightenment, -
By having turned over he surpasses the [merit of the] entire world. 
If there were a large heap of spurious glass jewels, One single gem of lapis lazuli surpasses it all: Just so the Bodhisattva, who rejoices, surpasses
The [merit from the] whole vast heap of gifts of the entire world. 
If the Bodhisattva, when giving gifts to the world Remains unaffected by a sense of ownership or by affection for his property,
From that his wholesome root grows into something of great might: As the moon, in the absence of cloud, is a circle of radiant light in the bright half of the lunar month.  
Chapter XXXII  Rewards of the Six Perfections 
Through Giving a Bodhisattva cuts off rebirth as a Preta. He also cuts off poverty, and likewise all the defilements. When he courses in it [i.e. giving] he gains infinite and abundant wealth.
Through [his] giving he matures beings in trouble. 
Through Morality he avoids rebirth as one of the many animals, And also the eight untoward moments; he constantly gains rebirth at an auspicious moment.
Through Patience he gains a perfect and exalted body, With golden skin, dear to the world to look at. 
Through Vigour he does not incur the loss of the bright qualities. He gains the storehouse of the infinite cognition of the Jinas.
Through Trance he casts off the sense-qualities in disgust, He acquires the "lore," the superknowledges and concentrations. 
Having, through Wisdom, comprehended the essential original nature of dharmas,
He completely transcends the triple world and the states of woe. Having turned the precious wheel of the Mightiest of Men, He demonstrates Dharma to the world for the complete extinction of ill. 
When the Bodhisattva has fulfilled these dharmas, He then still receives the purity of the field and the purity of [the] beings [in it].
He also receives the lineage of the Buddha, the lineage of the Dharma, And likewise the lineage of the Sangha. He receives all dharmas."  Conclusion 
The supreme physician who accords medical treatment to the sickness of the world, Has taught this exposition of wisdom which is the path to enlightenment. It is called "The Path to enlightenment which is the 'Accumulation of Precious Qualities,' "


Thus have I heard. Once upon a time, the Buddha sojourned in the Jetavana park near Sravasti with an assembly of twelve hundred and fifty bhiksus. 
One day, at mealtime, the World Honoured One put on His robe, took His bowl, and entered the great town of Sravasti to beg for His food. 
After He had begged from door to door, He returned to His place. 
When He had taken His meal, He put away His robe and bowl, washed His feet, arranged His seat and sat down. 
At the time, the elder Subhuti who was in the assembly, rose from his seat, uncovered his right shoulder, knelt upon his right knee, respectfully joined the palms of his hands and said to the Buddha: 'It is very rare, O World Honoured One! 
how well the Tathagata protects and thinks of all Bodhisattvas; how well He instructs all the Bodhisattvas. 
"O World Honoured One, when virtuous men or women develop the supreme-enlightenment mind, how should their minds abide and how should they be subdued?' The Buddha said: 
As you say, the Tathagata protects, cherishes and instructs Bodhisattvas so well. 
Now listen attentively and I will tell you how the minds of virtuous men and women, who develop the supreme enlightenment mind, should thus abide and be subdued. 
) 'Oh yes, World Honoured One, I shall be glad to hear .' The Buddha said: 'Subhuti, all Bodhisattvas and Mahasattvas should subdue their minds as follows: All living beings born from eggs, wombs, humidity or by transformation, with or without form, either thoughtful or thoughtless, and neither thoughtful nor thoughtless are all led by me to the final nirvana for the extinction of reincarnation. Although immeasurable, uncountable and unlimitable numbers of living beings are thus led to  the extinction of reincarnation, it is true that not a living being is led there. 
Why so, Subhuti? 
Bodhisattva. 
'Furthermore, Subhuti, a Bodhisattva's mind should not abide anywhere when giving alms; that is to say, he should give without a mind abiding in form, or he should give without a mind abiding in sound, or in smell, or in taste, or in touch or in things . 
Subhuti thus a Bodhisattva should give alms without a mind abiding in false notions of form . , his merit will be inconceivable and immeasurable. 
Subhuti, what do you think? 
Can you think of and measure the extent of space in the East?' 'I cannot, World Honoured One!' 'Subhuti, can you think of and measure  a Bodhisattva practises charity without a mind abiding in forms, his merit is equally inconceivable and immeasurable.' 'Subhuti, a Bodhisattva's mind should thus abide as taught. 
'Subhuti, what do you think? 
Can the Tathagata be seen by means of His bodily form?' 'No, World Honoured One, the Tathagata cannot be seen by means of His bodily form. 
Because when the Tathagata speaks of bodily form, it is not  form.' The Buddha said to Subhuti: 
'Everything with form is unreal; if all forms are seen as unreal, the Tathagata will be perceived.' Subhuti said to the Buddha: 
'World Honoured One, will there be living beings who can develop a true belief in these words, sentences and chapters when they are expounded to them?' The Buddha said: 
In the last 500 years, before the final passing of the Tathagata, there will be those who will observe the rules of morality and perform good actions which will result in blessing. These people will be able to develop a faith in these sentences (which they will consider as embodying the Truth. You should know that they will not have planted good roots in just one, two, three, four, or five Buddha lands. They will have planted them in countless thousands and tens of thousands of Buddha lands. 
Upon hearing these sentences, there will arise in them a single thought of pure faith. 
Subhuti, the Tathagata knows and sees all; these living beings will thus acquire immeasurable merits. 
they will have wiped out false notions of an ego, a personality, a being and a life, of Dharma and Not-Dharma. 
cling to the notion of an ego, a personality, a being and a life. If their minds grasp the Dharma, they will  cling to the notion of an ego, a personality, a being and a life. cling to the notion of an ego, a personality, a being and a life. 
Therefore, one should not grasp and hold on to the notion of Dharma as well as that of NotDhama. 
This is why, the Tathagata always said: "Ye Bhiksus, should know that the Dharma I expound is likened to a raft." Even the Dharma should be cast aside; how much more so the Not-Dharma? 
'Subhuti, what do you think? 
Has the Tathagata ? 
'As I understand the meaning of the Buddha's teaching, there is no fixed Dharma called Supreme Enlightenment and there is also no fixed Dharma the Tathagata can expound. 
; it is neither Dharma nor Not-Dharma. 
Why is this? 
All Bhadras and Aryas differ on account of the Eternal Asamskrta Dharma.' 'Subhuti' what do you think? 
If someone filled the Universe with the seven treasures and gave them all as alms, would his merit be great?' Subhuti replied: 
Because this merit is not the nature of merit, the Tathagata says it is great.' 'Subhuti, if on the other hand, someone received and kept even a four line stanza of this sutra and expounded it to others, his merit would surpass that . 
, Subhuti, all Buddhas and their Supreme-Enlightenment-Dharma originate from this sutra. 
Subhuti, the so-called Buddhas and Dharmas are not real Buddhas and Dharmas. 
'Subhuti, what do you think? 
I have obtained the fruit of entering the stream?' Subhuti replied: 
'No, World Honoured One. Because srota-apanna means 'entering the stream', but actually there is no entry into either form, sound, smell, taste, touch or dharma. Therefore, he is called srota-apanna.' 'Subhuti, what do you think? 
Can a Sakrdagamin have this thought : I have obtained the fruit of a Sakrdagamin?' Subhuti replied: 'No, World Honoured One. 
Because Sakrdagamin means „once more to come", but actually there is neither coming nor going. Therefore, he is called a Sakrdagamin.' 'Subhuti, what do you think? 
Can an Anagamin have this thought : I have obtained the fruit of an Anagamin?' Subhuti replied: 'No, World Honoured One. 
Because Anagamin means "no-coming" but actually there is no such a thing as no-coming. Therefore, he is called an Anagamin.' 'Subhuti, what do you think? 
Can an Arhat have this thought : I have obtained the enlightenment of an Arhat?' Subhuti replied: 'No, World Honoured One. 
Because there is no Dharma which is called Arhatship. 
World Honoured One, if an Arhat thinks "I have obtained the enlightenment of an Arhat", he will still grasp and hold on to the notion of an ego, a personality, a being and a life. 
World Honoured One, the Buddha has declared that I have obtained the Passionless Samadhi and that I surpass all men. I am, therefore, the highest passionless Arhat. 
World Honoured One, I do not think "I am a passionless Arhat" for, World Honoured One, if I had thought "I have attained Arhatship", the World Honoured One would not have said: 
"Subhuti takes delight in- the calm and quiet, free from temptation and distress." The fact that Subhuti does not act  is called the calm and quiet in which Subhuti takes delight.' The Buddha said to Subhuti: 
'What do you think.? 
Do Bodhisattvas adorn Buddha lands ?' 'No. World Honoured One. 
Because this is not real adornment; it is  called the adornment of Buddha lands.' 'Subhuti, this is why all Bodhisattvas and Mahasattvas should thus develop a pure and clean mind which should not abide in form, sound, smell, taste, touch and dharma. 
'Subhuti, supposing a man has a body as great as mount Sumeru, what do you think? 
Would such a body be great?' Subhuti replied: 'Very great, World Honoured One. 
Because the Buddha says it is not the real body but is  called a great body.' 'Subhuti, if there were as many rivers like the Ganges as there are grains of sand in the Ganges, would the total of grains of sand in all these rivers be very great?' Subhuti replied: 
These rivers would be innumerable; how much more so would be their sand-grains.' 'Subhuti, I now tell you truly. 
If a virtuous man or woman filled a number of universes, as great as the number of sand-grains in all these rivers, with the seven treasures, and gave them all away in alms , would his or her merit be great?' Subhuti replied: 
'Very great, World Honoured One!' The Buddha said to Subhuti: 'If a virtuous man or woman receives and holds  even a four-line stanza of this sutra and expounds it to others, his or her merit will surpass that of the almsgiver. 
Furthermore, Subhuti, wheresoever this sutra or even one of its four-line stanzas is expounded, you should know that all devas, men and asuras should make their offerings there as if the place was a Buddha stupa or a Buddha temple. How much more so if someone is able to receive, hold , read and recite the whole sutra! 
Subhuti, you should know that such a person will achieve the highest and rarest Dhama. Wheresoever this sutra may be found the Buddha and His respected disciples will be there also.' Subhuti then asked the Buddha: 
'World Honoured One, what name should be given to this sutra and how should we receive and hold it ?' The Buddha said: 
Because, Subhuti, the Prajna- paramita as expounded by the Buddha, is not Prajna- paramita but is  so called.' 'Subhuti, what do you think Does the Tathagata expound the Dharma?' Subhuti said: 
'World Honoured One, the Tathagata does not expound anything.' 'Subhuti, what do you think? 
Are there many particles of dust in the universe?' Subhuti replied: 
'Many, World Honoured One!' 'Subhuti, the Tathagata says these particles of dust are not  called particles of dust. 
The Tathagata says the universe is not  called the universe.' 'Subhuti, what do you think? 
Can the Tathagata be perceived by means of His thirty-two physical characteristics ?' 'No, World Honoured One. The Tathagata cannot be perceived by them. 
Because the Tathagata says they are not real but are  even a four-line stanza of this sutra, and expounds it to other, the merit resulting from the latter will be greater.' At that time, after listening to this sutra, Subhuti had understood its profound meaning and was moved to tears. 
He said to the Buddha: 'How rare, O World Honoured One! The Buddha has expounded such a very profound sutra. Since I have acquired the wisdom eye, I have not heard of such a sutra. 
World Honoured One, if someone after listening to this sutra believes that his mind is clean and pure, he will realise reality. We should know that such a person will achieve the highest and rarest merit. 
World Honoured One, this Reality is not Reality but the Tathagata calls it Reality. 
World Honoured One, as I now listen to this sutra I have no difficulty in believing, understanding, receiving and holding it, but in the last epoch, the last five hundred year period if there be a man who  listen to this sutra, believes, understands receives and holds it, he will be most rare. 
Because he will no longer  an ego, a personality, a being and a life. 
Because the forms of an ego, a personality, a being and a life are not forms. 
Because when he has rejected all forms he is called a Buddha.' The Buddha said: 
'Just so! Subhuti, just so! If on the one hand, there be a man who listens to this sutra and is not filled with alarm, fear, or dread, you should know that such a person is most rare. 
Because, Subhuti, as the Tathagata says, the first perfection . 
'Subhuti, the Tathagata speaks of the Perfection of Patience  which is not but is called the Perfection of Patience. 
Because, Subhuti, in  when my body was mutilated by Kaliraja, I had at that time no notion of an ego, a personality, a being and a life. 
Because, in the past, when my body was dismembered, if I  held the conception of an ego, a personality, a being and a life, I would have been stirred by feelings of anger and hatred. 
Subhuti, I also remember that in the past, during my former five hundred lives, I was a Ksantyrsi and held no conception of an ego, a personality, a being and a life. 
Therefore, Subhuti, Bodhisattvas should forsake all conceptions of form and resolve to develop the Supreme Enlightenment Mind . Their minds should not abide in form, sound, smell, taste, touch and dharma. Their minds should abide nowhere. 
If minds abide somewhere, it will be in falsehood. 
This is why the Buddha says that Bodhisattvas' minds should not abide in form when practising charity . 
Subhuti, all Bodhisattvas should thus make offerings for the welfare of all living beings. 
The Tathagata speaks of forms which are not forms and of living beings who are not living beings. 
'Subhuti, the Tathagatas' words are true and correspond to reality. They are ultimate words, neither deceitful nor heterodox. 
Subhuti, the Dharma the Tathagata has obtained is neither real nor unreal. 
'Subhuti, if a Bodhisattva practises charity  if a Bodhisattva practises dana with a mind not abiding in dharma, he is like a man with open eyes, who can see everything in the sunshine. 
'Subhuti, in future ages, if a virtuous man or woman is able to receive, hold , read and recite this sutra, the Tathagata, by means of His Buddha Wisdom, will know and see clearly that such a person will achieve immeasurable and unlimitable merits. Subhuti, if  contradiction, the latter's merit will surpass that of the former. How much more so if this sutra is written, received, held, read, recited and expounded to others! 
'Subhuti, to sum up, the merits resulting from this sutra are inconceivable, inestimable and without limit. 
The Tathagata expounds it to those initiated into the Mahayana and the Supreme Yana. If they are able to receive, hold , read and recite it and expound it widely to others, the Tathagata will know and will see that they will achieve inexpressible and inconceivable merits that are without measure or limit. 
They will bear  Why? 
Because, Subhuti, those who take delight in the Hinayana and hold the view of an ego, a personality, a being and a life, cannot listen to, receive, hold , read and recite this sutra and explain it to others. 
'Subhuti, wheresoever this sutra may be found, all worlds of devas, men and asuras should make offerings, for you should know that such a place is just a stupa which should be revered, worshipped and circumambulated, with offerings of flowers and incense. 
'Subhuti, I remember that in the past countless aeons before the advent of Dipamkara Buddha, I met 84,000 milliards of Buddhas to whom I made offerings and whom I served faultlessly. 
Now if in the last period , read and recite this sutra, his merits will far exceed mine which resulted from my offerings made to Buddhas, for mine cannot be reckoned as one hundredth, one thousandth, one ten thousandth or one hundred thousandth part thereof; in fact no computation or comparison is possible. 
Subhuti, in the last period of the Buddha kalpa, if a virtuous man or woman is able to receive, hold , read and recite this sutra, my full statement of this person's merits will create derangement, doubt and disbelief in the minds of all listeners. 
Subhuti, you should know that as the meaning of this sutra is inconceivable, so is the fruit of its reward.' At the time, Subhuti asked the Buddha: 
'World Honoured One, if a virtuous man or woman is determined to develop the Supreme Enlightened Mind, how should his or her mind abide and how should it be subdued?' The Buddha said to Subhuti: 
I have to lead all living beings to put a stop to  or escapes suffering. 
Because, Subhuti, if a Bodhisattva clings to the notion of an ego, a personality, a being and a life, he is not a  Bodhisattva. 
Because, Subhuti, there is not really a Dharma which can develop the Supreme-Enlightenment-Mind. 
'Subhuti, what do you think? 
When the Tathagata was with Dipamkara Buddha, did He have any Dharma by means of which He attained Supreme Enlightenment ?' 'No, World Honoured One. 
As I understand the meaning of the Buddha's teaching, when He was with Dipamkara Buddha, He had no Dharma by means of which He attained "Supreme Enlightenment".' The Buddha said: 'Just so! Subhuti, just so! 
There was really no Dharma by means of which the Tathagata attained Supreme Enlightenment. 
Because "Tathagata" means the suchness of all Dharmas. If someone still says: "The Tathagata obtained Supreme Enlightenment," I tell you, Subhuti, there is no Dharma by means of which the Buddha did so, , Subhuti, that Enlightenment was by itself neither real nor unreal. 
This is why the Tathagata says that all Dharmas are Buddha's Dharmas. 
Subhuti, these so-called Dharmas are not, but are , called all Dharmas. 
'World Honoured One, the great body of which the Tathagata speaks is not great, but is  called a great body.' 'Subhuti, in like manner, if a Bodhisattva says: 
"I should lead uncountable living beings to put a stop to ", he cannot be called a Bodhisattva. 
Because there is really no dharma called the Bodhisattva . 
Therefore, the Buddha says: "Of all dharmas, there is not a single one which possesses an ego, a personality, a being and a life." Subhuti, if a Bodhisattva says: 
"I should adorn Buddha lands", he cannot be called a Bodhisattva. 
Because when the Tathagata speaks of such adornment it is not, but is , called adornment. 
Subhuti, if a Bodhisattva is thoroughly versed in , the Tathagata will call him a true Bodhisattva. 
'Subhuti, what do you think.? 
Does the Tathagata possess human eyes? 
'Yes, World Honoured One, the Tathagata possesses human eyes.' 'Subhuti, what do you think? 
Does the Tathagata possess deva eye?' 'Yes, World Honoured One, the Tathagata possesses deva eyes.' 'Subhuti, what do you think? 
Does the Tathagata possess wisdom eyes?' 'Yes, World Honoured One, the Tathagata possesses wisdom eyes. 
'Subhuti, what do you think? 
Does the Tathagata possess Dharma eyes? 
'Yes, World Honoured One. 
The Tathagata possess Dharma eyes' 'Subhuti, What do you think? 
Does the Tathagata possess Buddha eyes?' 'Yes, World Honoured One, the Tathagata possesses Buddha eyes.' 'Subhuti, what do you think? 
Does the Tathagata say that the sand-grains in the Ganges are sand-grains? 
'Yes, World Honoured One, the Tathagata says they are sand-grains' 'Subhuti, what do you think? 
If there were as many Ganges rivers as sand-grains in the Ganges, and if there were as many Buddha realms as sandgrains of all these Ganges rivers, would there be many world systems.?' 'Many, World Honoured One!' The Buddha said the living beings in all these world systems have many different minds which are all known to the Tathagata. 
Because the minds the Tathagata speaks of are not minds, but are  called minds. 
And why? 
Because, Subhuti, neither the past, the present nor the future mind can be found. 
'Subhuti, what do you think.? 
If someone filled the universe with the seven treasures and gave all away in his practice of dana, would this  cause the giver would gain a great merit.' 'Subhuti, if the merit was real, the Tathagata would not say it was great. 
He says so because there is no merit. 
'Subhuti, what do you think? 
Can the Buddha be perceived by His completely perfect physical body ?' 'No, World Honoured One, the Tathagata should not be so perceived. 
Because the Buddha says the completely perfect rupa-kaya is not, but is called the completely perfect rupakaya.' 'Subhuti' what do you think? 
Can the Tathagata be perceived by His completely perfect forms? 
'No, World Honoured One, the Tathagata should not be so perceived, because the Tathagata says the completely perfect forms are not, but are called completely perfect forms.' 'Subhuti, do not say that the Tathagata thinks: 
"I must expound the Dharma". Do not have such a thought. 
Because if someone says so, he will really slander the Buddha and be unable to understand my teaching. 
Subhuti, when  expounds the Dharma, there is really no Dharma to teach: 
'World Honoured One, will there be in future ages living beings who will believe this Dharma when they hear it?' The Buddha said: 
'Subhuti, the living beings  are neither living nor not living beings. 
Because, Subhuti, the Tathagata says these living beings are not , called living beings.' Subhuti said to the Buddha: 
'World Honoured One, does your  mean that you have not gained anything whatsoever?' The Buddha replied: 
'Just so, Subhuti, just so, I have not gained even the least Dharma from Supreme enlightenment, and this is called Supreme Enlightenment. 
Furthermore, Subhuti, this Dharma is universal and impartial; wherefore it is called Supreme Enlightenment. 
The practice of all good virtues , free from attachment to an ego, a personality, a being and a life, will result in the attainment of Supreme Enlightenment. 
Subhuti. 
the so-called good virtues  called good virtues. 
'Subhuti, if  reads and recites even a four-line stanza of this Prajna-paramita Sutra, and expounds it to others, the merit resulting from the former's dana will not be worth one-hundredth, one-thousandth, one-ten-thousandth and one-hundred thousandth part of that obtained by the latter, as no conceivable comparison can be made between the two. 
'Subhuti, what do you think? 
You should not say the Tathagata has this thought : "I should liberate living beings." Subhuti, you should not think so. 
Because there are really no living beings whom the Tathagata can liberate. If there were, the Tathagata would hold  an ego, a personality, a being and a life. 
Subhuti,  the Tathagata speaks of an ego, there is in reality no ego, although common men think so. 
Subhuti, the Tathagata says common men are not, but are  called, common men. 
'Subhuti, what do you think? 
Can the Tathagata be recognised by His thirty-two physical characteristics?' Subhuti replied: 
'Yes, yes, He can.' The Buddha said: 
'Subhuti, if the Tathagata can be recognised by His thirty-two physical characteristics, a world ruler  would be the Tathagata.' Subhuti said to the Buddha: 
'World Honoured One, as I understand your teaching, the Tathagata cannot be recognised by His thirty-two physical characteristics. 
Thereupon, the World Honoured One recited the following gatha: 'He who sees me by outward appearance  cannot perceive the Tathagata. 'Subhuti, if you have  this thought: 
"The Tathagata does not rely on His possession of characteristics to obtain supreme Enlightenment," Subhuti, banish that thought. 
Subhuti, if you think it while developing the Perfect Enlightenment Mind, you will advocate the annihilation of all Dharmas. 
Because one who develops the Supreme Enlightenment Mind, does not advocate the annihilation . 
Because, Subhuti, all Bodhisattvas do not receive reward for their merits.' Subhuti asked the Buddha: 
'World Honoured One, why do Bodhisattvas not receive reward for their merits?' 'Subhuti, Bodhisattvas should have no longing and no attachment when they practise meritorious virtues; therefore, they do not receive a reward. 
'Subhuti, if someone says the Tathagata comes or goes, sits or lies, he does not understand what I mean. 
Because the Tathagata has neither whence ; therefore, He is called the Tathagata. 'Subhuti. 
If a virtuous man or woman reduced to dust all the worlds in the Universe, would those particles of dust many?' Subhuti replied: 
'Many, World Honoured One. 
Because if they really existed, the Buddha would not say they were particles of dust. 
And why? 
Because when the Buddha speaks of particles of dust, they are not, but are  called, particles of dust. 
World Honoured One, when the Tathagata speaks of worlds, they are not, but are  called, worlds. 
Because if they really exist, they are just agglomerations. 
The Tathagata speaks of agglomerations which are not, but are  called, agglomerations.' 'Subhuti, that which is called an agglomeration cannot be spoken of, but the vulgar man has longing for and attachment to this thing. 
'Subhuti, what do you think? 
"The Buddha speaks of the view of an ego, a personality, a being and a life", Subhuti, does that person understand what I mean?" 'No, World Honoured one, that person does not understand. 
Subhuti, the so-called form of things  called the form of things. 
'Subhuti, if on the one hand, someone gave away in alms , read and recited even a four-line stanza of this sutra and expounded it to others, the latter's merit would surpass that of the former. 
In what manner should it be taught to others? 
By teaching it without attachment to form with the immutability of the absolute. 
Why is it? Because: 
All phenomena are like a dream, an illusion, a bubble and a shadow, Like dew and lightning. Thus should you contemplate them'. 
When the Buddha had finished expounding this sutra, the elder Subhuti, together with bhiksus, bhiksunis, upasakas, upasikas, and all the worlds of devas, men and asuras who had listened to His teaching, were filled with joy and believed received and observed it. 

Sūtra of the All-Encompassing Knowledge Store, the Heart of Prajñā-Pāramitā 
Translated from Sanskrit into Chinese in the Tang Dynasty by The Tripiṭaka Master Dharmacandra from India 
Thus I have heard: At one time the Buddha was staying on the Vulture Peak Mountain near the great city of Rājagṛha, together with 100,000 great bhikṣus and 77,000 Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas. At their head were Avalokiteśvara Bodhisattva, Mañjuśrī Bodhisattva, Maitreya Bodhisattva, and others. 
They all had attained the Samādhi of Total Retention, abiding in the inconceivable liberation. 
Avalokiteśvara Bodhisattva, seated in the multitude, rose and came to the Buddha. 
Facing the Buddha, he joined his palms and bent over respectfully. Gazing deferentially at the venerated visage, he said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, I would like to pronounce in this assembly Bodhisattvas’ all-encompassing knowledge store, the heart of prajñā-pāramitā. 
I pray only that the World-Honored One will permit me to pronounce to the Bodhisattvas the secret tenets of the Dharma.” The World-Honored One replied to Avalokiteśvara Bodhisattva in the Brahma tone: 
Great Compassionate One, you have my permission to speak and to be the great radiance to sentient beings.” Then Avalokiteśvara Bodhisattva, having received the Buddha’s approval and considerate protection, entered the right experience in the Samādhi of Wisdom Light. 
After he entered this samādhi, with its power, he went deep into prajñā-pāramitā and saw that the self-essence of the five aggregates is all empty. 
With the understanding that the self-essence of the five aggregates is all empty, he peacefully rose from his samādhi. 
Forthwith, he told Śāriputra the Wise, “Good man, this Bodhisattva has the heart of prajñā-pāramitā, called the All-Encompassing Knowledge Store. 
Now hearken and ponder well! 
I will pronounce it to you.” That having been said, Śāriputra the Wise responded to Avalokiteśvara Bodhisattva, “Yes, Great Pure One, I pray that you will pronounce it. 
Now is the right time.” Thereupon, he told Śāriputra, “Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas should learn in this way. 
The nature of form is emptiness; the nature of emptiness is form. 
Form is no different from emptiness; emptiness is no different from form. 
In effect, form is emptiness and emptiness is form. 
The same is true for sensory reception, perception, mental processing, and consciousness. 
The nature of consciousness is emptiness; the nature of emptiness is consciousness. 
Consciousness is no different from emptiness; emptiness is no different from consciousness. 
In effect, consciousness is emptiness and emptiness is consciousness. 
Śāriputra, dharmas, with empty appearances, have neither birth nor death, neither impurity nor purity, neither increase nor decrease. 
“Therefore, in emptiness there is no form, nor sensory reception, perception, mental processing, or consciousness; no eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, or mental faculty, nor sights, sounds, scents, flavors, tactile sensations, or mental objects; no spheres, from eye sphere to mental consciousness sphere. 
There is neither ignorance nor ending of ignorance, neither old age and death nor ending of old age and death. There is no suffering, accumulation , cessation , or the path. There is neither wisdom-knowledge nor attainment because there is nothing to attain. 
“Bodhisattvas, because they rely on prajñā-pāramitā, have no hindrances in their minds. 
Without hindrance, they have no fear. Staying far from inverted dreaming and thinking, they will ultimately attain nirvāṇa. 
Buddhas of the past, present, and future, because they rely on prajñā-pāramitā, all attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
“Hence, we know that the Prajñā-Pāramitā  is the great spiritual mantra, the great illumination mantra, the unsurpassed mantra, the unequaled mantra, which can remove all suffering. It is true, not false. 
Hence the Prajñā-Pāramitā Mantra is pronounced. 
gate gate pāragate pāra-saṁgate bodhi svāhā ||” After the Buddha pronounced this sūtra , the multitude of bhikṣus and Bodhisattvas as well as all the gods, humans, asuras, gandharvas, and others in the world, having heard the Buddha’s words, greatly rejoiced. They all believed in, accepted, and reverently carried out the teachings. 

Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum
 Translated from Sanskrit into Chinese in the Liu Song Dynasty by The Tripiṭaka Master Guṇabhadra from India
At one time the Buddha was dwelling in the Anāthapiṇḍika Garden of Jetavana Park in the city kingdom of Śrāvastī, together with 500 great bhikṣus, as well as 100,000 Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas and a multitude of gods, dragons, yakṣas, and gandharvas. Also present were 100,000 upāsakas and upāsikās. In attendance too were the Brahma-kings, rulers of this Sahā World, as well as the god-king Śakra, the four god-kings, and their retinues. From worlds in the ten directions came innumerable bhikṣus, bhikṣuṇīs, upāsakas, and upāsikās, as well as Bodhisattvas. 
At that time the Tathāgata pronounced the Dharma to His four groups of disciples, telling them, “With existence, there are pain and pleasure. Without existence, there is neither pain nor pleasure. Therefore, keeping away from pain and pleasure is the foremost bliss of nirvāṇa.” All these 500 voice-hearer bhikṣus were Arhats. 
They had ended their afflictions and the discharges thereof, and their minds had achieved command and ease. 
Like the great dragon, with their minds liberated and their wisdom unfolded, they had completed their undertaking . Having shed the heavy burden, they had acquired benefits for themselves, ending the bondage of existence. 
Liberated by true knowledge, they had achieved the foremost pāramitā and total command of their minds Of those who were still learning, a countless number had achieved the  fruits, becoming Srotāpannas, Sakṛdāgāmins, or Anāgāmins. 
An innumerable multitude of bhikṣus, though still with afflictions, had come to achievement. Also from worlds in the ten directions came an innumerable multitude of Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas who had acquired immeasurable asaṁkhyeyas of merits. Their number was beyond calculation or analogy, unknowable to voice-hearers or Pratyekabuddhas. 
The exceptions were Mañjuśrī Bodhisattva, Great Strength Bodhisattva, Avalokiteśvara Bodhisattva, and Maitreya Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva. Such leading Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas were in asaṁkhyeya multitudes, as numerous as grasses and trees grown from the earth. Bodhisattvas who came from other directions were countless as well. 
Also present was the bhikṣuṇī Kṣema, together with a group of bhikṣuṇīs. Present as well were Lady Viśākhā and Queen Mallikā, together with their innumerable attendants. 
Also present was the Elder Sudatta, together with innumerable upāsakas. 
The World-Honored One, in the midst of this huge multitude, introduced the Dharma Door of Existence and Nonexistence. 
Meanwhile, King Prasenajit, rising from his sleep, thought: 
“I should go to the World-Honored One.” Having had this thought, he immediately set off, with drums beating and conch shells blowing, going to the Buddha. 
The World-Honored One, knowing the reason, still asked, “Ānanda, why is there the sound of drums and conch shells?” Ānanda replied to the Buddha, “King Prasenajit is coming to the Buddha. 
Hence the sound of drums and conch shells.” The Buddha told Ānanda, “You should also beat the great Dharma drum because I now will pronounce the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum.” Ānanda asked the Buddha, “I have never heard of the name of this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum. 
Why is it called the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum?” The Buddha told Ānanda, “How can you know it? 
Not even one of the Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas in this assembly knows this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum, which has a six-syllable name . 
Much less have you heard of it.” Ānanda said to the Buddha, “This is unprecedented. 
The name of this Dharma is truly hard to know.” “Indeed, Ānanda, the fact is not different from your statement. 
Ānanda, this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum, like the bloom of the udumbara tree, is rare in the world.” Ānanda asked the Buddha, “Not all Buddhas have this Dharma?” The Buddha told Ānanda, “Buddhas of the past, present, and future all have this Dharma.” Ānanda asked the Buddha, “If so, why did these Bodhisattvas, the heroes among men, all come to gather here? 
Why do their Tathāgatas not expound this Dharma in their own lands?” The Buddha told Ānanda, “For example, an āraṇyaka bhikṣu lives alone in a mountain cave. 
On his way to the village to beg for food, he sees various human and animal corpses. 
Having seen them, he feels disgusted and returns without food, thinking: 
‘Alas, I will definitely be like that.’ Then he feels happy, thinking: ‘I should go there again to observe corpses to intensify my revulsion.’ Again he heads for that village, looking to see corpses in order to strengthen his perception of impurity. 
Seeing them, he continues to observe them. Then he achieves the holy fruit, becoming an Arhat. “Buddhas in other worlds do not teach impermanence, suffering, emptiness, or impurity. 
Because the Dharma in those Buddha Lands should be their way. 
Those Tathāgatas say to their Bodhisattvas, ‘How marvelous! 
Śākyamuni the World-Honored One, taking the hard way, appears in the land of the five turbidities. For the sake of suffering sentient beings, using various viable approaches, he pronounces the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum. 
Therefore, good men, you should learn in that way.’ Those Bodhisattvas have come to this assembly because they all want to see me, to pay respects, and to make obeisance. 
Having come to this assembly, they will attain the first ground, even up to the tenth ground . 
Hence the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum is very hard to encounter. 
Hence multitudes of great Bodhisattvas from worlds in the ten directions, for the sake of hearing the Dharma, have all gathered here.” Ānanda said to the Buddha, “Very good! Very good! All who attend will benefit. 
They all will receive the hard-to-acquire Dharma in this sūtra.” The Buddha told Ānanda, “Such a profound sūtra cannot be received by all. 
Therefore, you should not say that all who attend will benefit.” Ānanda asked the Buddha, “Why will not all who attend benefit?” The Buddha told Ānanda, “This sūtra is the secret Dharma store of Tathāgatas. 
Therefore, Ānanda, you should not say that all who attend will benefit.” Ānanda said to the Buddha, “Then is it not like King Prasenajit beating the huge war drum to launch a battle? 
When the sound is heard, all  arrows fall away.” The Buddha told Ānanda, “When King Prasenajit beats the war drum, not all delight in hearing the sound of the drum. 
The cowardly ones are scared to death, or nearly to death. 
Indeed, Ānanda, the name of this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum is the Dharma Door in which riders of the Two Vehicles disbelieve. 
Therefore, Ānanda, as the huge war drum is beaten only by the king before fighting a battle, so too can this great Dharma drum, the secret of Buddhas, be expounded only by a Buddha who has appeared in the world.” Then the World-Honored One asked Mahākāśyapa, “The bhikṣus here, having left all the scum and chaff, are pure, alike, and truly strong. 
Are they capable of hearing this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum?” Mahākāśyapa replied to the Buddha, “If there are bhikṣus who have breached the precepts or violated the regulations, they are rebuked by Mahāmaudgalyāyana. 
Even I do not accommodate such bhikṣus, much less would the World-Honored One. 
The multitude in this assembly is like the sandalwood grove, pure and unvaried.” The Buddha told Mahākāśyapa, “The multitude in this assembly is all pure and homogeneous. 
However, they do not have good understanding of my veiled statements.” Mahākāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What is meant by veiled statements?” The Buddha told Mahākāśyapa, “Saying that the Tathāgata enters the ultimate nirvāṇa is making a veiled statement. In truth the Tathāgata abides eternally, never extinct, because parinirvāṇa is not a dharma of destruction. 
This sūtra leaves the veiled approach and expounds with entirely explicit tones through hundreds of thousands of causes and conditions. 
Therefore, Mahākāśyapa, you should survey this huge multitude again.” Mahākāśyapa again observed those present and their reason for coming. 
In the time of a kṣaṇa, sentient beings of weak faith, voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and novice Bodhisattvas, who considered themselves incapable, had the thought of giving up. 
As an analogy, a man named Thousand Strong Men stands up in the midst of a multitude of strong men owned by the royal family. Beating a drum, he chants, “Who is capable of wrestling with me?” The incapable ones remain silent, thinking: “I am incapable of wrestling with him. 
I might be injured or even lose my life.” The one against whom no one in the group dares to fight is the brave, indomitable strong man who can erect the great victory banner. 
“I am incapable of hearing or accepting this Dharma, which states that the Tathāgata has entered parinirvāṇa and that He is eternally abiding, never extinct.” Having heard in the midst of the multitude what they had never heard before, they left their seats and departed. 
Because they had cultivated in the long night the view of void with respect to parinirvāṇa. Upon hearing of this pure sūtra, which is free from obscurity, they left their seats and departed. 
Among the voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and novice Bodhisattvas, who came from worlds in the ten directions, on the scale of a million koṭi parts, only one part remained. The Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas who stayed on believed in the eternal abiding and changelessness of the dharma body. They then could settle in, accept, and uphold all the sūtras about the Tathāgata store. They could also explain to and comfort the world, enabling others to understand all the veiled statements . 
They could well discern sūtras of definitive meaning versus sūtras of non-definitive meaning. They all could subdue sentient beings that violated the prohibitions, and they all could respect and serve the pure, virtuous ones. With great pure faith in the Mahāyāna, they would not consider the Two Vehicles as extraordinary. 
They would pronounce only mahāvaipulya sūtras, not other sūtras. They would pronounce only that the Tathāgata is eternally abiding and that there is the Tathāgata store, without abandoning emptiness—not only the emptiness of the self-view but also the emptiness of the self-essence of all saṁskṛta dharmas. 
The Buddha told Mahākāśyapa, “Ask the huge multitude again whether they want to hear this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum, the hard-to-believe Mahāyāna sūtra, from the vast One Vehicle. 
Ask all of them this three times.” Mahākāśyapa said to the Buddha, “Very good, World-Honored One.” Forthwith he rose from his seat, bared his right shoulder, knelt on his right knee, and bowed down at the feet of the Buddha. 
He then circled the Buddha three times and questioned the huge multitude: “Do you all want to hear this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum? 
The Tathāgata now will expound to all of you the One Vehicle, the Mahāyāna, which surpasses the vehicle of voice-hearers and the vehicle of Pratyekabuddhas.” Three times he asked them, and they all replied, “We would be delighted to hear it. 
Yes, Mahākāśyapa, we all have come here to hear the Dharma. 
May the Buddha pronounce to us the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum!” Kāśyapa next asked, “Why do you all believe?” They then replied, “As an analogy, a man 20 years of age has a son 100 years old. 
If the Buddha says so, we will believe that it is so. 
Much more will we believe in the true Dharma He is going to pronounce. 
Because the Tathāgata acts in accordance with His words. 
The Tathāgata’s pure eye shines, perfectly hindrance free. Seeing with His Buddha-eye, He knows our minds.” Kāśyapa praised, “Very good! Very good! 
You worthy ones are capable of hearing the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum, to uphold or pronounce it.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “As an analogy, a man only 20 years of age has a 100-year-old son. 
Because the Tathāgata enters parinirvāṇa and still abides eternally. Nothing has a self, but the Tathāgata still speaks of a self.” They immediately responded, “Only the Buddha can know. 
Whatever the World-Honored One says, we will accept and uphold it accordingly.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “I pray only that the World-Honored One will pronounce the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum, beat the great Dharma drum, and blow the great Dharma conch shell.” The Buddha said, “Very good! 
Kāśyapa, you now want to hear me pronounce the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum?” Kāśyapa replied to the Buddha, “Affirmatively I accept Your teachings. 
Because the Tathāgata regards me highly and treats me with respect. 
What kind of respect? 
He once said to me, ‘Come and sit together with me.’ For this reason, I should recognize His kindness.” The Buddha said, “Very good! 
Kāśyapa, for a good reason, I treat you with respect. 
For example, King Prasenajit takes good care of his four types of armed forces. When they fight, they beat the huge war drums and blow the huge war conch shells, standing their ground against the enemy. 
Because of the king’s kind caring, they fight, sparing no strength, to defeat the enemy in order to bring peace to the country. 
Therefore, bhikṣus, after my parinirvāṇa, Mahākāśyapa should protect and uphold this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum. 
For this reason, I let him use half of my seat. Accordingly, he should carry on my Way. 
After my parinirvāṇa, he will be capable of widely expounding the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “I am the eldest son born from the mouth of the World-Honored One.” The Buddha told the bhikṣus, “As an analogy, King Prasenajit teaches his sons to engage in the  studies, so that they will one day be capable of continuing the royal line. 
Thus, bhikṣus, after my parinirvāṇa, in the same way the bhikṣu Kāśyapa will protect and uphold this sūtra. 
“Furthermore, Kāśyapa, for example, King Prasenajit and other kings are enemies, and they battle against one another. 
During those times, his warriors in the four types of armed forces—elephants, cavalry, chariots, and infantry—upon hearing the sound of the great drum, have no fear, and they hold firm their armor and weapons. 
The king, out of kindness, regularly bestows on them good food. 
During a war they are in addition given jewels and even cities. 
If they have defeated the enemy, they are each crowned with a white silk scarf, decorated as kings. 
If, among my voice-hearer bhikṣus and bhikṣuṇīs as well as upāsakas and upāsikās, there are those who learn the Prātimokṣa precepts and become accomplished in observing these rules of conduct, the Tathāgata will give them the peace and joy of human or celestial life. 
If there are those who have achieved great merit by subduing the four māras, the Tathāgata will crown their heads with the white silk scarf of liberation, made of the Four Noble Truths. 
If there are those who, with enhanced faith and understanding, seek the Buddha store, the true self, and the eternally abiding dharma body, the Tathāgata will pour the water of sarvajña  on their heads and crown them with the white silk scarf of the Mahāyāna. 
Mahākāśyapa, in the same way I now crown your head with the white silk scarf of the Mahāyāna. You should protect and uphold this sūtra in the places where innumerable future Buddhas will be. 
Kāśyapa, know that, after my parinirvāṇa, you are capable of protecting and upholding this sūtra.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “It will be as You instruct.” He further said to the Buddha, “From today on, and after Your parinirvāṇa, I will always protect, uphold, and widely pronounce this sūtra.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Very good! 
Very good! I now will pronounce to you the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum.” Then gods and dragons in the sky praised with one voice, “Very good! Very good! 
Kāśyapa, today gods rain down celestial flowers, and dragon-kings rain down sweet nectar and finely powdered incense. To comfort and delight all sentient beings, you should be established by the World-Honored One as the eldest son of the Dharma.” Then the multitude of gods and dragons, with one voice, spoke in verse: 
As the king in the city of Śrāvastī Beats the war drum and blows the war conch shell, The Dharma King in Jetavana Park Beats the great Dharma drum. 
The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “You should now use questioning as the drumstick to beat the great Dharma drum. The Tathāgata, the Dharma King, will explain to you. 
The God of Gods will resolve your doubts.” Then the World-Honored One told Mahākāśyapa, “There is a bhikṣu called Faith in the Mahāvaipulya. If, among my four groups of disciples, for those who hear his name, the arrows of their greed, anger, and delusion will all be pulled out. 
Kāśyapa, King Prasenajit has  Superior Medicine, who is the son of Jīva. 
When King Prasenajit is battling an enemy country, he tells Superior Medicine, ‘Quickly bring me the medicine which can pull the arrows out for sentient beings .’ Then Superior Medicine brings the anti-poison medicine, and the king smears his war drum with the medicine. He beats the drum as he smears it with medicine and suffuses it with the smoke of burning medicine. 
If sentient beings that have been shot by poisonous arrows hear the sound of the drum, one or two yojanas away, their arrows will all be pulled out. 
“Thus, Kāśyapa, if there are those who hear the name of the bhikṣu Faith in the Mahāvaipulya, the arrows of their greed, anger, and delusion will all be pulled out. 
Because that bhikṣu has propagated the true Dharma through this sūtra and acquired this great fruit as his present achievement. 
Mahākāśyapa, you should note that even beating a mindless ordinary drum smeared with mindless medicine and suffused with its smoke has such power to benefit sentient beings. 
Much more, sentient beings that hear the name of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva or the name of the bhikṣu Faith in the Mahāvaipulya are enabled to remove their three poisons.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “If hearing the name of a Bodhisattva can remove the three poisonous arrows for sentient beings, it will be more effective if they praise the name and merit of the World-Honored One by saying, ‘Namo Śākyamuni.’ If praising the name and merit of Śākyamuni can pull the three poisonous arrows out of sentient beings, it will be even more effective if they hear this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum and expound its verses and stanzas to comfort others. 
Furthermore, if they expound it widely, it will be impossible for their three poisonous arrows not to be pulled out.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “As I just mentioned, bhikṣus who observe their precepts purely can fulfill their wishes at will because of their original vows. 
All Buddhas have this Dharma, as taught in the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum, that dharmas, which  are not made , neither arise nor perish. 
Therefore, Kāśyapa, in a future life, you will be like me. 
Because if your four groups of disciples hear your name, their three poisonous arrows will all be pulled out. 
Therefore, Kāśyapa, you now should request the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum, and then, after my parinirvāṇa, protect, uphold, and pronounce it for a long time in the world.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Very good! 
World-Honored One, please pronounce for my sake the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “You should spare no question about this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “Very good! 
World-Honored One, I will ask about my doubts. 
The World-Honored One says, ‘With existence, there are pain and pleasure. 
Without existence, there is neither pain nor pleasure.’ What is meant by that?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Without existence means the foremost bliss of parinirvāṇa. Therefore, having left pain and pleasure, one acquires the foremost bliss of parinirvāṇa. 
Pain and pleasure mean that there is existence. 
Without existence, there is neither pain nor pleasure. 
Therefore, those who wish to attain parinirvāṇa should seek to cease existing.” Then the World-Honored One, to restate this meaning, spoke in verse: Existence is impermanent, Nor is it changeless. With existence, there are pain and pleasure. 
Without existence, there is neither pain nor pleasure. Not acting  brings neither pain nor pleasure; Acting  brings pain and pleasure. Do not delight in saṁskṛta dharmas, Nor be involved with them. 
If one acquires pleasure, One will nevertheless fall into pain. 
Before attaining nirvāṇ, One abides in neither peace nor bliss. 
Then Kāśyapa replied in verse: If sentient beings do not effect their existence, Nirvāṇa will be their foremost bliss. That bliss is merely a name As there is no one experiencing bliss. 
Then the World-Honored One again spoke in verse: The eternal liberation is not just a name, The wondrous form  evidently standing. This is not the state of voice-hearers or Pratyekabuddhas, Nor that of Bodhisattvas. 
Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, why do you speak of form then say it is eternally abiding?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “I will give you an analogy. 
A person comes from Mathurā in the south. 
Someone asks him, ‘Where do you come from?’ He answers, ‘From Mathurā.’ He is next asked, ‘Where is Mathurā?’ Then this person points to the south. 
Kāśyapa, will the questioner not believe him? 
Thus, Kāśyapa, because I have seen it, you should believe me.” Then the World-Honored One again spoke in verse: 
By analogy, there is a person Who points his finger to the sky. I now do the same, Who pronounce liberation by name. 
Analogous to the person Who comes from the distant south, I now do the same, Who come from nirvāṇa. 
“However, Kāśyapa, those who see the meaning do not need causes or conditions. If they do not see the meaning, they need causes and conditions. 
Indeed, Kāśyapa, Buddha-Bhagavāns always indicate liberation through innumerable causes and conditions.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What is cause?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Cause is the reason.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What is condition?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Condition is a contributing factor.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “I pray that you will further clarify with an analogy.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “For example, a child is born from parents. 
The mother is the cause, and the father is the condition. 
Thus, a dharma born through causes and conditions is called a formation.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What is meant by formation?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Formation refers to a worldly formation.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What is world?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “It is constructed with an assembly of sentient beings.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What is a sentient being?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “A sentient being is constructed with an assemblage of dharmas.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What is dharma?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Non-dharma is dharma, and dharma is non-dharma. 
There are two kinds of dharmas. 
What are these two? 
Saṁskṛta and asaṁskṛta; form and non-form. 
There is no third kind.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What does dharma look like?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Dharma is non-form.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What does non-dharma look like?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Non-dharma is also non-form.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “If both dharma and non-dharma have neither form nor appearance, then what is dharma and what is non-dharma?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Dharma is nirvāṇa, and non-dharma is saṁsāra.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “If both dharma and non-dharma have neither form nor appearance, how, what, and why can the wise know about their appearances?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Through their cycle of birth and death, sentient beings that develop various kinds of meritorious, pure roots of goodness are in the right ways. 
If they carry out these dharmas, pure appearances will arise. 
Those who perform these dharmas are dharma sentient beings. 
If they carry out non-dharmas, impure appearances will arise. 
Those who perform these non-dharmas are non-dharma sentient beings.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, what is a sentient being?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “A sentient beings is constructed by assembling the four domains—earth, water, fire, and wind—as well as the five faculties, the Twelve Links of Dependent Arising, sensory reception, perception, thinking, mind, mental faculty, and mental consciousness. 
Kāśyapa, know that it means all dharmas.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Which of these component dharmas is a sentient being?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “None of them alone is called a sentient being. 
Kāśyapa, taking the king Prasenajit’s drum as an example, what is a drum?” Kāśyapa replied to the Buddha, “A so-called drum includes a membrane, wood, and a drumstick. 
The assemblage of these three dharmas is called a drum.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Likewise a construction with an assemblage of dharmas is called a sentient being.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Is the sound-producing drum not the drum?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Besides the sound-producing drum, any drum makes sound to be carried by the wind.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Is the drum a dharma or a non-dharma?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “The drum is neither a dharma nor a non-dharma.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What is its name?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “What is neither a dharma nor a non-dharma is called a nonspecific dharma.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “Including the nonspecific dharma, there should be three kinds of dharmas in the world.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “An example of a nonspecific appearance would be a person who is neither male nor female. 
Such a person is called a non-man. 
The drum is nonspecific in the same way.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “As the World-Honored One says, a child is born from the union of his parents. 
If they do not have the seeds for forming sentient beings, they are not the parental causes and conditions.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “That which does not have the seeds for forming sentient beings is called nirvāṇa. 
So too is the great eternal non-man. 
As an analogy, when King Prasenajit battles an enemy country, his warriors who eat men’s meals are not called men if they are not bold and fierce. 
Therefore, those who do not have the seeds of sentient beings are not called parents, and neither is the great eternal non-man.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, there are good dharmas, bad dharmas, and neutral dharmas. 
What are good, bad, and neutral dharmas?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “A pleasurable experience is a good dharma. A painful experience is a bad dharma. An experience that is neither pleasurable nor painful is a neutral dharma. Sentient beings are always in contact with these three dharmas. 
Pleasurable experiences relate to gods or humans gratifying the five desires as requital for their merit. 
Painful experiences relate to  hell dwellers, animals, hungry ghosts, or asuras. 
Experience in neither pleasure nor pain is like a minor skin disease.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “This is not right.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Pleasure as a cause of pain, and pain as a cause of pain, are also called a neutral experience.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What would be an analogy?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “For example, one becomes ill because of eating food. 
Eating food is pleasure, but illness is pain. 
Like a minor skin disease, this is called a neutral experience.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “If both pleasure and pain can be called a neutral experience, then parents’ giving birth to a child is also a neutral experience.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “This is not right.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What would be an analogy?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Formless gods in Neither with Nor without Perception Heaven, and gods with form in No Perception Heaven, still abide by the law of karma. 
So doesgoodness.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, as the Buddha says, those with sensory reception and perception are sentient beings. 
Then, formless gods in Neither with Nor without Perception Heaven must not be sentient beings.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “They still have mental processing. 
The dharma of sentient beings that I describe excludes the gods with form in No Perception Heaven.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Are sentient beings form or non-form?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Sentient beings are neither form nor non-form. Those who accomplish this dharma are called sentient beings.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “If there are sentient beings formed by a different dharma, formless gods should not be included. 
Then, there should not be these two realms of existence called the form realm and the formless realm.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Dharmas are non-form, and non-dharmas are also non-form.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Does it mean that dharmas are attuned to liberation and that non-dharmas are as well? 
Are formless gods already liberated?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Not true. There are only saṁskṛta and asaṁskṛta dharmas, and liberation is an asaṁskṛta dharma. 
Formless gods are in the domain of saṁskṛta dharmas because they still have the disposition to assume form.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, all saṁskṛta dharmas are form, and asaṁskṛta dharmas are non-form. 
Seeing the form of formless gods is the state of the Buddha, not our state.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Very good! Very good! 
It is my state, not yours. 
Indeed, Buddha-Bhagavāns, having achieved liberation, are free from form but still have form.” The Buddha then asked Kāśyapa, “What are formless gods? 
Do you know what these gods do? 
Kāśyapa, can gods with form be considered formless?” Kāśyapa replied to the Buddha, “This is beyond our state.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Indeed, Buddha-Bhagavāns, who have achieved liberation, all assume form. 
You should observe them.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “If one achieves liberation in this way, one should still experience pain and pleasure.” The Buddha asked Kāśyapa, “If sick sentient beings take medicine and are cured of their diseases, will they be sick again?” Kāśyapa replied to the Buddha, “If they have karma, they will still have illnesses.” The Buddha asked Kāśyapa, “Will those who have no karma have illnesses?” Kāśyapa replied to the Buddha, “No, World-Honored One.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Indeed, leaving pain and pleasure is liberation. 
Know that pain and pleasure are illness. 
A great man is one who has attained nirvāṇa.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “If leaving pain and pleasure is liberation, will illness end with the exhaustion of karma?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Worldly pleasures are in effect pain. 
One achieves liberation by leaving such pleasures and ending karma.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Is liberation the final ending?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “One may liken space to the ocean. 
As space is beyond analogy, so too is liberation. 
No one can know that formless gods have form. Nor can one know whether they are like this or like that, whether they stand in this way or frolic in that way. 
As this  is beyond the state of voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas, so too is liberation.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, who forms sentient beings?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Sentient beings are formed by themselves.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What does that mean?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Those who do good are Buddhas. 
Those who do evil are sentient beings.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Who made the very first sentient being?” The Buddha asked Kāśyapa, “Who made the formless gods, such as those in Neither with Nor without Perception Heaven? 
How do formless gods live and how do they carry themselves?” Kāśyapa replied to the Buddha, “Although their karmas cannot be known, they are formed by their own karmas. 
Then who makes sentient beings black in saṁsāra, or white in nirvāṇa?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “It is made by their karmas. 
Karma gives rise to innumerable dharmas; goodness also gives rise to innumerable dharmas.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What arises from karma? 
What arises from goodness?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Existence arises from karma. 
Liberation arises from goodness.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “How does goodness arise as a dharma that has no birth?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “These two are not different.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “As goodness arises, how can one realize that it has no birth?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “By doing good karmas.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Who taught this?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “It has been taught by Buddhas since time without a beginning.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Who taught and transformed all Buddhas without a beginning in time?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Time without a beginning is not what voice-hearers or Pratyekabuddhas can know by thinking. 
If a person who is as wise and well informed as Śāriputra appears in the world, he can think throughout the long night but still cannot know who is the very first of Buddhas, who are without a beginning. Nor can he know His nirvāṇa or the interval in between. 
Furthermore, Kāśyapa, even Mahāmaudgalyāyana, using his transcendental powers, can never find the very first Buddha World without a beginning. 
Thus, none of the voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, or Bodhisattvas on the tenth ground, such as Maitreya Bodhisattva, can know it. 
As the origin of Buddhas is hard to know, so too is the origin of sentient beings.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “Therefore, World-Honored One, there is neither a doer  nor a recipient .” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Causation is the doer and the recipient.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Does the world have an ending, or have no ending?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “The world has not ended. 
There is nothing to end, nor is there a time of ending.” Then the Buddha asked Kāśyapa, “Suppose you use a hair to draw water from the immense ocean by the drop. 
Can you deplete the ocean water?” Kāśyapa replied to the Buddha, “Yes, it can be finished.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Innumerable asaṁkhyeyas of great kalpas ago, a Buddha called Kelava appeared in the world, who widely expounded the Dharma. 
At that time in the Licchavi clan, there was a youth called Entire World Is Delighted to See. He was a Wheel-Turning King who ruled with the true Dharma. 
This king, together with his retinue in the hundreds of thousands, went to that Buddha. He bowed down at the feet of that Buddha and circled Him three times. After presenting his offerings, he asked that Buddha, ‘How long will it take me to acquire the Bodhisattva Way?’ That Buddha told the great king, ‘A Wheel-Turning King is a Bodhisattva. There is no difference. 
Because no one else can be the god-king Śakra, a Brahma-king, or a Wheel-Turning King. 
A Bodhisattva is the god-king Śakra, a Brahma-king, or a Wheel-Turning King. First, he is reborn as the god-king Śakra or a Brahma-king many times, then he is reborn as a Wheel-Turning King to rule and deliver people through the true Dharma. You have already been the god-king Śakra or a Brahma-king as many times as the sands of asaṁkhyeya Ganges Rivers. 
Now you are a Wheel-Turning King.’ “Then the king asked, ‘What does the god-king Śakra or a Brahma-king look like?’ Kevala Buddha told the great king, ‘The god-king Śakra or a Brahma-king looks just like you now, wearing a celestial crown, but their magnificence does not match yours. 
For example, the form of a Buddha is so sublime and extraordinary that voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and Bodhisattvas can never compare. 
As a Buddha is sublime, you in your way are magnificent.’ “Kāśyapa, the noble king next asked Kevala Buddha, ‘How long will it take me to attain Buddhahood?’ That Buddha replied, ‘Great King, attaining Buddhahood requires a vastly long time. 
Suppose you, Great King, abandon your merit, become an ordinary person, and use a hair to draw water from the immense ocean by the drop. 
When the ocean water is almost completely gone, and the remaining water is like  cow tracks, in the world will appear a Tathāgata called Lamp Light, the Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha. 
At that time there will be a king named Earth Sovereign, and Lamp Light Tathāgata will bestow upon him a prophecy that he will be a Buddha. 
Great King , you will be that king’s first-born son, upon whom Lamp Light Buddha will also bestow a prophecy. 
“Great King , your first-born son is born to you, as the water in the immense ocean, diminishing since the past, is near depletion. 
During this period, he has never been a lesser king, but has been the god-king Śakra, a Brahma-king, or a noble Wheel-Turning King ruling and transforming the world with the true Dharma. 
This first-born son of yours is boldly valiant and energetically diligent. 
Great King Earth Sovereign, bodhi is hard to attain. Because of these causes and conditions, I give you an analogy. 
Earth Sovereign, this first-born son of yours has 60,000 lady attendants. Like goddesses, they are shapely, beautiful, adorned with necklaces of jewels. He will abandon them all like spit. 
Knowing that desire is impermanent, precarious, and fickle, he will say, ‘I will renounce family life.’ Having said this, believing that family is not his way of life, he will renounce family life to learn the Way.” Therefore, Lamp Light Buddha will bestow a prophecy upon that youth: 
“In the future, there will be a Buddha called Śākyamuni. 
His world will be called Endurance. Young man, you will then be reborn in the Licchavi clan and become a youth called Entire World Is Delighted to See. After the parinirvāṇa of Śākyamuni Buddha, the true Dharma will be perishing. When eighty years still remain, you will be  a bhikṣu who upholds this Buddha’s name and disseminates this sūtra, not caring even about his own life. 
Standing on the eighth Bodhisattva ground, he will manifest one body in Tuṣita Heaven, another body in the Pure Land of Peace and Bliss, and a third body to ask Ajita Buddha questions about this sūtra.” Then King Earth Sovereign, having heard the prophecy of his son, will be exultant and exuberant, saying, “Today the Tathāgata has prophesied that my son will stand on the eighth ground.” That youth, having heard the prophecy, will make energetic progress.’” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “Therefore, World-Honored One, drawing water by the drop with a hair can deplete the water in the immense ocean.” The Buddha asked Kāśyapa, “What is meant by that?” Kāśyapa replied to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, as an analogy, a merchant keeps his gold coins in a container. 
the money in the container decreases day by day. 
Likewise, Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas know how the water in the immense ocean decreases drop by drop, as well as how much still remains. Even more, the World-Honored One should know the ending of the infinite mass of sentient beings. 
However, sentient beings have no ending. All voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas are unable to know this. Only Buddha-Bhagavāns can know this.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Very good! Very good! 
As you say, the infinite mass of sentient beings has no ending.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Do sentient beings have an ending or not? 
Does parinirvāṇa mean the end or not?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Sentient beings have no ending.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Why do sentient beings not have an ending?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “The ending of sentient beings would mean decrease . 
Therefore, Kāśyapa, Buddha-Bhagavāns after parinirvāṇa are eternally abiding. 
Because of this meaning, Buddha-Bhagavāns, having entered parinirvāṇa, are never extinct.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Why do Buddha-Bhagavāns enter parinirvāṇa, but are not ultimately extinct?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Indeed! 
Indeed! 
When a house is destroyed, space is revealed. 
Indeed! Indeed! 
The nirvāṇa of Buddhas is liberation.” Fascicle 2  Then the World-Honored One told Mahākāśyapa, “As an analogy, a king is active in giving alms, and many hidden treasures are uncovered in his kingdom. 
Because the king widely gives various kinds of relief to unfortunate sentient beings, hidden treasure stores spontaneously turn up. 
Thus, Kāśyapa, Bodhisattvas who use skillful ways to pronounce the profound Dharma treasure widely will acquire this profound sūtra, which is in accord with  emptiness, no appearance, and no act, and is a sūtra apart from non-dharmas. They will acquire sūtras about the Tathāgata store as well. 
“Kāśyapa, on Uttarakuru, the northern continent, food grows naturally, and it never diminishes as the multitudes continue to partake of it. 
Because the people there, in their entire lives, never have thoughts of belongings, stinginess, or greed. 
Likewise, Kāśyapa, here on Jambudvīpa, the southern continent, if, among the bhikṣus, bhikṣuṇīs, upāsakas, and upāsikās, there are those who, having acquired this profound sūtra, read and recite it, copy and uphold it, thoroughly penetrate it, and widely pronounce it to others, never maligning it or feeling bored or doubtful, they will always naturally receive, by virtue of Buddhas’ spiritual power, offerings to their satisfaction. Until their attainment of bodhi, the offerings will be without any shortage, continuing endlessly, except for those constrained by firm karmic requitals. During their entire lives, as long as bhikṣus observe their precepts without being lax, gods and spirits will serve them and make offerings to them. 
If they can refrain from thinking even one maligning thought of this profound sūtra, they will gain knowledge of the Tathāgata store and of the eternal abiding of Tathāgatas, and they will often see Buddhas, be close to them, and make offerings to them. 
“As the seven treasures always follow the Wheel-Turning King wherever he goes, likewise this sūtra is always where its comforting presenter stays. 
The seven treasures stay only where the Wheel-Turning King stays, not elsewhere, while lesser treasures stay elsewhere. 
Likewise, where a comforting presenter stays, this sūtra will come to him from elsewhere, while sūtras in accord with the non-definitive meaning of emptiness will stay elsewhere. 
When the comforting presenter goes away from his place, this sūtra always accompanies him. 
Wherever the Wheel-Turning King goes, sentient beings that follow him each thought: ‘Where the king stays, I too should be there.’ Likewise, wherever the comforting presenter goes, this sūtra always follows him. 
When a Wheel-Turning King appears in the world, the seven treasures appear. 
Likewise, when a comforting presenter appears in the world, this sūtra appears. 
If one of the seven treasures owned by the Wheel-Turning King is lost and the king seeks it, he will definitely arrive in the place where that one treasure is. 
Likewise, if the comforting presenter, for the sake of hearing this sūtra, seeks everywhere, he will definitely arrive in the place where this sūtra is. “Furthermore, when a Wheel-Turning King does not appear in the world, the lesser kings, acting like Wheel-Turning Kings, appear in the world along with other kings. 
However, nowhere does anyone expound this profound sūtra. There are those who pronounce kindred sūtras, primary or secondary. Sentient beings study and follow them. 
In the course of their study, when they hear of this ultimate profound sūtra about the Tathāgata store and the eternal abiding of the Tathāgata, they elicit doubts in their minds. 
They bear malice toward the comforting presenter, and dishonor and scorn him. Without any appreciation, they insult and criticize, making such statements as: ‘These words are spoken by māras.’ Judging this sūtra as destructive to the Dharma, they all reject it and return to their own places. Because they damage the Dharma, breach the precepts, and hold the wrong views, they will never acquire such a sūtra. 
Why not? 
Because this sūtra stays only with its comforting presenter. “There will be many sentient beings that malign Mahāyāna sūtras they see or hear. 
Do not have fear. 
Why not? 
Because as the true Dharma declines during the times of the five turbidities, there will be sentient beings that malign the Mahāyāna. 
As in a village of seven families, there must be a dhāyini ghost, so too wherever this sūtra is, in a seven-member group, there must be a maligner. “Kāśyapa, as those who observe the same precepts are delighted to see one another, likewise are those who violate the precepts. 
When, in the midst of the multitude, they hear this sūtra, they look at one another and scornfully say, ‘What is the realm of sentient beings? 
What is eternal?’ Viewing one another’s facial expressions, they think: 
‘These are my companions.’ They empathize with one another, keep their ways, and go their ways. 
As an analogy, an elder in the Brahmin caste has a son who has learned evil ways. After being reproached and admonished by his parents, he neither regrets nor changes his ways. 
He abandons his family to follow his evil friends, entertaining themselves with bird fights and animal fights. 
He goes to other lands, banding with his kind and doing non-dharma things together. They are mates. 
Those who do not appreciate this sūtra do the same. When they see others recite or pronounce this sūtra, they laugh at them. 
Because most sentient beings will be negligent and indolent. Lax in observing their precepts, they will cause difficulties in preserving the Dharma. 
Following one another, those mates viciously criticize.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “Alas! 
Truly that will be an evil time!” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “As for the comforting presenters , what should they do? 
Kāśyapa, as an analogy, the roadside fields near a city are encroached upon by people, elephants, and horses. 
The landowner sends a man to guard the fields, but the guard is not vigilant in protecting them. He then increases the number of guards to two, three, four, five, ten, twelve, and even a hundred. 
The more guards sent, the more trespassers arrive. 
The last guard thinks: ‘Guarding the fields in this way does not really protect them all. There should be a skillful way to keep them from raids.’ He then takes the seedlings from the fields and personally hands them out as alms. The recipients are grateful, and the seedlings in the fields are saved. 
Kāśyapa, likewise those who have skillful means will be able to protect this sūtra after my parinirvāṇa.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, I can never accommodate those evil ones. 
I would rather carry Mount Sumeru on my shoulders for 100,000 kalpas than tolerate those evil ones violating the precepts, destroying the Dharma, maligning the Dharma, or defiling the Dharma. Such evils are not the tones of the Dharma. 
World-Honored One, I would rather be owned by someone as a slave than tolerate those evil ones violating the precepts, countering the Dharma, abandoning the Dharma, or damaging the Dharma. 
Such evils are not the tones of the Dharma. World-Honored One, I would rather carry on my head the great earth, mountains, and oceans for 100,000 kalpas than tolerate those evil ones violating the precepts, destroying the Dharma, elevating themselves, or slandering others. Such evils are not the tones of the Dharma. 
World-Honored One, I would rather be deaf, blind, or mute than tolerate those evil ones damaging and violating the pure precepts, or renouncing family life for benefits, such as others’ trust and offerings. 
Such evils are not the tones of the Dharma. World-Honored One, I would rather quickly abandon my body and enter parinirvāṇa than tolerate those evil ones damaging and violating the pure precepts, committing insidious acts, fawning with their bodies, or telling lies with their mouths. 
Such evils are not the tones of the Dharma.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Your parinirvāṇa would be that of a voice-hearer, not the ultimate parinirvāṇa.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “If the parinirvāṇa of a voice-hearer or of a Pratyekabuddha is not the ultimate, why does the World-Honored One pronounce the Three Vehicles: the Voice-Hearer Vehicle, the Pratyekabuddha Vehicle, and the Buddha Vehicle? 
Why does the World-Honored One, having entered parinirvāṇa, enter parinirvāṇa again?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “A voice-hearer enters parinirvāṇa as a voice-hearer, and this parinirvāṇa is not the ultimate. 
A Pratyekabuddha enters parinirvāṇa as a Pratyekabuddha, and this parinirvāṇa is not the ultimate. 
If one acquires the merit of all merit, the knowledge of all knowledge, and the Mahāyāna parinirvāṇa, then this is ultimate, or no different from the ultimate.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, what does this mean?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “For example, cream is produced from milk; fresh butter is produced from cream; melted butter is produced from fresh butter; and ghee is produced from melted butter. 
Ordinary beings holding the wrong views are like an impure mixture of milk and blood. 
Those who have taken refuge in the Three Jewels are like pure milk. 
Those who act according to their faith and newly-resolved Bodhisattvas who stand on the Training Ground for Excellent Understanding are like cream. 
Voice-hearers in the seven ranks who are still learning and Bodhisattvas from the first through the seventh sround are like fresh butter. 
Arhats and Pratyekabuddhas, who can manifest their mind-created bodies, and Bodhisattvas on the ninth and tenth grounds are like melted butter. 
Tathāgatas, also called Arhats, Samyak-Saṁbuddhas, are like ghee.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, why does the Tathāgata say that there are the Three Vehicles?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “As an analogy, a valiant, heroic guiding teacher takes his retinue and a huge multitude from their homes to another place. 
As they pass through wilderness and treacherous, perilous paths, he thinks: ‘This group is fatigued, and they might want to turn back.’ In order for them to take a rest, he conjures up a great city ahead of them. He points at it in the distance and says to the huge multitude, ‘There is a great city ahead, and we should quickly go there.’ Those in the multitude, seeing that they are approaching the city, say to one another, ‘This is where I can rest.’ They all enter into the city to rest and enjoy their stay, unwilling to proceed further. 
Then the guiding teacher thinks: ‘This huge multitude has gained this small pleasure and is satisfied with it. Weak and indolent, they have no intention of advancing further.’ Forthwith the guiding teacher dissolves the conjured city. 
When the huge multitude sees the city vanish, they ask their guiding teacher, ‘What was it? 
An illusion or a dream, or something real?’ Hearing this, the guiding teacher tells the huge multitude, ‘It was for your respite that I conjured up that great city. 
We now should go to the next city. We should quickly get there to have peace and joy.’ The huge multitude responded, ‘Affirmatively we accept your instruction. 
Why should we enjoy this sordid small place? 
Together we should go to the great city of peace and joy.’ The guiding teacher tells them, ‘Very good! 
We should proceed.’ As they advance together, he further tells the huge multitude, ‘This great city we go toward is appearing. You should observe that this great city ahead is prosperous and joyous.’ As they gradually go forward, they all see the great city. 
Thereupon the guiding teacher tells the huge multitude, ‘Kindly People, know that before you is the great city.’ Then all in the huge multitude, seeing the great city in the distance, peaceful, prosperous, and joyous, find delight in their minds. 
They look at one another with curiosity and ask, ‘Is this city real or just another illusion?’ The guiding teacher replies, ‘This city is real, with all its extraordinary peace, prosperity, and joy.’ He tells the multitude to enter this great city, for this is the foremost, ultimate great city. There is no other city beyond this one. After the huge multitude has entered into the city, with wonder and happiness they praise their guiding teacher, ‘Very good! Very good! 
The one with true great wisdom treats us in skillful ways with great compassion!’ “Kāśyapa, know that the conjured city is like the pure knowledge of the Voice-Hearer Vehicle and the Pratyekabuddha Vehicle, the wisdom-knowledge of emptiness, no appearance, and no act. 
The real great city is like the liberation of a Tathāgata. 
Therefore, the Tathāgata presents the Three Vehicles and reveals the two nirvāṇas. 
He then pronounces the One Vehicle.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “If there are those who say that this sūtra is nonexistent, they are not my disciples, nor am I their teacher.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, Mahāyāna sūtras mostly state the meaning of emptiness.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “All sūtras about emptiness have unrevealed aspects. 
Only this sūtra is the unsurpassed pronouncement, without any unrevealed aspect. 
For example, Kāśyapa, King Prasenajit always sponsors a great assembly of almsgiving in the eleventh month of the year. He first feeds the hungry ghosts, the forlorn ones, and the poor mendicants. He next gives to śramaṇas and Brahmins fine food in various flavors as they wish. 
In the same way Buddha-Bhagavāns expound various kinds of Dharmas in the sūtras according to sentient beings’ desires and preferences. 
“There are sentient beings that breach their precepts, are negligent and indolent in training and learning, and reject the wondrous texts concerning the eternal abiding of the Tathāgata store. They prefer to study and learn various sūtras that teach emptiness, whether following the words and phrases, or adding or altering some words and phrases. 
Because they say these words: ‘The Buddha’s sūtras all declare that a sentient being has no self.’ Nevertheless, they do not know the true meaning of emptiness and no self. Those without wisdom pursue extinction. 
“Indeed, emptiness and no self are the Buddha’s words. 
Because immeasurable afflictions, like stored dirt, have always been empty, in nirvāṇa. Indeed, nirvāṇa is the all-encompassing word. 
It is the word for the great parinirvāṇa attained by Buddhas, eternally in peace and bliss.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “How does one discard  cessation  perpetuity?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Sentient beings each transmigrate through their cycle of birth and death without a commanding self. 
However, the great parinirvāṇa attained by Buddhas is eternal peace and bliss. 
This meaning shatters the two wrong views, cessation and perpetuity.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “Please turn to no self, having talked about self for a while.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “I explain the meaning of no self to destroy the worldly view of self. 
If I did not say so, how could I induce people to accept the Dharma of the great teacher? 
When the Buddha pronounces no self, sentient beings become curious. To hear what they have never heard before, they come to the Buddha. Then I enable them to enter the Buddha Dharma through hundreds of thousands of causes and conditions. 
Once they have entered the Buddha Dharma with growing faith, they diligently train and energetically progress in their learning of the Dharma of Emptiness. Then I pronounce to them the eternal peace and bliss, and the liberation that still manifests form. 
There are worldly doctrines asserting that existence is liberation. To destroy them, I pronounce that liberation leads to nonexistence. 
If I did not say so, how could I induce people to accept the Dharma of the great teacher? 
Through hundreds of thousands of causes and conditions, I explain to them liberation, nirvāṇa, and no self. 
Then I see sentient beings mistake liberation for ultimate extinction. Those without wisdom pursue extinction. 
Then I pronounce, through hundreds of thousands of causes and conditions, that there still is form after achieving liberation.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, achieving liberation and command means that sentient beings must be eternal. 
By analogy, upon seeing smoke, one deduces that there must be fire. If there is a  self in one, then there can be liberation. 
Saying that there is a  self means that there is form after achieving liberation. 
This is not the worldly self-view, nor is it the statement of cessation or perpetuity.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, why does the Tathāgata, who never enters  parinirvāṇa, manifest entering parinirvāṇa? 
Why does He who is never born manifest birth?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “It is for destroying the idea of perpetuity in sentient beings’ calculating minds. The Tathāgata never enters  parinirvāṇa but manifests entering parinirvāṇa. He is never born but manifests birth. 
Because sentient beings would say, ‘Even a Buddha has an ending in life and is not in command, not to mention any of us, who has a self and its belongings.’ As an analogy, a king is seized by a neighboring nation. In cangue and shackles, he thinks: ‘Am I now still the king, the lord? 
I now am neither the king nor the lord.’ Why does he have such tribulations? 
It is caused by his abandonment of self-restraint. Every sentient being that transmigrates through its cycle of birth and death has no commanding self. 
The lack of command is the meaning of no self that I have explained. 
“As another analogy, a person is pursued by bandits who will harm him with knives. He thinks: ‘I now have no strength. How can I avoid death?’ With such concerns about the suffering of birth, aging, illness, and death, sentient beings wish to become the god-king Śakra or a Brahma-king. 
The Tathāgata is the god of gods. If His parinirvāṇa meant extinction, then the world should also go extinct. 
If it does not mean extinction, then it means eternal peace and bliss. 
To be in eternal peace and bliss, there must be a  self, just as to have smoke, there must be fire. 
If there is no self and one claims to have a self, the world should be filled with selves. A  self does not invalidate no self. 
If there were no  self, a  self could not be established.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “What is existence?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Existence refers to the twenty-five forms of existence as sentient beings. 
Nonexistence refers to the state of any no-thinking thing, or any sentient being before its birth or after its death. 
If thinking beings could be destroyed, sentient beings would eventually be extinct. 
Because sentient beings  have neither birth nor death, they neither increase nor decrease in number.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, if there is a  self in one, why is it covered up by one’s afflictions, which are like dirt?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Very good! 
Very good! You should ask the Tathāgata this question. 
As an analogy, a goldsmith perceives the purity of gold. He thinks about why such pure gold is mixed with dirt and seeks the origin of the dirt. 
Will he find its origin?” Kāśyapa replied, “No, World-Honored One.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “If he spends his entire lifetime thinking about the initial cause of the dirt since time without a beginning, will he find the original state? 
He will acquire neither gold nor the origin of dirt. 
However, if he diligently uses skillful means to remove the dirt mixed with the gold, he will acquire the gold.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Thus  self is covered up by one’s afflictions, like dirt. 
If a person who wants to see his  self thinks: 
‘I should search for this self and the origin of afflictions,’ will that person find the origin?” Kāśyapa replied to the Buddha, “No, World-Honored One.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “If one diligently uses skillful means to remove one’s afflictions, which are like dirt, one will realize one’s  self. 
If one, having heard this sūtra, with profound faith and delight, uses skillful means, neither leisurely nor rushed, to do good karmas with one’s body, voice, and mind, through these causes and conditions, one will realize one’s  self.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “If there is true self, why it is not seen?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “I will now give you an analogy. 
For example, a beginning student is learning the five letters , which are used to compose stanzas of verses. 
If one wants to know the meanings  before learning , can one know them? 
One should first learn , then one will know . 
Having learned , one needs to be taught by the teacher, who uses examples to indicate the meanings of verses composed of words. 
If one can listen to and accept the teacher, one will acquire understanding of the meanings of the verses, and believe and appreciate them. 
The  self is now covered up by the store of afflictions. If someone says, ‘Good man, the Tathāgata store is such and such,’ then the hearer immediately wants to see it. 
Is he able to see it?” Kāśyapa replied, “No, World-Honored One.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “For example, the student who does not know the meanings of the verses should follow the teacher on faith. 
Kāśyapa, know that the Tathāgata is the speaker of truthful words. He truthfully describes the existence of sentient beings. You will know later, like that student who has learned . 
I now explain to you the realm of sentient beings by four veiled analogies. These four are the eye blinded by a disease, the moon covered by heavy clouds, the water in a well to be dug, and the flame of a lamp inside a container. Know that these four analogies involve the causes and conditions for realizing one’s Buddha nature. All sentient beings have Buddha nature with immeasurable excellent appearance, majesty, and radiance. 
For example, the disease of the eye can be cured. Before one has encountered a good physician, one’s eye is sightless. 
Once a good physician appears, one will quickly perceive sights. 
Indeed, the immeasurable store of afflictions covers and obstructs one’s Tathāgata nature. Unless one encounters Buddhas,  voice-hearers, or Pratyekabuddhas, one mistakes no self for self, and non-self for belongings of self. 
After encountering Buddhas,  voice-hearers, or Pratyekabuddhas, one then knows about one’s true self. As if cured of a disease, one’s eye opens and sees clearly. 
The eye disease refers to one’s afflictions, and the eye refers to one’s Tathāgata nature. When the moon is covered by clouds, it is neither bright nor clear. 
Likewise, when one’s Tathāgata nature is covered up by afflictions, it is neither bright nor clear. 
If one discards one’s cloud-like afflictions, one’s Tathāgata nature will be bright and clear, like the full moon. When one digs a well, dry dirt indicates that water is still far away. 
When one gets wet dirt, one knows that water is near. 
If one gets the water, then it is the ultimate . 
If one encounters Buddhas,  voice-hearers, or Pratyekabuddhas, and learns to do good karmas and to remove one’s afflictions, like dirt, one will realize one’s Tathāgata nature, which is like the water. This nature is also like the flame of a lamp inside a container. It is useless to sentient beings when its brilliance is hidden. 
If the container is removed, then the light of the lamp will shine everywhere. 
Likewise, one’s afflictions are the container that hides one’s Tathāgata store, which is useless to sentient beings when its appearance and majesty are neither bright nor clear. 
If one discards the store of afflictions, eradicating them all forever, then one’s Tathāgata nature will fully manifest its excellent appearance and radiance for Buddha work. It is like shattering the container so that sentient beings can enjoy the lamplight. Thus these four analogies illustrate the causes and conditions. As one’s  self encompasses the realm of sentient beings, the same is true for all sentient beings. 
The realm of sentient beings is boundless, radiant, and pure.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, if all sentient beings have the Tathāgata store in one nature and ride the One Vehicle, why does the Tathāgata say there are the Three Vehicles: 
the Voice-Hearer Vehicle, the Pratyekabuddha Vehicle, and the Buddha Vehicle?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “I should now use an analogy. 
An elder of great wealth has an only son who, under the care of his wet nurse, was lost in the midst of a crowd. 
As the elder is near his time, he thinks: ‘It has been a long time since I lost my only son. I do not have other sons, nor parents or relatives. Once I die, all my assets will go to the king.’ As he is feeling concerned, the lost son, begging on his way, arrives at his original home. 
Because the son has been lost since childhood. 
His father recognizes him but does not tell him so. 
Because he is afraid that his son might run away. 
He gives him some things and says to him, ‘I have no offspring, and you can be my son. Do not go elsewhere.’ The son answers, ‘I cannot bear staying here. 
Because my staying here would be as painful as if in shackles.’ The elder asks, ‘What would you like to do?’ The son answers, ‘I would rather remove filth, tend livestock, or work in the fields.’ The elder thinks: 
I will go along with his wish for now.’ Then he tells him to remove feces. A long time has passed, and the son has seen the elder gratify the five desires. Delight rising in his heart, he thinks: ‘I hope this great elder will, out of pity, accept me as his son and give me riches and treasures.’ With this idea in mind, he no longer works diligently. 
The elder, having seen the change, thinks: ‘Before long, he will definitely be my son.’ Then the elder finds him and asks, ‘Do you now have different ideas which cause you not to work hard?’ The son replies, ‘My heart wishes to be your son.’ The elder says, ‘Very good! 
I am your father, and you are my son. 
I am really your father though you did not know it. I now give you all that is in my treasure store.’ He then makes an announcement in the midst of a huge multitude: ‘This is my long-lost son. Unwittingly, he happened to return home. 
Today he willingly asks to be my son.’ “Kāśyapa, that elder tactfully entices his humble-minded son, first telling him to remove feces, next giving him wealth. 
Then he makes an announcement in the midst of a huge multitude, saying these words: ‘He is originally my son who, after having been lost for a long time, has come back by luck and has reckoned that he is my son.’ Likewise, Kāśyapa, to those who do not appreciate the One Vehicle, I pronounce the Three Vehicles. 
Because this is the Tathāgata’s skillful approach. 
All voice-hearers are my sons, just like the feces remover who has come to know his identity only today.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “Alas! Strange! How inferior is the Voice-Hearer Vehicle! 
are really the sons of the Buddha, but they do not recognize their father.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “You should learn . 
If you cannot bear to rebuke or reprove them, then you should refrain from doing so. 
When they come to maturity later, you will know it. 
Furthermore, Kāśyapa, the Voice-Hearer Vehicle and the Mahāyāna often counter each other, like the worldly versus that which is free from afflictions and their discharges, or folly versus wisdom. 
Because the maligners, after death, will fall into boundless darkness. 
Out of pity for them, you should devise some ways to bring them to maturity through the Dharma of the Mahāyāna. 
While those who are beyond cure will fall into hell, the faithful ones will believe. 
“Moreover, Kāśyapa, if there is a man who has just developed fever, he should not immediately be given medicine or other treatments. 
Because the time has not come. 
One should bide the right time to treat the patient. A physician who knows neither the right treatment nor its timing is a failure. 
Therefore, treatment should be given when the disease has come to a head. 
If it is not yet ready, one should wait for its time. 
Likewise, for sentient beings that malign this sūtra, when they come to maturity, they will reprove themselves in remorse, saying, ‘Alas! 
I now finally realize what I have done.’ At that time you should rescue them and draw them in by means of the Four Drawing-in Dharmas.” “Moreover, Kāśyapa, suppose there is a man who, crossing an expanse of wilderness, hears the call of a flock of birds. 
Dreading that the bird call means there are bandits, he takes another path. He enters an empty marshland and arrives at where tigers and wolves lurk. He is eaten by a tiger. 
Kāśyapa, likewise, when bhikṣus, bhikṣuṇīs, upāsakas, and upāsikās in future times hear the talk of self as well as the talk of no self, they fear the talk of self. They then enter the vast void, the view of cessation, to study and learn no self. They do not appreciate the profound sūtras that teach the Tathāgata store and the eternal abiding of Buddhas. 
Furthermore, Kāśyapa, you ask me what I have said to Ānanda: ‘With existence, there are pain and pleasure. Without existence, there is neither pain nor pleasure.’ Hearken now! 
Kāśyapa, the Tathāgata is neither existence nor a sentient being, nor does He perish.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Why not, World-Honored One?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “As an analogy, under the snow mountain, there is a precious jewel radiating pure light. 
A person who is skilled in identifying precious jewels can recognize one on sight and seize it. 
It is like the process of refining gold. When the impurities and rubbish are eliminated, pure gold is revealed, which has never been tainted by the filth initially with it. 
Because it is like the lamp carried by a person walking. Wherever he goes, darkness is dispelled by the bright light of the lamp. 
As refined pure gold is never tainted by filth, neither is the precious jewel. When moonlight and starlight shine on it, it rains down pure water. When sunlight shines on it, it blazes fire. 
Indeed, Kāśyapa, the Tathāgata, also called Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, who appears in the world, has forever left birth, aging, illness, and death, and has eradicated all afflictions and habits. He always radiates great light, like a luminous jewel, and He is never tainted, like a pure lotus flower never touched by dirt or water. 
Furthermore, Kāśyapa, the Tathāgata responsively appears in the world, manifesting an ordinary body with such and such an appearance at such and such a time. 
He is never tainted by the filth in the birthplace of ordinary beings, nor does He experience the pain or pleasure of the world. 
The pleasures of the five desires of gods and humans as requital for one’s merit in effect are pains. Only liberation is the ultimate eternal bliss.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “Very good! Very good! 
World-Honored One, I just realize that beginning today I have truly renounced family life, accepted the complete monastic precepts, become a bhikṣu, and attained Arhatship. 
I should recognize the kindness of the Tathāgata and requite His kindness because the Tathāgata once shared His seat with me. 
Moreover, today in the midst of His four large groups , He poured the Dharma water of the Mahāyāna on the crown of my head.” Among the multitude were those assuming the appearance and deportment of bhikṣus, those assuming the appearance and deportment of upāsakas, and those assuming the appearance and deportment of non-upāsakas. Leaning sideways, bending forward or back, they all were in disguise under the power of the māra. 
Then Ānanda asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, this huge multitude, having left the scum, are firm and true like the sandalwood grove. 
Why do those others stay in this multitude?” The Buddha advised Ānanda, “Ask Mahākāśyapa.” Ānanda said, “Yes, very good. 
I should ask him.” He then asked Kāśyapa, “Why do they stay in this multitude?” Kāśyapa replied, “Those fools are the retinue of the māra, and they have come along with him. 
That is why, Ānanda, I said earlier that, after the Tathāgata’s parinirvāṇa, I would be incapable of protecting the true Dharma by skillful means as if competently guarding the fields. That is why I said earlier, with other details, that I would rather carry the great earth. 
Thereupon the Tathāgata told me, ‘After my parinirvāṇa, you should be capable of protecting and upholding the true Dharma until its end.’ I then said to the Buddha, ‘I will be capable of protecting and upholding the true Dharma for forty years.’ And the Buddha rebuked me, ‘Why are you too lazy to protect the Dharma until its end?’” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Identify the māra . 
If you can find him, you are capable of protecting the Dharma.” Kāśyapa then searched with his God-eye, but was unable to see the māra. 
He was like that savage in the city kingdom of Śrāvastī who had lost his son. Searching through a huge multitude, the savage failed to find his son, and he returned tired. 
Likewise, Kāśyapa searched with his God-eye for the māra in the multitude but could not find him. 
Forthwith he said to the Buddha, “I am incapable of finding the evil māra.” For the same reason, the 80 great voice-hearers all said that they were incapable. 
Kāśyapa also ordered the 500 Bodhisattvas, including Worthy Protector Bodhisattva, to find the evil māra. Except for a Bodhisattva called Entire World Is Delighted to See, all were unable to find him. 
Then the World-Honored One told Kāśyapa, “You are incapable of protecting or upholding the Dharma for the last eighty years as the Dharma perishes. 
A Bodhisattva from the south will be able to protect and uphold it. You will at last find him among the 500 Bodhisattvas, including Worthy Protector Bodhisattva.” Kāśyapa replied, “Very good! 
“World-Honored One, this Licchavi youth called Entire World Is Delighted to See must be the one.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “You should go ask him to find the evil māra.” Then Kāśyapa, together with the 80 great voice-hearers and the 500 Bodhisattvas, including Worthy Protector Bodhisattva, jointly said to the Licchavi youth called Entire World Is Delighted to See: 
“Young man, you are designated by the World-Honored One as the one who is capable of finding the evil māra.” This youth in the huge multitude said to Kāśyapa, “I am capable of finding the evil māra. 
However, there are 80 great voice-hearers and 500 Bodhisattvas, including Worthy Protector, as well as holy Bodhisattvas Mañjuśrī, Avalokiteśvara, Great Might Arrived, Annihilating All Evil Life-Journey, and Maitreya. Why do they not look for him, and why do you make me look for him? 
It would be appropriate first to have them do it, and next to have me do it.” Kāśyapa asked, “Is subjugating the evil māra not a merit?” He replied, “Kāśyapa, since you know there is merit, you should do it yourself. 
I cannot do it for now.” Then Kāśyapa reported the story to the Buddha. 
The Buddha asked Kāśyapa, “Why did this youth say these words?” Kāśyapa replied to the Buddha, “This youth said, ‘The great virtuous ones have precedence, and I am next in line. 
I am a worldly person, in a humble caste. 
These great virtuous ones, such as the 80 great voice-hearers and the 500 leading Bodhisattvas, including Worthy Protector, should go first. 
Like that savage who had been unable to find his son, they all admitted that they were incapable, and retired to one side. 
Then the World-Honored One further told Kāśyapa, “You now have heard this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum. For forty years after my parinirvāṇa, you should protect and uphold the true Dharma as you do today. You should beat the great Dharma drum, blow the great Dharma conch shell, convene the great Dharma assembly, and erect the great Dharma banner. 
Then, during the next eighty years, as the true Dharma perishes, the Licchavi youth called Entire World Delighted Is to See will bind that evil māra and each of his retinue with five strings, like tying up a little rabbit. He will widely pronounce and recite the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum. 
He will beat the great Dharma drum, blow the great Dharma conch shell, convene the great Dharma assembly, and erect the great Dharma banner.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “When will this happen?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “During the last eighty years of the true Dharma, as it perishes.” Kāśyapa said to the Buddha, “I would like to see the evil māra.” The Buddha told the youth, “Quickly show the evil māra to the huge multitude.” Then the youth, gazing reverently at the Buddha, said, “Look at this evil māra that has come from elsewhere and is seated among the multitude in the way Bodhisattvas assume the forms of bhikṣus.” The huge multitude all saw him bound by five strings. 
The māra said, “Young man, I will no longer be a hindrance to this sūtra.” Three times he said it. 
Then the World-Honored One told the Licchavi youth called Entire World Delighted Is to See as well as the multitude of Bodhisattvas: “Mahākāśyapa will be able to protect and uphold the true Dharma for forty years after my parinirvāṇa. Who among you all can be the final Dharma protector after I am gone?” Three times the Buddha asked them, and no one was capable. 
The Buddha told the multitude, “Do not think less of yourselves. 
In this multitude I have many disciples who, after my parinirvāṇa, will be able to protect the true Dharma and pronounce this sūtra. 
The last one among the 500 Bodhisattvas, including Worthy Protector, is the Licchavi youth called Entire World Delighted Is to See. After my parinirvāṇa, he will beat the great Dharma drum, blow the great Dharma conch shell, convene the great Dharma assembly, and erect the great Dharma banner.” Then the youth released the vile māra. 
Then the huge multitude said to the youth, “You have received a prophecy from the Buddha.” The Buddha told Mahākāśyapa, “Kāśyapa, like a man guarding the fields without effective skills, you are incapable of protecting or upholding this sūtra. 
This youth has now heard this sūtra. He will excel in reading and reciting it, will step forward to protect and uphold it, and will expound it to others. He will always assume the form of an ordinary man though he stands on the seventh Bodhisattva ground. 
When eighty years still remain for the true Dharma  as it perishes, he will be reborn in the south, in the kingdom of Madras , into the Kāyale family in the village of Mahāpari on the bank of the Skillful Means River. 
He will be the bhikṣu who upholds my name as if skillfully guarding and protecting the seedlings in the fields. “In the midst of an arrogant, negligent, indolent multitude, he will renounce family life, the secular life. He will draw in that multitude by means of the Four Drawing-in Dharmas. 
After receiving this profound sūtra, he will read, recite, and penetrate it. He will purify the Saṅgha, enabling its members to abandon the impure ways they have accepted. 
First, he will pronounce to them this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum. Second, he will pronounce to them Mahāyāna sūtras about emptiness. Third, he will pronounce to them the eternal abiding of a Tathāgata and the realm of sentient beings, in accordance with this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum. He will beat the great Dharma drum, blow the great Dharma conch shell, convene the great Dharma assembly, and erect the great Dharma banner. 
In my presence, he will don the armor of great vows. He will pour down the Dharma rain in his entire 100-year lifespan. 
After living 100 years, he will manifest great spiritual powers and demonstrate parinirvāṇa. He will say these words: ‘Śākyamuni Buddha now has come here. All should regard Him reverently, pay respects, and make obeisance. 
You kindly people should observe that true reality is eternal and blissful as I say.’ Thereupon Buddhas from worlds in the ten directions will all appear and say these words, ‘Indeed! 
It is just as you say. 
All should believe in what you have said so well.’” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, what merits should a Bodhisattva achieve in order to see the eternal, indestructible dharma body of the Tathāgata and, upon dying, to demonstrate great spiritual powers?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas who have acquired eight merits can readily see the eternal, indestructible dharma body of the Tathāgata. 
What are these eight merits? 
First, pronounce this profound sūtra tirelessly. 
Second, pronounce the teachings of the Three Vehicles also tirelessly. 
Third, never abandon those who should be delivered. 
Fourth, bring harmony and unity to disrupted Saṅghas. 
Fifth, never be intimate with bhikṣuṇīs, women, or eunuchs. 
Sixth, stay far away from kings or those in power. 
Seventh, always delight in dhyāna and samādhi. 
Eighth, ponder and observe impurity and no self. 
These are the eight merits to acquire. “There are four more things. 
What are these four? 
First, excel in upholding the Dharma. 
Second, always celebrate the good and joyful things one has done. 
Third, willingly take refuge  and recognize it as a gain of great benefits. Fourth, resolutely have no doubts about the eternal abiding of the Tathāgata and, day and night, think of the merit of the Tathāgata. “Through these causes and conditions, before one’s death, one will presently see one’s eternally abiding dharma body and manifest great spiritual powers. 
Kāśyapa, wherever such good men and good women stay in cities or villages, I will reveal the dharma body to them and say these words: 
‘Good men and good women, the Tathāgata is eternally abiding.’ From today on, you should accept and uphold this sūtra, and read and recite it. You should explain it to others, saying these words: ‘Know that the Tathāgata always abides in peace and bliss. You should wish to see  with an upright mind, neither sycophantic nor deceitful.’ You should know that the World-Honored One is indeed eternally abiding. 
For the pure ones who wish to see me, I will manifest myself to them. 
“Mahākāśyapa, you should believe and deliberate. If one does not train in accordance with the Dharma, how can one see me ? 
How can one acquire transcendental powers and demonstrate them? 
As I have said to the voice-hearers, if a bhikṣu can discard even one  dharma, I assure him that he will achieve a  fruit, becoming an Anāgāmin. In the same way he will acquire merits. 
As I said earlier, a bhikṣu who observes his precepts will have gods following and serving him for life. Therefore, you all should never be greedy for benefits or worship. 
You should cultivate disgust as you meditate on your  body. 
Furthermore, Kāśyapa, that bhikṣu, who will uphold my name, will bring purity to the Saṅgha.” Kāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Why do you say that?” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “That bhikṣu will skillfully guard and protect the Four Drawing-in Dharmas, and will draw in the entire multitude of those who are greedy and corrupt, and those who violate the precepts. 
Each of the 500 Bodhisattvas, including Worthy Protector, initially considered himself incapable of being the final protector of the Dharma after my parinirvāṇa. They now are still incapable. 
When that bhikṣu, who will uphold my name, carries out the Drawing-in Dharmas, he will include the bhikṣus who are negligent and indolent and have them learn to make offerings. 
He will give sūtras to them, diminishing their afflictions and protecting their minds, like a ranger who tames cattle when they are ready. 
Those who do not reform after inclusion and training should be abandoned. Do not allow poisonous arrows to touch and harm good and pure people. 
He will have these thoughts: ‘Do not allow bhikṣus who are pure in their ways to breach their precepts because of the seamy ones. 
Nor should they perform together with the seamy ones the Saṅgha duties, such as Dharma assembly, recitation of precepts, confession, and repentance.’ Just as a king subjugates his enemies, he will tame the bhikṣus by skillful means. 
Having tamed them, for 100 years he will always pour down the Dharma rain, beat the great Dharma drum, blow the great Dharma conch shell, convene the great Dharma assembly, and erect the great Dharma banner. He will demonstrate great spiritual powers and, at death, enter parinirvāṇa. 
After the appearance of 1,000 Buddhas and 100,000 Pratyekabuddhas, and the parinirvāṇa of 8 Tathāgatas in 62 kalpas, he will then attain Buddhahood. He will be called Knowledge Accumulation Radiance, the Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha. 
That bhikṣu, who will uphold my name then ultimately attain Samyak-Saṁbodhi in this land, is now the Licchavi youth called Entire World Is Delighted to See. “Kāśyapa, know that it is hard to attain the unsurpassed bodhi. 
Kāśyapa, is it something an ordinary being can attain?” Kāśyapa replied to the Buddha, “No, World-Honored One.” The Buddha told Kāśyapa, “As a Buddha does His Buddha work in a one-Buddha world, so too do a second Buddha and a third Buddha . 
Within a mustard seed, there is a multitude of worlds. Sentient beings are not aware that they move to and fro among worlds, and they do not know who is in command of their comings and goings or who places them somewhere. 
They cannot help doing things according to what they know. 
Some know there is  self while others do not. 
In this world, on the Gṛdhrakūṭa Mountain, there is Śākyamuni Buddha, and in the same place, there will be Ajita Buddha. 
Events may manifest in this world, whether the burning of a kalpa or the pronouncement of the Dharma by a Buddha. 
“What is the foremost extraordinary event? 
It is the youth Entire World Is Delighted to See, who has never been reborn into an ordinary family. The families into which he has been reborn are Bodhisattvas. 
Kāśyapa, know that his supporting family and attendants are all delighted. His loving kin all say these words: ’such  person has been born into our family.’ These people are all sent by me. 
Kāśyapa, know that if my four groups of disciples who survive me become the retinue of that Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, they all will hear him pronounce this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum. They all will attain the unsurpassed bodhi. 
“Kāśyapa, in a life far in the past, I was a Wheel-Turning King called Nandisena, in the city of Vaiśālī. 
At that time the city of Vaiśālī was like this Sahā World, Jambudvīpa, one of the four continents  in this Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World. 
My lifespan was inconceivable. 
As the Wheel-Turning King, I gave generous alms and cultivated virtues in asaṁkhyeya ways. My observance of the precepts was pure, and I trained in good actions, accumulating immeasurable merit. 
However, if good men and good women, hearing of the Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum of the One Vehicle, go laughing to its presentation or remember it in one thought only, the merit they will acquire surpasses mine as described. It will be beyond reckoning by measurement or calculation, or by analogy. 
For example, when the mantra-king Blazing Flame recites a mantra, he will be well protected by its power for four months. 
Kāśyapa, know that the power of even a worldly ordinary mantra can be such. If one reads this Sūtra of the Great Dharma Drum, it is impossible that its power will fail to protect one for life. 
Therefore, if there are sentient beings that can make offerings to this sūtra, they have the definite cause for attaining the unsurpassed bodhi. Until their attainment of the ultimate bodhi, they will not stop pronouncing this sūtra.” Then the huge multitude chanted with one voice, “Very good! Very good! 
How amazing! 
World-Honored One, this youth will be  the bhikṣu who will uphold the Buddha’s name. If this bhikṣu enters parinirvāṇa in the south, the spirits of Jetavana Park here will have nothing to rely on. 
Instead, have him come from the south to the place where the Buddha was, then enter parinirvāṇa.” The Buddha told the huge multitude, “He will not take the initiative to come here. I will go to him, manifesting myself. I will first have this sūtra sent to him, and then go there. 
Because if this sūtra is not in his hands, his mind will regress. 
If he knows sentient beings that should be tamed, I, together with a huge multitude, will stand before him. 
After he has seen me, he will come here. Having been received here, he will enter parinirvāṇa. He will enter parinirvāṇa in the place where he wishes to deliver sentient beings.” A son of the god-king Śakra called Abhimaṁru had come to this assembly by means of his transcendental powers. 
Although he was young, he believed and delighted in the Mahāyāna with a truly pure mind. 
Unique and unmatched, he upheld among the gods this profound Mahāyāna sūtra. Because he explained to them the right cause of liberation, he received a prophecy from the Buddha. 
Then the huge multitude, with one voice, spoke in verse: 
Amazing! The youth Entire World Is Delighted to See Will be  a bhikṣu, To beat the great Dharma drum And to protect the Buddha Dharma, Enabling it to abide for a long time. 
After his parinirvāṇa, The world will be empty like space. 
After his parinirvāṇa, No one can take his place. 
Such a bhikṣu, Rare in the world, Can pronounce to the world The ultimate Way. 
Kāśyapa, Ānanda, Worthy Protector Bodhisattva, and the innumerable multitude, having heard the Buddha’s words, rejoiced and reverently carried out the teachings. 
Sūtra of the Vajra Samādhi
北涼失譯人名  Translated in the Northern Liang Dynasty by An Unknown
序品第一      Chapter 1 – Preface 
Thus I have heard: At one time the Buddha was staying on the Gṛdhrakūṭa Mountain, near the city of Rājagṛha. He was accompanied by 10,000 great bhikṣus who all had completed the Arhat path, including Śāriputra, Mahāmaudgalyāyana, and Subhūti. 
Also present were 2,000 Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas, including Liberation Bodhisattva, Mind King Bodhisattva, and Not Abiding Bodhisattva. 
In attendance as well were 80,000 elders, including Brahma Way, Great Brahma Way, and Jyotiṣka. 
Also gathered there were 600,000 koṭi gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, mahoragas, humans, and nonhumans. 
At that time the World-Honored One, surrounded by the multitude, pronounced to all a Mahāyāna sūtra called The Truth in One Flavor,  No Appearance,  No Birth, the Absolute True Reality , and the Benefits of One’s Inherent Awareness. Whoever heard this sūtra, and accepted and upheld even one four-line stanza, would enter a Buddha’s wisdom ground and be able to use skillful means to teach and transform sentient beings, and to serve as their great beneficent learned friend. 
After the Buddha pronounced this sūtra, He sat cross-legged and entered the Vajra Samādhi, His body and mind motionless. 
Then, in the midst of this multitude, a bhikṣu named Agada  rose from his seat, knelt on his right knee, and joined his palms. to restate the meaning of this sūtra, he spoke in verse: The World-Honored One, who has great lovingkindness, Wisdom, and hindrance-free transcendental powers To widely deliver sentient beings, Has revealed the meaning of the one truth. 
Using the one flavor, Never the path of the Small Vehicle , The meaning He has revealed Is apart from falsity. 
It enters Buddhas’ wisdom ground To reveal the absolute true reality . Whoever hears it will transcend the world And achieve liberation. 
To deliver sentient beings, Innumerable Bodhisattvas, for the sake of this multitude, Ask profound questions, In order to know that dharmas are in quiet nirvāṇa And to enter their absolute place . 
Using wisdom and skillful means, The Tathāgata has given teachings to reveal the truth, Teachings that follow the One Vehicle  And have no mixed flavors. 
As a rain brings wetness, All grasses thrive according to their different natures. 
As the Dharma in one flavor Pervades everywhere, Bodhi sprouts grow, Like grasses wetted by a rain. 
Whoever enters the Vajra Samādhi, The samādhi that verifies the truth, Definitely will eliminate  doubts and regrets In accordance with one dharma . 
Chapter 2 – Dharmas Have No Appearance Then the World-Honored One rose from samādhi and said, “Buddhas’ wisdom ground reveals the true reality of dharmas. 
Their skillful means and spiritual powers have no appearance because dharmas are by nature absolutely empty . However, the definitive meaning of the one realization ] is hard to understand and fathom, and beyond the knowledge and views of riders of the Two Vehicles. Only Buddhas and Bodhisattvas can know it. 
To sentient beings ready to be delivered, I expound the Dharma in one flavor.” Then Liberation Bodhisattva rose from his seat. 
Kneeling on his right knee, with joined palms, he asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, after the Buddha enters parinirvāṇa, the true Dharma  will be gone, and a likeness of the Dharma will abide in the world. In its final kalpa with the five turbidities, sentient beings will do evil karmas as they endlessly transmigrate in the Three Realms of Existence. 
I pray that the Buddha, out of lovingkindness and compassion, will expound the Dharma in one flavor and reveal the absolute true reality of dharmas, to enable future sentient beings to achieve equal liberation.” The Buddha answered, “Good man, you ask why I have appeared in the world. 
It is because I want to transform sentient beings and enable them to acquire the spiritual fruit, i.e., to transcend the world. 
This great matter  is inconceivable because it arises from great compassion. If I would not give you teachings out of great compassion, stinginess would be a fault of mine. 
All of you should intently hearken as I explain to you. 
“Good man, when transforming sentient beings, if one neither regards oneself as a transformer who transforms them nor regards them as objects to be transformed, and if one does not regard their transformation as no transformation, then this is a great transformation. 
One should enable every sentient being to discard the wrong view that one has a mind and an embodied self, because they have always been empty and quiet. If he realizes that his mind is empty, it will not produce illusions . 
His realization that one’s mind has no birth lies in its freedom from producing illusions.” Liberation Bodhisattva asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, a sentient being’s mind by nature has always been empty and quiet. 
An empty and quiet mind has no form. 
Then how should one train in order to realize that it has always been empty? 
I pray that the Buddha, out of lovingkindness and compassion, will explain to me.” The Buddha answered, “Bodhisattva, all one’s mental appearances have no root, no place, and no birth, and are empty and quiet. If one’s mind has no birth, it must be empty and quiet. 
By clearing one’s mind ground, one realizes that one’s mind has always been empty and had no appearance. 
Good man, as one’s mind with no appearance has no mind and no self, so all dharma appearances .” Liberation Bodhisattva asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, if sentient beings imagine that they have a self and a mind, what teachings should be used to enable them to free themselves from their fixations?” The Buddha answered, “Good man, if someone holds the view that one has a self, you should have him observe the Twelve Links of Dependent Arising, which are based on cause and effect and arise from one’s mental actions. 
Even one’s mind does not exist, much less one’s body. 
If someone holds the view that one has a self, you should have him discard the view of its existence. 
If someone holds the view that one has no self, you should have him discard the view of its nonexistence. If someone thinks that one’s mind has a birth, you should have him discard his misconception that it will die. 
If someone thinks that one’s mind has a death, you should have him discard his misconception that it was born. Once he discards these views , he will enter the true reality of dharmas. 
Hence all dharmas have neither birth nor death, neither death nor birth.” Liberation Bodhisattva asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, when a sentient being perceives the birth of a dharma, what view should he discard? 
When he perceives the death of a dharma, what view should he discard?” The Buddha answered, “Bodhisattva, when a sentient being perceives the birth of a dharma, you should have him discard the view of its nonexistence. 
When he perceives the death of a dharma, you should have him discard the view of its existence. 
If he discards these views, he will realize that dharmas are by nature absolutely empty and definitely have no birth.” Liberation Bodhisattva asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, if a sentient being abides in the view that dharmas have no birth, has he realized the truth that dharmas have no birth?” The Buddha answered, “Abiding in the view of no birth means birth . 
Because not abiding in the view of no birth means no birth . 
Bodhisattva, if one has the thought that dharmas have no birth, one is using the birth of a thought to end the view of birth. 
Only when one ends  birth and death of dharmas will one realize that dharmas have never had any birth, and that one’s mind is constantly empty and quiet, and abides in nothing. 
When one’s mind abides in nothing, it has no birth.” Liberation Bodhisattva asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, if one’s mind abides in nothing, how does one train and learn? 
Does one still have something to learn or have nothing to learn?” The Buddha answered, “Bodhisattva, one’s mind, which has no birth, neither enters something  nor exits anything , because it is one’s Tathāgata store , which has always been quiet and motionless. 
It has neither something to learn nor nothing to learn. 
Freedom from learning and not learning means having nothing to learn. 
What one has learned is that one’s mind has nothing to learn.” Liberation Bodhisattva asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, why is one’s Tathāgata store by nature quiet and motionless?” The Buddha answered, “Although one’s Tathāgata store is hidden by the appearances of birth and death of one’s thoughts and concerns, it is by nature quiet and motionless.” Liberation Bodhisattva asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, what are the appearances of the birth and death of one’s thoughts and concerns?” The Buddha answered, “Bodhisattva, the principle  is free from duality. 
If one differentiates between approval and disapproval , thousands of thoughts will arise and expire. These are the appearances of birth and death. 
Bodhisattva, observe that one’s true nature  fully accords with the principle, while thousands of thoughts and concerns disaccord with the principle. 
“If one has no thoughts or concerns, then their births and deaths will not appear, and one’s  consciousnesses will remain quiet and motionless. Then one’s five dharmas  will become pure. This is a Mahāyāna teaching. 
“Bodhisattva, when one enters the purity of one’s five dharmas, one’s mind will be free from delusion. 
Without delusion, one enters a Tathāgata’s holy wisdom ground of self-realization. 
Having entered the wisdom ground, one will know well that no dharma has ever been born. 
Knowing that dharmas have never been born, one will not have deluded thinking.” Liberation Bodhisattva said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, if one has no deluded thinking, then one does not need to stop it.” The Buddha said, “Bodhisattva, because one’s delusion has never been born, there is no delusion to end. 
If one knows that one’s mind is no mind, there is no mind to stop. 
Free from differentiation, one’s manifesting consciousness  does not arise. Then it has no birth to stop. However, no stopping is not no stopping. 
Because there is nothing to stop.” Liberation Bodhisattva asked the Buddha, “Although stopping does not have anything to stop, to stop something means the birth . 
Then what is no birth?” The Buddha answered, “Bodhisattva, one should stop the birth of a thought. 
As one does not abide in one’s no stopping or no abiding, how can there be the birth ?” Liberation Bodhisattva asked the Buddha, “If one’s mind  has no birth, how does one accept or reject anything? 
In what dharma appearances does one abide?” The Buddha answered, “One’s mind, which has no birth, neither accepts nor rejects anything. 
It abides in no mind and no dharma.” Liberation Bodhisattva asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, how does one abide in no mind and no dharma?” The Buddha answered, “If one’s mind does not arise, one abides in no mind. 
If a dharma does not arise , one abides in no dharma. 
Good man, as dharmas and one’s mind do not arise, one relies on nothing. 
As one does not abide in actions , one’s mind is constantly empty and quiet, free from various appearances. 
As an analogy, the open sky neither moves nor abides, neither arises nor does anything, and never differentiates between this and that. When one acquires the eye that sees that one’s mind is empty, and acquires the mind that knows that dharmas are empty, one realizes that one’s five aggregates and six faculties are empty and quiet. 
“Good man, to train to realize this emptiness, one does not rely on the Three Realms of Existence or various precepts, because one’s mind has no thoughts, and is pure and free from restraint and unrestraint. 
Although it is by nature as adamantine as vajra, it never damages  Three Jewels. 
Empty and motionless, one’s mind encompasses the six pāramitās.” Liberation Bodhisattva asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, the six pāramitās have their appearances. 
How can one use dharmas with appearances to transcend the world?” The Buddha answered, “Good man, the six pāramitās that I expound have no appearances and are asaṁskṛta . 
Because if one discards desires, one’s mind will always be pure. 
If one’s resolve is firm, and if one’s mind is pure, abides in nothing, and has no attachment to the Three Realms of Existence, this is śīla-pāramitā . 
If one delves into the emptiness of dharmas, cuts off one’s fetters, quiets one’s three karmas , and does not abide in one’s body or mind, this is kṣānti-pāramitā . 
If one stays far way from names and numbers, discards the opposite view, whether that a dharma is empty or that it is existent, and delves into the emptiness of one’s five aggregates, this is vīrya-pāramitā . 
If one’s meditation stays away from blankness and does not abide in various emptinesses, and if one’s mind abides in nothing, not even great emptiness, this is dhyāna-pāramitā . 
If one knows that one’s mind has no appearance but is not a blank like the open sky, does not give birth to actions or enter nirvāṇa, does not rely on the Bodhisattva grounds or abide in one’s wisdom, neither enters nor exits anything, but constantly abides in equality  and definitely accords with the true reality of dharmas, this is prajñā-pāramitā . 
“Good man, these six pāramitās are the benefits of one’s inherent awareness and accord with one’s true nature. They enable one to transcend the world and achieve hindrance-free liberation. 
Good man, this liberation has neither appearance nor action. 
Freedom from liberation and no liberation is called liberation. Because it has no appearance, no action, no motion, and no disorder. 
It is quiet nirvāṇa without the appearance of nirvāṇa.” After Liberation Bodhisattva heard these words, he found great joy in his heart because he acquired an understanding he never before had. To affirm the meaning of the Buddha’s words, he spoke in verse: The World-Honored One, who is fully enlightened, Has Expounded the Dharma to this multitude. His teachings reveal the One Vehicle, Not the paths of the Two Vehicles. 
in one flavor and with no appearance Is like the vast open sky, which encompasses all things. 
It enables all those with different natures To realize their own place . If one discards the view that one has a mind and a self, One will realize that all things are manifested by one dharma . 
When one discards the view of opposite appearances , such as existence and nonexistence, One realizes quiet nirvāṇa But does not abide in it, Because one enters the absolute place , Which is free from appearances and actions. 
One’s empty mind on the nirvāṇa ground Is the nirvāṇa mind, which has no birth. 
It is by nature as adamantine as vajra, And never damages  Three Jewels It has the six pāramitās To deliver all sentient beings. 
One never rides the Small Vehicle To transcend the Three Realms of Existence, Because the seal of the Dharma in one flavor Is formed by the One Vehicle. 
After the multitude heard this meaning, all found great joy in their hearts, discarded the wrong view that one has a mind and a self, entered the vastness of emptiness and no appearance, and definitely cut off their fetters and ended their afflictions. 
Chapter 3 – Actions Have No Birth At that time, Mind King Bodhisattva heard the Buddha’s inconceivable teaching on transcending the Three Realms of Existence. He rose from his seat, joined his palms, and asked in verse: According to the Tathāgata’s teaching, One’s transcendence of the world has no appearance. 
If all sentient beings End their afflictions, cut off their fetters, And know that one’s mind and self are empty, They will realize that dharmas have no birth. 
As dharmas have no birth, How can one acquire endurance in one’s realization that dharmas have no birth? 
Then the Buddha told Mind King Bodhisattva, “Good man, endurance in one’s realization that dharmas have no birth means an enduring understanding that dharmas have never had any birth; for example, all actions have no birth. 
It is false that one can take action that has birth to acquire endurance in one’s realization that dharmas have no birth.” Mind Kind Bodhisattva said, “World-Honored One, if perceiving as an attainment one’s endurance in one’s realization that dharmas have no birth is false, then perceiving no attainment and no endurance must not be false.” The Buddha said, “Not so. 
Why not? 
Because perceiving no attainment and no endurance implies attainment . Any attainment and one’s endurance in it mean birth, the birth of an attainment. 
Whether one perceives attainment or no attainment, one’s perception is false.” Mind Bodhisattva asked, “World-Honored One, why is one’s mind, which has no birth and no abiding in anything, not false?” The Buddha answered, “What is meant by one’s mind, which has no birth and no abiding in anything? 
One’s mind has no shape or sections, just as the nature of fire is hidden in wood but has no place. 
Fire has a name, which is a word, but its true nature cannot be captured. To describe its principle, one gives it a false name, which also cannot be captured. 
Likewise one’s mind does not have a place. 
“Good man, one’s mind is like an āmra , which is not born from itself, from something else, from both itself and something else, or from no cause. It has no birth. 
Because conditions arise and expire. 
When a condition arises, it is no birth; when a condition expires, it is no death. Whether conditions are hidden or visible, they have no appearance because their basic principle is nirvāṇa. 
The presence of one’s mind cannot be identified with a place because it abides in its true nature. 
“This true nature is neither the same nor different, neither perpetual nor ceasing, neither entering nor exiting, and has neither birth nor death. It is free from the four falsities and beyond the way of words. 
Likewise one’s mind by nature has no birth. 
How can it be described as born or not born, or as having or not having endurance? 
If someone claims that his mind attains, abides in, or sees something, he has not attained anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
prajñā , he remains in the long night . To understand one’s mind and its nature, one should know that one’s mind is true suchness  and that its nature is true suchness as well. 
They have no birth and no action.” Mind King Bodhisattva said, “World-Honored One, if one’s mind is true suchness, it will not give birth to actions, and actions will not be born from one’s mind. 
Whatever has no birth takes no action. 
Hence actions have no birth.” The Buddha asked, “Good man, do you use  no birth to prove that actions have no birth?” Mind King Bodhisattva answered, “Not so. 
Why not? 
Because as the appearances of one’s actions, which have no birth, are by nature empty and quiet, there is no seeing or hearing, no gain or loss, no words or speech, no knowing or appearing, and no accepting or rejecting. Then how does one verify anything? 
Any claim of verifying  would be disputable. 
Actions, which have no birth, are free from dispute and discussion.” The Buddha asked, “Have you attained anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi?” Mind King Bodhisattva answered, “World-Honored One, I do not attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
Why not? 
Because bodhi by nature has neither gain nor loss, neither perception nor knowledge, and makes no differentiation. 
Its freedom from differentiation is purity, and its nature is unadulterated, indescribable by words, and free from existence and nonexistence, and knowing and not knowing. 
Likewise are Dharma actions. 
Because all Dharma actions have no place, because of their true nature. 
Therefore, how can one attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi?” The Buddha said, “Indeed, indeed. 
As all one’s mental actions are quiet and have no appearance and no birth, so too all one’s consciousnesses are quiet and have no appearance and no birth. 
Because as eye and what it touches are empty and quiet, eye consciousness is empty and quiet, free from motion and no motion, and from the three kinds of internal sensations , which are in nirvāṇa. 
So too are ear consciousness, nose consciousness, tongue consciousness, body consciousness, mental consciousness , manas consciousness , and ālaya consciousness . All one’s consciousnesses are free from the notion that they are in nirvāṇa and the notion that they have no birth. 
If one entertains these two notions, then one’s actions have birth, not no birth, and one is not free from the three kinds of sensations, the three kinds of actions , and the three kinds of precepts. “If one has attained nirvāṇa, one’s mind does not arise but is quiet and free from effort and usage. 
It abides in neither attainment nor no attainment of nirvāṇa. As one’s mind remains in no abiding and no appearance, one is free from the three kinds of sensations, the three kinds of actions, and the three kinds of precepts. One’s mind is quiet and pure, has neither birth nor action, and abides in nothing, whether dhyāna or samādhi. 
Mind King Bodhisattva asked, “Dhyāna can control one’s moving mind and still one’s chaotic illusions. 
Why should one not abide in dhyāna?” The Buddha answered, “Bodhisattva, dhyāna is motion. No motion and no dhyāna are dhyāna, which has no birth. 
Dhyāna by nature has no birth and is apart from its appearances. 
It by nature does not abide in anything and is apart from the motion of abiding in dhyāna. 
If one knows that dhyāna by nature has neither motion nor quietness, one will understand that it has no birth. 
Likewise prajñā, which has no birth does not abide in anything, and one’s mind does not move. 
Because of this wisdom-knowledge , one achieves prajñā-pāramitā, which has no birth.” Mind King Bodhisattva said, “World-Honored One, prajñā, which has no birth, neither abides nor departs anywhere. 
One’s mind abides nowhere, and there is nowhere one’s mind can abide. Having nowhere to abide, one’s mind has no birth and no abiding. Abiding in this way, one’s mind abides in no birth and no abiding. 
World-Honored One, one’s mind, which has no birth and no abiding, is inconceivable. 
What is inconceivable is describable and indescribable.” The Buddha said, “Indeed, indeed.” After Mind King Bodhisattva heard these words, he marveled at them as unprecedented teachings and praised the Buddha in verse: The World-Honored One, who is adorned with great wisdom, Has broadly expounded that dharmas have no birth. These teachings never before heard Are now given. 
They are like pure sweet dew, Which appears once in a long while. They are inconceivable, hard to encounter, And hard to hear. 
Like an unsurpassed fortune field And a supreme remedy, To deliver sentient beings, These teachings are now given. 
After the multitude heard these words, all acquired endurance in their realization that dharmas have no birth and acquired prajñā, which has no birth. 
Chapter 4 – The Benefits of One’s Inherent Awareness At that time, Not Abiding Bodhisattva heard the Buddha expound the inconceivable truth in one flavor. Having come from a distant place, he stayed close to the Tathāgata’s seat to listen with intent mindfulness. He entered a pure state, his body and mind motionless. 
Then the Buddha asked Not Abiding Bodhisattva, “Whence have you come and where have you come to?” Not Abiding Bodhisattva answered, “I came from nowhere and came to nowhere.” The Buddha praised, “Inconceivable! 
Because you came from nowhere and came to nowhere, you have acquired the benefits of your inherent awareness. 
You are a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva.” Then He emitted vast radiance that illuminated everywhere in the Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World, and spoke in verse: 
He always uses the benefits of his inherent awareness To benefit sentient beings. 
Neither coming nor going, As he carries out his four majestic deportments, He constantly abides in the benefits of his inherent awareness To guide sentient beings. 
Then Not Abiding Bodhisattva asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, what benefits should be used to enable a sentient being’s emotion-driven consciousnesses to become amala ?” The Buddha said, “Buddha-Tathāgatas always use the one realization  to turn a sentient being’s consciousnesses into amala. 
Because all sentient beings have their inherent awareness. So Buddhas use the one realization to awaken all sentient beings, enabling them to realize their inherent awareness and see that their emotion-driven consciousnesses are empty and quiet, and have no birth. 
Because a sentient being’s true nature has always been motionless.” Not Abiding Bodhisattva asked, “One’s eight consciousnesses depend on objects to arise. 
How can they not move?” The Buddha said, “All  objects and one’s consciousnesses have always been empty. Emptiness is free from dependency. 
Then how can one’s consciousnesses depend on objects to arise?” Not Abiding Bodhisattva asked, “If all objects are empty, how does one perceive them?” The Buddha said, “One’s perception is false. 
Because all dharmas in existence have no birth, no appearance, and no names. 
As all dharma appearances are empty and quiet, so too are all sentient beings’ bodies. 
Even one’s body does not exist, much less its perception.” Not Abiding Bodhisattva said, “If one’s body,  objects, and consciousnesses are empty, one’s inherent awareness must also be empty.” The Buddha said, “One’s inherent awareness is indestructible because of its true nature. 
It is neither empty nor not empty, and free from emptiness and non-emptiness.” Not Abiding Bodhisattva said, “Likewise the appearances of all objects are neither empty nor not empty.” The Buddha said, “Indeed. 
Moreover, the root of this nature has no place.” Not Abiding Bodhisattva said, “Likewise one’s inherent awareness has no place.” The Buddha said, “Indeed. 
Because one’s inherent awareness has no place, it is pure. In its purity, it has no perception. 
Because a  thing has no place, it is pure. 
In its purity, it has no form.” Not Abiding Bodhisattva said, “Likewise one’s mind, eye, and consciousness are inconceivable.” The Buddha said, “Likewise one’s mind, eye, and consciousness are inconceivable. 
Because an object has no place, and is pure and without a name, it does not come inside . 
Because one’s eye has no place, and is pure and without perception, it does not go outside . 
Because one’s mind has no place and is pure, it neither arises from nor stops anywhere. 
Because one’s consciousness has no place, and is pure and motionless, it makes no differentiation. The nature  is emptiness, which has no perception. 
“Good man, when one realizes that one’s inherent awareness is free from perception, one’s consciousnesses enter . 
Because when one arrives on the ground of vajra wisdom, one has completed the liberation path and entered the no-abiding ground , free from entering and exiting, and one’s mind abides nowhere on the ground of its true nature. 
This ground is pure like lucid aquamarine ; its nature is equality, like the nature of the great earth; its discerning observations are like the wisdom sunlight; its benefits that enable sentient beings to realize their inherent awareness are like a great Dharma rain. 
Acquiring these four kinds of wisdom-knowledge is entering the ground of a Buddha’s wisdom-knowledge, where one’s consciousnesses do not arise.” Not Abiding Bodhisattva said, “The holy power of realizing one’s inherent awareness and the ground of the four kinds of vast wisdom-knowledge revealed by the Tathāgata are the benefits of every sentient being’s inherent awareness. 
Because every sentient being has always had them in his body.” The Buddha said, “Indeed. 
Because all sentient beings have always been free from afflictions and had the benefits of their inherent awareness. 
However, they have not yet conquered their desires, which are like thorns.” Not Abiding Bodhisattva asked, “If sentient beings have not yet acquired the benefits of their inherent awareness and are still collecting , how can they conquer what is hard to conquer?” The Buddha answered, “Whether one is collecting  or letting one’s perception be alone, whether one is making differentiations or forming attachments , whether one draws one’s mind back to stay in an empty cavern , one will be able to conquer what is hard to conquer, and to liberate oneself from the fetters of māras, because when one sits loftily  on the open ground, one’s consciousness enters nirvāṇa.” Not Abiding Bodhisattva said, “When one’s mind abides in nirvāṇa alone, unaccompanied , one should achieve liberation.” The Buddha said, “Constantly abiding in nirvāṇa is being fettered by nirvāṇa. 
Because nirvāṇa is a benefit of one’s inherent awareness, and because the benefits of one’s inherent awareness are in nirvāṇa. Attaining nirvāṇa is realizing one’s inherent awareness. 
As one’s inherent awareness is by nature changeless, so too nirvāṇa is changeless. 
As one’s inherent awareness has neither birth nor death, so too nirvāṇa has neither birth nor death. 
Because nirvāṇa and one’s inherent awareness are no different, attaining nirvāṇa is no attainment. As attaining nirvāṇa is no attainment, how can one abide in it? 
“Good man, an enlightened person does not abide in nirvāṇa. 
Why not? 
Because one’s inherent awareness has no birth and is apart from one’s filthy afflictions. 
One’s inherent awareness has no death and is apart from the motion of entering nirvāṇa. 
Abiding on this wisdom ground, one’s mind abides in nothing. 
Free from entering and exiting, it enters amala consciousness.” Not Abiding Bodhisattva said, “Entering amala consciousness means that there is a place to enter. 
Entrance into this place means attainment.” The Buddha said, “Not so. 
Why not? 
As an analogy, a confused son possesses gold coins but does not know that he has them. 
He roams in the ten directions for fifty years, undergoing poverty and hardship. He has to beg for things to live a life of privation. 
When the father sees his son in such a plight, he says to him, ‘You have gold coins. Why do you not use them? 
Then you can get whatever you need in full.’ The son is awakened and sees his gold coins. With great joy in his heart, he declares that he has gotten gold coins. 
His father says, ‘Confused child, do not rejoice. The gold coins have always been yours. You did not get them. 
There is no reason to rejoice.’ “Good man, likewise is one’s amala consciousness. 
Because it has never left one, it does not enter one. 
When one is confused, it is not absent. 
One’s awakening  does not mean that it enters one.” Not Abiding Bodhisattva asked, “The father knows that his son is confused. Why does he let him wander in the ten directions for fifty years, undergoing poverty and hardship, then tell him ?” The Buddha answered, “Passing fifty years describes how one’s mind moves in one thought. 
Roaming in the ten directions in pursuit of the appearances of objects describes how one travels far away .” Not Abiding Bodhisattva asked, “What is meant by ‘one’s mind moves in one thought’?” The Buddha answered, “When one’s mind moves in one thought, one’s five aggregates arise, which bring fifty evils.” Not Abiding Bodhisattva asked, “Roaming in the ten directions in pursuit of the appearances of objects, far away from one’s true mind, describes how a thought in one’s mind brings fifty evils. 
How can a sentient being be enabled not to have any thoughts?” The Buddha answered, “Have a sentient being quiet his mind and abide on the vajra ground, where no thought arises. 
If his mind remains peaceful and calm, not a single thought will arise.” Not Abiding Bodhisattva said, “Inconceivable! 
When one has no thought, one’s mind remains peaceful and calm. This is a benefit of one’s inherent awareness. 
Its benefits are motionless, constantly present, and free from existence and nonexistence, and awareness and unawareness. 
Free from perception, one’s inherent awareness is pure, changeless, taint free, and attachment free, because its pure nature is inconceivable.” The Buddha said, “Indeed.” After hearing these words, Not Abiding Bodhisattva acquired an understanding he never before had, and spoke in verse: 
Once realizing one’s inherent awareness, One uses its benefits to guide sentient beings to realize their inherent awareness, Like that son who comes to see his gold coins And whose gain is no gain. 
When the multitude heard these words, all achieved prajñā-pāramitā, a benefit of their inherent awareness. 
Chapter 5 – Entering the True Reality of Dharmas Then the Tathāgata said, “Bodhisattvas who have entered deep into their inherent awareness and acquired its benefits can deliver sentient beings. 
After the true Dharma age, even when the times are not right, they should explain to them a sentient being’s inherent awareness. 
They should give them pertinent teachings, whether the same or different, whether in accord with or against their views, to guide their emotion-driven consciousness into the sea of sarvajña , and to enable those ready to be delivered not to puff their false wind of ignorance but to drink the wondrous Dharma milk in one flavor. “Whether one engages in worldly or supra-worldly matters, one should abide nowhere to observe the five emptinesses, and should neither grasp nor discard them when one enters or exits one’s observation. 
Because dharmas have empty appearances. Their true nature is neither existence nor nonexistence, though they may appear to be existent or nonexistent. Without a fixed appearance, they abide in neither existence nor nonexistence. 
If a Bodhisattva knows that realizing the emptiness of dharmas is a benefit of one’s inherent awareness, he will attain bodhi.” Then, in the midst of this multitude, a Bodhisattva called Great Strength rose from his seat and came forward. 
He asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, as the Buddha says, one should neither grasp nor discard the five emptinesses when one enters or exits . 
What are these five emptinesses?” The Buddha answered, “Bodhisattva, the five emptinesses are the emptiness of  the meanings of one’s mind and consciousnesses . 
Bodhisattva, emptinesses such as these do not abide in emptiness and have no appearance of emptiness. How can one grasp or discard a dharma, which has no appearance? 
When one enters the no-grasping ground, one enters the three emptinesses.” Great Strength Bodhisattva asked, “What are the three emptinesses?” The Buddha answered, “The three emptinesses are the emptiness of  whatever is seen as empty. 
Not abiding in their appearances, these three emptinesses are true, beyond the way of words, and inconceivable.” Great Strength Bodhisattva said, “Whatever is true implies its existence.” The Buddha said, “Existence does not abide in existence; nonexistence does not abide in nonexistence. 
An existent dharma does not mean that it abides in its existence; a nonexistent dharma does not mean that it abides in its nonexistence. 
One cannot use the existence or nonexistence of a dharma to explain its principle . 
Bodhisattva, it is inconceivable that a dharma with no name and no meaning appears to have a name and a meaning. 
Because a dharma has no name but is given a name, and because a name has no meaning but is given a meaning.” Great Strength Bodhisattva said, “Then the name and meaning of a dharma are actually an appearance of true suchness, just as a Tathāgata is an appearance of true suchness. 
True suchness does not abide in true suchness and has no appearance of true suchness. 
Although the appearance of a dharma is not true suchness, it is no different from the appearance of a Tathāgata. 
Likewise a sentient being’s mental appearances are a Tathāgata’s appearance. 
Then his mind must not have differentiated objects.” The Buddha said, “Indeed. 
A sentient being’s mind has no differentiated objects. 
Because one’s mind has always been pure and should have no taints. However, it is tainted by one’s afflictions and perceives the Three Realms of Existence. 
The Three Realms of Existence perceived by one’s mind are called its differentiated objects. 
These objects are false because they are manifested by one’s mind. 
If one’s mind is not deluded, it will not manifest differentiated objects.” Great Strength Bodhisattva said, “If one’s mind is pure, it does not give birth to objects. 
If one’s mind is pure, one does not perceive the Three Realms of Existence.” The Buddha said, “Indeed. 
Bodhisattva, one’s mind does not give birth to objects, and objects do not give birth to one’s mind. 
Because when one sees objects, one sees only one’s mind. If one’s mind does not give birth to illusions, then one does not see them. 
If one sees no sentient being within oneself and sees the emptiness of the three natures  of one’s karma, then one sees neither oneself nor others. Even when one makes the two entrances , one’s mind does not arise. 
After one acquires this benefit , the Three Realms of Existence will not arise in one’s mind.” Great Strength Bodhisattva asked, “What is meant by making the two entrances while one’s mind does not arise? 
If one’s mind has never had any birth, how does it make an entrance?” The Buddha answered, “The two entrances are  the entrance through action. “The entrance through the principle means having a deep belief that sentient beings are no different from their true nature. 
One should focus one’s awareness and intently observe that one’s Buddha nature is neither existent nor nonexistent, does not differentiate between itself and other things, and is the same in an ordinary being and a holy being. 
When one firmly abides on the ground of one’s vajra mind, remains in quietness, and makes no differentiation, this is called the entrance through the principle. “The entrance through action means keeping one’s mind quiet, free from forming attachments, producing illusions, and seeking something, and, like the great earth, remaining immovable by winds. One should discard the view that one has a mind and a self, and should rescue and deliver sentient beings. 
Using one’s mind, which has neither birth nor appearance, one neither grasps nor discards anything. 
Realizing that it neither enters nor exits is called entering , though entering is no entering. 
Bodhisattva, entering  in this way, one does not regard dharma appearances as empty or false. 
Why not? 
Because a dharma that is not nonexistent has merits. 
As  neither one’s mind nor its projections, it is naturally pure.” Great Strength Bodhisattva asked, “What is neither one’s mind nor its projections, and is naturally pure?” The Buddha answered, “ emptiness, or true suchness, which cannot be identified by one’s mind, consciousnesses, or mental functions. 
It is free from the appearance of emptiness and the appearance of form, and is neither coherent  nor incoherent  with one’s mind through or not through conditions. 
It is not one’s mental projections or indications. It has no self-essence, makes no differentiation, and has no appearance, no name, and no meaning. 
Because the meaning of a name is words, not true suchness. 
There is no dharma whose nature is not true suchness, because true suchness pervades all dharmas. 
Because true suchness is the root principle of all dharmas, but is neither a root nor a principle, is apart from dispute, and has no appearance. 
Bodhisattva, this pure dharma is beyond birth and death.” Great Strength Bodhisattva said, “Inconceivable! 
A dharma appearance is not formed compositely or singly, and is not constrained by existence or nonexistence, neither gathers nor disperses, has neither birth nor death, and neither comes nor goes, nor abides. 
It is inconceivable.” The Buddha said, “Indeed. 
As a dharma appearance is inconceivable, so too is one’s mind. 
Because one’s mind is no different from true suchness, and because it has always been true suchness. 
A sentient being and his Buddha nature are neither the same nor different. 
His nature has neither birth nor death because the nature of birth and death is nirvāṇa. “Dharma nature and appearance are true suchness, which never moves. 
Although all dharmas appear to arise through conditions, they have no birth because the nature of their arising is true suchness, which never moves. Moreover, the appearances of conditions are by nature empty. 
As each condition also arises through conditions, in true reality there is no dependent arising of dharmas. 
However, one’s deluded mind sees dharmas arise through conditions, not knowing that their appearances have no birth because the conditions they depend upon are nonexistent. 
One’s mind accords with the principle of dharmas because its essence is emptiness. 
Like the open sky, it abides nowhere. However, an ordinary being’s mind takes dharma appearances as real and differentiates them. 
Because the appearance of true suchness is beyond existence and nonexistence, whoever perceives the existence or nonexistence of a dharma sees only his mind and consciousnesses. 
“Bodhisattva, one’s mind has no self-essence, and is neither existent nor nonexistent. 
It has neither appearance nor no appearance, and is beyond the description of words. 
Because true suchness, like the open sky, has no appearance, and is beyond riders of the Two Vehicles. 
Only those who train through the six stages can know it.” Great Strength Bodhisattva asked, “What are the six stages of training? 
I pray that you will reveal them.” The Buddha answered, “They are  the ground of virtually perfect enlightenment. Those who train in this way can know true suchness.” Great Strength Bodhisattva asked, “The benefits of one’s inherent awareness neither enter nor exit. 
What dharma can enable one’s mind to enter the true reality of dharmas?” The Buddha answered, “The true reality of dharmas is boundless. 
When one realizes one’s boundless mind, one enters the true reality of dharmas.” Great Strength Bodhisattva asked, “One’s boundless mind has limitless wisdom. 
It is hindrance free, and with hindrance-free wisdom enters the true reality of dharmas. 
However, an ordinary being has a weak mind that jitters. 
What dharma should be used to enable him to develop a firm mind in order to enter the true reality of dharmas?” The Buddha answered, “Bodhisattva, his mind jitters because it is driven by internal faculties and external objects to accumulate his afflictions, which form a sea with waves agitated by strong winds. 
Bodhisattva, have him retain three things, abide in one thing, and enter a Tathāgata’s dhyāna. 
Through dhyāna, his mind will not jitter.” Great Strength Bodhisattva asked, “What is meant by retaining three things, abiding in one thing, and entering a Tathāgata’s dhyāna?” The Buddha answered, “Retaining three things means retaining the three liberations. 
Abiding in one thing means abiding in the true suchness of one’s mind. 
Entering a Tathāgata’s dhyāna means using the principle to observe that one’s mind is true suchness. When one enters one’s mind ground in this way, one enters the true reality of dharmas.” Great Strength Bodhisattva asked, “What are the three liberations? 
How does one use the principle to observe ?” The Buddha answered, “The three liberations are  prajñā liberation. When one uses the principle to observe, one sees that one’s mind is as pure as the principle and never differentiates between approval and disapproval .” Great Strength Bodhisattva asked, “What is meant by making use ? 
How does one observe ?” The Buddha answered, “Making use  means seeing that one’s mind is no different whether one is in meditation or is doing things. 
One’s mind is no different whether one is observing one’s internal actions or is taking external actions, whether one is entering or exiting meditation. 
Not abiding in any appearance, free from any sense of gain or loss, one’s pure mind flows with the same or different appearances. 
This is called using the principle to observe.” “Bodhisattva, whoever observes his mind in this way does not abide in opposite appearances. 
Although he does not renounce family life, he does not abide in family life. 
Although he does not don a Dharma robe, does not observe the prātimokṣa precepts, and does not participate in the poṣadha practice, he does self-purification by letting his mind be, and acquires the holy fruit. 
He does not ride either of the Two Vehicles, but enters the Bodhisattva Way. Then he completes his training on all Bodhisattva grounds and attains Buddha bodhi.” Great Strength Bodhisattva said, “Inconceivable! 
Such a person neither renounces nor does not renounce family life. 
Because he enters the house of nirvāṇa, dons a Tathāgata’s robe, and sits on a bodhi seat. Even śramaṇas should respect him and make offerings to him.” The Buddha said, “Indeed. 
Because entering the house of nirvāṇa means that his mind transcends the Three Realms of Existence; donning a Tathāgata’s robe means that he realizes the emptiness of dharmas; sitting on a bodhi seat means that he ascends to the ground of true enlightenment. 
The mind of such a person is beyond riders of the Two Vehicles, not to mention śramaṇas. 
How can they not make offerings to him?” Great Strength Bodhisattva said, “His wisdom ground and his  ocean of emptiness cannot be seen by riders of the Two Vehicles.” The Buddha said, “Indeed. 
Riders of the Two Vehicles are attached to the flavor  of samādhi and acquire a samādhi body. 
As if in a coma caused by drinking alcohol, even after several kalpas, they still cannot awaken to their inherent awareness. Only after the alcohol has worn off can they begin to train and then to acquire a Buddha’s body. 
“By contrast, as soon as a person sheds the status of an icchantika , he trains through the six stages. On his training ground, in one thought from his pure mind, he absolutely understands the truth, acquires the power of vajra wisdom, reaches the spiritual level of avinivartanīya , and, with endless lovingkindness and compassion, begins to deliver sentient beings.” Great Strength Bodhisattva said, “Such a person has no need to observe the precepts or show respect for śramaṇas.” The Buddha said, “Buddhas pronounce the precepts to transform those whose evil ways and arrogance are like ocean waves. 
However, on that person’s mind ground, the ocean of his eighth consciousness is clear, and the flow of his ninth consciousness  is pure, immovable by winds that agitate ocean waves. The precepts are by nature empty, but those who observe them are attached to their appearances. 
However, that person’s seventh and sixth consciousnesses do not arise, and his accumulation of afflictions has ended in his samādhi. He is never apart from the three Buddhas, under whom he activates the bodhi mind. He pierces a dharma’s three appearances  to see that they have no appearance, and reveres the Three Jewels. Displaying his majestic deportments, he never fails to show respect for śramaṇas. 
Bodhisattva, that kindly one abides in neither action nor no action in the world. 
He enters the three emptinesses and ends his attachment to the Three Realms of Existence.” Great Strength Bodhisattva said, “That kindly one activates the bodhi mind under the three Buddhas: the Tathāgata-store Buddha , the Buddha fulfilled in all required merits , and the Buddha in physical form . He enters the three clusters of Bodhisattva precepts but does not abide in their appearances. 
He ends his attachment to the Three Realms of Existence but does not abide on the nirvāṇa ground. 
He enters the place where the untamed reside and never abandons those ready to be delivered. 
He is inconceivable.” Then Śāriputra rose from his seat, came forward, and spoke in verse: Sailing in the ocean of prajñā, A Buddha does not abide in the city of nirvāṇa. He is like a wonderful lotus flower, Which does not grow on a plateau. 
For countless kalpas, Bodhisattvas never discard their afflictions As they deliver the world and attain Buddhahood, Like a lotus flower that rises from mud. 
The six stages of training Are a Bodhisattva’s training ground. 
The three emptinesses Are the right path to bodhi. 
I now abide in not abiding in  In accordance with the Buddha’s teachings, And I will come to this world again and again . 
I will enable sentient beings To do the same, no different from me, And enable those who are ready now and those will be ready later To attain true enlightenment. 
Then the Buddha told Śāriputra, “ inconceivable! You will attain bodhi and enable innumerable sentient beings to cross the ocean of suffering from birth and death.” At that time all riders of the Mahāyāna attained bodhi, and riders of the Small Vehicle entered the ocean of the five emptinesses. 
Then Śāriputra said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, trainings on the Bodhisattva Way have neither names nor appearances. 
Then the three clusters of Bodhisattva precepts have no descriptions. 
How can one accept them and explain them to sentient beings? 
I pray that the Buddha, out of lovingkindness and compassion, will explain to me.” The Buddha said, “Good man, hearken. I will explain to you. 
Good man, good and evil dharmas are manifested by one’s mind. 
All one’s perceptions of objects are differentiations made by one’s consciousnesses and words. 
Because, good man, as one’s inherent awareness never arises, the three clusters of Bodhisattva precepts have no use. 
abides in true suchness , the doors of the six life-paths shut, and the four conditions accord with true suchness and encompass the three clusters of Bodhisattva precepts.” Śāriputra asked, “What is meant by ‘the four conditions accord with true suchness and encompass the three clusters of Bodhisattva precepts’?” The Buddha answered, “The four conditions are as follows: 
the power of wisdom arising from one’s inherent awareness is the condition that accords with true suchness. 
These are the four conditions. “Bodhisattva, the power of these four conditions does not abide in anything’s appearances but has its usefulness. However, one cannot acquire it if one fails to set one’s mind in one place. 
Good man, one’s inherent awareness is the one thing that encompasses the six stages of training and is Buddha bodhi, which is an ocean of wisdom.” Śāriputra said, “ does not abide in anything’s appearances but has its usefulness  absolute emptiness and has the four virtues: 
eternity, bliss, a true self, and purity. It is free from the two wrong views  that a dharma has a self. 
It is the great nirvāṇa but has no attachment to it. 
According to one’s direct observation, one’s inherent awareness must encompass the Thirty-seven Elements of Bodhi.” The Buddha said, “Indeed. 
Their names and numbers are mere words, which cannot capture their true meaning. 
This one meaning that cannot be captured has no words and no appearances because it is emptiness, which means true suchness. 
The principle of true suchness encompasses all dharmas. 
Good man, whoever abides in this principle will cross the ocean of the three kinds of suffering.” Śāriputra asked, “All dharmas are described by words, whose appearances are not the true meaning. 
If the true meaning of a dharma is indescribable by words, how does the Tathāgata expound the Dharma?” The Buddha answered, “I expound the Dharma because you sentient beings use speech in your lives. 
I expound the Dharma to express what is ineffable. 
What I say is the true meaning, not mere words. 
What sentient beings say is mere words, not the true meaning. 
Speech that does not reveal the true meaning is void, and void words have no meaning. 
Speech devoid of meaning is false speech. 
Speech in accord with the meaning of true suchness is apart from opposite appearances, such as empty and not empty, or real and unreal, and does not abide in the middle. 
Not abiding in a dharma’s three appearances , it abides nowhere. 
Speech in accord with the meaning of true suchness reveals that true suchness abides in neither existence nor nonexistence. 
Such is a description of true suchness.” Śāriputra asked, “To reach a Tathāgata’s state and attain a Tathāgata’s reality, starting with an icchantika’s mind, through what steps should all sentient beings develop?” The Buddha answered, “For an icchantika’s mind to reach a Tathāgata’s state and attain a Tathāgata’s reality, he should develop through five steps. 
The first step is belief. 
Belief means that one should believe that the seed of true suchness in one’s body is shrouded by one’s false mind. By discarding one’s false mind, one’s pure mind reveals its purity, and one knows that one’s perceptions of objects are differentiations made by one’s consciousnesses and words. 
The second step is pondering. 
Pondering means that one should observe that one’s perceptions of objects are displays of differentiations made by one’s consciousnesses and words, and that one’s perceptions are not one’s root consciousness , which is neither a mental object nor its meaning, neither a grasper nor an object grasped. 
The third step is training. 
As the arising of the bodhi mind and one’s training are concurrent, one should be guided by wisdom to eliminate hindrances and difficulties and free oneself from the fetters of one’s mental coverings. The fourth step is completion of training. 
Completion of training means that one leaves all training grounds because one’s mind is free from accepting and rejecting, one’s faculties are extremely pure and keen, and one’s mind in its true nature, in great nirvāṇa, and in absolute emptiness, is motionless. 
The fifth step is relinquishment. 
Relinquishment means that one does not abide in emptiness because one’s true wisdom is revealed. One’s great compassion is an appearance of true suchness but does not abide in true suchness. Although one does not attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi, one’s mind is boundless, has no place, and has reached a Tathāgata’s state. 
Good man, these five steps are the benefits of one’s inherent awareness. 
When one transforms sentient beings, one should start from their own place .” Śāriputra asked, “What is meant by starting from their own place?” The Buddha answered, “ has no origin and no place. 
Realizing that it is emptiness, one enters the true reality of dharmas, activates the bodhi mind, and completes the holy path. 
Because, good man, holding empty space in one’s fist is neither attainment nor no attainment.” Śāriputra said, “As the World-Honored One says, before one does anything, one should use the benefits of one’s inherent awareness to see that one’s thoughts are in nirvāṇa, which is true suchness. 
It encompasses all virtues and all dharmas in a perfect fusion. 
It is inconceivable. 
Know that one’s inherent awareness is mahā-prajñā-pāramitā , which is the great spiritual mantra, the great illumination mantra, the unsurpassed mantra, and the unequaled mantra.” The Buddha said, “Indeed, indeed. 
True suchness is the emptiness of dharma nature . One’s realization of this emptiness is the wisdom fire that burns away one’s afflictions. 
Then one will realize that all dharmas are equal . And one will complete the three grounds of virtually perfect enlightenment and acquire the three bodies of perfect enlightenment , because one has entered one’s ninth consciousness , which is bright and pure, free from one’s mental projections. 
“Good man, this dharma  is neither a cause nor a condition because its wisdom naturally arises. 
It is neither moving nor motionless because its nature is emptiness. 
It is neither existent nor nonexistent because the appearance of emptiness is empty. 
Good man, when you transform sentient beings, have them study this meaning. 
Whoever fathoms this meaning sees a Tathāgata.” Śāriputra said, “To study this meaning revealed by the Tathāgata, one should not abide in the flows , but should leave the four dhyānas and transcend Akaniṣṭha Heaven, the top heaven in the form realm.” The Buddha said, “Indeed. 
Because all dharmas, including the four dhyānas, are described by names and numbers. 
To see a Tathāgata is to realize that one’s Tathāgata mind is hindrance free and constantly in nirvāṇa, neither entering nor exiting anything, because  inside and  outside are equal . 
“Good man, the four dhyānas are meditations on the appearance of emptiness, but observing true suchness is not like them. 
Because if one uses true suchness to observe true suchness, one can find neither an observer nor an object observed, for the appearance of true suchness is in nirvāṇa. 
“Meditations on the appearance of emptiness imply motion, which is not dhyāna. 
Because the nature of dhyāna is no motion. It neither taints nor is tainted, is neither a mental object nor a mental projection, and is apart from making differentiations, because it is a benefit of one’s inherent awareness. 
Good man, doing meditation according to this observation is called dhyāna.” Śāriputra asked, “Inconceivable! 
The Tathāgata always uses the meaning of true suchness to transform sentient beings, which contains many words and broad meanings. While those with a keen capacity can train accordingly, those with a dull capacity find it hard to comprehend. 
What skillful means can be used to enable them to enter this truth?” The Buddha answered, “Have those with a dull capacity accept and uphold a four-line stanza, and they will enter the truth. 
The entire Buddha Dharma is encompassed in this stanza.” Śāriputra asked, “What is this four-line stanza? 
I pray that you will speak it.” Then the World-Honored One spoke in verse: The statement that dharmas are born through causes and conditions Means that they are in nirvāṇa and have no birth. 
Ending  a dharma’s birth and death Means  arises and never ends. 
When the multitude heard this stanza, all greatly rejoiced, ended  a dharma’s birth and death, and entered the ocean of wisdom, realizing that dharma nature is emptiness. 
Chapter 7 – The Tathāgata Store Then Brahma Way the Elder rose from  the true reality of dharmas and asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, a dharma’s birth  is no birth; a dharma’s death  is no death. 
Mastering the meaning of true suchness is attaining Buddha bodhi, and bodhi is by nature free from differentiation. 
One’s differentiation-free wisdom-knowledge can differentiate countless appearances and end one’s making differentiations. 
Dharma appearances and the meaning of true suchness are inconceivable, and whatever is inconceivable is free from differentiation. 
World-Honored One, the entire Dharma encompasses countless names and appearances. However, they have only one true meaning and abide in only one nature. 
What does this mean?” The Buddha answered, “Inconceivable! 
Elder, I expound the Dharma to the confused and use skillful means to guide them. All dharma appearances have only one true meaning. 
Because it is like a city with four gates, each providing an entrance to the city. Multitudes can enter the city through any gate at will. 
Likewise various Dharma flavors come down to only one flavor.” Brahma Way said, “If the Dharma is like this, I can abide in one Dharma flavor to taste all flavors.” The Buddha said, “Indeed, indeed. 
Because the true meaning in one flavor is like a vast ocean, into which all streams flow. 
Elder, all Dharma flavors are like streams. Although all streams have different names, their waters are no different. 
Likewise if one abides in one Dharma flavor, one tastes all flavors.” Brahma Way asked, “If all Dharmas have one flavor, why do riders of the Three Vehicles have different wisdoms?” The Buddha answered, “Elder, as an analogy, a creek, a stream, a river, and an ocean have different sizes, depths, and names. 
Water in a creek is called creek water; water in a stream is called stream water; water in a river is called river water. When these waters are in the ocean, they all are called ocean water. 
Likewise all teachings arise from true suchness and are called the path to Buddhahood. 
Elder, whoever walks this path should understand three actions.” Brahma Way asked, “What are the three actions?” The Buddha answered, “The three actions are actions that  accord with true suchness. 
These three actions encompass all Dharma Doors  without exception. 
Whoever takes these actions does not fabricate the appearance of emptiness but enters his Tathāgata store, though entering is no entering.” Brahma Way asked, “Inconceivable! 
Entering one’s Tathāgata store is like a seedling coming to bear fruit without entering any place. 
When one uses the power of the benefits of one’s inherent awareness to realize one’s inherent awareness, how much wisdom does one acquire?” The Buddha answered, “One acquires limitless wisdom. 
In brief, one acquires four wisdoms: 
Elder, past Buddhas have already expounded the use of these wisdoms. They are a great bridge and a great ferry. 
Whoever transforms sentient beings should use these wisdoms. 
“Elder, to put these four great wisdoms to great use, one must do three great things: 
One must do these three things to attain bodhi. 
Without doing them, one’s mind cannot flow into the ocean of those four wisdoms, but will allow māras to gain the upper hand. 
Elder, until each of you in this multitude attains Buddhahood, each of you should train to do these three things without lapsing even temporarily.” Brahma Way asked, “What are the three samādhis?” The Buddha answered, “The three samādhis are  no-action samādhi. 
These are the three samādhis.” Brahma Way asked, “, what are the great domains, the three sets of components, and the foundation?” The Buddha answered, “The great domains  are earth, water, fire, and wind. 
As one does these three things to put the four wisdoms to great use, one benefits oneself and others, enters the Bodhisattva Way, transcends the Three Realms of Existence, and does not abide in nirvāṇa. 
However, one may perceive the births and deaths of dharma appearances because of one’s differentiation. 
If one stays away from making differentiation,  dharmas have neither birth nor death.” Then, to restate this meaning, the Buddha spoke in verse: 
Dharmas are born from differentiation And die from differentiation. 
When Brahma Way heard this stanza, he found great joy in his heart and affirmed its meaning in verse: Dharmas have always been in nirvāṇa, Which has no birth. Dharmas perceived as undergoing birth and death Do not reveal the meaning of no birth. Birth and death are not the same as nirvāṇa If one holds the view of a dharma’s perpetuity or cessation. 
Nirvāṇa is apart from these two opposites And does not abide in the middle. 
If someone holds that dharmas are existent,  their appearances are false, Like a wheel of swirling hair Or water in a mirage. 
If someone holds that dharmas are nonexistent Like the open sky, He is like a blind man who claims that there is no sun, A claim that is like the hair of a turtle. 
I now have heard the Buddha’s words And learned that dharmas are apart from opposite views, Do not abide in the middle, But abide nowhere. 
As the Tathāgata’s teachings Abide nowhere, So I abide nowhere To make obeisance to the Tathāgata. 
I make obeisance to the appearance of the Tathāgata, Whose immovable wisdom equals the sky. With no attachment and no place, I make obeisance to His  body, which abides nowhere. 
Wherever I am, I constantly see Tathāgatas. I pray that Tathāgatas Will expound to me what is eternal. 
Then the Tathāgata said, “Good men, all of you hearken. I will expound to you what is eternal. 
Good men, what is eternal cannot be described by words. It is not perpetuity  because it is apart from the view of perpetuity or cessation. It has no time frames , and is not a truth, not a liberation, not a mental object, not nonexistence, and not impermanence. 
One clearly sees that one’s root consciousness  is eternal because it is constantly in nirvāṇa, which is beyond description. 
“Good men, one’s mind that knows that dharmas are in nirvāṇa is not the mind in nirvāṇa, because the mind constantly in nirvāṇa is one’s true awareness . 
The mind in one’s name and form  is one’s deluded mind, which differentiates dharmas by means of words. Nothing else is done by one’s name and form. 
Knowing that they are like this, one should not follow words. If one’s mind accords with the true reality of dharmas and does not differentiate between self and no self because one knows that “self” is but a false name, one attains nirvāṇa. 
Attaining nirvāṇa is attaining anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi.” When Brahma Way heard these words, he spoke in verse: Name, appearance, and differentiation Are the three dharmas . True wisdom-knowledge  and true suchness, Together with the preceding three, constitute the five dharmas. I now know that these dharmas Are connected with  perpetuity and cessation. 
Entering the path of birth and death Is entering  impermanence. 
The emptiness of dharmas expounded by the Tathāgata Is far apart from perpetuity and cessation. Causes and conditions have no birth, And whatever has no birth has no death. 
Taking causes and condition as truly existent Is like trying to pluck a flower in the sky Or looking for a barren woman’s child, Because neither object can be grasped. 
One should not take a dharma’s birth and death as real, Because they arise from causes and conditions. 
While true suchness Is always changeless and hindrance free, All myriad dharmas Are manifested by one’s consciousness. Without one’s consciousness, dharmas are nonexistent. 
Therefore, emptiness is their true reality. By discarding the view that dharmas have birth and death, One can abide in nirvāṇa. 
However, driven by great compassion, One does not abide in the quietness of nirvāṇa. Turning away from perceiving a grasper and an object grasped, One enters one’s Tathāgata store. 
When the multitude heard this meaning, all began to live a righteous life and acquired a Tathāgata’s wisdom in the ocean of the Tathāgata store. 
Chapter 8 – Total Retention of Teachings Then, in the midst of the multitude, Earth Store  Bodhisattva rose from his seat and came before the Buddha. Kneeling with joined palms, he said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, I observe that all in this multitude have unresolved doubts and that the Tathāgata wants to resolve their doubts. 
I would like to ask questions according to their doubts and pray that the Buddha, out of lovingkindness and compassion, will give me permission.” The Buddha said, “Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, you can rescue and deliver sentient beings in this way because your great compassion is inconceivable. You should ask questions widely. 
I will explain to you.” Earth Store Bodhisattva asked, “Why are dharmas not born from conditions?” Then the Tathāgata answered in verse: 
If dharmas were born from conditions, Without conditions, there would be no dharmas. 
As dharma nature is emptiness, How can any condition give birth to a dharma? Earth Store Bodhisattva asked, “If dharmas have no birth, why is it said that they are born from one’s mind?” Then the World-Honored One answered in verse: 
To say that dharmas are born from one’s mind Is to imply subject  and object , Like a drunkard’s eye seeing a flower in the sky, Though dharmas  have no birth. 
Earth Store Bodhisattva said, “If a dharma is like this, it is not relative . 
A dharma that is not relative must be formed by itself.” The World-Honored One spoke in verse: A dharma is neither existent nor nonexistent, Nor does it have a self versus others. It has neither a beginning nor an end, Neither formation nor destruction. 
Earth Store Bodhisattva said, “As all dharma appearances are in nirvāṇa, so too are nirvāṇa and the appearance of emptiness. 
As nirvāṇa and emptiness cannot be grasped, they accord with true suchness.” The Buddha agreed, “As nirvāṇa and emptiness cannot be grasped, they are true suchness.” Earth Store Bodhisattva said, “Inconceivable! 
It cannot be grasped by means of one’s mind or actions. 
Likewise one’s mind cannot be grasped, because it is empty, quiet, and in nirvāṇa.” Then the World-Honored One spoke in verse: Although all dharmas are empty and quiet, They are quiet but not empty . 
While one’s mind is not empty, It is not existent. Earth Store Bodhisattva said, “One’s mind is not encompassed in the three truths . When one realizes that form is emptiness, one’s mind is in nirvāṇa. As dharmas have always been in nirvāṇa, so too one’s mind has always been in nirvāṇa.” Then the World-Honored One spoke in verse: 
Dharmas have no self-essence And are born from one’s differentiation. 
Earth Store Bodhisattva asked, “If dharmas have neither birth nor death, why are they not the same?” Then the World-Honored One answered in verse: 
As dharmas abide nowhere, They are nonexistent because their appearances and numbers are empty. 
Earth Store Bodhisattva asked, “All dharma appearances abide on neither of the two opposite shores , nor in the stream between them. 
Then why are objects of perception born from one’s consciousness? 
If they are born from one’s consciousness, one’s consciousness is also born from its perceived objects. 
Why can one’s consciousness, which has no birth, have subject and object?” Then the World-Honored One answered in verse: 
Birth and what is born Are one’s perception and perceived objects, And neither has self-essence. 
Before one’s consciousness arises There is no object of perception. Before an object is perceived, One’s consciousness is nonexistent. 
One’s consciousness and its objects of perception are nonexistent, And nonexistence is not a state that can be grasped. As one’s consciousness, which has no birth, is nonexistent, How can it give birth to objects of perception? 
Earth Store Bodhisattva said, “Such are dharma appearances. 
inside and  outside are both empty because they have always been in nirvāṇa. 
The true reality of dharmas revealed by the Tathāgata is absolute emptiness, which never collects .” The Buddha said, “Indeed. 
The true reality of dharmas has no form, abides nowhere, is neither a collector nor things collected, and is neither the four domains nor one’s five aggregates, twelve fields, or eighteen spheres. 
One acquires its mass of inconceivable virtues when one’s seventh and sixth consciousnesses halt and one’s eighth and first five consciousnesses become quiet, because one’s ninth consciousness  is revealed, which is neither empty nor not empty. 
As the World-Honored One says, dharmas and their meanings are empty. As one enters the liberation door of emptiness without taking action, one never stops doing karmas . 
When one’s faculties inside and objects perceived as outside become quiet, one is freed from their fetters and achieves the no-wish liberation. As one makes observations in accordance with the principle, one’s wisdom and samādhi accord with true suchness. 
As the World-Honored One often says, realizing that dharmas are empty is good medicine .” The Buddha said, “Indeed. 
Because dharma nature is emptiness. 
As emptiness has no birth, so too one’s mind has no birth. 
As emptiness has no death, so too one’s mind has no death. 
As emptiness abides nowhere, so too one’s mind abides nowhere. 
As emptiness is free from causes and conditions, so too one’s mind is free from causes and conditions. 
As emptiness neither enters nor exits, is apart from gain and loss, and has no five aggregates, twelve fields, or eighteen spheres, so too one’s mind has no attachment to anything. 
Bodhisattva, I expound the emptiness  to shatter  existence.” Earth Store Bodhisattva said, “World-Honored One, one should know that existence is unreal, like water in a mirage, and that true reality is existent, like the nature of fire hidden in wood. 
Because he makes observations in accord with true suchness. As he observes his mind in nirvāṇa, he sees that appearance and no appearance are equally empty. Because he cultivates  emptiness, he never fails to see a Buddha. 
Because he sees a Buddha, he rides the Mahāyāna to go against the flow of afflictions in the Three Realms of Existence. 
Walking the path of the three liberations, he realizes that dharmas are in unity because they have no self-essence. Because they have no self-essence, they are empty. 
Because they are empty, they have no appearance. 
Because they have no appearance, one takes no action . 
Because one takes no action, one has no wish . 
Because one has no wish, one knows one’s karmas and purifies one’s mind. 
Because one’s mind is pure, one sees a Buddha. 
Because one sees a Buddha, one will be reborn in a Pure Land. 
Bodhisattva, one should diligently train through the Three Liberation Doors to master the profound Dharma. 
When one’s wisdom and samādhi are perfected, one transcends the Three Realms of Existence.” Earth Store Bodhisattva asked, “As the Tathāgata says, birth and death mean impermanence. 
When one ends  birth and death, one realizes the eternality of nirvāṇa, which never ends and is apart from motion and no motion in the Three Realms of Existence. 
Therefore, one should avoid dharmas subject to causes and conditions, like avoiding a fire pit. 
World-Honored One, because of what things should one reprove oneself in order to enter the one door ?” The Buddha answered, “Bodhisattva, one should reprove one’s mind because of three grave things and should follow three great truths to train to attain bodhi.” Earth Store Bodhisattva asked, “Because of what three things should one reprove one’s mind? 
What three truths should one follow in order to train to attain bodhi?” The Buddha answered, “The three grave things are  one’s consciousness . 
These three things have always been empty and are not one’s true self. 
Why should one be attached to them? 
One should observe these three things and know that they are one’s fetters as one drifts in the ocean of suffering. Because of these things, one should constantly reprove one’s mind. “The three great truths are as follows: equal training in wisdom and sam&$257;dhi, not other trainings, brings one bodhi. 
If one follows these three truths to train to attain Buddha bodhi, one will never fail to attain true enlightenment. 
One will acquire a Buddha’s wisdom-knowledge, exude great compassion, benefit oneself and others, and attain Buddha bodhi.” Earth Store Bodhisattva said, “World-Honored One, the truth that dharmas are equal means that they are free from causes and conditions. 
Without conditions, causes will not arise. 
How can one use motionless dharmas to enter a Tathāgata’s state?” Then, to explain this meaning, the Tathāgata spoke in verse: 
As dharmas appear, Their nature is emptiness, free from motion . Then a dharma at any given time Does not arise. A dharma has no time frames  And does not arise at such various times. 
It neither moves nor does not move, And is in nirvāṇa, because its nature is emptiness. However, because dharma nature is emptiness, A dharma appears at any given time. 
Although dharmas depend on conditions to appear, They are empty and not born from conditions. Causes and conditions have neither birth nor death Because the nature of birth and death is emptiness. 
A condition perceived as a subject or an object Also arises from conditions.  a dharma does not arise from conditions, Because conditions do not arise. 
Dharmas born from causes and conditions Are causes and conditions . They have the appearances of birth and death, But their nature has neither birth nor death. 
In true reality Dharmas neither appear nor disappear, Although they appear and disappear At any given time. 
Their extremely pure root  Never depends on the power of conditions. 
When Earth Store Bodhisattva heard the Buddha’s words, he found great joy in his heart and knew that all in the multitude no longer had any doubts in their minds. Then he spoke in verse: Knowing that all in this multitude had doubts in their minds, I eagerly asked questions. With great lovingkindness, The Tathāgata explained in detail without reservation. 
The two groups  Have understood His teachings. I will use my understanding To transform all sentient beings. 
As the Tathāgata, out of great compassion, Never abandons his original vows, I should regard sentient beings as an only son And deliver them as I abide in my afflictions. 
Then the Tathāgata told the multitude, “This Bodhisattva is inconceivable. He constantly uses great lovingkindness to remove sentient beings’ suffering. 
Whoever upholds this sūtra and this Bodhisattva’s name will never go down any evil life-paths, and his hindrances and difficulties will be eliminated. 
If someone intently thinks of this sūtra without distracting thoughts, and trains accordingly, this Bodhisattva will manifest a body to expound the Dharma to him. He will support and protect him, never abandon him even temporarily, and enable him to quickly attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
To transform sentient beings, you Bodhisattvas should have them study this Mahāyāna sūtra of absolutely definitive meaning.” Chapter 9 – Entrusting This Sūtra Then Ānanda rose from his seat, came forward, and asked the Buddha, “This sūtra pronounced by the Buddha is a mass of Mahāyāna virtues. 
What is the name of this sūtra? 
How much merit will one acquire by upholding his sūtra? 
I pray that the Buddha, out of lovingkindness and compassion, will tell me.” The Buddha answered, “Good man, the name of this sūtra is inconceivable. 
It is protected and remembered by all Buddhas and can enable one to enter the ocean of a Tathāgata’s wisdom-knowledge. 
Whoever upholds this sūtra will not seek other sūtras. This sūtra retains all teachings of Buddhas and encompasses the essentials of all sūtras. 
It is the hub of the teachings in all sūtras. 
This sūtra is called Adopting the Mahāyāna, also called Vajra Samādhi, also called Tenet of Immeasurable Meaning. 
Accepting and upholding this sūtra is accepting and upholding  100,000 Buddhas. The merit acquired in this way is inconceivable and boundless, like the open sky. 
I entrust to you this sūtra.” Ānanda asked, “What mental actions should be taken by whoever can accept and uphold this sūtra?” The Buddha answered, “Good man, whoever accepts and upholds this sūtra should take five mental actions: 
have no attachment to the Three Realms of existence while living a family life. 
Such benefits are enjoyed by a person who accepts and upholds this sūtra.” Ānanda asked, “If that person delivers sentient beings, can he accept their offerings?” The Buddha answered, “That person can serve as a great fortune field to sentient beings. 
He uses great wisdom to give provisional and definitive teachings because he relies upon four dharmas. He can accept even such offerings as head, eyes, brain, and bone marrow, not to mention food and clothing. 
Good man, that person is your beneficent learned friend and your bridge ]. 
How can ordinary beings not make offerings to him?” Ānanda asked, “If one accepts and upholds this sūtra under that person and makes offerings to him, how much merit will one acquire?” The Buddha answered, “Suppose that one takes gold and silver that fill a city and gives them away as alms. This act is not as meritorious as accepting and upholding under that person one four-line stanza from this sūtra. 
The merit acquired by making offerings to that person is inconceivable. 
“Good man, one who has sentient beings uphold this sūtra should constantly be in samādhi and never forget one’s true mind . 
If one forgets it, one should immediately repent because repentance brings coolness.” Ānanda said, “Repenting of past sins does not mean entering the past.” The Buddha said, “Indeed. 
As an analogy, if a bright lamp is placed in a dark room, darkness is expelled. 
Good man, do not say that repenting of past sins is entering the past.” Ānanda asked, “What is meant by repentance?” The Buddha answered, “Repentance means following the teachings in this sūtra to observe the true reality of dharmas. 
As soon as one makes this observation, one’s sins are expunged, and one leaves all evil life-paths, and will be reborn in a Pure Land and quickly attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi.” After the Buddha pronounced this sūtra, Ānanda, the Bodhisattvas, and the Buddha’s four groups of disciples acquired a resolute mind and greatly rejoiced. 

Mahāyāna Vaipulya Sūtra of Total Retention 
  Translated in the Sui Dynasty by The Tripiṭaka Master Vinītaruci
Thus I have heard: At one time the Buddha was staying on the Gṛdhrakūṭa Mountain, near the city of Rājagṛha, together with 62,000 great bhikṣus, 80 koṭi Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas, and 60 koṭi 100,000 upāsakas from the kingdom of Magadha. 
The summer meditation retreat having ended, nearing the time of His parinirvāṇa, the World-Honored One entered the In-Accord-with-the-Dharma Samādhi. 
During His samādhi, this Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World was everywhere adorned with silky banners and canopies. Jeweled incense vases were well placed and fragrances were widely spread. Scattered all about were thousand-petaled lotus flowers. 
At that time, in this Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World, multitudes in the hundreds of thousands of koṭis, Brahma-kings, and their retinues in the hundreds of thousands of koṭis came to the Buddha. 
Upon arrival they bowed their heads down at the feet of the Buddha. With folded palms, facing the Buddha, they stepped back to stand on one side. 
Also to the Buddha came hundreds of thousands of koṭis of god-sons from pure abode heavens, god-kings Īśvara and Maheśvara, dragon-kings, yakṣa-kings, asura-kings, garuḍa-kings, kiṁnara-kings, mahoraga-kings, together with their respective retinues in the hundreds of thousands of koṭis. 
Upon arrival they bowed their heads down at the feet of the Buddha. 
Also to the Buddha, from worlds in the ten directions, came Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas of great awesome virtue, who were as numerous as the sands of the Ganges. 
Upon arrival they bowed their heads down at the feet of the Buddha. With folded palms, facing the Buddha, they stepped back to stand on one side. 
Even the gods from the top heaven in this Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World came to join the huge multitude, which filled the space with no room to spare. 
Also to the assembly came all those others with great awesome power, such as gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, mahoragas, and others. 
The World-Honored One, prompted by the right thought, rose from His samādhi. He looked all over the huge multitude as He stretched His body and opened His mouth. 
Like a lion-king, three times He stretched. 
Then the World-Honored One extended from His mouth His wide-ranging, far-reaching tongue, completely covering this Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World. 
After the Tathāgata had finished His display of spiritual power, He again looked at the massive crowd. 
Then all in the huge multitude rose from their seats. They made obeisance with joined palms and stood in silence. 
Then the Buddha told Maitreya Bodhisattva, “Ajita, before long the Tathāgata will enter parinirvāṇa. 
If you have doubts regarding the Dharma and would like to ask me, now is the right time, while I am still here. 
Do not allow yourself to have any distressing regrets after the Buddha is gone.” Then Maitreya Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva said to the Buddha, “Yes, World-Honored One, You best know the right time. 
The Buddha-Tathāgata has realized the ultimate of all dharmas. 
I pray only that You will pronounce it, enabling Your Dharma-eye to abide in the world for a long time.” In the assembly, the god-king Maheśvara’s sons and 80 koṭi gods from pure abode heavens, together with their retinues, surrounded the Buddha and bowed their heads down at His feet. 
Joining their palms reverently, they said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, the Mahāyāna Vaipulya Total Retention Dharma Door has been taught in the past by innumerable Buddha-Tathāgatas, also called Arhats, Samyak-Saṁbuddhas. 
We pray only that the Tathāgata now will also expound it to bring benefits, comfort, and delight to innumerable gods and humans, and to enable the Buddha Dharma to abide in the world for a long time.” The Buddha approved in silence. 
Knowing that the Buddha had granted their request, the god-king Maheśvara’s son was joyful and exuberant. Joining his palms, he made obeisance and stepped back to stand on one side. 
Then the Buddha told Maitreya Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, “Ajita, this Mahāyāna Vaipulya Total Retention Dharma Door is not taught by me only. 
Innumerable Buddhas of the past, present, and future, in worlds in the ten directions, have frequently taught it. 
If there are sentient beings that malign the Dharma and the Saṅgha and say that the Buddha’s words are not spoken by the Buddha, these maligners will go down the evil life-paths to undergo suffering in hell.” Then the Buddha told Maitreya Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, “If, among good men and good women, there are those who have activated the bodhi mind and will accept and uphold, read and recite, and explain to others, this Mahāyāna Vaipulya Sūtra of Total Retention, know that these people will not go down the evil life-paths.” Then the World-Honored One asked Maitreya Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, “Ajita, from the night I attained Buddhahood to the time when I will enter the nirvāṇa without remnant, are there evil karmas arising from oversights in what has been done, spoken, thought of, and pondered by the Buddha’s body, voice, and mind?” Maitreya Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva replied, “No, World-Honored One.” The Buddha said, “Maitreya, as you say, from the time of my attainment of bodhi to the time of my parinirvāṇa, what I have said in this interval is all true, never false. 
If there are fools who, failing to understand that the Tathāgata’s words are skillful tools, judge that ‘this Dharma is this way; this Dharma is not this way,’ they are maligning the true Dharma as well as Buddhas and Bodhisattvas. I say that they are headed for hell. 
“Ajita, after my parinirvāṇa, if, in the world of the five turbidities, among bhikṣus, bhikṣuṇīs, upāsakas, and upāsikās, there are those who are not Bodhisattvas but claim to be Bodhisattvas, they are actually non-Buddhists. 
Because they in their past lives had made offerings to Buddhas and made their resolve, they have been able to enter the Buddha’s Order, renouncing family life. 
Wherever they have gone, they have sought fame, benefits, and worship from their kinfolk and friends. They have unscrupulously engaged in impure activities and abandoned their faith. They have not restrained themselves from evil acts. They have not subjugated their greed for benefits and worship. 
For the sake of their kinfolk, they have falsely claimed their knowledge and understanding. Standing in flattery and deception, their mouths have spoken contradictory words and their bodies have performed contradictory acts. 
“Ajita, in my Bodhi Way all sentient beings are equal and embraced in my great compassion. While using skillful means, I never lose right mindfulness. 
Abiding peacefully in His unequaled power, the Tathāgata expounds the Dharma, hindrance free. 
Suppose there are sentient beings that say these words: ‘Bodhisattvas should not hear, study, or accept the sūtras the Buddha has pronounced for voice-hearers. These are not the true Dharma, nor the right path. 
Nor should Bodhisattvas study the Pratyekabuddha Dharma.’ Suppose they also say, ‘Voice-hearers should not hear or accept the Dharmas that Bodhisattvas practice. 
Nor should voice-hearers hear or accept the Pratyekabuddha Dharma.’ Suppose they also say, ‘Whatever Bodhisattvas have to say, voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas should not hear or accept.’ Their contradictory words and actions are not in accord with the sūtras. 
They are unable to believe and accept either the true Dharma of Liberation or words that are in accord with true reality. The followers of their ways cannot even be reborn in heaven, much less achieve liberation. 
“Ajita, according to their faith, I have expounded the Dharma to and tamed as many  as the sands of the Ganges. 
Ajita, even now I want to go to worlds in the ten directions to expound the Dharma suitably to sentient beings for their benefit. 
Nor is it for the evil, deceitful ones who, having heard little of the Dharma, double talk about my Dharma. Suppose the double talker says these words: ‘This, Bodhisattvas should learn. This, Bodhisattvas should not learn.’ Having maligned the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha, the double talker after death will fall into hell and, for hundreds and thousands of kalpas, will not be able to leave there. 
Suppose he will later be reborn in a poor family and even receive the prophecy of attaining Buddhahood. 
Then he will eventually attain samyak-saṁbodhi in an evil world of the five turbidities, just like me who has realized Buddha bodhi in this world of the five turbidities. 
Therefore, you should hearken, believe, and know that such will be the consequences of following the way of evil friends. 
“Ajita, as I remember, countless kalpas ago, in the world appeared a Buddha called Untainted Flame Worthy-of-Name King, the Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, Knowledge and Action Perfected, Sugata, Understanding the World, Unsurpassed One, Tamer of Men, Teacher to Gods and Humans, Buddha the World-Honored One. 
During His life of 80,000 nayuta years, that Buddha expounded the Dharma to the multitudes. In the Dharma of Untainted Flame Worthy-of-Name King Tathāgata, there was a bhikṣu called Pure Life. 
As a great Dharma master, he retained fourteen koṭi sūtras and six million Mahāyāna sūtras. 
His words were pure and beautiful, his eloquence unhindered. He helped innumerable, countless sentient beings by giving them teachings, benefits, and delight. Untainted Flame Worthy-of-Name King Tathāgata, upon entering parinirvāṇa, told the bhikṣu Pure Life, ‘You should protect and uphold my true Dharma-eye in future times.’ Pure Life, having accepted that Buddha’s instruction, for thousands and tens of thousands of years after that Buddha’s parinirvāṇa, guarded and circulated the secret store of Buddhas. 
He accepted and upheld, and read and recited,  the Vaipulya Total Retention Dharma Door, and had profound understanding of their tenets. 
He also widely expounded them to all the sentient beings in 80,000 cities in that world according to their wishes and preferences. “At that time there was a great city called Bhadra. 
Pure Life went to that city to expound the Dharma to 80 koṭi households according to their preferences. 
Consequently, 80 koṭi people in that city acquired pure faith, one koṭi people set themselves on the Bodhi Way, and 79 koṭi people accepted the Voice-Hearer Vehicle and were thus trained. 
Then the Dharma master Pure Life, followed by 10,000 bhikṣus, went to train in the Bodhi Way. “At that time, in the city of Bhadra, there was a bhikṣu named Dharma. 
He accepted and upheld 1,000 Mahāyāna vaipulya sūtras and attained the four dhyānas. 
He was transforming the sentient beings in that city only by means of the Vaipulya Dharma of Emptiness. 
Unable to speak easily and skillfully, he said these words: ‘All dharmas are empty and silent. What I say is truly the words of the Buddha. 
What the bhikṣu Pure Life says is filthy and impure. This bhikṣu is leading an impure life but calls himself Pure Life. 
Because this bhikṣu keeps the flowers he has received for his own enjoyment, not for making offerings. He does the same with the solid perfumes and powdered incense. 
This bhikṣu Pure Life, foolish and senseless, does not know that I have long trained in the Brahma way of life. 
He is young and has not renounced family life for too long. He is arrogant, faithless, and utterly undisciplined. 
Those who do not have this knowledge say that Pure Life is a bhikṣu who observes the precepts.’ “Then Dharma, who with a vicious mind had slandered the bhikṣu upholding the Dharma, after death fell into hell. 
Upon completion of the 70 kalpas, he was reborn in animal form. 
After 60 kalpas, he encountered Fragrant Jewel Light Buddha, under whom Dharma activated his bodhi mind. He continued to be reborn in animal form for 90,000 lives. 
After these 90,000 lives, he was reborn in human form. For 60,000 lives, he did not have a tongue and lived in poverty and sordidness. “ the bhikṣu Pure Life, having gained pure faith in the Dharma, continued to pronounce the Dharma. 
Subsequently, he encountered 63 nayuta Buddhas. As a Dharma master with the five transcendental powers, he always asked each Buddha to turn the wheel of the true Dharma . “Ajita, tell me this. 
Was the bhikṣu Pure Life in the past a different person? 
Do not view him as someone different. He is none other than Amitābha Buddha today. 
Ajita, tell me this. 
Was the bhikṣu Dharma in the past a different person? 
Do not view him as someone different. He is none other than I today. 
Because I had slandered Him out of foolishness and senselessness, I underwent such suffering. 
Through these karmic causes and conditions, I have attained samyak-saṁbodhi in this world of the five turbidities. 
Therefore, Ajita, if there are Bodhisattvas who double talk about the Dharma, they will, for these causes and conditions, attain Buddha bodhi in a future world of the five turbidities. 
When they expound the Dharma, there will be māras in their Buddha Lands, constantly causing hindrances and making trouble.” When the huge assembly heard the Buddha’s words, they all wept in grief, tears flowing and noses running. 
They all said these words: “May we, unlike that bhikṣu, refrain from double talk about the Dharma!” Then one hundred Bodhisattvas in the assembly rose from their seats, knelt on their right knees, and cried loudly, shedding tears of sorrow. 
The World-Honored One, knowing the reason, still asked these Bodhisattvas, “Good men, why do you all wail miserably like this?” These Bodhisattvas replied with one voice to the Buddha: 
“World-Honored One, we see in ourselves such evil karma hindrances as well.” In confirmation, the World-Honored One spoke these words: 
Indeed! In the past you renounced family life in the Dharma of Dīpaṅkara Buddha. 
After the parinirvāṇa of Dīpaṅkara Buddha, there was a bhikṣu called Knowledge Accumulation, and you all slandered this bhikṣu. 
For this reason, you have since been unable to see Buddhas, unable to activate the bodhi mind, and unable to acquire dhāraṇīs and samādhis. From now on, you all will stay on the Bodhi Way. 
Good men, under the last Buddha in this Worthy Kalpa, you will achieve the Endurance in the Realization of the No Birth of Dharmas. Afterward, you will walk the Bodhisattva Way for over three asaṁkhyeya kalpas, and then you will attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
“Therefore, good men, when Bodhisattvas see other Bodhisattvas, they should not think of self versus others. Instead, they should think that others are like sacred pagodas, like Buddhas. 
Hence, when Bodhisattvas see other Bodhisattvas, they should not have discriminatory thoughts, considering others as non-Buddhas. Any discriminatory thoughts are self-harming. You should accept and uphold this . Without alienating thoughts, you should join others in harmony. 
If I held the view that newly-resolved Bodhisattvas would be less than a Buddha, I would be deceiving innumerable asaṁkhyeyas of Buddhas of the present,  in the ten directions. 
Therefore, good men, if Bodhisattvas can acquire dhāraṇīs and samādhis in the future, in a world of the five turbidities, it will all be by virtue of the awesome power of Buddhas. 
Hence, good men, slandering a Dharma master is no different from slandering a Buddha. 
Good men, after the Buddha’s parinirvāṇa, if there is a Dharma master who can well expound the Dharma according to the preferences , and is able to have Bodhisattvas study the Mahāyāna doctrine, and to have the multitude feel as little joy as a hair and even shed one tear, know that it will all be by virtue of the spiritual power of the Buddha. “Suppose a fool who is not a Bodhisattva but claims to be a Bodhisattva maligns a true Bodhisattva and his actions, even speaking these words: ‘What does he know? 
What does he understand?’ Maitreya, I remember in the past, in Jambudvīpa, when I was learning to be a Bodhisattva, I loved and treasured the Dharma. For the sake of a verse or a stanza, I abandoned my head, eyes, wife, and throne, which I cherished. 
To seek the Dharma. 
As for the fools who seek only fame, benefits, and worship, confident in their own limited capacity, they do not go to one who imparts the Dharma of the Tathāgata, to hear and receive the true Dharma. 
Maitreya, if the slanderers and the slandered unite in harmony, they will be able to uphold and circulate my Dharma. If the two groups are in conflict and in dispute, the true Dharma will not prevail. 
Ajita, you can observe those who malign the Dharma. They have done such enormously sinful karma that they will go down the three evil life-paths, from which it is hard to escape. 
“Furthermore, Ajita, in the time since I attained Buddhahood, with true wisdom I have widely expounded the true Dharma to sentient beings. Suppose there are fools who neither believe nor accept the Buddha’s words, just like that bhikṣu Dharma. Although he had read and recited 1,000 Mahāyāna sūtras, explained them to others, and attained the four dhyānas, because of his slander of another, he underwent dreadful suffering for 70 kalpas. 
It is even more severe for those who, foolish and sordid, without any real knowledge , proclaim these words: ‘I am a Dharma master who clearly understands the Mahāyāna and can widely spread it.’ They slander the true Dharma master, saying that he has no understanding. For self-elevation, they also malign the Buddha Dharma. If those fools malign even a four-verse stanza in the Buddha’s Mahāyāna teachings, know that, for this karma, they will definitely fall into hell. 
Because they malign the Buddha Dharma and Dharma masters. 
For these causes and conditions, they will always walk the evil life-paths, never to see Buddhas. 
Because they have maligned the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha, they can also create obstacles for those who have recently activated the bodhi mind, causing them to abandon the right path. 
Know that those who adorn themselves with enormously sinful karmas will fall into hell to receive horrendous requitals for immeasurable kalpas. 
Fixing an evil eye on one who has activated the bodhi mind will result in the requital of no eyes. 
Slandering one who has activated the bodhi mind will result in the requital of no tongue. 
Ajita, I have never seen an evil dharma graver than the sin of sabotaging others’ activation of the bodhi mind. 
Even for this sin, one will go down the evil life-paths. Even graver is  slandering Bodhisattvas. 
“Bodhisattvas should explain the Dharma truthfully to sentient beings, without holding the wrong views, such as perpetuity or cessation, the definite existence or definite nonexistence of sentient beings, or the existence or nonexistence of dharmas. 
Ajita, those who are learning to be Bodhisattvas should abide in this way. 
Abiding in this way is a pure and good karma of Bodhisattvas. They do not cling to what they train in or learn. 
If sentient beings cling to anything, know that they will be reborn in the world of the five turbidities. “Furthermore, there are Bodhisattvas who excel in pronouncing the Dharma in various ways to sentient beings according to their natures and desires. 
Ajita, Bodhisattvas who practice all six pāramitās in this way will be able to attain the unsurpassed bodhi. The fools who believe in what they fixate on may say these words: ‘Bodhisattvas should practice prajñā-pāramitā only. Do not learn other pāramitās because prajñā-pāramitā is the supreme one.’ This statement is incorrect. 
Because, Ajita, in the past, when King Kāśaka was training to be a Bodhisattva, he abandoned his head, eyes, bone marrow, and brain, which he cherished. 
Did this king not have any wisdom?” Maitreya replied to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, truly as Your Holiness has said, he had wisdom.” The Buddha told Ajita, “I practiced all six pāramitās fully for an immeasurable amount of time. 
If I had not practiced all six pāramitās fully, I would not have attained the unsurpassed bodhi.” “Indeed, World-Honored One.” The Buddha told Ajita, “As you say, in the past I practiced dāna-pāramitā, śīla-pāramitā, kṣānti-pāramitā, vīrya-pāramitā, dhyāna-pāramitā, and prajñā-pāramitā, each for sixty kalpas. 
There is nothing right about their claim. Because they embrace the view of void, they expound the Dharma with such impurity. 
The body, voice, and mind of those speakers contradict the Dharma. 
As they explain to others their understanding of emptiness, their do not act according to their words. 
Without  actions, they are far from the  meaning of emptiness. Even more than their kinfolk, they harbor jealousy and are attached to benefits and worship. 
Ajita, when I was a Wheel-Turning King, I abandoned jewels, my head, my eyes, my hands, and my feet, but still could not attain the unsurpassed bodhi. 
By contrast, fools, for the sake of food and drink, visit others’ homes to make their statement. They only praise the Dharma of Emptiness and claim that what they say is the Bodhi Way and the Bodhisattva action, and that only this Dharma is the true Dharma while all other Dharmas are not. 
They also say these words: ‘My understanding has been realized by and known to innumerable Dharma masters.’ For the sake of fame, they praise themselves, saying that they clearly understand hatred and jealousy. 
Ajita, I see those who set their minds on seeking benefits and worship for a livelihood. Even if they take good actions for one hundred kalpas, they will not develop even a little Endurance in Dharmas, much less attain the unsurpassed bodhi. 
Ajita, I do not pronounce bodhi to the deceitful ones, who have contradictory mind and mouth. Nor to those who are jealous; nor to those who are arrogant and disrespectful; nor to those who are faithless; nor to those who are untamed; nor to those who engage in sexual misconduct; nor to those who believe that they are right and others wrong. Ajita, those fools, out of arrogance, claim that they have surpassed the Buddha. 
They malign Mahāyāna sūtras pronounced by the Buddha, alleging that these are actually pronounced by voice-hearers riding the Small Vehicle.” Then the Buddha told the venerable Subhūti, “You should not pronounce prajñā-pāramitā to those who adhere to the view of dualism.” Subhūti said to the Buddha, “No, indeed, World-Honored One, as the Buddha says.” The Buddha said, “Indeed, Subhūti, giving alms without being attached  is called bodhi.” Subhūti said, “Indeed, World-Honored One.” The Buddha said, “Subhūti, giving without praising oneself and criticizing others is called bodhi.” Subhūti said, “Indeed, World-Honored One.” The Buddha said, “Subhūti, when you see fools who, for the love of their kinfolk, greedy for a living,  adhere to the view of self and its belongings, and enjoy accepting offerings from others without any sense of shame or dishonor, you know that they do only evil karma. 
“Furthermore, Ajita, Bodhisattvas should have no fear of any dharmas, such as the dharmas of Pratyekabuddhas, voice-hearers, or ordinary beings; afflictions, ending of dharmas, or difficulty in making progress; right or wrong, act or no act, fear or fearlessness, existence or nonexistence, mind or no mind, enlightenment or no enlightenment, karma or no karma, good or bad, peace or no peace, liberation or no liberation, training or not training, dharma or non-dharma, serenity or turmoil, true or false, belief or disbelief, good thoughts or bad thoughts, abiding or not abiding. 
Thus Bodhisattvas do not have fear of any dharmas. 
“Ajita, because I have trained in the past in such fearlessness, I have attained samyak-saṁbodhi. I can know the mental states of all sentient beings without the notion that I am the knower of what I know. 
I expound what I have realized according to the capacities of Bodhisattvas, enabling those who have heard the Dharma to acquire the Radiant Dhāraṇī Seal. Having acquired this Dharma Seal, they will never regress. 
If one does not truly know this dharma  and speaks without eloquence, one will not ultimately attain the unsurpassed bodhi. 
“Ajita, when I expound the Dharma to the sentient beings here in this small world comprising four large continents, by virtue of the spiritual power of the Buddha, each of them sees  Śākyamuni Tathāgata expound the Dharma only to him. 
In the same way, from one heaven to the next, up to Akaniṣṭha Heaven, each of the sentient beings there also says that the Tathāgata pronounces the Dharma only to him. 
It is like this, ranging from a small world comprising four continents to even a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold world. All sentient beings think: ‘Śākyamuni Buddha has come to be born in my country, and He turns the great Dharma wheel only for me.’ Ajita, in the morning, using great skill, I observe everywhere sentient beings in immeasurable, boundless worlds and expound the Dharma to those that should be transformed. 
In the midday and in the evening, I observe sentient beings impartially with my Dharma-eye and expound the Dharma in their worlds. 
Such are the states of innumerable Buddhas! All sentient beings that are learning to be Bodhisattvas should train in this way. Those fools who malign the true Dharma pronounced by the Buddha adhere to their wrong understanding as the right understanding. 
Those who malign the Dharma do not believe in the Buddha. Because of this evil karma, they will fall into hell to undergo multitudinous suffering, never to hear the Dharma. 
Furthermore, Ajita, you should accept and uphold the secret teachings of the Tathāgata and widely pronounce them to others by skillful means.” Then Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas, including Mañjuśrī the Youth, Fortune Light Equality Bodhisattva, No Doubt Bodhisattva, Definite Resolve Bodhisattva, Wonder Mind Open Intellect Bodhisattva, Radiance Bodhisattva, Joyful King Bodhisattva, Fearless Bodhisattva, Thoughts Reaching Boundless Buddha Lands Bodhisattva, Avalokiteśvara Bodhisattva, Fragrant Elephant Bodhisattva, Annihilating All Evil Karma Bodhisattva, Abiding in Samādhi Bodhisattva, Hundred Thousand Merits Adorned Bodhisattva, Wonderful Tone Heard Afar Bodhisattva, All Knowledge Unforgotten Bodhisattva, Great Name Shaking Jeweled Banner Adorned Bodhisattva, Seeking All Dharma Bodhisattva, Abiding in the Buddha State Bodhisattva, Moonlight Adorned Bodhisattva, and Great Multitude in All the World Adorned Bodhisattva, said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, indeed, indeed, truly as Your Holiness says, when we passed Buddha Lands in the east, which were as numerous as the sands of sixty Ganges Rivers, and reverently made obeisance to the Buddhas there, we saw only Śākyamuni Buddha appearing in every world. 
We then visited everywhere  in the ten directions for seven days and still saw only Śākyamuni Buddha appearing in each world, not other Buddhas. 
After visiting everywhere, we have returned to this land to hear and accept the true Dharma.” At that time the Buddha told Mañjuśrī the Youth, “Now observe carefully. The wisdom of the Tathāgata is inconceivable, and the state of the Tathāgata is also inconceivable. 
Those fools say these words, ‘Only prajñā-pāramitā is the Tathāgata action, the Bodhisattva action, and the sweet nectar action.’” The Buddha told Mañjuśrī, “Their words contradict the Dharma. 
Because it is very difficult to fully complete the Bodhisattva action. 
Acting without attachment is the Bodhisattva action; acting without the view of a self and its belongings is the Bodhisattva action; acting with the understanding of emptiness is the Bodhisattva action, and acting with no appearance is the Bodhisattva action. 
Mañjuśrī, such actions are the Bodhisattva action. Those learning to be Bodhisattvas should accept and uphold it. 
If those fools embrace the wrong views, you should know that they do not understand my Dharma. 
Do not allow them to dissipate in bad ways. Fortify your minds and keep them from regressing. As you fully expound the Dharma to sentient beings, you should abide in the Dharma. Since I fully attained the unsurpassed bodhi distant asaṁkhyeya kalpas ago, I have widely and skillfully pronounced the Dharma, enabling sentient beings to stay far away from the evil life-journeys. 
Making a statement that this Dharma is correct and that Dharma is incorrect is called maligning the Dharma. Making a statement that this Dharma is pronounced for Bodhisattvas and that Dharma is pronounced for voice-hearers is called maligning the Dharma. Making a statement that these are Bodhisattva studies and those are not Bodhisattva studies is called maligning the Dharma. Making a statement that as the past Buddha is gone, the future Buddha has not yet arrived, and the present Buddha is not staying, only I have acquired the Dhāraṇī Dharma, is called maligning the Dharma. 
Because of maligning the Dharma, their claim to have acquired the dhāraṇī is an impure dharma. They malign what a true Dharma master is cultivating. They further slander the Dharma master, saying that although he has intellectual understanding, his actions are inconsistent with his words. They further slander the Dharma master, saying that his actions violate the Way. 
They also say, ‘This sūtra is correct, this sūtra is incorrect; this stanza is correct, this stanza is incorrect; this Dharma is credible, this Dharma is not credible.’ They wrongly rebut what is explained correctly. 
For those who listen to the true Dharma, they create hindrances, making claims, such as ‘this is a training, this is not a training; this is an accomplishment, this is not an accomplishment; this is the right time, this is the wrong time.’ These statements are all called maligning the Dharma. 
“Furthermore, Mañjuśrī, whether voice-hearers pronounce the Dharma, whether Bodhisattvas pronounce the Dharma, know that it is entirely by virtue of the awesome spiritual power of the Tathāgata’s protection and consideration, which enables Bodhisattvas and others to say what they say. 
Mañjuśrī, even now the fools slander the Buddha. After my parinirvāṇa, how can Dharma masters, who accept and uphold my Dharma, not be slandered by them? Because these fools are the retinue of the māras, know that they will go down the evil life-paths. 
As these fools greedily seek benefits and worship to support their kinfolk, they not only have no faith in the Dharma of the Tathāgata, but also destroy the Dharma taught by the Tathāgata. 
Their kinfolk, with a clannish mind, go to the houses of Brahmins and elders to praise these fools, claiming that they know and understand the Dharma and its meanings and that they are good at explanations because they know others’ capacities and desires. These fools accept others’ trust and offerings without any sense of shame or dishonor. Because they malign the Dharma, both they and their retinues will fall into hell. 
“Mañjuśrī, I do not pronounce the Bodhisattva action to nonbelievers. Nor do I pronounce the pure Dharma to those who are attached to family life. Nor do I pronounce the Dharma of Liberation to those who adhere to the view of dualism. Nor do I pronounce the supra-worldly Dharma to those who adhere to the view of monism. 
“Mañjuśrī, with a mind clinging to nothing, I teach to people as many Dharma Doors as the sands of the Ganges. 
Then with a mind seemingly attached to something, I also teach to sentient beings as many Dharma Doors as the sands of the Ganges. If sentient beings delight in emptiness, I pronounce to them the Dharma of Emptiness. 
If sentient beings delight in knowledge, I pronounce to them the Dharma of Knowledge. 
If sentient beings delight in no appearance, I pronounce to them the Dharma of No Appearance. 
If sentient beings delight in appearance, I pronounce to them the Dharma of Appearance. 
If sentient beings delight in lovingkindness, I pronounce to them the Dharma of Lovingkindness. 
If sentient beings delight in causality, I pronounce to them the Dharma of Causality. 
If sentient beings delight in no causality, I pronounce to them the Dharma of No Causality. 
The words of those fools, which malign the true Dharma of the Buddha, are not in accord with the pure, true teachings of the Tathāgata.” Then Mañjuśrī asked Buddha, “World-Honored One, as You say, such fools, because they are close to evil friends, step forward to voice their slander. 
Then, World-Honored One, through what causes and conditions, can they avoid this fault?” The Buddha told Mañjuśrī, “For seven years in the distant past, day and night in the six periods, I repented of the grave sins I had committed with my body, voice, and mind. 
After being purified, it took me ten kalpas to acquire the Endurance in Dharmas. 
Mañjuśrī, know that this sūtra is the Bodhisattva Vehicle. It can enable those who have not realized  to come to realization. 
If those who, having heard the words of this sūtra, refuse to believe and accept them and even malign them, they will go down the evil life-paths. 
Bodhisattvas need to understand and accept my Dharma, before they can pronounce it to others. 
By accepting and upholding  in this way, one can stay far away from the evil life-journeys.” The Buddha told Mañjuśrī, “There are four equality dharmas Bodhisattvas should learn. 
What are these four? 
First, Bodhisattvas are impartial to all sentient beings. Second, they are impartial to all dharmas. Third, they are impartial to bodhi. Fourth, they pronounce various Dharmas impartially. 
These are the four equality dharmas. Bodhisattvas should know these four dharmas and explain them to sentient beings. 
The believers will stay far away from the evil life-journeys. 
The nonbelievers will go down the evil life-paths. 
If, among good men and good women, there are those who abide in these four dharmas, know that they will not have to take the evil life-journeys. There are another four dharmas . 
What are these four? 
First, their minds do not regress from helping sentient beings. Second, they neither disdain nor slander Dharma masters. Third, they do not slander the wise. Fourth, they always respect everything said by Tathāgatas. 
If good men and good women can competently train in and learn these four dharmas, they will never go down the evil life-paths. 
“Furthermore, Mañjuśrī, Bodhisattvas can take the seven treasures which fill up as many Buddha Lands as the sands of the Ganges, and make offerings every day for as many kalpas as the sands of the Ganges to as many Buddha-Bhagavāns as the sands of the Ganges. 
If good men and good women can three times read and recite a verse or a stanza in such a wonderful Mahāyāna vaipulya sūtra, the merit they will acquire exceeds that from making those offerings. 
The merit acquired by those who recite and uphold this sūtra will be twice as much. 
Suppose there are those who practice almsgiving, observance of precepts, endurance, energetic progress, meditation, and wisdom. The merit they achieve from cultivating these six pāramitās also cannot compare . 
Mañjuśrī, the name and meaning of such a sūtra are so vast that they are unequaled. 
You Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas should study and learn this sūtra, accept and uphold it, read and recite it, and explain it widely to sentient beings.” Then those in the huge multitude and Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas from worlds in the ten directions all said to the Buddha: 
Bodhisattvas as numerous as the sands of 70 Ganges Rivers attained the spiritual level of no regress from the anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi mind. 
Furthermore, the massive multitudes in 63 koṭi 100,000 nayuta Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold Worlds, having heard the Buddha’s words, heartily rejoiced. They would have to continue flowing in the stream of birth and death for 80 kalpas, and then they too would reach the spiritual level of no regress from the anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi mind. 
At the end of another 63 kalpas, they would fully attain the unsurpassed bodhi. 
All in the multitude—Bodhisattvas, gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, and mahoragas, humans, nonhumans, and others—having heard the Buddha’s words, greatly rejoiced and made obeisance. Then they reverently carried out the teachings. 

Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning
Translated in the Xiao Qi Dynasty by The Tripiṭaka Master Dharmagatayaśas
Chapter 1 The Virtuous Actions
At one time the Buddha was staying on the Gṛdhrakūṭa Mountain, near the city of Rājagṛha, together with 12,000 great bhikṣus and 80,000 Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas, as well as gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, and mahoragas. 
Also present were bhikṣus, bhikṣuṇīs, upāsakas, and upāsikās, as well as great Wheel-Turning Kings and lesser Wheel-Turning Kings, such as gold wheel kings and silver wheel kings, as well as kings, princes, state ministers, citizens, men, women, and elders, surrounded by their retinues in the billions. They all came to the Buddha, bowed their heads down at His feet, and circled Him 100,000 times. They burned incense, scattered flowers, and presented various kinds of offerings. 
Having made their offerings to the Buddha, they stepped back and sat on one side. 
Among the 80,000 Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas were Mañjuśrī the Dharma Prince, Great Awesome Virtue Store the Dharma Prince, Carefree Store the Dharma Prince, Great Eloquence Store the Dharma Prince, Maitreya Bodhisattva, Guiding Leader Bodhisattva, Medicine King Bodhisattva, Medicine Superior Bodhisattva, Flower Banner Bodhisattva, Flower Radiance Banner Bodhisattva, Dhāraṇī Sovereign King Bodhisattva, Avalokiteśvara Bodhisattva, Great Might Arrived Bodhisattva, Persistent Energetic Progress Bodhisattva, Jewel Seal Hand Bodhisattva, Treasure Pile Bodhisattva, Jewel Staff Bodhisattva, Beyond the Three Realms Bodhisattva, Vimalabhadra Bodhisattva, Fragrant Elephant Bodhisattva, Great Fragrant Elephant Bodhisattva, Lion’s Roar King Bodhisattva, Lion Frolic World Bodhisattva, Lion Vigor Bodhisattva, Lion Advance Bodhisattva, Valiant Force Bodhisattva, Lion Fierce Subjugation Bodhisattva, Magnificence Bodhisattva, and Great Magnificence Bodhisattva. 
All of these Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas are great ones who have realized their dharma body through perfecting  precepts, samādhi, wisdom, liberation, and the knowledge and views of liberation. 
Their minds, silent and meditative, are constantly in samādhi, peaceful, reserved, asaṁskṛta, and free from desire. Inverted thoughts and perceptions no longer arise. Silent, lucid, profound, and vast, their minds can remain still for 100,000 koṭi kalpas, as innumerable Dharma Doors are all present before them. 
Having unfolded great wisdom and penetrated all dharmas, they understand the true reality of dharmas, which, differentiated by their natures and appearances, clearly manifest as existence or nonexistence, long or short. Moreover, they are adept in identifying the capacities, natures, and desires of sentient beings. 
Equipped with dhāraṇīs and unimpeded eloquence, they always request Buddhas to turn the Dharma wheel. Likewise, they are also able to turn it. They first dampen the dust of desire with drizzling drops . As they open the door to nirvāṇa and fan the wind of liberation, they turn the heat of the afflictions of the world into the coolness of the Dharma. 
They next rain down the profound principle of the Twelve Links of Dependent Arising upon the blazing, glowing sunlight of suffering that runs from ignorance to old age, illness, and death. 
Then, they cascade a downpour of unexcelled Mahāyāna  to water the roots of goodness of sentient beings in the Three Realms of Existence. They scatter the seeds of goodness everywhere in merit fields, enabling all to germinate bodhi sprouts. With their wisdom like the sun and the moon, using skillful means and timing, they promote and expand the mission of the Mahāyāna, enabling sentient beings to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi quickly and to abide in bliss and inconceivable true reality. As these Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas rescue longsuffering sentient beings with immeasurable great compassion, they are their true beneficent learned friends, their great fortune fields, and their unasked teachers. 
For sentient beings, they serve as sanctuaries of peace and joy and as places of rescue, protection, and great reliance. In every way they are the great guiding teachers to sentient beings. 
They can be the eye for those who are born blind and be the ear, nose, and tongue for those who are deaf, unable to smell, and mute. They can complete those who are incomplete in their faculties and can make the deranged think straight. 
Like the captain, the great captain, of a ship, they carry sentient beings across the river of birth and death to the shore of nirvāṇa. 
Like the medicine king, the great medicine king, they differentiate the symptoms of diseases, know the properties of medicines, dispense medicines according to the diseases, and make patients enjoy taking them. 
Like the animal trainer who can train elephants and horses without fail, they, the tamers, the great tamers, always refrain from unrestrained actions. 
Like the brave fierce lion that subdues all animals, totally undefeatable, they playfully practice the Bodhisattva pāramitās. Unshakably resolved to attain the Tathāgata Ground, they rely on the power of their vows to purify Buddha Lands. Before long, they will attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
These Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas all have such inconceivable merits as described. 
Among the 12,000 bhikṣus were Śāriputra the Great Wisdom, Maudgalyāyana the Transcendental Power, Subhūti the Wisdom Life, Mahākātyāyana, Pūrṇa , Upananda, Revata, Kapphiṇa, Vakkula, Mahāmaudgalyāyana, Svāgata, Mahākāśyapa the Foremost in Dhūta Training, Uruvilvākāśyapa, Gayākāśyapa, and Nadīkāśyapa. 
All of them were Arhats, who, having ended their afflictions and the discharges thereof, were free from bondage and truly liberated. 
At that time Great Magnificence Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, seeing the multitude settled calmly, together with the 80,000 Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas in the assembly, rose from his seat and came to the Buddha. They bowed their heads down at the feet of the Buddha, and circled him 100,000 times. As an offering to the Buddha, celestial incense smoke, flowers, garments, necklaces, and priceless jewels fell spiraling down from the sky and gathered around like clouds. 
Celestial serving dishes and bowls were filled with delicacies of one hundred celestial flavors, gratifying all with their colors and aromas. 
Placed everywhere were celestial banners, flags, and canopies, as well as wonderful musical instruments, playing celestial music to entertain the Buddha. 
With one mind and one voice, they presented their tribute in verse: Sublime is the holy lord, the great enlightened one! With no taint, no defilement, and no attachment, He is the tamer of gods and men as well as of elephants and horses. The influence of His Way and the fragrance of His virtue permeate everywhere. 
His wisdom is peaceful, His emotions serene, and His cares at rest. His mental faculty and mental consciousness are still, and His mind silent, Having forever ceased dreaming, thinking, perception, and rumination. He no longer takes as real the  domains, the  aggregates, the  spheres, and the  fields. 
Born from neither causes nor conditions, neither self nor others, His  body is neither existent nor nonexistent, Neither square nor round, neither long nor short, Neither appearing nor disappearing, with neither birth nor death, Neither constructed nor arisen, neither made nor formed, Neither sitting nor lying, neither walking nor standing still, Neither moving nor turning, neither noisy nor tranquil, Neither advancing nor retreating, neither safe nor perilous, Neither right nor wrong, neither gaining nor losing, Neither this nor that, neither coming nor going, Neither blue nor yellow, neither red nor white, Neither scarlet nor purple, nor in a variety of colors. It is realized through achieving  precepts, samādhi, wisdom, liberation, and the knowledge and views of liberation. 
Accomplished are the Three Clarities, the six transcendental powers, and the  Elements of Bodhi. Arisen are lovingkindness, compassion, the Ten Powers, and the Four Fearlessnesses. 
His thirty-two physical marks And eighty excellent characteristics seem to be visible. In true reality, there is neither form nor appearance Because appearances before the eye are empty. As the appearance of no appearance is manifested as His body, In the same way it is manifested as the bodies of sentient beings. 
His appearance enables sentient beings to make obeisance joyfully, And to pay their respects sincerely and earnestly. By discarding self-elevation and self-arrogance, He has acquired such a wonderful body. 
All of us together, 80,000 in this multitude, Make obeisance to and take refuge in the holy one who, without attachment, Has skillfully transformed His thinking, perception, mind, mental faculty, and mental consciousness, As well as tamed elephants and horses. 
We bow down to take refuge in the physical form of His dharma body, A combination of precepts, samādhi, wisdom, liberation, and the knowledge and views of liberation. 
We bow down to take refuge in the appearance of the wondrous being. We bow down to take refuge in the inconceivable one. 
His Brahma tone thunders in eight ways, Wondrous, pure, and far-reaching, Announcing the Four Noble Truths, the six pāramitās, and the Twelve Links of Dependent Arising, According to the mind karmas of sentient beings. None of the hearers will fail to open his mind, And to shatter the bondage of his immeasurable cycle of birth and death. 
Some voice-hearers become Srotāpannas, Sakṛdāgāmins, Anāgāmins, or Arhats. 
Some acquire innumerable dhāraṇīs And delight in expounding the Dharma with great eloquence. They pronounce profound, wondrous stanzas, Playing and bathing in the pure lake of the Dharma. 
Some display transcendental powers as they jump up and fly Or freely go in and out of water or fire. Such are the manifestations of the Dharma wheel, Pure, boundless, and inconceivable! 
Again we all bow down together to take refuge In the Dharma wheel that turns at the right time. 
We all bow down to take refuge in the Brahma tones. 
For innumerable kalpas in the past, The World-Honored One arduously trained in virtuous actions. 
For Himself, humans, gods, dragons, spirits, kings, And all other sentient beings, He was able to abandon all that was hard to abandon, Such as wife, children, riches, throne, and kingdom. Never begrudging dharmas, internal or external, He gave others his head, eyes, bone marrow, and brain. 
Observing the pure precepts of Buddhas, He never caused any harm, even to save His life. He never became angry when struck by knives or clubs Or attacked by insults and abusive words. 
For kalpas, He was never tired or indolent in His endeavor. Day and night, He has kept his mind in meditation. 
Having learned all the ways in the Dharma, He can penetrate the capacities of sentient beings with His wisdom. 
Hence, He has now achieved commanding power, Becoming the Dharma King in command of dharmas. We all bow down together to take refuge, So that we can endeavor to do what is hard to do. 
Chapter 2 Expounding the Dharma Great Magnificence Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva and the 80,000 Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas, having finished the stanza in praise of the Buddha, asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, all of us 80,000 Bodhisattvas now would like to ask about the Dharma of the Tathāgata. 
We do not know whether the World-Honored One will grant us permission.” The Buddha told Great Magnificence Bodhisattva and the 80,000 Bodhisattvas: 
“Very good! 
Very good! Good men, you best know that this is the right time. You may ask any questions. 
Before long, the Tathāgata will enter parinirvāṇa, and there should be no doubts remaining after my parinirvāṇa. 
You may ask me any questions you wish.” Then Great Magnificence Bodhisattva and the 80,000 Bodhisattvas asked the Buddha with one voice, “World-Honored One, if Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas wish to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi quickly, through what Dharma Door should they train? 
What Dharma Door will enable Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi quickly?” The Buddha replied to Great Magnificence Bodhisattva and the 80,000 Bodhisattvas: 
“Good men, there is one Dharma Door through which Bodhisattvas can attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi quickly. 
If there are Bodhisattvas who learn this Dharma Door, they can attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi quickly.” “World-Honored One, what is this Dharma Door called? 
What is its meaning? 
How should Bodhisattvas train themselves?” The Buddha replied, “Good men, this one Dharma Door is called Immeasurable Meaning. 
Bodhisattvas who wish to study and learn the immeasurable meaning should observe that dharmas have always been empty in nature and in appearance. With neither birth nor death, dharmas are neither large nor small, neither moving nor standing still, neither advancing nor retreating. 
Like space, they are non-dual. However, sentient beings mistakenly calculate this versus that, gain versus loss. They elicit bad thoughts, do evil karmas, and hence transmigrate through the six life-journeys, undergoing dreadful suffering. For innumerable koṭis of kalpas, they are unable to transcend the cycle by themselves. 
Having observed them carefully in this way and wishing to rescue them, Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas feel sympathy and exude great lovingkindness and compassion. 
Moreover, they deeply penetrate all dharmas: with such a dharma appearance, such a dharma is arising; with such a dharma appearance, such a dharma is staying; with such a dharma appearance, such a dharma is changing; with such a dharma appearance, such a dharma is perishing; such a dharma appearance can produce evil dharmas; such a dharma appearance can produce good dharmas. In the same way each dharma stays, changes, and perishes. 
Having fully observed and understood the ins and outs of the four appearances , Bodhisattvas next observe intently that all dharmas arise and perish instantly, as thoughts, one after another, never stay. They also observe the instantaneous birth, stay, change, and death of all dharmas. Having made these observations, Bodhisattvas then penetrate the capacities, natures, and desires of sentient beings. 
Because their capacities, natures, and desires are immeasurable, Bodhisattvas pronounce immeasurable Dharmas. 
As the Dharmas pronounced are immeasurable, their meanings are also immeasurable. 
The immeasurable meanings are born from one dharma. 
This one dharma is no appearance, which is not apart from appearance. 
The truth that appearance and no appearance are not apart from each other is called true reality. 
As Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas abide in this true reality, the lovingkindness and compassion they exude are genuine, not false. They can truly end sentient beings’ suffering. 
Having rescued them from suffering, Bodhisattvas pronounce the Dharma to them, enabling them to experience happiness. 
“Good men, if Bodhisattvas can train in this one Dharma Door of Immeasurable Meaning, they will quickly attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
Good men, this profound, unexcelled Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning is true in its principle and supreme in its dignity. It is protected by all Buddhas of the past, present, and future. No māras or non-Buddhists can enter it, nor can it be corrupted by the wrong views that perpetuate birth and death. 
Therefore, good men, Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas who wish to attain the unsurpassed bodhi should study and learn this profound, unexcelled Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning.” Great Magnificence Bodhisattva next said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, the Dharma pronounced by You is inconceivable, the capacities of sentient beings are also inconceivable, and the explanations of the Dharma Doors are inconceivable as well. 
We no longer have doubts about the Dharma pronounced by the Buddha. However, I need to restate my question because sentient beings have bewildered minds. 
World-Honored One, since the Tathāgata’s attainment of bodhi, for over forty years, You have often expounded to sentient beings that the meaning of the four appearances of every dharma is impermanence, pain, emptiness, and no self. With neither birth nor death, dharmas are neither large nor small, but in the one appearance of no appearance. Dharma nature and dharma appearance have always been empty, neither coming nor going, neither appearing nor disappearing. 
Of those who have heard these teachings, some have completed  Warmth, Pinnacle, Endurance, and Foremost in the World; some have become Srotāpannas, Sakṛdāgāmins, Anāgāmins, or Arhats; some have activated the bodhi mind and ascended to the First, Second, Third, or even the Tenth Ground. 
“What is the difference in the meaning between the Dharma You have pronounced in the past and what You have stated today, that prompted You to say that Bodhisattvas who train according to this profound, unexcelled Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning will attain the unsurpassed bodhi quickly? 
What is the reason? 
I pray only that the World-Honored One, out of His lovingkindness and compassion for all, will widely explain it to sentient beings, enabling present and future hearers of the Dharma not to have a web of doubts remaining.” Then the Buddha told Great Magnificence Bodhisattva, “Very good! 
Very good! Man of great goodness, you are able to ask the Tathāgata about such subtle meaning of this profound, unexcelled Mahāyāna. We know that you are able to bring a great many benefits to gods and humans and to rescue suffering sentient beings, giving them all peace and joy. Your great lovingkindness and compassion are true, not false. 
Because of these causes and conditions, you will definitely attain the unsurpassed bodhi quickly. You will also enable sentient beings in the Three Realms of Existence to attain the unsurpassed bodhi in their present or future lives. 
“Good man, after sitting properly for six years under the bodhi tree in my bodhimaṇḍa, I attained anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. I then observed all dharmas with my Buddha-eye and decided that some  should not yet be pronounced. 
Because the natures and desires of sentient beings are varied. 
Because their natures and desires are varied, my teachings have also been varied. 
Pronouncing various Dharmas with the power of skillful means for over forty years, I did not reveal the definitive meaning. 
As a result, there are differences in the bodhi attained by sentient beings, and they are unable to attain the unsurpassed bodhi quickly. 
“Good man, the Dharma is like water, which can wash off filth and dirt. Whether water comes from a well, a lake, a stream, a river, a brook, a channel, or an immense ocean, it all can wash off different kinds of dirt. 
Likewise, the Dharma water can cleanse sentient beings’ filthy afflictions. 
“Good man, the nature of water is the same, but a stream, a river, a well, a pool, a channel, and an immense ocean are different from one another. 
Likewise, the nature of the Dharma is the same, and there is no difference in its washing away of filthy afflictions. However, the three dharmas, the four  fruits, and the Two Paths are not the same. 
“Good man, although water from any source washes off dirt just the same, a well is not a pool, a pool is neither a stream nor a river, and a brook or a channel is not an immense ocean. The Dharma pronounced by the Tathāgata, the hero in the world, who has command of all dharmas, is like water. 
Although what is taught at the beginning, in the middle, and at the end all can cleanse sentient beings’ afflictions, the beginning is not the middle, nor is the middle the end. The teachings given at the beginning, in the middle, and at the end use the same words but their meanings are different. 
“Good man, after I rose from under the bodhi tree, the king of trees, I went to Deer Park in Vārāṇasī and turned the Dharma wheel of the Four Noble Truths for the five people, including Ājñātakauṇḍinya. I pronounced that dharmas have always been empty, changing nonstop, as thoughts arise and perish, thought after thought. 
During the middle period of my teachings, I expounded everywhere to bhikṣus and Bodhisattvas the Twelve Links of Dependent Arising and the six pāramitās. I also pronounced that dharmas have always been empty, changing nonstop, as thoughts arise and perish, thought after thought. 
As I now expound this Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning, I again pronounce that dharmas have always been empty, changing nonstop, as thoughts arise and perish, thought after thought. 
Therefore, good man, the teachings at the beginning, in the middle, and at the end use the same words, but with different meanings. 
Because the meanings are different, sentient beings’ understandings are different. 
Because their understandings are different, the Dharma, the fruit, and bodhi they acquire are also different. 
“Good man, at the beginning, as I pronounced the Four Noble Truths to those who wanted to be voice-hearers, eight koṭi gods who descended  to hear the Dharma, activated the bodhi mind. 
In the middle period , as I pronounced everywhere the profound Twelve Links of Dependent Arising to those who wanted to become Pratyekabuddhas, innumerable sentient beings activated the bodhi mind, while others remained as voice-hearers. 
I next pronounced sūtras in the twelve categories, including the vaipulya sūtras and the mahāprajñā sūtras, like a splendid ocean of clouds, and I expounded how Bodhisattvas would train themselves for kalpas. However, of the hundreds of thousands of bhikṣus and tens of thousands of koṭis of humans and gods, a countless number became Srotāpannas, Sakṛdāgāmins, Anāgāmins, or Arhats, abiding in the Dharma of Dependent Arising realized by Pratyekabuddhas. 
Good man, for this reason, know that although the words are the same, their meanings are different. 
Because the meanings are different, the understandings of sentient beings are different. 
As their understandings differ, the Dharma, fruit, and bodhi they achieve also differ. 
“Good man, after attaining the great bodhi, from the time I started pronouncing the Dharma, to this day on which I expound the Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning, I have never stopped explaining suffering, emptiness, impermanence, and no self. Nor have I stopped explaining that dharmas, neither real nor unreal, neither large nor small, have never been born, nor do they die. The one appearance of all dharmas is no appearance, as dharma appearance and dharma nature are neither coming nor going. However, sentient beings continue to be driven by the four appearances they perceive . 
“Good man, this means that Buddhas, who never speak contradictory words, can respond with one tone universally to all sounds. 
They each can use one body to manifest as many copies of that body as the sands of immeasurable, uncountable billions of koṭis of nayutas of Ganges Rivers. 
Each copy can in turn manifest as many kinds of forms as the sands of asaṁkhyeyas billions of koṭis of nayutas of Ganges Rivers. 
Each form can further manifest as many shapes as the sands of asaṁkhyeya billions of koṭis of nayutas of Ganges Rivers. 
Good man, the inconceivable profound state of Buddhas is unknowable to riders of the Two Vehicles and beyond Bodhisattvas on the Tenth Ground. It is understood only by Buddhas. 
“Therefore, good man, I pronounce this wondrous, profound, unexcelled Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning, which is true in its principle and supreme in its dignity. It is protected by all Buddhas of the past, present, and future. No māras or non-Buddhists can enter it, nor can it be corrupted by the wrong views that perpetuate birth and death. 
If Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas wish to attain the unsurpassed bodhi quickly, they should study and learn this profound, unexcelled Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning.” After the Buddha had finished these words, this Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World quaked in six different ways. The sky spontaneously rained down various kinds of celestial flowers, such as utpala, padma, kumuda, and puṇḍarīka. 
As an offering to the Buddha and the huge multitude of Bodhisattvas and voice-hearers, innumerable kinds of celestial incense, garments, necklaces, and priceless jewels fell spiraling down from the sky. 
Celestial serving dishes and bowls were filled with delicacies of one hundred celestial flavors. 
Placed everywhere were celestial banners, flags, canopies, and musical instruments. 
As celestial music and songs were performed to praise the Buddha, the world again quaked in six different ways. In the east, in Buddha Lands as numerous as the sands of the Ganges, their skies also rained down celestial flowers, incense, garments, necklaces, and priceless jewels. Their celestial serving dishes and bowls too were filled with delicacies of one hundred celestial flavors. Also placed everywhere were celestial banners, flags, canopies, and musical instruments. 
Just the same were worlds in the south, west, and north, as well as in the four in-between directions, and toward the zenith and nadir. 
Then in the multitude, 32,000 Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas attained the Samādhi of Immeasurable Meaning, and 24,000 Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas acquired innumerable, immeasurable Dhāraṇī Doors and were enabled to turn the no-regress Dharma wheel of Buddhas of the past, present, and future. The bhikṣus, bhikṣuṇīs, upāsakas, upāsikās, gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, and mahoragas, as well as great Wheel-Turning Kings and lesser Wheel-Turning Kings, such as silver wheel kings and iron wheel kings, as well as kings, princes, state ministers, citizens, men, women, and elders, together with their retinues in the hundreds of thousands, having heard the Buddha pronounce this sūtra, all received benefits. Some achieved  Warmth, Pinnacle, Endurance, and Foremost in the World. Some achieved the  fruits, becoming Srotāpannas, Sakṛdāgāmins, Anāgāmins, or Arhats. 
Chapter 3 The Ten Virtues Great Magnificence Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva next said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, You have pronounced this wondrous, profound, unexcelled Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning. 
Truly it is very profound, very profound, very profound. 
Because in this multitude of Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas, Your four groups of disciples, gods, dragons, spirits, kings, state ministers, citizens, and sentient beings, having heard this profound, unexcelled Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning, no one has failed to acquire the Dhāraṇī Doors, the Three Dharmas, the four  fruits, or the bodhi mind. 
Know that this sūtra is true in its principle and supreme in its dignity. It is protected by all Buddhas of the past, present, and future. No māras or non-Buddhists can enter it, nor can it be corrupted by the wrong views that perpetuate birth and death. 
Why not? 
Because by hearing it only once, one is enabled to uphold all Dharmas. 
“If there are sentient beings that have heard this sūtra, it is to their great benefit. 
Because if they train accordingly, they will attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi quickly. 
If there are sentient beings that are unable to hear this sūtra, know that it is a great loss to them. Even after passing immeasurable, limitless, inconceivable asaṁkhyeyas of kalpas, they still will not attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
Why not? 
Because not knowing the great Way to bodhi, they take perilous paths which lead to many tribulations. “World-Honored One, this sūtra is inconceivable! 
I pray only that the World-Honored One, out of lovingkindness and sympathy, will broadly expound to this huge multitude the profound and inconceivable things about this sūtra. 
World-Honored One, where does this sūtra come from, where does it go, and where does it stay, to have such immeasurable virtue and inconceivable power, enabling sentient beings to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi quickly?” Then the World-Honored One told Great Magnificence Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, “Very good! 
Very good! Good man, indeed, indeed, it is just as you say. 
Good man, I say that truly this sūtra is very profound, very profound, very profound. 
Because it enables sentient beings to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi quickly. Hearing it once enables them to uphold all Dharmas. It brings great benefits to sentient beings, and it enables them to walk the great right path without tribulations. 
Good man, you ask where this sūtra comes from, where it goes, and where it stays. 
Hearken well! Good man, this sūtra comes from the abode of Buddhas, goes to sentient beings for them to activate the bodhi mind, and stays in the action range of Bodhisattvas. 
Good man, this sūtra comes in this way, goes in this way, and stays in this way. 
Indeed, this sūtra has immeasurable virtue and inconceivable power, and can enable sentient beings to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi quickly. 
Good man, would you like to hear the ten inconceivable powers of this sūtra’s virtue?” Great Magnificence Bodhisattva replied, “I would be delighted to hear.” The Buddha said: 
“Good man, first, this sūtra can enable Bodhisattvas who have not activated the bodhi mind to activate the bodhi mind; enable those who have no lovingkindness to invoke the mind of lovingkindness; enable those who enjoy killing to awaken the mind of compassion; enable those who are jealous to open the mind of sympathetic joy; enable those who have love and attachment to cultivate the mind of equability; enable those who are miserly and greedy to unleash the mind of generosity; enable those who are arrogant to observe their precepts; enable those who are easily angered to endure ; enable those who are negligent and indolent to strive for energetic progress; enable those who are disorderly to develop the meditative mind; enable those who are foolish to unfold the wisdom mind; enable those who are unable to deliver others to have the will to deliver others; enable those who do the ten evil karmas to be motivated to do the ten good karmas; enable those who delight in saṁskṛta dharmas to realize the asaṁskṛta mind; enable those with a regressive mind to invoke the mind that never regresses; enable those who discharge their afflictions to uncover the mind with no affliction to discharge; and enable those who have a great many afflictions to resolve to eradicate them. 
Good man, these are called the first inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. 
“Good man, here is the second inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. If there are sentient beings that have acquired this sūtra, whether in its entirety or just one stanza or one verse, they will be enabled to penetrate 100,000 koṭi meanings in the Dharma which, for innumerable kalpas, they have upheld but been unable to expound. 
Because the Dharma in this sūtra has immeasurable meaning. 
Good man, by analogy, a seed can produce hundreds, thousands, and tens of thousands of seeds. Each seed in turn can produce hundreds, thousands, and tens of thousands of seeds. The seeds successively produced in this way are innumerable. Likewise this sūtra expands. 
One Dharma gives rise to hundreds and thousands of meanings. Each meaning in turn evokes hundreds, thousands, and tens of thousands of meanings. Expanding in this way, immeasurable, boundless meanings are revealed. 
Therefore, this sūtra is called Immeasurable Meaning. 
Good man, these are called the second inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. 
“Good man, here is the third inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. If there are sentient beings that have heard this sūtra, whether in its entirety or just one stanza or one verse, they will be enabled to penetrate a billion koṭi meanings. Although they still have afflictions, they will carry on as if without afflictions. They will go through birth and death without thoughts of fear. 
As a strong man can carry heavy loads, so too can the upholders of this sūtra shoulder the onerous undertaking for the unsurpassed bodhi and carry sentient beings away from the journey of birth and death. Although they have not delivered themselves, they will be able to deliver others. 
As an analogy, a severely ill captain of the ship stays on this shore because of his physical disability, but he owns a sturdy ship equipped for transporting people, so he gives it to others to sail away. 
So too do the upholders of this sūtra. Transmigrating through the five life-paths, with their bodies fettered by 108 grave diseases, they will continue their ignorance, grow old, and die on this shore . However, they have this sturdy Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning and can deliver others. 
Sentient beings that train according to its tenets will be delivered from  birth and death. 
Good man, these are called the third inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. 
“Good man, here is the fourth inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. If there are sentient beings that have heard this sūtra, whether in its entirety or just one stanza or one verse, they will acquire bravery. Although they have not delivered themselves, they will be enabled to deliver others and to have Bodhisattvas as their spiritual family. Buddha-Tathāgatas will often expound the Dharma to them. 
After hearing it, they will be able to accept and uphold it accordingly, not countering it. They will in turn pronounce it widely to others where appropriate. 
Good man, they are like the youngest prince born to the king and queen, whether one or two or up to seven days old, whether one or two or up to seven months old, whether one or two or up to seven years old. Although he is unable to administer the affairs of the state, he is already respected by his people. He is in the company of older princes, and the king and queen, with doting love, regularly talk to him. 
Because he is very young. 
Good man, fortunate as well are the upholders of this sūtra. Buddhas are the king and this sūtra is the queen. Their union gives birth to Bodhisattva-sons. 
If these Bodhisattvas have heard this sūtra, whether only one verse or one stanza, whether once or twice, whether ten, one hundred, one thousand, ten thousand times, or even as innumerable times as the sands of tens of thousands of koṭis of Ganges Rivers, although they are yet unable to realize the ultimate truth, nor can they turn the great Dharma wheel with the thundering Brahma tone to shake the Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World, they are already respected by  four groups of disciples and the eight classes of Dharma protectors, and have great Bodhisattvas as their spiritual family. Penetrating deeply into the secret Dharma of Buddhas, they can expound it without contradictions or faults. Because they are beginning students, they are always protected and remembered by Buddhas and embraced in their lovingkindness. 
Good man, these are called the fourth inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. 
“Good man, here is the fifth inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. If good men and good women, during the Buddha’s life or after His parinirvāṇa, accept and uphold this profound unsurpassed Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning and recite and copy it, they will be able to indicate the great Bodhi Way, though they are still fettered by afflictions and unable to keep away from the matters of ordinary beings. They will be able to lengthen one day to one hundred kalpas and shorten one hundred kalpas into one day, winning the appreciation and trust of sentient beings. 
Good man, these good men and good women are like a dragon-son who, only seven days old, already can stir up clouds and pour down rains. 
Good man, these are called the fifth inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. 
“Good man, here is the sixth inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. If good men and good women, during the Buddha’s life or after His parinirvāṇa, accept and uphold this sūtra and read and recite it, though still with afflictions, they will pronounce the Dharma to sentient beings, enabling them to stay far away from afflictions and saṁsāra and to end all suffering. 
Having heard it from them, sentient beings that train accordingly will acquire the Dharma,  fruits, and bodhi, just as if taught by Buddha-Tathāgatas, without any difference. 
As an analogy, although the prince is still very young, if the king is traveling or ill, he appoints the prince to administer the affairs of the state. 
The prince, following the great king’s order, properly commands his retinues and one hundred state ministers to proclaim the true Dharma. His kingdom and people will live in peace, just as if ruled by the great king, without any difference. 
The good men and good women who uphold this sūtra can do the same. Whether during the Buddha’s life or after his parinirvāṇa, although they have not ascended to the First Bodhisattva Ground called Joy, they will be able to expound the teachings by relying on the Buddha’s spoken words. Having heard  from them, sentient beings that train single-mindedly will be able to eradicate their afflictions and acquire the Dharma,  fruits, and even bodhi. 
Good man, these are called the sixth inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. 
“Good man, here is the seventh inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. If good men and good women, during the Buddha’s life or after His parinirvāṇa, have heard this sūtra, with joy and faith they appreciate its precious rarity. Moreover, they accept and uphold it, read and recite it, and copy and explain it; they train in accordance with the Dharma and activate the bodhi mind; and they develop their roots of goodness and invoke the mind of great compassion, resolved to deliver all suffering sentient beings. Although they have not practiced the six pāramitās, the six pāramitās will spontaneously be present before them. 
By analogy, a strong man vanquishes the enemy for the king. With the enemy eliminated, the king in his delight bestows half of his kingdom upon him. 
Men and women who uphold this sūtra can do the same. These spiritual trainees are truly courageous and vigorous. The six pāramitās, the Dharma treasure, will come to them without their quest, the enemy—birth and death—will perish spontaneously, and they will achieve the Endurance in the Realization of the No Birth of Dharmas. They will be awarded the treasure, half of a Buddha Land, to live in peace and bliss. 
Good man, these are called the seventh power of this sūtra’s virtue. 
Suppose good men and good women, during the Buddha’s life or after His parinirvāṇa, having acquired this sūtra, revere and believe it, regarding it as the Buddha’s body, without any difference. Delighting in this sūtra, they accept and uphold it, read and recite it, copy it, and respectfully train in accordance with the Dharma. They fortify their observance of precepts and their endurance as they practice almsgiving. Exuding profound lovingkindness and compassion, they widely pronounce to others this unexcelled Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning. 
If the hearers initially do not believe that sin and merit exist, they will show the hearers this sūtra and devise various skillful, persuasive ways to help them believe. By virtue of the awesome power of this sūtra, the minds  will be turned around. 
Once their faith is kindled, they will courageously make energetic progress. Because of the power and virtue of this sūtra, they will acquire the Way and achieve  fruits. 
Moreover, these good men and good women, because of their merit of transforming others, will in their present lives achieve the Endurance in the Realization of the No Birth of Dharmas and ascend to the next higher Ground , and they will have Bodhisattvas as their spiritual family. They will enable sentient beings quickly to come to  achievement, and they will purify Buddha Lands. Before long, they will attain the unsurpassed bodhi. 
Good men, these are called the eighth inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. 
“Good man, here is the ninth inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. If good men and good women, during the Buddha’s life or after His parinirvāṇa, have acquired this sūtra, with joy and exuberance they appreciate it as something that never existed before. If they accept and uphold it, read and recite it, copy it, make offerings to it, and explain its meaning to others, their past karmas, remaining sins, and severe hindrances will all be expunged at once. They will acquire purity and great eloquence, achieve the pāramitās one after another, and attain samādhis. 
Indeed, this sūtra has such powers. 
Good man, these are called the ninth inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. 
“Good man, here is the tenth inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. Suppose good men and good women, during the Buddha’s life or after His parinirvāṇa, having received this sūtra, express great joy in appreciation of its precious rarity. They not only accept and uphold it, read and recite it, copy it, make offerings to it, and train accordingly, but also convince lay and monastic people to accept and uphold it, read and recite it, copy and explain it, make offerings to it, and train in accordance with the Dharma. Those people will acquire the Way and achieve the  fruit because of their training and the power of this sūtra. 
For this reason, these good men and good women will in their present lives acquire innumerable Dhāraṇī Doors. Though still standing on the ground of ordinary beings, they will spontaneously be able to make innumerable asaṁkhyeyas of great vows to rescue with great compassion all sentient beings in suffering. They will bulk up their roots of goodness as they benefit all. Like channeling water to parched land, they will expound the Dharma as if giving Dharma medicine to sentient beings, and they will give peace and joy to all. 
Therefore, before long, these good men and good women will attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
Good man, these are called the tenth inconceivable power of this sūtra’s virtue. 
“Good man, this unexcelled Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning has great awesome spiritual power. Supreme in its dignity, it can enable ordinary beings to achieve the holy fruit, forever free from their cycle of birth and death. 
Therefore, this sūtra is called Immeasurable Meaning. 
It can cause sentient beings on the ground of ordinary beings to germinate immeasurable Bodhisattva bodhi sprouts. It can cause their trees of merit to flourish and expand. 
Hence this sūtra is called The Inconceivable Power of Virtue.” Then Great Magnificence Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva and the 80,000 Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas said to the Buddha with one voice: 
“World-Honored One, this wondrous, profound, unexcelled Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning pronounced by the Buddha is true in its principle and supreme in its dignity. It is protected by Buddhas of the past, present, and future. No māras or non-Buddhists can enter it, nor can it be corrupted by the wrong views that perpetuate birth and death. 
Hence this sūtra has these ten inconceivable powers of virtue, to give immeasurable great benefits to all sentient beings. It can enable Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas each to attain the Samādhi of Immeasurable Meaning. Some will acquire 100,000 Dhāraṇī Doors; some will achieve endurance on the Bodhisattva Grounds; some will become Pratyekabuddhas or achieve the four  fruits. 
World-Honored One, out of lovingkindness and sympathy, You have directly pronounced to us such teachings, giving us great Dharma benefits. This is so extraordinary, so unprecedented. 
The kindness and grace of the World-Honored One are truly hard to requite.” That having been said, the Three-Thousand Thousandfold World quaked in six different ways. The sky rained down various kinds of celestial flowers, such as utpala, padma, kumuda, and puṇḍarīka. 
As an offering to the Buddha and the huge multitude of Bodhisattvas and voice-hearers, various kinds of celestial incense, garments, necklaces, and priceless jewels fell spiraling down from the sky. Celestial serving dishes and bowls were filled with delicacies of one hundred celestial flavors, which gratified all with their colors and aromas. Placed everywhere were celestial banners, flags, and canopies, as well as wonderful musical instruments. 
As celestial music and songs were performed to praise the Buddha, the world again quaked in six different ways. In the east, in Buddha Lands as numerous as the sands of the Ganges, their skies also rained down celestial flowers, incense, garments, necklaces, and priceless jewels. Their celestial serving dishes and bowls too were filled with delicacies of one hundred celestial flavors, which gratified all with their colors and aromas. Placed everywhere as well were celestial banners, flags, and canopies. 
Then the Buddha told Great Magnificence Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas and the 80,000 Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas: “You all should invoke the reverent mind for this sūtra and train in accordance with the Dharma. You should widely circulate this sūtra and transform all people. Day and night you should diligently protect this sūtra and enabling sentient beings to receive Dharma benefits. 
You all truly have great lovingkindness and great compassion! Use your transcendental powers and the power of your vows to protect this sūtra. Do not allow it to be subject to doubts or blockages. Circulate it widely in Jambudvīpa far into the future and enable all sentient beings to see and hear it, read and recite it, copy it, and make offerings to it. 
Because of your effort, you all will be able to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi quickly.” Great Magnificence Bodhisattva and the 80,000 Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas rose from their seats, came forward to the Buddha, and bowed their heads down at His feet. They circled the Buddha 100,000 times. 
Then they knelt on their right knees and said to the Buddha with one voice, “World-Honored One, we are so fortunate that the World-Honored One has bestowed His loving sympathy on us and has pronounced to us this wondrous, profound, unexcelled Mahāyāna Sūtra of Immeasurable Meaning. 
We respectfully accept the Buddha’s command. After the parinirvāṇa of the Tathāgata, we will widely circulate this sūtra, enabling all to accept and uphold it, read and recite it, copy it, and make offerings to it. 
We pray only that the World-Honored One will not be worried. 
We will use the power of our vows to enable all sentient beings to acquire the awesome spiritual power of this sūtra.” The Buddha praised, “Very good! 
Very good! Good men, you now are truly the sons of the Buddha and are able to rescue, with great lovingkindness and great compassion, those who are in suffering and tribulations. 
As you widely give Dharma benefits to all, you are the good fortune field for all sentient beings, the competent guide for all sentient beings, the great refuge for all sentient beings, and the noble benefactor for all sentient beings.” All in the huge assembly greatly rejoiced. They made obeisance to the Buddha, accepted and upheld the teachings, and departed. 

Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment Chapter 26   The Ten Grounds ***** *** Translated from Sanskrit into Chinese in the Tang Dynasty by The Tripiṭaka Master Śikṣānanda from Yutian *** At that time the Bhagavān ] visited Paranirmita-vaśa-vartin Heaven . He stayed in its god-king’s gem-laden palace hall, together with an innumerable multitude of great Bodhisattvas who all came from worlds in other directions. 
These Bodhisattvas would never regress from the anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi mind. 
They abided in the realm of Bodhisattva wisdom and could enter the realm of Tathāgata wisdom. 
They excelled in displaying all kinds of transcendental powers. 
What they did to teach and transform sentient beings was always timely. 
To fulfill all their great Bodhisattva vows, without rest they trained all their lives in countless worlds for countless kalpas. 
They were adorned with merit and wisdom on their Way to bodhi, and universally benefited sentient beings without reservation. 
Having arrived at the shore of Bodhisattva wisdom and skillful means, they revealed the door of saṁsāra and the door of nirvāṇa, never neglecting their Bodhisattva training. 
Having mastered Bodhisattva meditation, liberation samādhi, and samāpatti, and being equipped with spiritual power and radiant wisdom, they did their work with ease. 
Using their transcendental powers, in one thought, without any effort they could visit all Buddha assemblies in worlds in the ten_directions. There, as leaders of the multitudes, they would beseech Buddhas to expound the Dharma. 
They protected and upheld the Dharma wheel of Buddhas and, with a magnanimous and profound mind, made offerings to all Buddhas and attended Them. They diligently engaged in all Bodhisattva works. 
Their bodies appeared in countless worlds; their voices reached dharma realms in the ten directions; their hindrance-free minds clearly saw everything in the past, present, and future. 
The merit they had accumulated from their Bodhisattva actions was complete, and it could not be fully described in countless kalpas. 
In this multitude were Vajra Store Bodhisattva, Treasure Store Bodhisattva, Lotus Store Bodhisattva, Virtue Store Bodhisattva, Lotus Virtue Store Bodhisattva, Sun Store Bodhisattva, Moon Store Bodhisattva, Stainless Moon Store Bodhisattva, Displaying in All Worlds Adornment Store Bodhisattva, Vairocana Wisdom Store Bodhisattva, Wonderful Virtue Store Bodhisattva, Sandalwood Virtue Store Bodhisattva, Flower Virtue Bodhisattva, Kusuma Virtue Store Bodhisattva, Utpala Virtue Store Bodhisattva, Divine Virtue Store Bodhisattva, Fortune Store Bodhisattva, Hindrance-Free Pure Wisdom Store Bodhisattva, Merit Store Bodhisattva, Nārāyaṇa Virtue Store Bodhisattva, Stainless Store Bodhisattva, Untainted Store Bodhisattva, Eloquence Adornment Store Bodhisattva, Web of Radiance Store Bodhisattva, Pure and Awesome King of the Radiance Store Bodhisattva, Gold Adorning the King of Radiance of the Great Virtue Store Bodhisattva, All Appearances Adorning the Pure Virtue Store Bodhisattva, Vajra Flame of the Virtue Adornment Store Bodhisattva, Radiant Flame Store Bodhisattva, Constellation King of the Radiance Store Bodhisattva, Unhindered-Sky Wisdom Store Bodhisattva, Unhindered Wonderful Sound Store Bodhisattva, Merit of Dhāraṇi Retaining the Deliverance-of-Sentient-Beings Vow Store Bodhisattva, Ocean Adornment Store Bodhisattva, Sumeru Virtue Store Bodhisattva, Purifying All Merit Store Bodhisattva, Tathāgata Virtue Store Bodhisattva, Buddha Virtue Store Bodhisattva, and Liberation Moon Bodhisattva. 
Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas such as these were inconceivable, indescribable, innumerable, and beyond reckoning. Their leader was Vajragarbha, Vajra Store Bodhisattva. 
**** The Samādhi of Mahāyāna Radiance **** Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva, through the spiritual power of the Buddha, entered the Bodhisattva samādhi, called Mahāyāna Radiance. In the ten directions, beyond worlds as numerous as the dust particles in ten koṭi Buddha Lands, there were Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in ten koṭi Buddha Lands, and they all were called Vajra Store. 
Vajra Store, you can enter this Bodhisattva Samādhi of Mahāyāna Radiance because you are supported by the power of Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in ten koṭi Buddha Lands; by the power of the original vows of Vairocana Tathāgata, the Samyak-Saṁbuddha; and by the power of your own excellent wisdom. 
“You are thus enabled to reveal to all Bodhisattvas the radiance of the inconceivable Buddha Dharma. It will enable them to enter the wisdom grounds; to develop all roots_of_goodness; to select the teachings in the Buddha Dharma; to know a wide range of dharmas; to excel in expounding the Dharma; to achieve purity by acquiring the differentiation-free wisdom-knowledge; to remain untainted by worldly dharmas; to achieve purity by developing supra-worldly roots of goodness; to acquire inconceivable wisdom and even Buddha wisdom; to complete the ten Bodhisattva grounds from start to finish; to explain correctly the differences between the ten Bodhisattva grounds; to ponder the entire Buddha Dharma; to learn and differentiate dharmas that are free from one’s afflictions; to adorn themselves with the radiance of great wisdom; to enter the definite door of wisdom-knowledge; to expound the Dharma systematically and fearlessly at their spiritual levels; to acquire the radiance of unimpeded eloquence; to abide on the ground of unimpeded wisdom-knowledge; to retain the bodhi mind and never to lose it; to bring sentient beings to  maturity; to be present everywhere; and definitely to attain enlightenment. 
“Good man, you should skillfully differentiate the  Dharma Doors because you are supported by the spiritual power of Buddhas; because you are blessed by the wisdom light of Tathāgatas; because you have purified your roots of goodness; because you universally purify the dharma realm; because you universally benefit all sentient beings; because you reveal the dharma body, the wisdom body; because Buddhas have poured the water of wisdom on your head; because you have assumed the hugest body in the world; because you have transcended all worldly paths; because you have pure supraworldly roots of goodness; because you fully qualify to acquire  the knowledge of all knowledge.”     Then Buddhas  in the ten directions bestowed upon Vajra Store Bodhisattva the unexcelled body; the unimpeded eloquence; the pure differentiating wisdom-knowledge; the power of mindfulness and unfailing memory; the radiant wisdom to understand everything; the wisdom-knowledge to be present everywhere and definitely to attain enlightenment; the commanding power to attain bodhi; the fearlessness of Tathāgatas; the wisdom-knowledge of Buddhas to examine and differentiate Dharma Doors; the sublime body, voice, and mind that adorn all Tathāgatas. 
Why? 
Because this Bodhisattva has naturally attained the Samādhi of Mahāyāna Radiance, and because of his original vows, his pure mind, his pure wisdom, his good training to complete the elements of bodhi, his good rectification of his karmas, his being an immeasurable Dharma_vessel, his pure faith in and understanding of , his unadulterated  total retention of the Dharma, and his sanctifying of his wisdom-knowledge of the dharma realm as a seal. 
**** Pronouncing the Names of the Ten Bodhisattva Grounds **** Then Buddha-Bhagavāns  in the ten directions extended their right hands and rubbed the crown of Vajra Store Bodhisattva’s head. 
Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva rose from his samādhi. He told all the Bodhisattvas in the multitude: “Buddha-Sons, Bodhisattva vows are a crucial resolve. 
Unadulterated and invisible, they are as vast as the dharma realm and as ultimate as the open sky. Throughout the endless future, Bodhisattvas will rescue and deliver all sentient beings in all Buddha Lands. Protected by all Buddhas, they will enter the wisdom ground of Buddhas of the past, future, and present. 
“Buddha-Sons, what are the wisdom grounds of Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas? 
There are ten wisdom grounds. As they were pronounced by Buddhas of the past, will be pronounced by Buddhas of the future, and are pronounced by Buddhas of the present, so I now pronounce them. 
What are these ten? 
“Buddha-Sons, these ten Bodhisattva grounds were pronounced by Buddhas of the past, will be pronounced by Buddhas of the future, and are pronounced by Buddhas of the present. 
Buddha-Sons, I have never seen any Buddha Land where the Tathāgata does not expound these ten grounds. 
Why not? 
Because they are the supreme Bodhisattva Way to bodhi, and are the illumination door of the pure Dharma. 
Buddha-Sons, to expound and differentiate these Bodhisattva grounds is inconceivable because the Bodhisattva wisdom developed on each ground is inconceivable.”     After pronouncing the names of the ten Bodhisattva grounds, Vajra Store Bodhisattva fell silent. 
He did not explain their meanings. **** Liberation Moon’s Request for an Explanation of the Ten Grounds **** At that time all Bodhisattvas in the multitude heard the names of the ten Bodhisattva grounds but not their explanations, and they were filled with longing. They thought, “Why did Vajra Store Bodhisattva only pronounce the names of the ten Bodhisattva grounds but not explain them?”     Then Liberation Moon Bodhisattva, knowing the thoughts of the multitude, asked Vajra Store Bodhisattva in verse: Why did the pure enlightened one, who is Equipped with mindfulness, wisdom, and merit, Pronounce the names of the wondrous grounds But not explain them, though he can? 
Resolute in everything, He is valiant and fearless. Why did he pronounce the names of the grounds But not expound their meanings? 
This multitude wishes to hear The profound meanings of the grounds. Their minds are not timid, And they pray that you will explain to them. 
This multitude is pure, Disciplined, and free from indolence. Unwavering in their solid training, They are adorned with merit and wisdom. 
Gazing with reverence, They all look up to you, Like bees thinking of pure honey, And like the thirsty longing for sweet dew. 
Vajra Store Bodhisattva, the fearless one with great wisdom, heard these stanzas. To delight the multitude, he spoke in verse: The training of a Bodhisattva on each ground Is the supreme root of a Buddha. A detailed explanation Is hard in the extreme. 
Such an explanation is subtle and hard to grasp, Beyond one’s thinking mind. As it arises from Buddha wisdom, The hearer will be bewildered. 
Only those who hold their minds like a vajra, Have profound faith in Buddha wisdom, and Know that one’s mind ground Has no self , Can hear such superb teachings, which are Like pictures or the wind In the open sky. 
Such is Buddha wisdom, A description of which is too hard to comprehend. Knowing that Buddha wisdom is Supreme and inconceivable, and that No one in the world can accept it, I choose to remain silent. 
Having heard these words, Liberation Moon Bodhisattva said to Vajra Store Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, this multitude of Bodhisattvas has congregated. 
They excel in training to complete the elements of bodhi. They have attended 100,000 koṭi Buddhas, developed innumerable roots of goodness, and acquired immeasurable merit. They have discarded their doubts and afflictions. With deep faith in and understanding of the Buddha Dharma, they do not need to be taught. 
Very good! 
Buddha-Son, through the spiritual power of the Buddha, you should expound to them. 
These Bodhisattvas can carry out your profound teachings.”     Then, to restate his meaning, Liberation Moon Bodhisattva spoke in verse: I pray that you will expound The supreme and most steadfast training of a Bodhisattva. Your explication of the Bodhisattva grounds Will lead them to pure wisdom and true enlightenment. 
This multitude of Bodhisattvas, who are free from afflictions, Abide in pure faith and understanding, And have attended innumerable Buddhas, Can understand the meanings of the Ten Grounds. 
Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva replied, “Buddha-Son, although this multitude has pure thoughts, has discarded delusions and doubts, and does not need to be taught the profound Dharma, there are sentient beings with inferior intellect. 
If they hear this profound and inconceivable training, they will harbor doubts and will be distressed in the long night. 
Out of pity for them, I remain silent.”     Then, to restate his meaning, Vajra Store Bodhisattva spoke in verse: This multitude has vast pure wisdom, Which is profound, keen, and capable of making right choices, And has a mind unwavering, like the king of mountains, And indestructible, like the immense ocean. 
They follow their consciousness, not their wisdom. If they hear my teachings, they will harbor doubts that will cause them to go down the evil life-paths. Out of compassion for them, I do not explain. 
Liberation Moon Bodhisattva again asked Vajra Store Bodhisattva, “BuddhaSon, I pray that, through the spiritual power of the Buddha, you will give this inconceivable teaching. 
The hearers, because of the Buddha’s protection and concern, will believe and accept it. 
Because when the Ten Grounds are pronounced, all Bodhisattvas naturally receive the Buddha’s protection and concern. 
Then they will enter the wisdom grounds with boldness. 
Because these grounds provide Bodhisattvas with the basic training to master the entire Buddha Dharma. 
“As an analogy, writing and numbering are based on the alphabet. They cannot be done without the alphabet. 
Buddha-Son,  the Buddha Dharma relies on the Ten Grounds. One must complete one’s training on the Ten Grounds to acquire  the overall wisdom-knowledge. 
Therefore, Buddha-Son, I pray that you will expound the Ten Grounds. 
All hearers will be protected by the Tathāgata, who will enable them to believe and accept your teachings.”     To restate his meaning, Liberation Moon Bodhisattva spoke in verse: 
Buddha-Son, I pray that you will expound A Bodhisattva’s training on the Ten Grounds to head for bodhi. 
All Buddhas in worlds in the ten directions Protect and care for the roots of wisdom. 
The Ten Grounds are the ultimate training place for wisdom, From which arises the entire Buddha Dharma. As writing and numbering are based on the alphabet, Likewise  the Buddha Dharma relies on  the grounds. 
**** Joint Request of the Multitude **** At that time the multitude of great Bodhisattvas, with one voice, spoke to Vajra Store Bodhisattvas in verse: Equipped with the excellent stainless wisdom-knowledge And the immeasurable eloquence to explicate dharmas, You can speak profound and beautiful words In accord with the highest meaning. 
You take pure actions with mindfulness, Accumulate merit through your ten powers, And explicate meanings with eloquence, So you can expound the supreme grounds. 
Having trained our minds with precepts and meditation, Having discarded our arrogance and wrong views, This multitude harbors no doubts But wishes to hear your profound words. 
As the thirsty long for cool water, Likewise the hungry yearn for warm food. As bees covet pure honey, Likewise the ill seek strong medicine. 
In the same way, We wish to taste the sweet dew of the Dharma. 
Great is the one with vast wisdom-knowledge! We pray that you will reveal how to enter the Bodhisattva grounds, In order to acquire the Ten Powers  hindrance free And take all the actions of the Sugata. **** Support from Buddhas **** At that time the World-Honored One emitted from between His eyebrows a beam of pure light, called Flaming Radiance of the Power of Bodhisattvas, accompanied by 100,000 asaṁkhyeya beams as its retinue. It shone everywhere in all worlds in the ten directions. Sentient beings on the three evil life-paths were given a respite from their suffering. 
It also illuminated all Tathāgata assemblies, revealing the inconceivable power of Buddhas. 
It also illuminated all Bodhisattvas in all worlds in the ten directions, who were expounding the Dharma with the support of Buddhas. 
Then the radiance formed a huge platform of radiance in the sky, like a web of radiant clouds. 
Meanwhile Buddhas in worlds in the ten directions did the same. They too emitted beams of pure light from between Their eyebrows. The names, the retinues, and the actions of these beams were the same as those just described. These beams also illuminated the Buddha and the huge multitude in this Sahā World, as well as Vajra Store Bodhisattva on his lion throne. 
Then the radiance formed a huge platform of radiance in the sky, like a web of radiant clouds. From this platform of radiance, through the spiritual power of Buddhas, a voice spoke in verse: The Buddha is as unequaled as the open sky. Adorned with immeasurable merit and the Ten_Powers. 
Buddha-Son, through the power of the Buddha, You should open the greatest treasury of this Dharma king. Through the spiritual power of the Buddha, you should explain The superb training on all wisdom grounds. The hearers, supported by the power of the Sugata, Will accept the Dharma treasure into their minds. 
After they have completed purifying the Ten Grounds one by one, They will acquire the Ten Powers of a Tathāgata. 
Those with doubts and disbelief Will never hear such meanings. Those capable of accepting them will definitely hear them Even if they live in the water and fire at the end of a kalpa. 
You should expound the grounds as the excellent wisdom path For them to train step by step, In order to develop their wisdom through their training And benefit all sentient beings. 
**** The Request Granted **** Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva observed everywhere in the ten directions. To strengthen the faith of the multitude, he spoke in verse: The bodhi attained by the Tathāgata, the holy master, Is wondrous and hard to know. It is beyond thinking and apart from thoughts, Impossible to be captured by one’s perception. 
With neither birth nor death, Its nature is forever pure and quiet. One who is wise and free from afflictions Knows that wisdom is Empty and quiet in nature, as well as Non-dual and endless. 
It enables one to liberate oneself from making repeated life-journeys And to abide in the equality of nirvāṇa. 
With no beginning, middle, or ending, It cannot be described by words. It transcends past, present, and future, And appears like the open sky. 
The attainment of a Buddha is nirvāṇa, Which is beyond the description of words. 
Likewise is one’s training on the Bodhisattva grounds, Which is hard to describe and hard to accept. 
Apart from thinking and mental functions, One’s wisdom  leads to Buddha wisdom. Not in the realm of one’s five_aggregates, twelve_fields, and eighteen_spheres, It is beyond one’s conscious mind. 
As bird tracks in the sky Are hard to indicate, Likewise the meanings of the Ten Grounds Are hard for one’s mind to comprehend. 
Equipped with lovingkindness, compassion, and the power of one’s vows, One can enter the Bodhisattva grounds to train. 
It can be known but not described. Through the power of the Buddha, I will expound it, and You should reverently accept it. 
The training for wisdom Cannot be explained in a koṭi kalpas. I now will describe it briefly, Revealing its true meanings without omission. 
You should wait with reverence and a single mind For me to speak, through the power of the Buddha, Wondrous tones of the true Dharma that express Words and analogies in accord with their meanings. 
May the immeasurable spiritual power of the Buddha Enter into my body. What is hard to expound I now will reveal in brief. 
**** The First Ground, the Joyful Ground **** **** Activating the Bodhi Mind **** “Buddha-Son, if sentient beings persistently develop their roots of goodness, gather provisions for the spiritual journey, do good training, make offerings to Buddhas, do good karmas, are protected by beneficent learned friends, cultivate a pure and profound mind, raise great aspirations, achieve profound understanding , and elicit lovingkindness and compassion, then they can activate the anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi mind. They activate the bodhi mind because they seek to acquire Buddha wisdom; to acquire the Ten Powers; to acquire fearlessness; to master the Buddha Dharma founded on equality; to purify their lovingkindness and compassion; to rescue all in the world; to acquire all possible wisdom-knowledge from the ten directions; to purify all Buddha Lands hindrance free; to know in one thought everything in the past, present, and future; to turn the great Dharma wheel without fear. 
“Buddha-Son, the bodhi mind is led by great compassion, ruled by wisdom, assisted by skillful means, and sustained by the supreme profound mind. It draws upon the immeasurable power of Tathāgatas and can observe and differentiate dharmas. Using the wisdom-knowledge of unhindered power, it follows one’s innate wisdom and can accept the wisdom contained in the entire Buddha Dharma. The bodhi mind is as vast as the dharma realm and as ultimate as the open sky, throughout the endless future. 
“Buddha-Son, as soon as someone activates the bodhi mind, he immediately transcends the ground of ordinary beings and becomes a Bodhisattva. he is born into the Tathāgata family, and no one can scorn his family name. He leaves worldly paths, enters the supra-worldly path, and acquires the Bodhisattva Dharma. As a Bodhisattva, he realizes the equality of past, present, and future. 
As a Bodhisattva of the Tathāgata character-type, he will definitely attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. A Bodhisattva abiding in these dharmas is called abiding on the first ground, the Joyful Bodhisattva Ground , because he is unwavering. 
**** Reasons to Be Joyful **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abiding on this Joyful Ground has much joy, much pure faith, much delight, much comfort, much enjoyment, much exuberance, and much valor. He has no aggression, no spite, and no anger. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this Joyful Ground is joyful because he thinks of Buddhas; because he thinks of the Buddha Dharma; because he thinks of Bodhisattvas; because he thinks of Bodhisattva actions; because he thinks of the purity of the pāramitās; because he thinks of the excellence of the Bodhisattva grounds; because he thinks of the indestructibility of Bodhisattvas; because he thinks of Tathāgatas teaching and transforming sentient beings; because he thinks of giving benefits to sentient beings; because he thinks of acquiring the wisdom and skillful means of all Tathāgatas. 
“He also thinks, ‘I am joyful because I have left all worldly things behind; because I am close to all Buddhas; because I have left the ground of ordinary beings far behind; because I am near the wisdom ground; because I have forever ended taking the evil life-paths; because I am a refuge for all sentient beings; because I see all Tathāgatas; because I am born in the realm of Buddhas; because I join all Bodhisattvas as their equal; because I stay far away from all terrifying things that cause my hair to stand on end.’     “Why? Because a Bodhisattva abiding on the Joyful Ground has left behind all his fears, such as  fear of the overwhelming presence of multitudes. He has discarded all such fears. 
Because this Bodhisattva has no perception of having a self. “He does not cherish even his body, much less his assets; therefore, he has no fear of his inability to survive. 
He does not seek to receive offerings but gives alms to all sentient beings; therefore, he has no fear of a bad name. 
He has neither self-view nor perception of having a self; therefore, he has no fear of death. 
He knows that, after death, he will never be separated from Buddhas or Bodhisattvas; therefore, he has no fear of the evil life-paths. 
He knows that his aspirations are unequaled, much less surpassed, in the world; therefore, he has no fear of the overwhelming presence of multitudes. 
Thus this Bodhisattva stays far away from all terrifying things that cause his hair to stand on end. 
**** Purifying and Cultivating the Ground **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva is led by his great compassion, and his great resolve is indestructible. Diligently developing his roots of goodness, he comes to achievement in faith because his faith is excellent, pure, and firm, out of pure understanding; because he elicits lovingkindness and compassion; because he has a tireless mind; because he adorns himself with a sense of shame and dishonor; because he endures adversity with a gentle mind; because he esteems and follows the Buddha Dharma. “He comes to achievement in training because day and night he tirelessly develops his roots of goodness; because he stays close to beneficent learned friends; because he delights in the Dharma and seeks to hear more of it, never satiated; because he makes right observations after hearing the Dharma; because his mind is not attached to anything, such as benefits, fame, or worship; because he does not seek to be offered life-supporting things; because he tirelessly seeks to realize his true mind. “He comes to achievement in transferring his merit because he seeks the ground of  the overall wisdom-knowledge; because he seeks to acquire a Tathāgata’s Ten Powers, Four_Fearlessnesses, and Eighteen_Exclusive Dharmas; because he practices the pāramitās in order to attain bodhi; because he shuns sycophancy and deceit; because he honors his words with actions; because he protects truthful words; because he never tarnishes the Tathāgata family; because he never abandons the Bodhisattva precepts; because he seeks the overall wisdom-knowledge with an unwavering mind like the king of mountains; because he walks the supra-worldly path without relinquishing worldly matters; because he tirelessly trains to complete the elements of bodhi; because he constantly seeks the supreme path to bodhi. 
“Buddha-Son, when a Bodhisattva purifies and cultivates the ground in this way, it is called abiding on the Joyful Bodhisattva Ground. 
**** Making Ten Great Vows **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on the Joyful Ground makes great vows with such great boldness and such great purpose. “First, with profound, pure, and definite understanding , he vows to make all possible offerings reverently to all Buddhas without omission. 
Throughout all future kalpas without rest, he honors this vow, which is as vast as the dharma realm and as ultimate as the open sky. “Second, he vows to accept the Dharma wheel of all Buddhas, to protect the teachings of all Buddhas, to uphold the Dharma of all Buddhas, and to attain Buddha bodhi. 
Throughout all future kalpas without rest, he honors this vow, which is as vast as the dharma realm and as ultimate as the open sky. “Third, he wishes Buddhas to appear in all worlds. Each Buddha disappears from Tuṣita Heaven , enters His mother’s womb, stays in the womb, is born, renounces family life, attains bodhi, expounds the Dharma, and demonstrates entering parinirvāṇa. He vows to visit them all simultaneously wherever they are, to stay close to them and make offerings to them, to accept and practice the true Dharma, and to be the leader of multitudes. 
Throughout all future kalpas without rest, he honors this vow, which is as vast as the dharma realm and as ultimate as the open sky. “Fourth, he wishes all Bodhisattva actions to be vast, immeasurable, indestructible, and unadulterated, to include the pāramitās, and to purify and cultivate the Bodhisattva grounds. He vows to explain truthfully the features of all Bodhisattva actions—general or particular, same or different, completed or undone—teaching all to take these actions and expand their minds. 
Throughout all future kalpas without rest, he honors this vow, which is as vast as the dharma realm and as ultimate as the open sky. “Fifth, he vows to teach all sentient beings that transmigrate through the six life-paths in the Three_Realms_of_Existence. Each composed of name and form  , sentient beings are with or without form, with or without perception, not with or not without perception, born from the egg, womb, or moisture, or by miraculous formation. He vows to teach and transform them all, and to set them on the path to  the knowledge of all knowledge, enabling them to enter the Buddha Dharma and end their worldly life-journeys forever. 
Throughout all future kalpas without rest, he honors this vow, which is as vast as the dharma realm and as ultimate as the open sky. “Sixth, he vows to acquire wisdom to see all worlds in the ten directions and to know their innumerable differences—coarse or fine; upright, inverted, or unfixed; coming, going, or wandering—like those displayed by the god-king Indra’s net. 
Throughout all future kalpas without rest, he honors this vow, which is as vast as the dharma realm and as ultimate as the open sky. “Seventh, he wishes to see that all worlds are encompassed in one world, that one world is encompassed in all worlds, and that countless worlds are pure and adorned with radiance. He vows to eradicate all his afflictions, to walk the pure path together with innumerable wise sentient beings, and to enter the vast realm of Buddhas, which is displayed at sentient beings’ wishes and pleasures. 
Throughout all future kalpas without rest, he honors this vow, which is as vast as the dharma realm and as ultimate as the open sky. “Eighth, he wishes all Bodhisattvas to train in the same way with the same aspirations; to develop their roots of goodness without jealousy; always to congregate as equals, never abandoning one another; to manifest at will as Buddhas and know the power and wisdom of all Tathāgatas; to acquire transcendental powers that never regress, in order to visit all worlds at will, appear in all assemblies, and be reborn wherever they can be reborn; to uphold the inconceivable Mahāyāna; to complete all Bodhisattva training. 
Throughout all future kalpas without rest, he honors this vow, which is as vast as the dharma realm and as ultimate as the open sky. “Ninth, he vows to ride the wheel of no regress to take Bodhisattva actions, so that his body, voice, and mind karmas never go to waste. Those who see him, however briefly, will definitely enter the Buddha Dharma; those who hear his voice, however briefly, will acquire true wisdom. As soon as they elicit pure faith, they end their afflictions forever and take all Bodhisattva actions, as if they had acquired the wish-fulfilling jewel or the king of medicinal trees. 
Throughout all future kalpas without rest, he honors this vow, which is as vast as the dharma realm and as ultimate as the open sky. “Tenth, he vows to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi in all worlds on the tip of a hair ; to display, in all worlds on the tips of all hairs , his birth, sitting in his bodhimaṇḍa, attaining Buddhahood, turning the Dharma wheel to deliver sentient beings, and entering parinirvāṇa; to acquire great wisdom in the realm of Buddhas; to enable sentient beings to attain nirvāṇa by displaying his attainment of Buddhahood in a manner suitable for their minds; to know in his  true enlightenment that all dharmas are appearances of nirvāṇa; to expound the Dharma with one tone to delight all sentient beings; to demonstrate entering parinirvāṇa without interrupting his Bodhisattva training; to reveal the ground of great wisdom to establish all dharmas; to acquire the dharma wisdom-knowledge; to use his transcendental powers to perform magical acts everywhere in the world. 
Throughout all future kalpas without rest, he honors this vow, which is as vast as the dharma realm and as ultimate as the open sky. 
**** The Ten Impossible Endings **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on the Joyful Ground makes such great vows with such great boldness and such great purpose. Led by these ten great vows, he fulfills a million asaṁkhyeya great vows. 
Buddha-Son, these ten great vows are established with ten impossible endings. 
What are these ten? 
They are  ending of the realm of changes in worlds, dharmas, and knowledge. 
As these ten, from the realm of sentient beings to the realm of the three kinds of changes have no end, so my great vows arising from my roots of goodness have no end.’ **** Acquiring Ten Dharmas **** Faith     “Buddha-Son, having made such great vows, this Bodhisattva acquires ten minds: 
the benevolent mind, the gentle mind, the compliant mind, the quiet mind, the tame mind, the mind in nirvāṇa, the humble mind, the nurturing mind, the unwavering mind, and the clear mind. 
He thus elicits pure faith in the original training of Tathāgatas, in achieving the pāramitās, in entering the superb Bodhisattva grounds, in acquiring the Ten Powers, in achieving the Four Fearlessnesses, in acquiring the indestructible Eighteen Exclusive Dharmas, in the inconceivable Buddha Dharma, in a Tathāgata’s realm that has neither middle nor sides, in entering a Tathāgata’s immeasurable state, and in achieving the holy fruit. 
He has faith in all Bodhisattva actions and all teachings on the wisdom ground of Tathāgatas. 
Compassion and Lovingkindness     “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva thinks, ‘The true Dharma of Buddhas is in nirvāṇa, and it is profound, quiet, untainted, immeasurable, and vast. It enables one to see the emptiness of dharmas and liberates one from one’s attachment to their appearances and one’s wish for rebirth. However, ordinary beings, shrouded by ignorance, embrace the wrong views. 
Their minds never discard stinginess and jealousy, and they create the causes and conditions for repeated birth and death through the six life-journeys. The karmas done by their greed, anger, and ignorance increase day and night. The wind of their anger blows on the fire of their consciousnesses, and their karmas accord with their inverted views. The stream of their desire, existence, ignorance, and wrong views waters the seeds of their consciousnesses—ālaya consciousness, manas consciousness, and mental consciousness—which germinate buds of suffering in the Three Realms of Existence. 
Each sentient being is born with name and form, which develop the six_faculties. Contact of these faculties with their corresponding objects produces sensory reception. sensory experiences spark love of sense objects. Growing love leads to grasping, and grasping fuels the karmic force for being. 
“‘However, each sentient being, as an aggregate of suffering, is empty, without a self with its belongings. It has no doer, no recipient, no perceiver, and no knower, like a plant or stone wall, and like a reflection. 
However, each suffering sentient being neither perceives nor knows its state.’     “This Bodhisattva sees sentient beings living in suffering, unable to escape, so he elicits great compassion with radiant wisdom. 
He thinks, ‘I should rescue these sentient beings and put them in a peaceful and joyful place.’ Then he elicits great lovingkindness with radiant wisdom. 
Relinquishment     “Buddha-Son, as this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abides on the first ground with a profound mind, he follows his great lovingkindness and great compassion, and never begrudges anything. 
Seeking to acquire the great wisdom of a Buddha, he can give away everything as alms, such as grain and warehouses; gold, silver, jewels, pearls, aquamarine, conch shells, jade, corals, precious collectibles, and ornaments, including necklaces; elephants, horses, and vehicles; cities, villages, gardens, and mansions; wives, retinues, slaves and servants, men and women, and people; even his head, eyes, hands, feet, bone marrow, and other body parts. He gives them all away as alms without begrudging them because he seeks to acquire the great wisdom of a Buddha. This is called achieving great relinquishment  on the first ground. 
Tirelessness     “Buddha-Son, out of lovingkindness, compassion, and generosity, to rescue all sentient beings, this Bodhisattva tirelessly does worldly and supra-worldly things to benefit them. Thus he acquires the tireless mind. 
Wisdom-knowledge, Worldly Knowledge     “With a tireless mind, he is not too timid to study scriptural texts. 
Without timidity, he acquires wisdom-knowledge from scriptural texts. 
With wisdom-knowledge, he determines what he should or should not do for sentient beings of high, middling, and low capacities, according to their needs, abilities, and backgrounds. Thus this Bodhisattva acquires worldly knowledge. 
A Sense of Shame and Dishonor, The Power of Persistence     “With worldly knowledge, knowing the right time and measure, he adorns himself with a sense of shame and dishonor, as he trains to benefit himself and others. Thus he fully develops a sense of shame and dishonor. Then he diligently trains to transcend the world, never to regress or digress from his path. Thus he acquires the power of persistence. 
Making Offerings to Buddhas, Carrying Out Their Teachings     “With the power of persistence, he diligently makes offerings to Buddhas and carries out Their teachings. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva thus acquires these ten dharmas that purify the Bodhisattva grounds. 
**** Training under All Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on the first ground, through the power of his great vows, comes to see many Buddhas: 
hundreds of Buddhas, thousands of Buddhas, hundreds of thousands of Buddha, koṭis of Buddhas, hundreds of koṭis of Buddhas, thousands of koṭis of Buddhas, hundreds of thousands of koṭis of Buddhas. koṭis of nayutas of Buddhas, hundreds of koṭis of nayutas of Buddhas, thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Buddhas, and even hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Buddhas. 
“With a magnanimous and profound mind, he reveres, honors, and attends all Buddhas, and makes offerings to Them. He offers Them life-supporting things, including clothing, food and drink, beds and bedding, and medicine. He also makes these offerings to all monks. Then he transfers his roots of goodness to his attaining the unsurpassed bodhi. 
“Buddha-Son, because he makes offerings to Buddhas, this Bodhisattva acquires skillful means to teach and transform sentient beings. Of the Four Drawing-in_Dharmas , he mainly employs the first two, almsgiving and loving words, to draw in sentient beings. 
He has faith in and understanding of the last two, but his practice of them is not yet proficient. 
Of the ten_pāramitās, he mainly practices the first pāramitā, the almsgiving pāramitā . 
It is not that he refuses to practice the other nine pāramitās, but that he practices them according to his ability and at his discretion. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva makes offerings to Buddhas, and teaches and transforms sentient beings, as he trains to purify this ground. 
Buddha-Son, as an analogy, a goldsmith who is skilled in refining gold fires the gold time and again. More and more, the gold becomes lustrous, pure, soft, and usable. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva makes offerings to Buddhas, and teaches and transforms sentient beings, in order to purify the ground. As he transfers all his roots of goodness to his acquiring  the overall wisdom-knowledge, they become more and more radiant, pure, gentle, and capable. 
**** Preparing for All Ten Grounds **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abiding on the first ground should tirelessly ask Buddhas,  Bodhisattvas, and beneficent learned friends about the features and fruit of the first ground because he wishes to complete his training on this ground. 
He should also tirelessly ask them about the features and fruit of each of the next nine grounds because he wishes to complete his training on all ten grounds. 
For each ground, this Bodhisattva should know its hindrances and their remedy, its formation and destruction, its features and fruit, its purity, and his arrival and departure. He should know how to progress from one ground to the next, the right or wrong place of each ground, the excellent wisdom developed on each ground,  each ground is a stage of no regress, how to purify and cultivate all these grounds, and how finally to enter the wisdom ground of Tathāgatas. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva’s wisdom-knowledge of the features of each ground is uninterrupted, from the first through tenth grounds. 
Because of the radiance of his wisdom developed on all Bodhisattva grounds, he acquires the radiance of Tathāgata wisdom. 
“Buddha-Son, suppose a wise merchant leader plans to take a group of merchants to a big city. Before they set off, he asks about the roads, their advantages and disadvantages, the safety and dangers of the stops on the way, and the faults of turning back. He then prepares for the journey accordingly. 
Buddha-Son, before they set off, that merchant leader already knows all the safe and treacherous things on the journey. He ponders and plans the journey with wisdom, and gathers the needed provisions. He then takes the group safely to the great city. Thus he and his companions are free from anxiety and distress. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva is like that merchant leader. Though abiding on the first ground, he knows well how to remove the hindrances on all Bodhisattva grounds, and how to purify these grounds, in order to ascend to the wisdom ground of Tathāgatas. Then, equipped with great merit and wisdom as provisions, he takes all sentient beings across the treacherous wilderness of repeated birth and death to arrive safely in the city of sarvajña. Thus he and sentient beings do not undergo tribulations. 
Therefore, a Bodhisattva should diligently do excellent pure karmas on all grounds, in order to enter the wisdom ground of Tathāgatas. 
“Buddha-Son, this is a brief description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva training on the first ground. An extensive explanation would include immeasurable, boundless hundreds of thousands of asaṁkhyeyas of different things. 
**** Becoming the King of Jambudvīpa **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abiding on the first ground usually becomes the king of Jambudvīpa . Noble and commanding, he protects the true Dharma. He gives great alms to draw in sentient beings. He excels in removing sentient beings’ stinginess by endlessly giving them great alms. 
As he does good karmas, such as almsgiving, loving words, beneficial actions, and collaborative work , he constantly thinks of the Buddha, the Dharma, the Saṅgha, Bodhisattva companions, Bodhisattva actions, the pāramitās, the Bodhisattva grounds, the Ten Powers, the Four Fearlessnesses, and the Eighteen Exclusive Dharmas, and even of acquiring sarvajña-jñāna, the knowledge of all knowledge. 
“He thinks, ‘Among all sentient beings, I should be excellent, especially excellent; wonderful, especially wonderful; superb, especially superb. To all sentient beings, I should be leader, guide, general, and teacher. I should even be the reliance for those who seek the knowledge of all knowledge.’     “If this Bodhisattva wishes to renounce family life in order to make energetic progress in learning the Buddha Dharma, he can relinquish his wife and family life, and discard the five desires, to head for bodhi, following the teachings of Tathāgatas. 
After renouncing family life, if he makes energetic progress, in one thought he enters 100 samādhis, sees 100 Buddhas, and knows the spiritual power of 100 Buddhas. He can move, visit, and illuminate 100 Buddha Lands, and teach sentient beings in 100 Buddha Lands. He can live for 100 kalpas and know all things in 100 past and future kalpas. He can enter the Illumination Door of One Hundred Dharmas. 
It cannot be known by figuring for 100, 1,000, or 100,000 kalpas, or even 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas.” **** Summarizing Stanzas **** Then, to restate his meaning, Vajra Store Bodhisattva spoke in verse: 
Suppose someone accumulates myriads of goodness, Does all good dharmas, Makes offerings to the one honored by gods and humans, And follows the path of lovingkindness and compassion. With great faith and understanding, And pure aspirations, Seeking to acquire Buddha wisdom, He activates the unsurpassed bodhi mind. 
To acquire the power of all wisdom-knowledge And fearlessness, To master the Dharma of Buddhas And rescue all sentient beings, To acquire great lovingkindness and compassion And turn the superb Dharma wheel, and To adorn and purify all Buddha Lands, He activates the unsurpassed bodhi mind. 
In one thought he knows everything in the past, present, and future, Without making differentiations. 
But he can indicate to the world The differences of time And explain how to acquire All the excellent merits adorning Buddhas. The great bodhi mind is As vast as the domain of space. 
It is led by compassion and ruled by wisdom, And assisted by skillful means. With pure faith and understanding, Through the immeasurable power of Tathāgatas, When the hindrance-free wisdom arises, Without anyone’s help, one attains self-realization Equal to that of Tathāgatas. 
As soon as a Buddha-son activates This wonderful precious mind, He transcends the ground of ordinary beings And enters the place walked by Buddhas. He is born into the Tathāgata family, Acquiring a stainless family name. He will definitely attain the unsurpassed bodhi Equal to that of Buddhas. 
He has much joy and delight, As well as much pure faith. With the mind of bold valor And the mind of exuberance, He shuns aggression, Spite, and anger. With respect, uprightness, and a sense of shame, He protects  his faculties. He aspires to rescue all sentient beings in the world And to acquire all wisdom-knowledge. 
As soon as he enters the first Bodhisattva ground, He discards five fears: Inability to survive, a bad name, death, The evil life-paths, and the overwhelming presence of multitudes. 
Discarding his fixation on having a self With its belongings, This Buddha-son Is free from fears. 
Eliciting great lovingkindness and compassion, With faith and reverence, And the virtue of knowing shame and dishonor, He does good dharmas day and night. 
He appreciates the benefits of the Dharma And loathes the bondage of desires. He ponders the Dharma he has heard And shuns acts driven by grasping and attachment. 
Never coveting benefits or worship, He only delights in attaining Buddha bodhi. Seeking Buddha bodhi single-mindedly, He is fully focused, without second thoughts. 
He practices the pāramitās And shuns sycophancy and deceit. He trains according to the teachings And abides in truthful words. 
He never tarnishes the Buddha family, Nor does he abandon the Bodhisattva precepts. He does not enjoy worldly matters But seeks to benefit the world. 
As he tirelessly does good, He seeks the excellent path. The good dharmas he does Accord with the meaning of merit. 
Constantly making great vows, He vows to see Buddhas, To protect and uphold the Dharma of Buddhas, And to follow Their great path. 
Constantly making great vows, He vows to undergo the supreme training, To bring sentient beings to  maturity, And to adorn and purify Buddha Lands. 
He wishes that Buddha-sons in All Buddha Lands Have the one mind of equality, That their endeavor never goes to waste, And that they attain true enlightenment simultaneously  on the tips of all hairs . 
Such great vows are Immeasurable and boundless, as endless as The domain of space, the realm of sentient beings, The realm of dharmas, the realm of nirvāṇa, The appearance of Buddhas in all worlds, The realm of Tathāgata wisdom, and the realm of one’s mental objects. 
“My vows would end only if Tathāgata wisdom And the three kinds of changes ended. 
As they have no end, So my vows have no end.” Having made such great vows, He acquires the gentle mind and the compliant mind. 
He thus has faith in the merits adorning Buddhas. Observing the suffering of sentient beings, He realizes that everything arises through causes and conditions. He then elicits lovingkindness and compassion  “These suffering sentient beings I now should rescue.” To these sentient beings, He gives all kinds of alms, Giving away his kingship and treasures; Elephants, horses, and vehicles; His head, eyes, hands, and feet; Even his body, blood, and flesh. He can give away everything as alms Without anxiety or regret. 
He seeks wisdom-knowledge from scriptural texts With a tireless mind. He excels in understanding their meanings And in following the worldly ways. As he adorns himself with a sense of shame and dishonor His training becomes more solid. He reveres and honors innumerable Buddhas, And makes offerings to Them all. 
As he trains in this way tirelessly Day and night, His roots of goodness become radiant and pure, Like genuine gold refined by fire. 
Abiding on this ground, This Bodhisattva prepares for his training on all ten grounds. His spiritual training has no hindrance And continues without interruption. 
As an analogy, a great merchant leader, To benefit his group of merchants, Asks about the safety and treachery of the roads, In order to lead the group safely to a great city. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on the first ground Should know to do the same, In order to arrive at the tenth ground, Boldly valiant and hindrance free. Abiding on the first ground, A Bodhisattva usually becomes a king who does great meritorious deeds. He transforms sentient beings by giving them the Dharma With lovingkindness and without harm. 
He rules the continent of Jambudvīpa And transforms sentient beings everywhere, Teaching them to give alms And to seek Buddha wisdom. 
Seeking the supreme path, He relinquishes his kingship And boldly trains In accordance with the Buddha Dharma. He then enters 100 samādhis, Sees 100 Buddhas, Moves 100 worlds, And illuminates 100 worlds. He transforms sentient beings in 100 worlds, Enters the Illumination Door of One Hundred Dharmas, And knows all things in 100 past and future kalpas. He manifests 100 bodies, Each body manifesting 100 Bodhisattvas as its retinue. 
Through the power of his vows, What he can do far exceeds these things and is immeasurable. 
I have described  only briefly In my explanation of the meaning of this ground. An extensive explanation Cannot be finished in a koṭi kalpas. 
The supreme Bodhisattva Way Benefits all sentient beings. Thus I have finished describing The first ground. 
*** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 34 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  *** When Bodhisattvas heard  This superb and wonderful ground , Their minds were purified, And they were filled with joy. 
They rose from their seats, Jumped up into the open sky, And showered down wonderful flowers. They praised in unison: “Very good! 
Vajra Store, The fearless one with great wisdom, Has well expounded the training of A Bodhisattva on this ground.” Liberation Moon Bodhisattva, Knowing that this multitude had pure minds and Hoped to hear the second ground, Requested Vajra Store Bodhisattva, “I pray that the one with great wisdom Will expound the second ground, which All Buddha-sons would like to hear.” **** Cultivating Ten Profound Minds **** Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva told Liberation Moon Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, after a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has completed his training on the first ground, if he wishes to enter the second ground, the Taint-Free Ground , he should cultivate ten profound minds. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the magnanimous mind. With these ten minds, this Bodhisattva enters the second ground. 
**** The Ten Good Karmas **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this Taint-Free Ground naturally never kills sentient beings. He does not stock weaponry, such as knives and clubs, nor does he harbor hatred. He has a sense of shame and dishonor. Kind and forgiving, he has lovingkindness for all sentient beings, and wants to benefit them. 
This Bodhisattva does not, out of malice, distress sentient beings, much less intentionally kill them, knowing that they are sentient beings. 
“He naturally never steals anything. This Bodhisattva is content with his own assets. With lovingkindness and forgivingness toward others, he never raids or damages others’ things. 
When he sees others’ things, he never thinks of stealing them. He does not take even a blade grass not given to him, much less life-supporting things. 
This Bodhisattva is satisfied with his own wife and never pursues the wife of another. He does not even lust for his wife or concubines, or for women under his protection, betrothed to his relatives, or protected by the law, much less actually have sex , much less in a perverted way. “He naturally never lies. 
This Bodhisattva always speaks truthful and timely words. He does not lie even in his dreams. “He naturally never speaks divisive words. 
This Bodhisattva does not want to divide, distress, or harm sentient beings. He does not say such words to that person to damage this person, nor does he speak such words to this person to damage that person. He protects a relationship, not letting it break, and prevents a broken relationship from getting worse. He does not wish to divide people, nor does he speak divisive words, true or false. 
“He naturally never speaks abusive words, such as vicious words, rude words, hurtful words, anger-provoking words, overtly abusive words, covertly abusive words, coarse words, vulgar words, distasteful words, displeasing words, angry words, heart-burning words, feud-forming words, heated words, unlovely words, unpleasant words, and words that harm others and hence himself. Discarding such abusive words, he always speaks nurturing words, gentle words, enjoyable words, pleasant words, joyful words, heart-capturing words, elegant words, popular enjoyable words, popular pleasant words, and inspiring words. “He naturally never speaks suggestive words. 
This Bodhisattva delights in carefully chosen words, timely words, truthful words, meaningful words, Dharma words, sensible words, cogent words, and well-considered decisive words. This Bodhisattva carefully watches himself even when he jokes and laughs, to avoid speaking meaningless words.     “He naturally has no greed. 
This Bodhisattva has no greed for others’ assets or life-supporting things. He neither wishes for nor seeks them. 
“He naturally has no anger. For all sentient beings, this Bodhisattva always elicits the loving-kind mind, the beneficial mind, the compassionate mind, the joyful mind, the nurturing mind, and the receptive mind. He forever discards anger, spite, and irascibility, and always takes appropriate actions to benefit others with lovingkindness. “He naturally discards the wrong views. 
A Bodhisattva walking the right path neither practices divination nor accepts evil precepts. His mind and views are upright, free from deceit and sycophancy. He has firm faith in the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva protects and upholds the ten_good karmas without interruption. He thinks, ‘Sentient beings go down the evil lifepaths because they have done the ten_evil_karmas. 
Therefore, I should do the right training and persuade others to do the same. 
Because it is utterly wrong for one to tell others to do the right training while unwilling to do so oneself.’ **** The Three Vehicles on the Path of the Ten Good Karmas **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva next thinks, ‘Taking the path of the ten evil karmas causes sentient beings to be reborn as hell-dwellers, animals, or hungry ghosts. 
Taking the path of the ten good karmas causes them to be reborn as humans or gods, including gods in the highest form heaven.’     “‘If those who follow the path of the ten good karmas with high-grade purity have narrow and lowly minds, fear rebirth in the Three_Realms_of Existence, lack compassion for sentient beings, and learn  by hearing it, they are called riders of the Voice-Hearer_Vehicle. 
If those who follow the path of the ten good karmas with high-grade purity do so without being taught by others, lack compassion for sentient beings, lack skillful means for delivering them, and realize the profound principle of causality, they are called riders of the Pratyekabuddha Vehicle. 
If those who follow the path of the ten good karmas with high-grade purity have a magnanimous mind, compassion, and skillful means, make great vows, seek the great wisdom of Buddhas, purify and cultivate all Bodhisattva grounds, practice all pāramitās, and never abandon sentient beings, they  will complete wide-ranging Bodhisattva actions. 
Because they have achieved all kinds of purity, they will eventually acquire the Ten_Powers and the Four_Fearlessnesses , and master the entire Buddha Dharma. 
Therefore, I should do the ten good karmas to achieve purity in everything. 
They are the skillful means a Bodhisattva should learn.’ **** Requitals for the Ten Evil Karmas **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva next thinks, ‘Doing the ten evil karmas can cause one to be reborn as a hell-dweller as a severe requital, an animal as a moderate requital, or a hungry ghost as a minor requital.’     “The sin of killing can cause a sentient being to be reborn as a helldweller, an animal, or a hungry ghost. 
If reborn as a human, he will receive two requitals, a short lifespan and sickliness. 
“The sin of stealing can cause a sentient being to go down any of the three evil life-paths. 
If reborn as a human, he will receive two requitals, poverty and no command of joint assets. 
“The sin of sexual misconduct can cause a sentient being to go down any of the three evil life-paths. 
If reborn as a human, he will receive two requitals, an unfaithful wife and an unruly retinue. 
“The sin of lying can cause a sentient being to go down any of the three evil life-paths. 
If reborn as a human, he will receive two requitals, being slandered and being deceived. 
“The sin of divisive speech can cause a sentient being to go down any of the three evil life-paths. 
If reborn as a human, he will receive two requitals, a disloyal retinue and vile relatives. 
“The sin of abusive speech can cause a sentient being to go down any of the three evil life-paths. 
If reborn as a human, he will receive two requitals, hearing evil sounds and speaking contentious words. 
“The sin of suggestive speech can cause a sentient being to go down any of the three evil life-paths. 
If reborn as a human, he will receive two requitals, rejection of his words and incomprehensibility of his words. 
“The sin of greed can cause a sentient being to go down any of the three evil life-paths. 
If reborn as a human, he will receive two requitals, discontentment and insatiable desire. 
“The sin of anger can cause a sentient being to go down any of the three evil life-paths. 
If reborn as a human, he will receive two requitals, being criticized by others and being incriminated by others. 
“The sin of holding the wrong views can cause a sentient being to go down any of the three evil life-paths. 
If reborn as a human, he will receive two requitals, a crooked mind and rebirth into a family that holds the wrong views. 
“Buddha-Son, the path of the ten evil karmas leads to an immeasurable and boundless pile of suffering. Therefore, this Bodhisattva thinks, ‘I should shun this path and take the path of the ten good karmas, which is like a Dharma garden. 
I will enjoy my stay there and persuade others to stay there as well.’ **** Resolved to Transform Sentient Beings **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has lovingkindness, compassion, and sympathy for all sentient beings and is resolved to benefit them and give them peace and joy. He regards them as himself, and wants to draw them into the Dharma and to be their protector, teacher, and great teacher. He thinks, ‘Sentient beings are pitiable because they are trapped in a dense forest of wrong views, evil wisdom, evil desires, and evil paths. 
I should enable them to abide in the right views and follow the right path.’     “He next thinks, ‘All sentient beings differentiate between self and others. They harm one another and fight with ceaseless fiery anger. 
I should enable them to abide in the unsurpassed great lovingkindness.’     “He next thinks, ‘All sentient beings covet and grasp insatiably. They seek wealth and benefits through an evil livelihood. 
I should enable them to make a right livelihood using body, voice, and mind in a pure way. “He next thinks, ‘Sentient beings are driven by the three poisons , which inflame their other afflictions. They do not seek to acquire the skillful means to achieve liberation. 
I should enable them to extinguish the massive fire of their afflictions and to settle themselves in the coolness of nirvāṇa.’     “He next thinks, ‘Sentient beings, blinded by delusion and wrong views like a thick film , have entered a dense forest of darkness, far from the radiance of their innate wisdom. They tread treacherous paths in wilderness and hold various wrong views. 
I should enable them to acquire the hindrancefree pure wisdom-eye and to know the true reality of dharmas without being taught by others.’     “He next thinks, ‘Taking the treacherous path of birth and death, sentient beings may go down the evil life-paths, reborn as hell-dwellers, animals, or hungry ghosts. Fallen into the web of wrong views and lost in the dense forest of delusion, they follow evil paths and take evil actions. 
Like the blind without a guiding teacher, they mistake the entrance for the exit and enter the domain of māras. Captured by bandits, they follow the mind of māras and go against the intent of Buddhas. 
I should rescue them from such tribulations and enable them to settle down in the fearless city of  the overall wisdom-knowledge.’     “He next thinks, ‘Swallowed by torrential waters, sentient beings linger in streams of desire, existence, ignorance, and wrong views. In the vortex of birth and death, they drift in the turbulent river of love, unable to make observations. 
Seized by self-view, which is like a rakṣasa who wants them to remain forever in the dense forest of love and desire, they follow their perception of desire, anger, and malice. 
Deeply attached to the things they love, each of them settles down on its mountain of arrogance and lives in its village of the six faculties. 
They have no one to rescue them. 
I should activate my great mind of compassion and rescue them with my roots_of_goodness, enabling them to end their tribulations, to leave impurity for purity, and to abide on the treasure continent of all wisdom-knowledge.’     “He next thinks, ‘Sentient beings live in a prison world of pain and distress. Filled with love and hate, they have anxiety and fear. Bound by heavy chains of love and desire, lost in the dense forest of ignorance, they are repeatedly reborn in the Three Realms of Existence, unable to escape on their own. 
I should enable them to transcend the Three Realms of Existence and to abide in the hindrance-free great nirvāṇa.’     “He next thinks, ‘Sentient beings are fixated on having a self, and none of them seeks to leave its cave of the five_aggregates. Each equipped with the six_faculties, they take the four inverted actions. Each bound to the four domains , which are like venomous snakes, and driven by the five aggregates, which are like bandits, they undergo immeasurable suffering. 
I should enable them to abide in the supreme attachment-free place, the hindrance-free supreme nirvāṇa.’     “He next thinks, ‘Sentient beings have narrow and lowly minds, and fear the highest wisdom path. If they wish to leave the world, they prefer the VoiceHearer Vehicle or the Pratyekabuddha Vehicle. 
I should enable them to abide in the vast Buddha Dharma and vast wisdom.’     “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva protects the Bodhisattva precepts in this way and excels in cultivating the mind of lovingkindness and compassion. 
**** Training under All Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this Taint-Free Ground, through the power of his vows, comes to see many Buddhas: 
hundreds of Buddhas, thousands of Buddhas, hundreds and thousands of Buddhas, koṭis of Buddhas, hundreds of koṭis of Buddhas, thousands of koṭis of Buddhas, hundreds of thousands of koṭis of Buddhas, and even hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Buddhas. 
With a magnanimous and profound mind, he reveres, honors, and attends all Buddhas, and makes offerings to Them. He offers Them life-supporting things, including clothing, food and drink, beds and bedding, and medicine. He also makes these offerings to all monks. Then he transfers his roots of goodness to his attaining anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
Before every Buddha, he vows to accept and do the ten good karmas until his attainment of bodhi, never to forget or lose them. 
“As an analogy, genuine gold refined with alum becomes more lustrous and pure. 
Because for 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas he shuns stinginess, jealousy, and the taint of violating the precepts, this Bodhisattva fully achieves purity in almsgiving and observance of precepts. 
“Buddha-Son, of the Four Drawing-in Dharmas , this Bodhisattva employs loving words more than the other three dharmas. 
Of the ten_pāramitās, he practices the second pāramitā, the precept pāramitā , more than the other nine pāramitās. 
It is not that he refuses to practice them, but that he practices them according to his ability and at his discretion. 
**** Becoming a Wheel-Turning King **** “Buddha-Son, this is a brief description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva training on the second ground, the Taint-Free Ground. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on this ground usually becomes a Wheel-Turning_King, a great Dharma master equipped with the seven precious things. He has the power to enable sentient beings to stop their stinginess, greed, and violation of the precepts, and has the skillful means to enable them to set off on the path of the ten good karmas. 
He is a great almsgiver who gives alms endlessly. 
As he carries out almsgiving, loving words, beneficial actions, and collaborative work , he constantly thinks of the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha, and even of acquiring sarvajña-jñāna, the knowledge of all knowledge. 
“He thinks, ‘Among all sentient beings, I should be excellent, especially excellent; wonderful, especially wonderful; superb, especially superb. To all sentient beings, I should be leader, guide, general, and teacher. I should even be the reliance for those who seek the knowledge of all knowledge.’     “If this Bodhisattva wishes to renounce family life in order to make energetic progress, he can relinquish his wife and family, and discard the five desires. 
After renouncing family life, if he makes energetic progress, in one thought he enters 1,000 samādhis, sees 1,000 Buddhas, and knows the spiritual power of 1,000 Buddhas. He can move 1,000 Buddha Lands and manifest 1,000 bodies. Each body can manifest 1,000 Bodhisattvas as its retinue. 
It cannot be known by figuring for 100, 1,000, or 100,000 kalpas, or even 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas. 
**** Summarizing Stanzas **** Then, to restate his meaning, Vajra Store Bodhisattva spoke in verse: Upright, gentle, and capable, With tameness, quietness, and benevolence, This Bodhisattva cultivates the magnanimous mind to transcend repeated birth and death, And, with the ten profound minds, he enters the second ground. 
Abiding on this ground, he acquires merit by observing the precepts, Shunning killing and harming , Stealing, and sexual misconduct, As well as using abusive, divisive, and suggestive speech. 
Not greedy for material wealth, he elicits lovingkindness and compassion. Walking the right path with an upright mind, he is never deceitful or sycophantic. Having destroyed his arrogance, he is always gentle. He acts in accordance with the Dharma, never abandoning self restraint. 
As hell-dwellers and animals undergo myriads of suffering, Hungry ghosts spew blazing flames. Knowing that their suffering is caused by their sins, he thinks, “I should not follow their paths but should abide in the true Dharma. 
I will be reborn at will as a human, And even be reborn in the highest heaven to enjoy the bliss of meditation. Riders of the Voice-Hearer Vehicle, the Pratyekabuddha Vehicle, and the Buddha Vehicle Achieve their goals because they take the path of the ten good karmas.” Pondering in this way, he exercises self-restraint, Observes the precepts, and teaches others to do the same. 
His sight of sentient beings in suffering Increases his great compassion. 
“Ordinary beings and the foolish do not have the right understanding, But harbor hatred, seek dispute, And grasp desire objects, never satiated. I should enable them to eradicate the three poisons. 
Shrouded by the darkness of delusion, They have fallen into the web of wrong views on the treacherous path, And are imprisoned in the cage of birth and death. I should enable them to annihilate the māras like thieves. 
They are drifting and sinking in the four torrential flows, Undergoing immeasurable suffering in the Three Realms of Existence, And imagining that they have a self residing in the five aggregates like a house. I should diligently train in accordance with the Dharma in order to deliver them. 
They seek to transcend the Three Realms of Existence But choose not to seek the supreme Buddha wisdom because of their lowly minds. 
I should make energetic progress tirelessly And enable them to ride the Mahāyāna.” A Bodhisattva abiding on this ground accumulates merit. He sees innumerable Buddhas and makes offerings to Them all. After training for koṭis of kalpas, his mind becomes more and more radiant, Like genuine gold refined by strong substances. 
A Buddha-son abiding on the second ground usually becomes a Wheel Turning King. He universally transforms sentient beings by teaching them to do the ten good karmas. He trains to do all good dharmas In order to acquire the Ten Powers to rescue all in the world. 
If he wishes to abandon his kingship and wealth, He can renounce family life to follow the Buddha Dharma. Making energetic progress with bold valor, in one thought He enters 1,000 samādhis and sees 1,000 Buddhas. 
A Bodhisattva on this ground can display All kinds of transcendental powers. Through the power of his vows, what he can do far exceeds these things As he delivers sentient beings with immeasurable ease. 
He who benefits all in the world Does the supreme Bodhisattva training. Thus I have described the virtues of the second ground To Buddha-sons. 
**** The Third Ground, the Radiant Ground **** When Buddha-sons heard the training on this ground , They realized that the state of a Bodhisattva was inconceivable. Reverent and joyful, They showered flowers down from the sky as an offering. They praised : “Very good! 
The wonderful trainings of Bodhisattvas are Really the same, without differences. To benefit sentient beings, Your explanations are the purest. 
We pray that the one to whom gods and humans make offerings Will expound the third ground. We hope that you will explain completely The wisdom-guided karmas that accord with the Dharma. 
We pray that you will expound the Dharma taught by the Buddha, such as almsgiving, observance of precepts, Endurance of adversity, energetic progress, meditation, and development of wisdom, As well as skillful means and the path of lovingkindness and compassion, And the pure action vows of a Buddha.” Then Liberation Moon requested, “Vajra Store, the fearless great one, I pray that you will explain how one can enter the third ground, And that you will reveal the virtues of such a one with a gentle mind.” **** Cultivating Ten Profound Minds **** Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva told Liberation Moon Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, after a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has purified the second ground, if he wishes to enter the third ground, the Radiant Ground , he should cultivate ten profound minds. 
What are these ten? 
With these ten minds, this Bodhisattva enters the third ground. 
**** Observing the True Reality of Saṁskṛta Dharmas **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abiding on the third ground observes the true reality of all saṁskṛta dharmas. 
He sees they are processes that are impermanent, painful, impure, unstable, deteriorating, and transient; undergoing birth and death from moment to moment; neither born in the past nor going to the future, nor abiding in the present. 
He observes that a sentient being is such a process, without reliance or rescue, and lives in anxiety, sorrow, pain, and distress. Fettered by love and hate, it experiences increasing sorrow without a respite. In the blazing fire of greed, anger, and delusion, it is bound by its afflictions day and night, though they are illusions. 
“Based on these observations, he loathes saṁskṛta dharmas. He seeks Buddha wisdom because he sees that Buddha wisdom is inconceivable, immeasurable, unexcelled, unadulterated, and hard to acquire. It frees one from anxiety and distress, leads one on the path of no regress to the city of fearlessness, and can rescue innumerable suffering sentient beings. 
**** Ten Reasons for Eliciting Compassion **** “This Bodhisattva, who has seen the immeasurable benefits of Tathāgata wisdom and the immeasurable faults of saṁskṛta dharmas, elicits compassion for sentient beings for ten reasons. 
What are these ten? 
He activates the mind of compassion because he sees that  sentient beings have no skillful means to achieve liberation. These are the ten. 
“This Bodhisattva, who sees the immeasurable suffering in the realm of sentient beings, makes energetic progress . He thinks, ‘I should rescue, liberate, purify, and deliver these sentient beings. 
I should put them in a good place and enable them to live in peace and joy, to have the right knowledge and views, to tame their minds, and to attain nirvāṇa.’     “This Bodhisattva, who loathes saṁskṛta dharmas and has compassion for sentient beings, knows the excellent benefits of  the knowledge of all knowledge. Wishing to rely on Tathāgata wisdom to deliver sentient beings, he thinks, ‘These sentient beings are in horrendous suffering because of their afflictions. What are the skillful means to rescue them and enable them to abide in the ultimate bliss of nirvāṇa?’     “He next thinks, ‘The skillful means to enable sentient beings to abide in nirvāṇa are not apart from the hindrance-free liberation wisdom. 
The hindrancefree liberation wisdom is not apart from the realization of the true reality of dharmas. 
The realization of the true reality of dharmas is not apart from the radiant wisdom that dharmas have no birth and no action. The radiant wisdom that dharmas have no birth and no action is not apart from the wisdom arising from skillfully chosen observations during meditation. 
The wisdom arising from skillfully chosen observations during meditation is not apart from hearing much of the Dharma.’ **** Hearing the Dharma and Training Accordingly **** “Having learned from his observations, this Bodhisattva seeks and learns the Dharma with double diligence. Day and night, he delights in hearing the Dharma. He enjoys, treasures, follows, ponders, understands, relies on, complies with, abides in, and practices the Dharma. 
As this Bodhisattva diligently seeks the Buddha Dharma, he never begrudges his wealth or treasures. He does not see anything as valuable or hard to acquire, but thinks that a Dharma expounder is hard to encounter. 
Therefore, seeking the Buddha Dharma, this Bodhisattva can give away as alms all his internal and external wealth. 
There is no reverence that he cannot show, no arrogance that he cannot discard, no endeavor that he cannot undertake, and no toil that he cannot accept. 
If he hears a stanza of the Dharma never heard before, his great joy surpasses the joy of acquiring treasures that fill the Three-Thousand_Large_Thousandfold_World, and exceeds the joy of becoming a Wheel-Turning King. 
“Why? Because if he hears a stanza of the Dharma never heard before, he can purify his Bodhisattva training. This benefit surpasses that of becoming the god-king Śakra, who lives for countless hundreds of thousands of kalpas. 
Suppose someone says to him, ‘I have a Dharma sentence spoken by the Buddha, which can purify your Bodhisattva training. 
If you jump into a pit of fire to undergo tremendous pain, I will give it to you.’ This Bodhisattva thinks, ‘If I could purify my Bodhisattva training with a Dharma sentence spoken by the Buddha, in order to receive it in person, I would even jump from a Brahma heaven down into a massive fire that fills the Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World. Why should I be deterred by a pit of fire? 
Seeking the Buddha Dharma, I should accept even all the suffering in hell, not to mention a small pain in the human world.’     “Thus this Bodhisattva makes energetic progress in seeking and learning the Buddha Dharma. He makes observations and trains in accordance with the Dharma he has heard. 
Having heard the Dharma, meditating in an open place, he subdues his mind and thinks, ‘One acquires the Buddha Dharma by training according to its teachings. One cannot achieve purity merely by talking about the Dharma.’ **** Attaining the Four Dhyānas, the Four Samādhis, and the Four Immeasurable Samādhis **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on the Radiant Ground trains in the four dhyānas of the form realm. 
First he discards all evil dharmas of the desire realm, meditates with coarse and fine perceptions, and experiences great joy , as he abides in the first dhyāna. 
Then he discards his coarse and fine perceptions, purifies his focused mind, and experiences exuberant joy , as he abides in the second dhyāna. 
Then he discards the exuberant joy, meditates with right mindfulness, and experiences superb bliss throughout his body, as he abides in the third dhyāna. 
Then he discards the superb bliss, and joy and anxiety, meditates with a pure mind in equability, and experiences neither pain nor pleasure, as he abides in the fourth dhyāna.     “Then he discards all perceptions of form and opposites. 
Without perceptions, he enters the Samādhi of Boundless Space , and abides in it. Then he exits this samādhi, enters the Samādhi of Boundless Consciousness, and abides in it. Then he exits this samādhi, enters the Samādhi of Nothingness, and abides in it. 
Then he exits this samādhi, enters the Samādhi of Neither with Nor without Perception, and abides in it. 
However, training in accordance with the Dharma, he is not attached to his meditation state. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva’s mind follows his lovingkindness, which is immeasurable, vast, and non-dual . It has no enemy or opponent, no hindrance or distress. It pervades everywhere throughout the dharma realm, the domain of space, and the entire world. In the same way his compassion, sympathetic joy, and equability are immeasurable and vast. 
**** Acquiring Transcendental Powers **** “Buddha-Son, such a Bodhisattva has acquired immeasurable transcendental powers. He can move the great earth, manifest his one body as many bodies, and merge them all into one body. 
He can appear or disappear, and pass through cliffs or mountains hindrance free, as if they were the open sky. 
He can sit cross-legged in the open sky and fly away like a bird. 
He can enter into the ground as if it were water; he can walk on the water, as if it were the ground. 
He can emit smoke and flames from his body as does a massive pillar of fire; he can produce water from his body as do clouds. 
He can touch the sun and the moon in the sky with his hands. 
He has such command of his body even in the Brahma World. 
“This Bodhisattva has the god-ear, which is purer than the human ear. He can hear the sounds of gods and humans anywhere, far or near, and even the sounds of insects, such as flies and mosquitoes. “He has telepathic knowledge of sentient beings’ minds. 
If they have greed, he truly knows that they have it. 
If they have discarded their greed, he truly knows that they have discarded it. 
He truly knows their minds, whether they have anger or have discarded it; have delusion or have discarded it; have other afflictions or no other afflictions; have a small mind, a broad mind, a magnanimous mind, or an immeasurable mind; have a restrained mind or an unrestrained mind; have a scattered mind or an organized mind; have a focused mind or an unfocused mind; have a liberated mind or a fettered mind; have an aspiring mind or a retiring mind; have a tainted mind or an untainted mind; have a broad mind or a narrow mind. 
Thus this Bodhisattva has telepathic knowledge of sentient beings’ minds. 
“He has the god-eye, which is purer than the human eye. For every sentient being, he sees its birth and death, its good or evil body, and its good or evil life-path. 
If a sentient being has done evil body karmas, evil voice karmas, or evil mind karmas; has slandered sages or holies; has held the wrong views; or has the causes and conditions for karmas induced by the wrong views, after death it will definitely go down an evil life-path, reborn in hell. 
If a sentient being has done good body karmas, good voice karmas, and good mind karmas; has never slandered sages or holies; has held the right views; or has the causes and conditions for karmas induced by the right views, after death it will definitely go up a good life-path, reborn in heaven. 
Events such as these, this Bodhisattva’s god-eye truly sees. 
“This Bodhisattva can easily enter and exit a dhyāna, samādhi, or samāpatti. However, he will not be driven by the power of his meditation to be reborn . Through the power of his will, he can choose to be reborn where he can train to complete all elements of bodhi. **** Training under All Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on the Radiant Ground, through the power of his vows, comes to see many Buddhas: 
hundreds of Buddhas, thousands of Buddhas, hundreds of thousands of Buddhas, and even hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Buddhas. 
With a magnanimous and profound mind, he reveres, honors, and attends all Buddhas, and makes offerings to Them. He offers Them lifesupporting things, including clothing, food and drink, beds and bedding, and medicine. He also makes these offerings to all monks. Then he transfers his roots of goodness to his attaining anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
“Under every Buddha, he reverently hears the Dharma, upholds it, and does his best to train accordingly. 
He observes all dharmas and sees that they have neither birth nor death, but arise through causes and conditions. 
Then the bondage of the Three Realms of Existence—desire, form, and formless—and the bondage of ignorance become weak. 
By his not accumulating afflictions for 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas, his greed, anger, and delusion end, and his roots of goodness become more radiant and pure. 
“Buddha-Son, when one refines genuine gold by skillful means, its weight does not decrease, but the gold becomes more lustrous and pure. 
Likewise, for a Bodhisattva abiding on this Radiant Ground, because he does not accumulate greed, anger, and delusion, they end, and his roots of goodness become more radiant and pure. 
Also more radiant and pure become his minds, such as the adversity-enduring mind, the gentle mind, the congenial mind, the pleasant mind, the anger-free mind, the unwavering mind, the clear mind, the mind that does not compare high and low, the mind that expects no requital, the mind that requites kindness, the sycophancy-free mind, the deceit-free mind, and the unbiased mind. 
“Of the Four Drawing-in Dharmas , he employs beneficial actions more than the other three dharmas. 
Of the ten pāramitās, he practices the third pāramitā, the endurance pāramitā , more than the other nine pāramitās. 
It is not that he refuses to practice them, but that he practices them according to his ability and at his discretion. 
**** Becoming the God-King of the Second Desire Heaven **** “Buddha-Son, this third ground is called the Radiant Bodhisattva Ground. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on this ground usually becomes the god-king of the Thirtythree_Heavens . He can use skillful means to enable sentient beings to discard their greed. 
As he carries out almsgiving, loving words, beneficial actions, and collaborative work , he constantly thinks of the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha, and even of acquiring sarvajña-jñāna, the knowledge of all knowledge. 
“He thinks, ‘Among all sentient beings, I should be excellent, especially excellent; wonderful, especially wonderful; superb, especially superb. To all sentient beings, I should be leader, guide, general, and teacher. I should even be the reliance for those who seek the knowledge of all knowledge.’     “If he makes energetic progress, in one thought he enters 100,000 samādhis, sees 100,000 Buddhas, and knows the spiritual power of 100,000 Buddhas. He can move 100,000 Buddha Lands and manifest 100,000 bodies. 
It cannot be known by figuring for 100, 1,000, or 100,000 kalpas, or even 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas.” **** Summarizing Stanzas **** Then, to restate his meaning, Vajra Store Bodhisattva spoke in verse: 
Equipped with the pure mind, the abiding mind, the affliction loathing mind, The desire-discarding mind, the no-regress mind, the firm mind, the radiant mind, The valiant mind, the broad mind, and the magnanimous mind, This wise man enters the third ground. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on this Radiant Ground Observes that saṁskṛta dharmas are processes, impermanent and painful, That they are impure, deteriorating, and transient, and That they are fragile, neither coming nor going, nor abiding. 
He observes that saṁskṛta dharmas are like a severe illness That is bound up with anxiety, sorrow, pain, and distress. The blazing fire of the three poisons  Has never died down since time without a beginning. 
He loathes the Three Realms of Existence, completely unattached to them, And seeks without second thoughts Buddha wisdom, Which is unimaginable, inconceivable, and unexcelled, As well as immeasurable, boundless, and free from distress. 
Seeing the benefits of Buddha wisdom, he pities sentient beings Because they are forlorn, without reliance or rescue. Burning in the three poisons, they are in deprivation. Transmigrating in the Three Realms of Existence as if in prison, they undergo suffering. Bound by their afflictions, they are like the eyeless. 
“I should make energetic progress in order to rescue them.” Seeking wisdom in order to benefit sentient beings, He ponders what skillful means can enable them to achieve liberation. 
He realizes that such skillful means are not apart from Tathāgatas’ hindrance-free wisdom, Which arises from the wisdom of the no birth of dharmas, and That this wisdom comes from hearing the Dharma. 
He ponders this to push himself to be assiduous, And hears the Dharma day and night without interruption, Holding the Dharma in the highest esteem. 
In reverence of the Dharma, This Bodhisattva can relinquish all precious things, Such as a kingdom, wealth, and treasures, Wife, retinues, and kingship. 
He does not think that it is hard to relinquish His head, eyes, ears, nose, tongue, and teeth, His hands, feet, bone marrow, heart, blood, and flesh. He thinks that being able to hear the Dharma is the hardest thing. 
Suppose someone says to this Bodhisattva, “If you can throw yourself into a pit of fire, I will give you the Dharma treasures of Buddhas.” He will throw himself into the fire with no fear. 
Even if a fire fills the Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World, He will jump from the Brahma World down into the fire. Seeking the Dharma, he does not think that this pain is too hard to bear, Much less the small pains in the human world. 
From his initial resolve to his attainment of Buddhahood, To hear the Dharma, he can accept all suffering, Even that in Avīci Hell, Not to mention the pains in the human world. 
Having heard the Dharma, he ponders it in the right way And attains the four dhyānas  and the four samādhis , From which arise the four immeasurable samādhis and the five transcendental_powers. However, he will not be reborn under their power. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on this ground sees many Buddhas, To whom he makes offerings and from whom he hears the Dharma. He is resolved to end his afflictions and purify his mind, Like refining gold without losing its substance. 
He usually becomes the god-king of Trayastriṁsa_Heaven . He teaches and transforms innumerable sentient beings, Enabling them to discard greed, abide in goodness, And single-mindedly seek the merits adorning Buddhas. 
If a Buddha-son abiding on this ground makes energetic progress, He enters 100,000 samādhis And sees 100,000 Buddhas well adorned with excellent physical marks. Through the power of his vows, what he can do far exceeds these things. 
These are the features of the superb training of A Bodhisattva abiding on the third ground, Who universally benefits sentient beings. 
*** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 35 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  ***** **** The Fourth Ground, the Flaming Wisdom Ground **** When Buddha-sons heard the great training On this delightful, profound, and excellent ground , With exuberance and delight, They scattered flowers as an offering to the Buddha. 
When such wonderful teachings were expounded, The great earth and ocean moved, And all goddess-daughters with great joy Sang wonderful hymns of praise. 
The god-king of Paranirmita-vaśa-vartin Heaven  rejoiced And showered precious jewels as an offering to the Buddha. He praised, “For my sake the Buddha has appeared in the world To expound the foremost virtuous training. 
The meanings of the grounds explained by such a wise one  Are hard to acquire in 100,000 kalpas. I now have suddenly heard the wonderful Dharma tones That reveal the superb training of Bodhisattvas. 
I pray that the wise one will next expound The higher grounds without omission, In order to benefit all gods and humans. 
All Buddha-sons would be delighted to hear.” Liberation Moon, with his valiant and magnanimous mind, Requested Vajra Store, “Buddha-Son, I pray that you will explain all the features of the training To progress from here to the fourth ground.” **** The Illumination Door of Ten Observations **** Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva told Liberation Moon Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, after a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has purified the third ground, if he wishes to enter the fourth ground, the Flaming Wisdom Ground , he should go through the Illumination Door of Ten Observations. 
What are these ten? 
Through this Illumination Door of Ten Observations, this Bodhisattva enters the fourth ground. 
**** Ten Dharmas to Ripen Wisdom-Knowledge **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this Flaming Wisdom Ground, in order to be born into the Tathāgata family and receive its inner teachings, uses ten dharmas to ripen his wisdom-knowledge. 
What are these ten? 
**** Training to Complete the Thirty-seven Elements of Bodhi **** The Four Abidings of Mindfulness “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this fourth ground practices the Four Abidings of Mindfulness: body, sensory experiences, mind, and dharmas. He systematically observes his body and, with diligence, mindfulness, and understanding, discards his worldly greed and anxiety. 
He systematically observes others’ bodies and, with diligence, mindfulness, and understanding, discards his worldly greed and anxiety. 
He systematically observes both his and others’ bodies and, with diligence, mindfulness, and understanding, discards his worldly greed and anxiety. 
“In the same way he systematically observes his sensory experiences, others’ sensory experiences, and both his and others’ sensory experiences; he systematically observes his mind, others’ minds, and both his and others’ minds; he systematically observes his dharmas, others’ dharmas, and both his and others’ dharmas. With diligence, mindfulness, and understanding, he discards his worldly greed and anxiety. 
The Four Right Endeavors     “This Bodhisattva diligently engages in the Four Right Endeavors. 
He diligently  expands existing goodness. 
Relying on disgust, turning away, and cessation, and settling his mind in equability, he cultivates the root of  his wisdom . 
Relying on disgust, turning away, and cessation, and settling his mind in equability, he develops the power of  his wisdom . 
Relying on disgust, turning away, and cessation, and settling his mind in equability, he trains in  equability. 
The Eightfold Right Path     “This Bodhisattva follows the Eightfold_Right_Path. Relying on disgust, turning away, and cessation, and settling his mind in equability, he trains in  right samādhi. 
“This Bodhisattva does such meritorious training because he never abandons sentient beings; because he is supported by his original vows; because he is led by great compassion; because he is imbued with great lovingkindness; because he seeks to acquire  the knowledge of all knowledge; because he wishes to adorn Buddha Lands; because he seeks to acquire a Tathāgata’s Ten_Powers, Four_Fearlessnesses, and Eighteen_Exclusive_Dharmas, as well as His sublime appearance and voice; because he seeks the supreme path; because he seeks liberation according to the profound Dharma; because he employs skillful means that arise from great wisdom. 
**** Ending All Wrong Views and Making Energetic Progress **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this Flaming Wisdom Ground observes that the wrong views follow from the view that one has an embodied self. 
He observes such fixations as they come and go, and ponders their remediation. He discards the view of a self with its belongings, such as things and places. 
When he sees karmas that are tainted by afflictions and denounced by Tathāgatas, he discards them all. 
When he sees karmas that accord with the Bodhisattva Way and are praised by Tathāgatas, he does them all. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva follows his applied wisdom-knowledge to head for bodhi by training to complete the elements of bodhi. Thus he acquires the nurturing mind, the gentle mind, the tame mind, the mind that benefits others and gives them peace and joy, the unadulterated mind, the mind that seeks supreme training, the mind that seeks supreme wisdom, the mind that rescues all in the world, the mind that respects the virtuous and follows their instructions, and the mind that trains in accordance with the Dharma. 
“This Bodhisattva acknowledges kindness received and knows to requite kindness. His mind is kind, peaceful, pleasant, upright, and gentle, not  like a dense forest. Without arrogance, he accepts instructions with a good grasp of the instructor’s intended meaning. 
This Bodhisattva is accomplished in gentleness, quietness, and endurance of adversity. With such gentleness, quietness, and endurance, on higher grounds he can purify his karmas. 
“As he purposefully trains, he makes energetic progress without rest. His energetic progress is unadulterated, comprehensive, boundless, glowing, unequaled, and indestructible, with no regress. He makes energetic progress in differentiating between the right and wrong paths, and in bringing sentient beings to  maturity. 
This Bodhisattva’s profound mind is pure, and he never loses it. As his understanding  becomes clearer and keener, his roots_of_goodness grow stronger. He discards the filth of the world and shatters his doubts. Completely free from doubts, he is imbued with joy. 
**** Training under All Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this Flaming Wisdom Ground, through the power of his vows, comes to see many Buddhas: 
hundreds of Buddhas, thousands of Buddhas, hundreds and thousands of Buddhas, and even hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Buddhas. 
He reveres, honors, and attends all Buddhas, and makes offerings to Them. He offers Them life-supporting things, including clothing, food and drink, beds and bedding, and medicine. He also makes these offerings to all monks. Then he transfers his roots of goodness to his attaining anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
“Under every Buddha, he reverently hears the Dharma, accepts it, and trains accordingly. 
He renounces family life to train for bodhi in the Dharma of that Buddha. Then he trains for profound faith and understanding for countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of kalpas, enabling his roots of goodness to become more radiant and pure. 
As an analogy, a goldsmith refines genuine gold to make gold ornaments, which are unrivaled by other gold ornaments. 
Likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva on this ground , which are unrivaled by those of Bodhisattvas on lower grounds. 
They are like the pure luster of an extraordinary jewel, which is unrivaled by that of other jewels and impervious to wind or rain. 
Likewise a BodhisattvaMahāsattva on this ground is unrivaled by Bodhisattvas on lower grounds. His attainment can never be destroyed by māras or by his afflictions. 
“Of the Four Drawing-in Dharmas , this Bodhisattva employs collaborative work more than the other three dharmas. 
Of the ten_pāramitās, he practices the fourth pāramitā, the progress pāramitā , more than the other nine pāramitās. 
It is not that he refuses to practice them, but that he practices them according to his ability and at his discretion. 
**** Becoming the God-King of the Third Desire Heaven **** “Buddha-Son, this is a brief description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva training on the fourth ground, the Flaming Wisdom Ground. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on this ground usually becomes the god-king of Yāma Heaven . Using skillful means, he can remove sentient beings’ wrong views, including the view that one has an embodied self, enabling them to abide in the right views. 
Whatever karmas he does, such as almsgiving, loving words, beneficial actions, and collaborative work, he constantly thinks of the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha, and even of acquiring sarvajña-jñāna, the knowledge of all knowledge. 
“He thinks, ‘Among all sentient beings, I should be excellent, especially excellent; wonderful, especially wonderful; superb, especially superb. To all sentient beings, I should be leader, guide, general, and teacher. I should even be the reliance for those who seek the knowledge of all knowledge.’     “If this Bodhisattva makes energetic progress, in one thought he enters a koṭi samādhis, sees a koṭi Buddhas, and knows the spiritual power of a koṭi Buddhas. He can move a koṭi Buddha Lands and manifest a koṭi bodies. 
It cannot be known by figuring for 100, 1,000, or 100,000 kalpas, or even 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas.” **** Summarizing Stanzas **** Then, to restate his meaning, Vajra Store Bodhisattva spoke in verse: 
Having purified the third ground, This Bodhisattva next observes the realm of sentient beings, the dharma realm, The domain of space, the spheres of consciousness, and the Three Realms_of_Existence. 
Spiritually, He is born into the Tathāgata family and will never regress. With indestructible faith in the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha, He observes that dharmas are impermanent and  have no birth. 
He also observes the formation and destruction of the world, and observes that rebirth is caused by karma, And that karma leads to saṁsāra or nirvāṇa. He also observes saṁskṛta processes from their past to their future and observes their ending. Diligently training in this way, he is born into the Buddha family. 
After he has learned from his observations, his lovingkindness and compassion grow stronger. Then he practices the Four Abidings of Mindfulness, Observing his and others’ bodies, sensory experiences, minds, and dharmas, And discards his worldly greed and anxiety. 
He engages in the Four Right Endeavors, Ending evil and expanding goodness. He trains in the Four Ways to Attain Samādhi, cultivates the Five Roots, and develops the Five Powers. He also trains in the Seven Bodhi Factors and follows the Eightfold Right Path. 
Supported by his original vows and led by lovingkindness and compassion, He trains diligently in order to deliver sentient beings. He seeks to acquire the knowledge of all knowledge and adorn Buddha Lands. He remembers a Tathāgata’s Ten Powers, Four Fearlessnesses, and Eighteen Exclusive Dharmas, As well as His sublime appearance and beautiful voice. 
He also seeks the wondrous path to liberation And seeks the great skillful means for his training. 
He sees that the sixty-two_wrong_views are led by the view of having an embodied self. This view of a self with its belongings leads to countless kinds of fixations on One’s five aggregates, twelve fields, and eighteen spheres. On this fourth ground, he discards all such fixations. 
He ends all affliction-driven karmas, which are denounced by Tathāgatas, Because they have neither meanings nor benefits. 
He is a wise man who trains to do pure karmas, Doing all possible things to deliver sentient beings. 
This Bodhisattva trains diligently, never indolent, And acquires ten profound minds. He seeks Buddha bodhi tirelessly with a single mind And aspires to receive the position to deliver sentient beings. 
He respects the virtuous and follows their instructions for his training. He acknowledges kindness received and is never offended by admonitions. Discarding arrogance and sycophancy, his mind is gentle As he makes further energetic progress, never to regress. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on this Flaming Wisdom Ground Never loses his pure mind. His understanding being firm, his roots of goodness continue to grow. He forever discards his afflictions and the web of doubts. 
This Bodhisattva is excellent among men. He makes offerings to innumerable nayutas of Buddhas, Hears the Dharma, and renounces family life. His resolve is indestructible, like genuine gold. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on this ground continues to accumulate merit. As he trains for bodhi by skillful means that arise from wisdom, Despite  the multitude of māras, his mind never regresses, Like an extraordinary jewel that cannot be destroyed. 
Abiding on this ground, he usually becomes the god-king of Yāma Heaven. In command of dharmas, he is revered by multitudes. He universally transforms sentient beings and removes their wrong views. He single-mindedly seeks Buddha wisdom as he does good karmas. 
This Bodhisattva makes energetic progress And enters a koṭi samādhis. 
Through the power of his excellent vows, What he can do far exceeds these things and cannot be known. 
This is how a Bodhisattva trains on the fourth ground In a pure and wonderful way That accords with the meaning of merit and wisdom. Buddha-Son, I now have explained it to you. 
**** The Fifth Ground, the Hard-to-Conquer Ground **** When Bodhisattvas heard the excellent training on this ground , They understood the Dharma and were filled with joy. 
They showered flowers from the sky as they praised, “Very good, Vajra Store the Great One!” The god-king of Paranirmita-vaśa-vartin Heaven  and his retinue of gods, Who were exuberant upon hearing the Dharma, stood in the open sky. With joy, they formed various wonderful clouds of radiance As an offering to the Tathāgata. 
Beautiful goddess-daughters played celestial music And praised the Buddha with hymns. Through the spiritual power of the Bodhisattva , they said, “Today, Buddha vows made long ago have finally been fulfilled. Today, Buddha bodhi sought since long ago has finally been attained. Today, after waiting for a long time, we finally see Śākyamuni Buddha come to this celestial palace to benefit gods. 
Today, after waiting for a long time, sentient beings have finally received peace and joy. The immense ocean has taken a long time to start surging. Buddha light has taken a long time to be emitted. The sound of great compassion has taken a long time to be heard. 
He has crossed over to the shore of merit And dispelled the darkness of arrogance. His superb purity is like that of the open sky. Untainted by worldly dharmas, He is like a lotus flower . 
Śākyamuni the World-Honored One has appeared in the world, Like Mount Sumeru rising from the immense ocean. By making offerings to Him, one can end one’s suffering. By making offerings to Him, one may acquire Buddha wisdom. 
The Buddha is worthy of unequaled offerings, So we joyfully make offerings to Him.” After innumerable goddess-daughters praised The Buddha with these words, All were filled with reverence and joy. 
Then Liberation Moon the Great One Requested Vajra Store the Fearless One, “Buddha-Son, I pray that you will describe The features of the training on the fifth ground.” **** Cultivating Ten Pure Minds **** Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva told Liberation Moon Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, after a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has completed his training on the fourth ground, if he wishes to enter the fifth ground, the Hard-to-Conquer Ground , he should cultivate ten pure minds founded on equality. 
What are these ten? 
With these ten pure minds founded on equality, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters the fifth ground. 
**** Acquiring the Mind of No Regress **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abiding on this Hard-to-Conquer ground acquires the mind of no regress because he excels in training to complete the elements of bodhi and in purifying his profound mind; because he seeks higher training; because he trains in accord with true suchness; because he is supported by the power of his vows; because, out of lovingkindness and compassion, he never abandons sentient beings; because he accumulates merit and wisdom to support his attaining bodhi; because he trains diligently without rest; because he produces skillful means; because he studies and understands the higher grounds; because he is protected and remembered by Tathāgatas; because he is supported by the power of his wisdom. 
**** Knowing Various Truths **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva knows the Four_Noble_Truths. He truly knows  the path to cessation of suffering. “He also knows well the worldly truths and the highest truth, as well as the truth of appearances, differentiations,  makeup,  events, birth, ending afflictions and karmic rebirths, entering the path to wisdom, completing all Bodhisattva grounds in the proper order, and acquiring Tathāgata wisdom. 
“This Bodhisattva knows the worldly truths because he gives sentient beings happiness according to their preferences. 
He knows the highest truth because he understands the one true reality of all dharmas. 
He knows the truth of appearances because he perceives the appearances of dharmas, both the unique and common appearances. 
He knows the truth of differentiations because he perceives the differences among dharmas. 
He knows the truth of makeup because he excels in differentiating a sentient being’s five aggregates, twelve fields, and eighteen spheres. 
He knows the truth of events because he perceives the suffering of body and mind. 
He knows the truth of birth because he observes the continuity of rebirths as life-paths. 
He knows the truth of ending afflictions and karmic rebirths because he will ultimately end his afflictions. 
He knows the truth of entering the path to wisdom because he realizes the non-dual state . 
He knows the truth of completing all Bodhisattva grounds in the proper order because he correctly observes his mental activities. 
He even knows the truth of acquiring Tathāgata wisdom through the power of his faith, understanding, and knowledge, though not through the power of his ultimate wisdom. 
**** Penetrating the Falsity of Saṁskṛta Dharmas **** “Buddha-Son, having acquired such kinds of wisdom-knowledge, this BodhisattvaMahāsattva truly knows that all saṁskṛta dharmas are false and deceptive, yet captivating to the foolish. 
Therefore, he elicits increased great compassion for sentient beings, illuminating them all with its radiance. 
Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, with such power of wisdom, always seeks Buddha wisdom and never abandons sentient beings. He observes all saṁskṛta processes from their past to their future as they truly are. 
“Because of ignorance and thirsty love of being, a sentient being transmigrates through its cycle of birth and death, each time trapped in a body composed of the five aggregates, which make one aggregate of suffering. 
Apart from a self with its belongings, a sentient being is a process with no self, no everlasting soul, no nurturer , and no entity, nothing that can repeatedly assume a body for the next life-journey, from past into future. 
One can end  only if one discards one’s greed for all false dharmas and truly knows whether or not one still has any. 
**** Training for Merit and Wisdom to Rescue Suffering Sentient Beings **** “This Bodhisattva thinks, ‘Ordinary beings are foolish, deluded, and pitiable. 
They have no fear of the four domains , which are like four venomous snakes. They cannot pull out  the arrow of arrogance and the wrong views. They cannot extinguish the fire of greed, anger, and delusion. They cannot dispel the darkness of ignorance. 
They drift with the waves of their perceptions in the ocean of birth and death.’     “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva next thinks, ‘Sentient beings undergo such immeasurable suffering, forlorn and distressed. They have neither rescue nor reliance, neither island nor shelter, neither guidance nor sight, but are shrouded by their ignorance and enveloped in darkness. 
To rescue all sentient beings, I now train for merit and wisdom, and train to complete the elements of bodhi. I am resolved to go alone, without seeking companions. 
I transfer this merit to sentient beings, enabling them to achieve ultimate purity and acquire a Tathāgata’s Ten Powers and hindrance-free wisdom.’     “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva develops wisdom and roots of goodness from such observations because he vows to rescue and protect all sentient beings, benefit them, give them peace and joy, pity them, enable them to come to  achievement, liberate them, draw them in, enable them to leave their suffering behind, enable them to become pure, tame them, and enable them to enter parinirvāṇa. 
**** Receiving Good Names **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahasattva abiding on this fifth ground, the Hardto-Conquer Ground, is called by these names: 
the one with memory because he never forgets the Dharma; the wise one because he has firm wisdom; the learned one because he knows the tenets of the sūtras and their sequence and connections; the one with a sense of shame and dishonor because he protects himself and others; the resolute one because he never abandons the precepts; the awakened one because he ponders right and wrong; the one who follows wisdom-knowledge because he follows nothing else; the one who follows wisdom because he differentiates between the right and wrong meanings of words; the one with transcendental powers because he excels in meditation; the one with skillful means because he can follow worldly ways; the insatiable one because he excels in accumulating merit; the one who never rests because he constantly seeks wisdom; the tireless one because he endlessly cultivates great lovingkindness and compassion; the one who diligently trains to benefit others because he wants to enable all sentient beings to attain nirvāṇa; the diligent seeker free from indolence because he seeks a Tathāgata’s Ten Powers, Four Fearlessnesses, and Eighteen Exclusive Dharmas; the one who does what he resolves to do because he will adorn Buddha Lands; the one who diligently does good karmas because he will acquire a Buddha’s sublime appearance; the one who trains diligently because he seeks the sublime body, voice, and mind that adorn a Buddha; the one who reveres and esteems the Dharma because he carries out the teachings of all Bodhisattva Dharma masters; the one whose mind is hindrance free because he continues to walk in the world by skillful means; the undistracted one because day and night he delights in teaching and transforming all sentient beings. 
**** Transforming Sentient Beings by Skillful Means **** “Buddha-Son, as this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva diligently trains himself, he teaches and transforms sentient beings by carrying out almsgiving, loving words, beneficial actions, and collaborative work ; by manifesting a physical body; by expounding the Dharma, by teaching them Bodhisattva actions; by displaying a Tathāgata’s awesome spiritual power; by revealing to them the faults of undergoing repeated birth and death; by praising Tathāgata wisdom; by demonstrating his great transcendental powers; by using various skillful means. 
“Buddha-Son, as this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva diligently teaches and transforms sentient beings by skillful means, his mind continues to head for Buddha wisdom, and his roots of goodness never regress because he persistently does excellent training. 
**** Mastering Worldly Knowledge and Skills **** “Buddha-Son, to benefit sentient beings, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva masters all worldly knowledge and skills, including words, numbers, texts, seal making, and various theories on earth, water, fire, and wind. 
He also masters medical prescriptions to treat illnesses caused by insanity, atrophy, possession by a ghost, or insect venom. He can cure them all. 
He is versed in writing, praising, singing and dancing, playing music, joking, and speaking. 
He properly cares for cities, towns, palaces, houses, gardens, fountains, ponds, grass, trees, flowers, and medicinal plants. 
He knows the  stores of gold, silver, gems, pearls, aquamarine, conch shells, jade, and corals, and reveals them to others. 
“He studies the sun, the moon, the planets, and the constellations, as well as bird calls and earthquakes. He interprets others’ night dreams as good or evil and correctly reads others’ physical appearances for good or evil signs. 
He observes the precepts, practices meditation, and acquires transcendental powers. He is accomplished in meditation, attaining even the four samādhis of the formless realm. As he handles worldly matters, he never distresses sentient beings. Instead, he gives them teachings to benefit them, enabling them gradually to abide in the unexcelled Buddha Dharma. 
**** Training under All Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this Hard-to-Conquer Ground, through the power of his vows, comes to see many Buddhas: 
hundreds of Buddhas, thousands of Buddhas, hundreds of thousands of Buddhas, and even hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Buddhas. 
He reveres, honors, and attends all Buddhas, and makes offerings to Them. He offers Them life-supporting things, including clothing, food and drink, beds and bedding, and medicine. He also makes these offerings to all monks. Then he transfers his roots of goodness to his attaining anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
“Under every Buddha, he reverently hears the Dharma, upholds it, and does his best to train accordingly. 
He renounces family life to train for bodhi in the Dharma of that Buddha. 
After renouncing family life, he hears more of the Dharma, acquires dhāraṇīs, and becomes a master who hears and upholds the Dharma. 
“As he abides on this ground for 100 or 1,000 kalpas, or even 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas, his roots of goodness become more radiant and pure. 
As an analogy, genuine gold polished by conch shells becomes more lustrous and pure. 
Likewise the roots of goodness of a Bodhisattva abiding on this Hard-to-Conquer Ground become more radiant and pure because he uses his applied wisdomknowledge to observe and ponder dharmas. 
“Buddha-Son, the merit acquired by a Bodhisattva on this Hard-to-Conquer Ground, using his applied wisdom-knowledge, is unrivaled by the merit acquired by Bodhisattvas on lower grounds. 
Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the sun, the moon, the stars, and the radiance of celestial palaces are indestructible and can never be shaken by winds. 
Likewise the roots of goodness of a Bodhisattva on this ground, who uses his applied wisdom-knowledge to observe dharmas, never regress and are indestructible. They are unrivaled by those of voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas. 
“Of the ten pāramitās, he practices the fifth pāramitā, the meditation pāramitā , more than the other nine pāramitās. 
It is not that he refuses to practice the other nine pāramitās, but that he practices them according to his ability and at his discretion. 
**** Becoming the God-King of Tuṣita Heaven **** “Buddha-Son, this is a brief description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva training on the fifth ground, the Hard-to-Conquer Ground. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on this ground usually becomes the god-king of Tuṣita Heaven  and always benefits sentient beings with ease. He shatters the wrong views of all non-Buddhists and enables sentient beings to abide in the true reality of dharmas. 
“As he carries out almsgiving, loving words, beneficial actions, and collaborative work , he constantly thinks of the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha, and even of acquiring sarvajña-jñāna, the knowledge of all knowledge. 
“He thinks, ‘Among all sentient beings, I should be excellent, especially excellent; wonderful, especially wonderful; superb, especially superb. To all sentient beings, I should be leader, guide, general, and teacher. I should even be the reliance for those who seek the knowledge of all knowledge.’     “If this Bodhisattva makes energetic progress, in one thought he enters 1,000 koṭi samādhis, sees 1,000 koṭi Buddhas, and knows the spiritual power of 1,000 koṭi Buddhas. He can move 1,000 koṭi Buddha Lands and manifest 1,000 koṭi bodies. 
It cannot be known by figuring for 100, 1,000, or 100,000 kalpas, or even 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas.” **** Summarizing Stanzas **** Then, to restate his meaning, Vajra Store Bodhisattva spoke in verse: 
A Bodhisattva who has purified the fourth ground Ponders the equality of Buddhas of the past, present, and future, And the equality in  the precepts, meditative minds, removing doubt, and knowing the right and wrong paths. 
The Four Abidings of Mindfulness are his bow, and the Five Roots his arrow. The Four Right Endeavors are his horse, and the Four Ways to Attain Samādhi his vehicle. Using the Five Powers as his sturdy armor, he annihilates the bandits . Valiant and vigorous, never regressing, he enters the fifth ground. 
A sense of shame and dishonor is his garment, and the Seven Bodhi Factors his garland. Observing the precepts with purity is his incense, and meditation his solid perfume. Adorned with wisdom and skillful means, He enters the grove of dhāranīs and the garden of samādhis. 
His samādhi is his feet, and his right mindfulness his neck. His lovingkindness and compassion are his eyes, and his wisdom his teeth. His lion’s roar that one has no self annihilates his afflictions, which are like bandits. A lion among men, he enters the fifth ground. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on this fifth ground Trains on an excellent, pure path. Resolved to seek the Buddha Dharma, he never regresses. Remembering lovingkindness and compassion, he never tires. 
He accumulates merit and wisdom And, using skillful means, diligently studies the higher grounds. Supported by the power of Buddhas, he has mindfulness and wisdom And truly knows the Four Noble Truths. 
He also knows the worldly truths and the highest truth, As well as the truth of appearances, differentiations, makeup, events, birth, ending of afflictions, entering the path, And even acquiring the hindrance-free wisdom of Tathāgatas. 
Although his observations of the truths are wonderful, He has not achieved hindrance-free liberation. Nevertheless, because such observations bring great merit, They surpass worldly wisdom. 
Through observations of the truths, he knows that saṁskṛta dharmas Are false and deceptive in nature, not firm. Carrying some of the radiance of Buddhas’ lovingkindness and compassion, He seeks Buddha wisdom in order to benefit sentient beings. 
He observes saṁskṛta processes from their past to their future and sees that Sentient beings live in the darkness of ignorance and are fettered by love, Each an aggregate of suffering, Transmigrating as a process with no self and no everlasting soul. 
they undergo suffering because of love and grasping. Unable to find the edge , And that they drift in confusion, with no ending in sight. “I should deliver these pitiable ones. 
The fire of desire blazing in their minds, they live in the darkness of delusion. Drifting in the river of love, they cannot observe themselves. 
Whatever he does, it is all for the sake of delivering sentient beings. He is called the one with memory, the one with wisdom, The awakened one, and the one with skillful means. 
He insatiably accumulates merit and wisdom, Respectfully hears more of the Dharma without weariness, Adorns Buddha Lands, and develops his appearance . All his work is to benefit sentient beings. 
In order to teach and transform all in the world, He masters worldly knowledge and skills, including words, numbers, and seal making. He masters prescriptions of medicine To treat illnesses and cure them all. 
He writes, sings, and dances wonderfully, And properly cares for palaces, houses, gardens, and ponds. He reveals to others many treasure stores Because he wants to benefit innumerable sentient beings. 
He studies the sun, the moon, the planets, and earthquakes, And even others’ physical appearances. Having attained the four dhyānas  and  the formless realm, and acquired transcendental powers, He displays them to benefit all in the world. 
This wise man abiding on this Hard-to-Conquer Ground Makes offerings to nayutas of Buddhas and hears the Dharma. Like genuine gold polished with conch shells, His roots of goodness become radiant and pure. 
They are like the stars in the open sky, Which cannot be shaken by winds, And like lotus flowers, which rise above the water. In this way this great Bodhisattva walks in the world. 
On the fifth ground, he usually becomes the god-king of Tuṣita Heaven, Who can shatter the wrong views of non-Buddhists. His good karmas are for acquiring Buddha wisdom, And he vows to acquire the Ten Powers in order to rescue sentient beings. 
Making great energetic progress in his training, In one thought he makes offerings to 1,000 koṭi Buddhas And enters 1,000 koṭi samādhis, and can move 1,000 koṭi Buddha Lands. Through the power of his vows, what he can do far exceeds these things. 
Thus the fifth ground, the Hard-to-Conquer Ground, Is the supreme true path in the world. For the sake of Buddha-sons, I have explained it through the power of various skillful means. 
Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment Chapter 26   The Ten Grounds ***** *** Translated from Sanskrit into Chinese in the Tang Dynasty by The Tripiṭaka Master Śikṣānanda from Yutian *** ***** Fascicle 37  ***** **** The Sixth Ground, the Revealing Ground **** After the Bodhisattvas heard the excellent training , As an offering to the Tathāgata, they joyfully showered wonderful flowers, Emitted pure radiance, and scattered precious jewels, As they praised Him. 
A multitude of 100,000 gods celebrated And showered treasures from the sky. They offered the Buddha garlands, necklaces, banners, Jeweled umbrellas, and solid perfumes. 
The god-king of Paranirmita-vaśa-vartin Heaven , Together with his retinue, joyfully stood in the sky. 
He scattered treasures to form a cloud as an offering And urged Vajra Store, “Buddha-Son, speak at once.” Innumerable goddess-daughters stood in the sky And praised the Buddha with music and songs. All the tones say these words: “Following the words of the Buddha can remove one’s afflictions. 
Dharmas by nature are in nirvāṇa and have no appearance, Like the open sky, which never differentiates. Beyond one’s attachment and verbal descriptions, They are forever equal and pure . 
To fully understand the nature of dharmas, One’s mind should remain unmoved by  existence or nonexistence. 
Training diligently to rescue all in the world, A true Buddha-son is born from the Buddha’s mouth. 
He gives alms without grasping appearances, And faithfully observes the precepts to end all evildoing. Understanding that dharmas are harmless, he endures adversity. Knowing that dharma nature is apart from perception, he makes energetic progress. He ends his afflictions and practices meditation. 
Whoever has ended his evildoing is called a great man.” After praising Vajra Store Bodhisattva with a million tones, They silently gazed upon the Buddha with reverence. 
Liberation Moon Bodhisattva then asked Vajra Store Bodhisattva, “Through what training can a Bodhisattva enter the next ground?” **** Ten Reasons for the Equality of Dharmas **** Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva told Liberation Moon Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, after a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has completed his training on the fifth ground, if he wishes to enter the sixth ground, the Revealing Ground ], he should observe that dharmas are equal for ten reasons. 
What are these ten? 
“Having observed the equality of all dharmas in their intrinsic purity and accepted it without any objection, this Bodhisattva enters the sixth ground, the Revealing Ground. With a radiant and keen mind, he acquires high Endurance in Accord but not Endurance in the No Birth of Dharmas. 
**** Repeated Birth and Death and the View of Having a Self **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva, having made these ten observations, to be led by his great compassion and to increase it to its fullest, then observes the appearances of birth and death in the world. “He thinks, ‘One is repeatedly reborn in the world because one is fixated on  a self. If one can end this fixation, one will no longer be  reborn.’     “He next thinks, ‘Ordinary beings have no wisdom. Fixated on a self, they follow their perceptions of existence and nonexistence. 
These actions driven by afflictions and grasping increase and accumulate the  seeds in their minds, which bring subsequent birth, old age, and death. “‘As ignorance shrouds , karmas are the field and consciousness retains the  seeds. Thirsty love  provides the moisture, arrogance waters the seeds, and the web of wrong views helps them grow. 
The seeds sprout name and form , which develop the six faculties. Contact of these faculties with their corresponding objects and consciousnesses produces sensory reception. sensory experiences spark love of sense objects. Growing love leads to grasping, and grasping fuels the karmic force for being. 
When one assumes a body composed of the five aggregates, it is called birth. 
When one matures, it is called old age. When one’s life ends, it is called death. 
At death, driven by the heat of afflictions, in the midst of suffering one laments with anxiety and sorrow. 
When such causes and conditions gather, there is no gatherer. When they naturally dissipate, there is no dissipater.’     “In this way this Bodhisattva observes the appearances of the Twelve Links of Dependent Arising. 
“‘At death, still foolishly attached to life, when one feels discomfort in the chest, it is called sorrow; when one weeps and wails, it is called lamentation; when one suffers in one’s body, it is called pain; when one suffers in one’s mind, it is called anxiety. 
Increased pain and anxiety are called distress. This process  is like a tree of suffering, with no self, no belongings, no doer, and no recipient.’     “He next thinks, ‘If there is a doer, there must be doings. 
If there is no doer, there are no doings. According to the highest truth, neither doer nor doings can be captured.’ 2. 
Encompassed in the Mind     “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva next thinks, ‘As all things in the Three Realms_of_Existence are encompassed in the mind, so too are the Twelve_Links_of Dependent_Arising expounded by the Tathāgata. 
Doing Different Karmas     “Buddha-Son, ignorance does two karmas: it causes one to take karmic actions. 
Karmic actions do two karmas: they cause consciousness to arise . 
Consciousness does two karmas: it causes one’s name and form to arise. 
Name and form do two karmas: they produce one’s six faculties. 
The six faculties do two karmas: they cause contact to arise. 
Contact with an object does two karmas: it causes sensory reception to arise. 
Sensory reception does two karmas: it causes love  to arise. 
Love does two karmas: it causes grasping to arise. 
Grasping does two karmas: it fuels the karmic force for being. 
The karmic force for being does two karmas: it causes birth to arise. 
Birth does two karmas: it causes old age to arrive. 
Old age does two karmas: it causes death to arrive. 
Death does two karmas: it causes one unconsciously to begin the next life. 
Continuing or Ending Together     “Buddha-Son, each of these twelve links is thus the condition for the next link to arise, from ignorance as the condition for karmic actions, to birth as the condition for old age and death, because each link leads to the next. 
Conversely, if ignorance ends, then karmic actions end; if birth ends, then old age and death end, because each link ends with the end of its preceding link. 
Summarized as Three Paths     “Buddha-Son, among the twelve links, ignorance, love, and grasping, until ended, are the path of afflictions. 
When one stops differentiating between past and future, these three paths end. Without a self with its belongings, as weak as a bundle of reeds, these three paths continue or end. 
Connecting One’s Past, Present, and Future Lives     “The first two links, ignorance and karmic actions, are the karmic cause produced in one’s past life. 
The next five links, from consciousness to sensory reception, are the karmic fruit received in one’s present life. 
Conversely, this chain reaction ceases when ending ignorance causes ending of karmic actions. 
Bringing Three Kinds of Suffering     “These twelve links bring three kinds of suffering. The first five links, from ignorance to six sense faculties, bring suffering of continuous change in every process. The next two links, from contact with sense objects to sensory reception, bring suffering of pain with a cause. 
Conversely, these three kinds of suffering end when ending ignorance causes ending of karmic actions. 
Continuing or Ending through Causes and Conditions     “Ignorance causes karmic actions because ignorance leads to karmic actions. 
Conversely, ending ignorance causes ending of karmic actions because absence of ignorance leads to absence of karmic actions. The same is true for the other links. 
Continuing or Ending Bondage     “Because ignorance causes karmic actions, the bondage  continues. 
Conversely, because ending ignorance causes ending of karmic actions, this bondage ends. 
The same is true for the other links. 
Karmic Existence or Its Termination     “That ignorance causes karmic actions is an observation of  existence. 
That ending ignorance causes ending of karmic actions is an observation of its termination. 
The same is true for the other links. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva thus observes in the conforming way  and the nonconforming way  the ten features of the Twelve Links of Dependent Arising: 
**** The Three Liberation Doors Are Revealed **** “Buddha-Son, after observing the ten features of the Twelve Links of Dependent Arising, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva realizes that a sentient being is empty in nature, with no self, no everlasting soul, no doer, and no recipient. 
Then the Liberation Door of Emptiness is revealed to him. He next observes that the nature of dharmas is nirvāṇa, which is in ultimate liberation, with no appearance. Then the Liberation Door of No Appearance is revealed to him. 
Then the Liberation Door of No Wish is revealed to him. 
Thus this Bodhisattva enters these Three_Liberation Doors and discards the perception of self versus others, doer versus recipient, and existence versus nonexistence. 
**** Prajña-Pāramitā Is Revealed **** “Buddha-Son, with expanding compassion, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva energetically trains to complete all the elements_of_bodhi. He thinks, ‘All saṁskṛta dharmas arise upon convergences of causes and conditions and perish upon their divergences. They cannot arise without convergences of causes of conditions. 
Knowing the multitudinous faults of saṁskṛta dharmas, I should stop their causes and conditions from converging. 
However, in order to bring sentient beings to  achievement, I would not end any saṁskṛta processes.’     “Buddha-Son, as this Bodhisattva observes saṁskṛta dharmas with their multitudinous faults, he sees that they have no self-essence and have neither birth nor death. Eliciting great compassion, he never abandons sentient beings. 
Abiding in the radiance of hindrance-free wisdom, as he trains to complete the elements of bodhi, he does not abide in saṁskṛta dharmas. Although he observes that the nature of saṁskṛta dharmas is nirvāṇa, he does not abide in nirvāṇa because he has not yet completed the elements of bodhi. 
**** Entering All Samādhi Doors of Emptiness, No Appearance, and No wish **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this Revealing Ground enters ten samādhis: the Samādhi of Emptiness That Is and Is Not Separated . 
“Through these ten Samādhi Doors of Emptiness, 100,000 Samādhi Doors of Emptiness are revealed to him. 
Moreover, through ten Samādhi Doors of No Appearance and ten Samādhi Doors of No Wish, 100,000 Samādhi Doors of No Appearance and 100,000 Samādhi Doors of No Wish are revealed to him. **** Cultivating Ten Minds **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva abiding on this Revealing Ground next cultivates ten minds: 
“Buddha-Son, with these minds in accord with Buddha bodhi, this Bodhisattva has no fear of non-Buddhist doctrines. He enters wisdom grounds, never to follow the path of the Two_Vehicles. He heads for Buddha wisdom, undeterred by māras, including his afflictions. Abiding in the radiance of Bodhisattva wisdom, he excels in practicing the Three Samādhis: 
Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this Revealing Ground does advanced practice of prajñā-pāramitā and achieves Endurance in Accord at the third level because he follows the true reality of dharmas without any objection. 
**** Training under All Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this Revealing Ground, through the power of his great vows, comes to see many Buddhas: 
hundreds of Buddhas and even hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Buddhas. 
With a vast and profound mind, he reveres, honors, and praises all Buddhas, and makes offerings to Them. He offers Them life-supporting things, including clothing, food and drink, beds and bedding, and medicine. He also makes these offerings to all monks. Then he transfers his roots_of_goodness to his attaining the unsurpassed bodhi. 
“Under every Buddha, he reverently hears the Dharma, accepts it, and upholds it. Then he acquires the Samādhi of True Reality. As he trains with the radiance of his wisdom, he retains what he has acquired, without losing anything. 
He thus acquires the profound Dharma store of Buddhas. “After 100 or 1,000 kalpas, or even 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas, his roots of goodness become more radiant and pure. 
As an analogy, genuine gold polished time and again with precious aquamarine becomes more lustrous and pure. 
Likewise, as a Bodhisattva abiding on this ground observes dharmas, using his applied wisdom-knowledge, his roots of goodness become more radiant and pure. They are in nirvāṇa and are unrivaled . 
As an analogy, moonlight, indestructible by the four wind wheels, shines on sentient beings’ bodies, cooling them. 
Likewise the roots of goodness of a Bodhisattva on this ground, indestructible by the four kinds of māras, can extinguish the fire of the afflictions of 100,000 koṭi nayuta sentient beings. 
“Of the ten_pāramitās, this Bodhisattva practices the sixth pāramitā, the wisdom pāramitā , more than the other nine pāramitās. 
It is not that he refuses to practice them, but that he practices them according to his ability and at his discretion. 
**** Becoming the God-King of the Fifth Desire Heaven **** “Buddha-Son, this is a brief description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva training on the sixth ground, the Revealing Ground. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on this ground usually becomes the god-king of Nirmāṇa-rati Heaven  and always does everything with ease. He is never at a loss facing the challenging questions raised by voice-hearers. He can enable sentient beings to destroy their arrogance and to delve into the dependent arising of dharmas. 
As he carries out almsgiving, loving words, beneficial actions, and collaborative work , he constantly thinks of the Buddha, the Dharma, the Saṅgha, and even of acquiring sarvajña-jñāna, the knowledge of all knowledge. 
“He thinks, ‘Among all sentient beings, I should be excellent, especially excellent; wonderful, especially wonderful; superb, especially superb. To all sentient beings, I should be leader, guide, general, and teacher. I should even be the reliance for those who seek the knowledge of all knowledge.’     “If this Bodhisattva makes energetic progress, in one thought he enters 100,000 koṭi samādhis and manifests 100,000 koṭi Bodhisattvas as his retinue. Through the power of his excellent vows, what this Bodhisattva can do with ease far exceeds these things. 
It cannot be known by figuring for 100, 1,000, or 100,000 kalpas, or even 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas.” **** Summarizing Stanzas **** Then, to restate his meaning, Vajra Store Bodhisattva spoke in verse: 
Having completed his training on the fifth ground, This Bodhisattva observes that dharmas have neither self-essence nor appearance. With neither birth nor death, they have always been pure, Beyond ludicrous doctrines and beyond acceptance and rejection. Nirvāṇa being their essence, they are like illusions, Free from differentiation and the duality of existence and nonexistence. Making such observations in accord with the nature of dharmas, He acquires wisdom and enters the sixth ground. 
With wisdom and high endurance in accord with the Dharma, He observes the appearances of birth and death in the world. Through the power of ignorance, one is born into the world. If ignorance ends, one’s world is no more. 
Although the essence of causes and conditions is emptiness, It neither prevents their convergences nor eliminates their false names. With no doer, no recipient, and no perceiver, All dharmas are processes that arise like clouds. 
Not knowing the truth  is called ignorance. Thoughts and karmas are the fruit of ignorance. Arising with consciousness are name and form, Which lead to an aggregate of suffering. 
As the Three Realms of Existence rely on the mind, So too do the Twelve Links of Dependent Arising. As birth and death are produced by the  mind, They end if such a mind ends. 
One’s ignorance does two karmas, Producing delusion about objects and causing karmic actions. As each link, from ignorance to old age and death, leads to the next link, One’s suffering is endless. 
Ignorance is the condition that is hard to end. If this condition ends, with it end all other conditions. Ignorance, love, and grasping are the path of afflictions. 
The first five links, from ignorance to the six faculties, bring suffering of continuous change in every process. The next two links, contact and sensory reception, bring suffering of pain with a cause. The last five links, from love to old age and death, bring suffering of deterioration of pleasure. If one sees that one has no self, the three kinds of suffering end. 
Ignorance is the condition for the bondage of birth and death. Ending this condition ends this bondage, Because ending the cause that produces the effect ends the effect. Based on this observation, this Bodhisattva knows that emptiness is the nature . By continuing one’s ignorance, one continues karmic existence. 
By ending one’s ignorance, one ends karmic existence. As this exists, so that exists; as this exists not, so that exists not. Through ten observations, his mind is freed from attachment . The twelve successive links for existence are encompassed in the mind. 
Each doing two karmas, they are summarized as three paths . Connecting one’s past, present, and future lives, they bring three kinds of suffering arising through causes and conditions. While continuing the twelve links ensures endless bondage, ending them breaks the bondage. 
The chain reaction of the Twelve Links of Dependent Arising, With neither doer nor recipient, Is unreal, like illusions, dreams, and reflections, And like mirages pursued by the foolish. 
Through such observations, he realizes the emptiness of dharmas And knows that  they have no appearance. Understanding their falsity, he has no wish , Except for great compassion for sentient beings. 
Knowing that all saṁskṛta dharmas arise upon convergences of causes and conditions, He is resolved to train diligently for bodhi. 
As the Liberation Door of Emptiness leads to100,000 more doors, So too do the Liberation Door of No Appearance and the Liberation Door of No Wish. With his advanced practice of prajñā-pāramitā and his Endurance in Accord, He fully achieves liberation and acquires wisdom. 
With a profound mind, he makes offerings to Buddhas And trains for bodhi in accordance with the Buddha Dharma. He thus acquires the Dharma store of Buddhas and expands his roots of goodness, which are Like genuine gold polished with aquamarine, And like moonlight, indestructible by the four wind wheels, Cooling all sentient beings. 
A Bodhisattva on this ground transcends the path of māras And can extinguish the fire of sentient beings’ afflictions. 
He usually becomes the god-king of the fifth desire heaven And always teaches sentient beings to destroy their arrogance. Whatever he does, he does to acquire the knowledge of all knowledge Because he has transcended the path of voice-hearers. 
A Bodhisattva on this ground makes energetic progress, Enters 100,000 koṭi samādhis, And sees innumerable Buddhas, who are Like the sun in the midsummer sky. 
a Bodhisattva on the sixth ground is Profound, wonderful, and hard to know, Beyond the understanding of voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas. Buddha-Son, I have expounded it to you. 
**** The Seventh Ground, the Far-Going Ground **** At that time the multitude of gods were filled with joy. They scattered treasures to form a cloud in the sky And emitted various kinds of wonderful sounds That praised the purest one : “With supreme wisdom You understand the highest meaning And have acquired merit measured by the hundreds, thousands, and koṭis. 
Like a taint-free lotus flower among men, You expound the profound training to benefit all sentient beings.” In the sky, the god-king of Paranirmita-vaśa-vartin Heaven , Emitted great radiance, shining on the Buddha’s body. He also formed a cloud of most exquisite fragrance As an offering to the one who removes anxiety and distress. 
All gods rejoiced And emitted beautiful tones that praised : 
“After hearing the virtues of this ground , We have already received great benefits.” In joyful celebration, Goddess-daughters played ten million kinds of musical tones. By the spiritual power of the Tathāgata , In unison the tones said these words: “His quiet deportment unexcelled, He can tame those hard to tame and is worthy of offerings from the world. Having transcended the world, He walks in the world and reveals the wonderful path. 
Although he manifests countless bodies, He knows that in true reality they are empty. He skillfully expounds the Dharma with words, But is not captivated by the appearances of their sounds. 
He visits hundreds of thousands of worlds And makes splendid offerings to Buddhas. With wisdom free from attachment, He has no perception of a self or a Buddha Land. 
Although he diligently teaches sentient beings, He has no perception of self versus others. 
Although he has cultivated great goodness, He is not attached to good dharmas. 
Having seen the blazing fire of greed, anger, and delusion In  the world, He discards such perceptions, Elicits great compassion, and proceeds with dynamic power.” After all gods and goddess-daughters Had made all kinds of offerings and completed their praises, They fell silent And reverently gazed upon the World-Honored One, hoping to hear the Dharma. 
Then Liberation Moon Bodhisattva requested Vajra Store Bodhisattva, “The minds of this huge multitude are pure. 
I pray that the Buddha-son will describe The features of the training on the seventh ground.” **** Ten Excellent Trainings That Arise from Applied Wisdom **** Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva told Liberation Moon Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, after a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has completed his training on the sixth ground, if he wishes to enter the seventh ground, the Far-Going Ground , he should do ten excellent trainings that arise from applied wisdom. What are these ten? 
First, as he practices the Three Samādhis—emptiness, no appearance, and no wish—he elicits lovingkindness and compassion for sentient beings and never abandons them. Second, as he understands that Buddhas are equal, he delights in making offerings to Them all. 
Third, as he has entered the wisdom door to observe the emptiness , he diligently accumulates merit. 
Fourth, as he has transcended the Three Realms of Existence, he adorns them . 
Fifth, as he knows that one’s flaming afflictions are in nirvāṇa, he teaches sentient beings how to eradicate their afflictions, including greed, anger, and delusion. 
Sixth, as he knows that dharmas have no self-essence, like illusions, dreams, reflections, echoes, mirages, conjurations, moons in the water, and images in the mirror, he does countless different karmas according to his mind. 
Seventh, as he knows that all Buddha Lands are like the open sky, he adorns them with his wonderful, pure actions. 
Eighth, as he knows that a Buddha’s dharma body has no appearance, he adorns his body with good appearances. 
Ninth, as he knows that Buddha sounds by nature are empty, silent, and indescribable, to communicate with sentient beings he uses various pure sounds. 
Tenth, as he has learned from Buddhas that past, present, and future are but one thought, he does training with various features, at various times, and in various kalpas, to suit sentient beings’ understandings and differentiations . 
“Through these ten excellent trainings that arise from applied wisdom, this Bodhisattva ascends from the sixth ground to the seventh ground. 
Because these ten trainings are always present, he is said to be abiding on the seventh ground, the Far-Going Ground. **** Entering Immeasurable Realms **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abiding on this seventh ground enters these realms: 
“This Bodhisattva thinks, ‘Such immeasurable realms of Tathāgatas cannot be known by figuring for even 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas. 
I should enter them all with the mind of no effort and no differentiation.’     “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva observes  as he diligently and persistently does the excellent training that arises from his applied wisdom, without even a single moment of rest or laxity. 
Whether he walks, stands still, sits, lies down, or even sleeps, he continues this resolve, never succumbing to any mental coverings. **** Practicing the Ten Pāramitās **** “Thought after thought, this Bodhisattva practices the ten pāramitās. 
Because each of his thoughts is led by great compassion as he trains in accordance with the Buddha Dharma to head for Buddha bodhi. 
To seek Buddha bodhi, he gives sentient beings his roots of goodness as alms because he practices the almsgiving pāramitā . 
He can end all his afflictions because he practices the precept pāramitā . 
Led by lovingkindness and compassion, he never harms sentient beings because he practices the endurance pāramitā . 
He unceasingly seeks to do good dharmas because he practices the progress pāramitā . 
He always maintains awareness of all wisdom paths before him because he practices the meditation pāramitā . 
He can endure the truth that all dharmas have neither birth nor death because he practices the wisdom pāramitā . 
He can access immeasurable wisdom-knowledge because he practices the skillful-means pāramitā . 
He earnestly seeks the supreme wisdom because he practices the earnest-wish pāramitā . 
He cannot be destroyed by māras or non-Buddhist doctrines because he practices the power pāramitā . 
He knows all dharmas as they truly are because he practices the wisdom-knowledge pāramitā . 
These are the ten pāramitās that this Bodhisattva fully practices, thought after thought. 
“Likewise, thought after thought he carries out the Four Drawing-in Dharmas, the Four Supports, the Three Liberation Doors, and the Thirtyseven Elements of Bodhi. 
Thought after thought he trains to complete all of them.” **** Training to Complete All Elements of Bodhi **** Then Liberation Moon Bodhisattva asked Vajra Store Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, does a Bodhisattva train to complete all elements of bodhi on the seventh ground only, or on all ten grounds?”     Vajra Store Bodhisattva answered, “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva trains to complete all elements of bodhi on all ten grounds. 
However, his attainment on the seventh ground is the most outstanding. 
Because on the seventh ground, he completes the training that requires effort  and enters the path of wisdom and transcendental powers. 
“Buddha-Son, on the first ground, a Bodhisattva trains to complete the elements of bodhi because he vows to master the entire Buddha Dharma; on the second ground, he trains to complete the elements of bodhi because he removes his taints; on the third ground, he trains to complete the elements of bodhi because with expanding vows he acquires dharma illumination on the fourth ground, he trains to complete the elements of bodhi because he enters the right path; on the fifth ground, he trains to complete the elements of bodhi because he follows worldly ways; on the sixth ground, he trains to complete the elements of bodhi because he enters profound Dharma Doors. “On the seventh ground he trains to complete the elements of bodhi because the entire Buddha Dharma is revealed to him. 
Because, on the first through seventh grounds, a Bodhisattva arduously trains to develop his wisdom. 
Using this power, on the eighth through tenth grounds, he completes his training without effort. 
**** Neither with nor without Afflictions **** “Buddha-Son, as an analogy, there are two worlds, impure and pure. It is hard to cross their border, except for a Bodhisattva equipped with great skillful means, transcendental powers, and the power of his will. 
It is hard to cross that border, except for a Bodhisattva with great wisdom, skillful means, and the power of his great vows.”     Liberation Moon Bodhisattva asked, “Buddha-Son, is the training of a Bodhisattva on the seventh ground impure or pure?”     Vajra Store Bodhisattva answered, “Buddha-Son, on the first through seventh grounds, a Bodhisattva’s training is free from karmas driven by his afflictions because he transfers his merit to attaining the unsurpassed bodhi and to walking the path of equality. 
However, he has not transcended his afflictions. “Buddha-Son, as an analogy, a Wheel-Turning_King rides his precious elephant to visit the four_continents. Although he knows those in poverty and suffering, he is not tainted by their troubles. However, he has not transcended the status of a human. 
If he discards his human body, is reborn as a god in a Brahma heaven, and rides his celestial palace to visit a thousand worlds, displaying a Brahma god’s radiance and awesome virtue, then he has transcended the status of a human. 
“Buddha-Son, likewise training on the first through seventh grounds, a Bodhisattva rides his vehicle of pāramitās to visit the world. Although he knows the faults of sentient beings’ afflictions, he is not tainted by them because he travels the right path. However, he has not transcended actions driven by his afflictions. 
If he completes the training that requires effort, ascends from the seventh ground to the eighth ground, rides a pure Bodhisattva vehicle to visit the world, and remains untainted by the faults of sentient beings’ afflictions, then he has transcended his afflictions. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on the seventh ground transcends many afflictions, such as greed, but he is said to be neither with afflictions nor without afflictions. 
He is not with afflictions because they are inactive. 
He is not without afflictions because his quest for Tathāgata wisdom has not yet been fulfilled. 
**** Entering Great Bodhisattva Samādhis **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on the seventh ground, with a profound pure mind, does  body karmas, voice karmas, and mind karmas. 
He has discarded all evil karmas denounced by every Tathāgata, and he does all good karmas praised by every Tathāgata. 
Without effort he naturally applies all worldly doctrines and skills that he has acquired on the fifth ground. 
This Bodhisattva is an illuminated teacher in the Three-Thousand_Large_Thousandfold_World. His profound mind and wonderful actions are unsurpassed, except by those of Tathāgatas, and Bodhisattvas on higher grounds. “All meditations, samādhis, samāpattis, spiritual powers, and liberations are revealed to him. 
However, these attainments come from training, not as karmic requitals to him  when he abides on the eighth ground. 
On the seventh ground, thought after thought this Bodhisattva fully cultivates his applied wisdom and trains to complete all elements of bodhi. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this ground enters great Bodhisattva samādhis, including the Samādhi of Good Observations, the Samādhi of Good Choice of Meanings, the Samādhi of Supreme Wisdom, the Samādhi of the Store of Differentiated Meanings, the Samādhi of Correct Differentiations of Meanings, the Samādhi of Abiding in the Firm Roots , the Samādhi of Wisdom and Transcendental Powers, the Samādhi of Karmas in the Dharma Realm, the Samādhi of the Tathāgata Victory, and the Samādhi of the Store of Meanings of Saṁsāra and Nirvāṇa. To purify and cultivate this ground, he enters a million such samādhis that reveal to him great wisdom and transcendental powers. 
This Bodhisattva attains these samādhis because he excels in purifying and cultivating his applied wisdom and because of the power of his great compassion. He transcends the ground of riders of the Two Vehicles and heads for the ground of Buddha wisdom. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this ground excels in purifying his training in doing immeasurable body karmas, voice karmas, and mind karmas, free from appearances. 
He thus acquires the radiance of Endurance in the Realization of the No Birth of Dharmas.” **** Surpassing Riders of the Two Vehicles **** Liberation Moon Bodhisattva asked, “Buddha-Son, even for a Bodhisattva on the first ground, have his body, voice, and mind karmas not already transcended those of riders of the Two Vehicles?”     Vajra Store Bodhisattva answered, “Buddha-Son, yes, they have. 
However, it is because of his aspiration to seek the Buddha Dharma, not because of the power of his wisdom developed from observation. 
On the seventh ground, this Bodhisattva’s karmas surpass those of riders of the Two Vehicles because of the power of his wisdom. 
“As an analogy, a prince is born from the queen into the royal family, and he is fully endowed with kingly features. As soon as he is born, he surpasses all ministers. However, it is because of the king’s power, not his own power. After he has grown up and completed his training in all areas, he surpasses all others because of his own power. 
“Likewise, as soon as a Bodhisattva resolves to seek the great Dharma, he surpasses all voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas. 
However, on the seventh ground, he surpasses all riders of the Two Vehicles because of the power of his wisdom. 
**** Abiding in Nirvāṇa but Not Entering Nirvāṇa **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this seventh ground goes far and deep, and shuns inaction. Doing  body, voice, and mind karmas, he diligently seeks the unsurpassed bodhi, never giving up. 
Therefore, although his mind abides in nirvāṇa, he does not enter nirvāṇa.”     Liberation Moon Bodhisattva asked, “Buddha-Son, on what ground can a Bodhisattva enter the Samādhi of Nirvāṇa?”     Vajra Store Bodhisattva answered, “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva on the sixth ground can enter the Samādhi of Nirvāṇa. 
On the seventh ground, thought after thought he can enter or exit this samādhi without entering nirvāṇa. 
Therefore, this Bodhisattva is accomplished in inconceivable  body, voice, and mind karmas, and he abides in the true reality of dharmas but does not enter nirvāṇa. 
As an analogy, someone sails a ship across the ocean. Through the power of his skills and knowledge, he averts water disasters. 
Likewise a Bodhisattva on the seventh ground sails the ship of pāramitās across the ocean of true reality. Through the power of his vows, he does not enter nirvāṇa. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva has acquired this samādhi and the power of wisdom. Although he manifests his birth and death by skillful means, he abides in nirvāṇa. 
Although he is surrounded by retinues, he is not attached to them. 
Although he is repeatedly reborn in the Three Realms of Existence through the power of his vows, he is not tainted by worldly ways. 
Although his mind abides in nirvāṇa , by skillful means it still glows, though it does not blaze. 
Although he follows Buddha wisdom, he may visit the ground of voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas. 
Although he has acquired the Dharma store of Buddhas, he may manifest māra states. 
Although he has transcended the path of māras, he may display the ways of māras. 
“Although he displays non-Buddhist ways, he never abandons the Buddha Dharma. 
Although he displays conformity with worldly ways, he constantly does supra-worldly dharmas. 
Although the magnificent things he does surpass those of Dharma protectors in eight classes—gods, dragons, gandharvas, asuras, yakṣas, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, and mahoragas—and those of humans and nonhumans, as well as those of the four god-kings , Śakra , and god-kings of Brahma heavens, he never abandons his delight in the Dharma. 
**** Training under All Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva has acquired great wisdom and abides on this FarGoing Ground. Through the power of his vows, he comes to see many Buddhas: 
hundreds of Buddhas and even hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Buddhas. 
With a magnanimous and superb mind, he reveres, honors, and praises all Buddhas, and makes offerings to Them. He offers Them life-supporting things, including clothing, food and drink, beds and bedding, and medicine. He also makes these offerings to all monks. Then he transfers his roots of goodness to his attaining anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
“Under every Buddha, he reverently hears the Dharma, accepts it, upholds it, and trains accordingly. Then he acquires radiant wisdom and the Samādhi of True Reality. 
He protects and upholds the true Dharma of Buddhas, and is praised by Them. He never flinches from the challenging questions raised by riders of the Two Vehicles. With pure endurance_of_dharmas, he benefits all sentient beings. 
“After 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas, his roots of goodness become more superb. 
As an analogy, genuine gold adorned with mixed jewels becomes more splendid and lustrous, unrivaled by other ornaments. 
Likewise, arising from applied wisdom, the roots of goodness of a Bodhisattva abiding on this seventh ground become more radiant and pure, unrivaled by those of riders of the Two Vehicles. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, sunlight, moonlight, and starlight are unexcelled, and they can dry the muddy puddles in Jambudvīpa. 
Likewise, unrivaled by riders of the Two Vehicles, a Bodhisattva on this Far-Going Ground can remove sentient beings’ afflictions, like drying muddy puddles. 
“Of the ten pāramitās, this Bodhisattva practices the seventh pāramitā, the skillful-means pāramitā , more than the other nine pāramitās. 
It is not that he refuses to practice them, but that he practices them according to his ability and at his discretion. 
**** Becoming the God-King of the Sixth Desire Heaven **** “Buddha-Son, this is a brief description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva training on the seventh ground, the Far-Going Ground. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on this ground usually becomes the god-king of the sixth desire heaven. He excels in teaching sentient beings how to develop true wisdom, and enables them to succeed. 
As he does good karmas, such as almsgiving, loving words, beneficial actions, and collaborative work , he constantly thinks of the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha, and even of acquiring sarvajña-jñāna, the knowledge of all knowledge. 
“He thinks, ‘Among all sentient beings, I should be excellent, especially excellent; wonderful, especially wonderful; superb, especially superb. To all sentient beings, I should be leader, guide, general, and teacher. I should even be the reliance for those who seek the knowledge of all knowledge.’     “If this Bodhisattva makes energetic progress, in one thought he enters 100,000 koṭi nayuta samādhis and manifests 100,000 koṭi nayuta Bodhisattvas as his retinue. 
Through the power of his excellent vows, what this Bodhisattva can do with ease far exceeds these things. 
It cannot be known by figuring for even 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas.” **** Summarizing Stanzas **** Then, to restate his meaning, Vajra Store Bodhisattva spoke in verse: On the path of samādhi and the highest wisdom-knowledge, This Bodhisattva has completed his training on the sixth ground. He immediately acquires applied wisdom, With which he enters the seventh ground. 
As he enters the Three Liberation Doors, he elicits lovingkindness and compassion. As he understands that Tathāgatas are equal, he diligently makes offerings to Them all. As he observes the emptiness of dharmas, he accumulates merit. Thus this Bodhisattva ascends to the seventh ground. 
Having transcended the Three Realms of Existence, he adorns them . Having extinguished the fire of afflictions, his mind glows . Knowing that dharmas are free from the duality , he diligently does good karmas. Understanding that the body  has no appearance, he plants the seeds of good appearances. 
He acquires understanding by observing dharmas And widely benefits those who are deluded. He enters the boundless realm of sentient beings And does the immeasurable Buddha work of teaching and transforming. 
He can enter worlds, dharmas, and kalpas, And know sentient beings’ understandings, preferences, and mental activities. Expounding without reservation the ways of the Three Vehicles, He teaches and transforms sentient beings. 
As this Bodhisattva diligently seeks the supreme bodhi, In motion or stillness, he never abandons his applied wisdom. As he transfers all his merit to attaining Buddha bodhi, He practices the ten pāramitās thought after thought. His giving his roots of goodness  is almsgiving. 
His eradication of his afflictions is observance of precepts. His not harming sentient beings is endurance of adversity. His tireless pursuit of goodness is energetic progress. His unshakable resolve to attain bodhi is meditation. 
On the fourth ground, he enters the bodhi path. On the fifth ground, he follows worldly ways. On the sixth ground, his wisdom that dharmas have no birth shines forth. On the seventh ground, he fully acquires the merit required for bodhi And makes all kinds of great vows. 
As if between two worlds , He is like a Wheel-Turning King who, though untainted by the world, Has not yet transcended the status of a human. 
Only on the eighth wisdom ground Does a Bodhisattva transcend his mental states. Then he is like the god-king of a Brahma heaven, who has transcended the status of a human, And like a lotus flower, which rises above the water, untainted. 
Although his afflictions are inactive, His yet unfulfilled quest for Buddha bodhi means that he is not without afflictions. 
He masters all worldly knowledge and skills And understands worldly texts and theories. Through training, he is accomplished in Meditation, samādhi, and transcendental powers. 
A Bodhisattva training on the seventh ground Surpasses riders of the Two Vehicles. Unlike a Bodhisattva on the first ground, who relies on his vows, He is like a prince who has fully developed his power. With such profound attainment, he continues to head for bodhi. 
His mind in nirvāṇa, he does not enter nirvāṇa, Like someone sailing a ship across the ocean, But not drowned in the water. 
No one in the world can understand The merit he acquires by taking actions with applied wisdom. As he makes offerings to many Buddhas, he mind becomes more radiant, Like genuine gold adorned with mixed jewels. 
A Bodhisattva on this ground has radiant wisdom, Like sunlight that can dry the water of one’s love . He usually becomes the god-king of the sixth desire heaven, And always teaches and guides sentient beings to acquire true wisdom. 
If he makes energetic progress, he enters many samādhis and sees many Buddhas, Numbering 100,000 koṭi nayuta. Through the power of his vows, what he can do with ease far exceeds these things. 
This is the Far-Going Bodhisattva Ground, The pure path of wisdom and skillful means. No god, human, voice-hearer, Or Pratyekabuddha in the entire world can know it. 
*** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 37 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  ***** **** The Eighth Ground, the Motionless Ground **** At that time the god-king  and the multitude of gods Were delighted to have heard the excellent training . As an offering to the Tathāgata And innumerable great Bodhisattvas, They showered down flowers, banners, canopies, Fragrances, chaplets, necklaces, and exquisite garments, In countless millions of varieties, All adorned with jewels. 
Goddess-daughters played celestial music, Emitting various wonderful tones As an offering to the Buddha and Buddha-sons. They praised in unison with these words: “The all-seeing one, the most honored one among gods and humans, Out of compassion for sentient beings, displayed his spiritual power, Enabling us to hear the wonderful tones of Various kinds of celestial music. 
On the tip of a hair there are worlds as numerous as The dust particles in 100,000 koṭi nayuta worlds, Where reside innumerable Buddhas, Who expound the wondrous Dharma. 
Inside each pore  there are countless worlds, Each containing four continents and  immense oceans, Which encircle Mount Sumeru and are encircled by the iron mountain range . 
All worlds are not crowded . On the tip of a hair there are the six life-paths, Three evil ones , Which are taken by sentient beings, such as gods, asuras, humans, and dragons, As requitals for their karmas. 
In each of these worlds there is A Tathāgata, who emits wondrous sounds, Turning the supreme, pure Dharma wheel According to sentient beings’ minds. 
Each world contains sentient beings with different bodies, And each body contains various worlds. Sentient beings that take different life-paths, such as gods and humans, are different, And their Buddha knows all their differences and expounds the Dharma to them. 
At His thought, a big world changes into a small one, And a small world changes into a big one. 
Then, with great joy all fell silent And single-mindedly gazed upon the Buddha, hoping to hear His teachings. 
Then Liberation Moon Bodhisattva requested Vajra Store Bodhisattva, “All in this multitude are now quiet. 
I pray that you will describe The features of the training on the eighth ground.” **** Acquiring the Foremost Endurance **** Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva told Liberation Moon Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva on the seventh ground excels in cultivating applied wisdom, purifying his actions, and training to complete the elements of bodhi. 
He excels in purifying his profound mind and thoughts, and acquires merit and wisdom. He elicits great lovingkindness and great compassion, and never abandons sentient beings. “He enters the path to immeasurable wisdom and realizes the true reality of all dharmas, seeing that, as always, they have no birth, no arising, no appearance, no formation, no destruction, no ending, and no change. Having no self-essence, they are equal before, during, and after . 
**** All Efforts of Body, Voice, and Mind Are No Longer Needed **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva who has acquired this endurance immediately enters the eighth ground, the Motionless Ground , and becomes a Bodhisattva of profound action, whose attainment is hard to know. He has left behind all differentiations, appearances, perceptions, and attachments. No voice-hearer or Pratyekabuddha can compare with him. All mental noises having ended, quietness is revealed to him. 
“As an analogy, a bhikṣu with transcendental powers is in command of his mind. He enters samādhi one after another into  the Samādhi of Total Halt, during which all mental activities, such as thinking, memory, and differentiation, come to a halt. 
Likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abiding on the Motionless Ground leaves behind all training that requires effort. His body, voice, and mind remaining motionless, he has acquired the effortless way as requital for past effort. 
“As an analogy, someone dreams of swimming across a wide river. He applies bold valor and skillful means, which wake him up. Upon waking, all his efforts come to an end. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva, who is resolved to rescue sentient beings in the four torrential flows, summons bold valor and makes energetic progress. 
Because of these efforts, he reaches the Motionless Ground. 
Upon arrival, all his efforts come to an end, and the two trainings and all perceptual activities are no longer in motion. 
“Buddha-Son, for someone reborn as a god in the Brahma World, desire-realm afflictions no longer arise in him. 
For this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, even the Bodhisattva mind, the Buddha mind, the bodhi mind, and the nirvāṇa mind no longer arise, much less the worldly mind. 
**** Seven Guiding Instructions from All Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, for a Bodhisattva on this ground, because of the power of his original vows, all Buddha-Bhagavāns appear before him and give him Tathāgata wisdom, enabling him to enter the Dharma stream. They say these words: ‘Very good! 
Very good! Good man, this Endurance  is foremost in accord with the Buddha Dharma. 
However, you have not yet acquired a Buddha’s Ten Powers, Four Fearlessnesses, and Eighteen Exclusive Dharmas. To acquire these abilities, you should make energetic progress and never abandon this door of endurance. 
“‘Moreover, good man, although you have attained nirvāṇa and achieved liberation, ordinary beings have not done so. All kinds of afflictions arise in them, and all kinds of perceptions drive them. You should pity them. 
“‘Moreover, good man, you should remember your original vows to benefit all sentient beings and enable them to enter the inconceivable wisdom door. 
“‘Moreover, good man, whether or not a Buddha appears in the world, dharma nature ever abides, without change. Buddhas are called Tathāgatas not solely on account of their realization of the changelessness of dharma nature, because riders of the Two_Vehicles too can realize that dharma nature has no differentiation. 
“‘Moreover, good man, you should observe our sublime physical appearances, immeasurable wisdom, countless Buddha Lands, countless skillful means, immeasurable radiance, immeasurable purity, and immeasurable sounds. 
“‘Moreover, good man, you now have acquired just one kind of dharma illumination,  all dharmas have no birth and no difference. 
Good man, a Tathāgata’s dharma illumination includes countless entrances, countless ways, and immeasurable variations, which cannot be known by figuring for 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas. 
You should train to acquire such illumination. 
“‘Moreover, good man, you should observe in the ten_directions the differences among countless worlds, innumerable sentient beings, and immeasurable dharmas. 
You should know these things as they truly are.’     “Buddha-Son, Buddhas-Bhagavāns thus give this Bodhisattva countless wisdomproducing doors, enabling him to do various karmas guided by wisdom. 
**** Doing Wisdom-Guided Karmas without Effort **** “Buddha-Son, if Buddhas did not give this Bodhisattva wisdom-producing doors, he would immediately enter nirvāṇa and give up doing karmas to benefit sentient beings. 
However, because Buddhas give him countless, boundless wisdom-producing doors, his wisdom-guided karmas that arise in one thought surpass his karmas done since his initial resolve  by training through the first seven grounds. By comparison, the latter karmas are less than one hundredth, one thousandth, one hundred-thousandth, one koṭith, one nayutath, one asaṁkhyeyath, and one kalā of the former, or less than the former karmas by any analogy, calculation, or upaniṣad  measure. 
“Why? 
Buddha-Son, because this Bodhisattva, who began his training with one body, is now on this eighth ground. Using the motionless way, he manifests innumerable bodies, emits countless sounds, acquires immeasurable wisdom, manifests innumerable births, visits countless pure worlds, teaches innumerable sentient beings, makes offerings to innumerable Buddhas, enters countless Dharma Doors, masters immeasurable transcendental powers, attends assemblies in countless different bodhimaṇḍas, does immeasurable body, voice, and mind karmas, and does all Bodhisattva training. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, someone wants to sail a ship across the ocean. Before entering the ocean, he expends a great deal of effort . 
After he has entered the ocean, he sails away with the wind, without using human power. The distance he covers in one day surpasses the distance he would travel for one hundred years to get to the ocean. 
Buddha-Son, likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva develops great roots_of_goodness and gathers abundant provisions in order to sail the ship of Mahāyāna in the ocean of great wisdom, which is sailed by all Bodhisattvas. Using his wisdom-knowledge of effortlessness, in one thought he enters the realm of  knowledge of all knowledge. He cannot achieve this in 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas by doing training that requires effort. 
**** Acquiring the Differentiating Wisdom-Knowledge of All Things **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this eighth ground uses his great applied wisdom to do effortless training in observing all things in the realm of all wisdom-knowledge. 
He observes the formation of a world, the destruction of a world, the convergence of karmas that results in its formation, and the dissipation of karmas that results in its destruction. 
He also knows the appearances of each of the four domains—earth, water, fire, and wind—such as small, large, immeasurable, and diverse. He knows all things as they truly are. “He also knows the appearances of dust particles, such as fine, coarse, immeasurable, and diverse. 
He knows all the dust particles gathered in a world, and their differences, as they truly are. 
He also knows the number of dust particles in each of the four domains—earth, water, fire, and wind—in any world. 
He also knows the number of dust particles contained in a treasure  and those contained in a world. He also knows the number of dust particles contained in a sentient being’s body, large or small, whether it is the body of a hell-dweller, an animal, a hungry ghost, an asura, a god, or a human. Thus he acquires the differentiating wisdom-knowledge of dust particles. 
“He also knows the formation of the desire realm, the form realm, and the formless realm, as well as their destruction. He also knows the appearances of the desire realm, the form realm, and the formless realm, such as small, large, immeasurable, and diverse. Thus he acquires the differentiating wisdomknowledge for observing the Three_Realms_of_Existence. 
**** Manifesting Different Bodies to Teach Sentient Beings **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva then uses his radiant wisdom-knowledge to teach and transform sentient beings. 
He excels in differentiating sentient beings’ bodies and knows well their differences. 
He excels in observing their birth places, manifests himself according to their needs, and teaches and transforms them until they come to  achievement. 
“This Bodhisattva, using his radiant wisdom-knowledge, universally manifests his births in one Three-Thousand_Large_Thousandfold_World according to sentient beings’ different levels of faith and understanding. 
In the same way he universally manifests his births in two, three, 100,000, and even countless Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold Worlds, according to sentient beings’ different levels of faith and understanding. 
Because of his attainment in such wisdom, as his body remains motionless in one Buddha Land, he manifests different bodies in assemblies in countless Buddha Lands. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva manifests different bodies in assemblies in Buddha Lands according to sentient beings’ different levels of faith and understanding. 
Among śramaṇas, he manifests as a śramaṇa. 
Among Brahmins, he manifests as a Brahmin; among kṣatriyas, he manifests as a kṣatriya; among vaiśyas, he manifests as a vaiśya; among śūdras, he manifests as a śūdra. In the same way he manifests himself in compatible bodies among laymen; among gods —the first desire heaven ruled by the four godkings, Trayastriṁsa_Heaven , Yāma Heaven , Tuṣita Heaven , Nirmāṇa-rati Heaven , and Paranirmita-vaśa-vartin Heaven —among māras; and among gods in the Brahma World, including those in Akaniṣṭha_Heaven . 
“He manifests as a voice-hearer for those who should be delivered by a voice-hearer; as a Pratyekabuddha for those who should be delivered by a Pratyekabuddha; as a Bodhisattva for those who should be delivered by a Bodhisattva; as a Tathāgata for those who should be delivered by a Tathāgata. 
Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva manifests bodies in countless Buddha Lands according to sentient beings’ different preferences and levels of faith. 
**** Abiding in the Equality of Bodies and Knowing Their Differences **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva is free from perception of differences in bodies and abides in their equality. 
Yet he knows all bodies: the body of a world, a sentient being’s body, a karmic requital body, a voice-hearer’s body, a Pratyekabuddha’s body, a Bodhisattva’s body, a Tathāgata’s body, the wisdom body, the dharma body, and the body of the open sky. 
“This Bodhisattva knows sentient beings’ preferences and can make a sentient being’s body become his own body, a karmic requital body, the body of a world, or even the body of the open sky. 
According to sentient beings’ preferences, he can make the body of a world become his own body, a sentient being’s body, a karmic requital body, or even the body of the open sky; he can make a karmic requital body become his own body, a sentient being’s body, the body of a world, or even the body of the open sky; he can make his own body become a sentient being’s body, the body of a world, or even the body of the open sky. 
According to sentient beings’ preferences, this Bodhisattva manifests suitable bodies because he knows a sentient being’s karma-accumulating body, karmic requital body, affliction-ridden body, physical body, and non-physical body. 
He also knows that a Tathātaga’s body includes  the wisdom body. 
“He knows the appearances of the wisdom body, such as pondering, making choices, training for a result, and differentiating worldly and supra-worldly dharmas. He also knows the differences among the Three_Vehicles, such as their features in common and not in common, liberating and not liberating, and the appearances of riders who are still learning and those of riders with nothing more to learn.     “He knows the features of the dharma body, such as its equality , its indestructibility, its different false names that follow the times and convention, its different appearances as sentient and nonsentient beings, and its different features as the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha. He knows the features of the open sky, such as immeasurable, pervasive, formless, changeless, boundless, and revealing the appearances of physical objects. **** Achieving Command of Ten Things **** “Buddha-Son, because this Bodhisattva has acquired great wisdom-knowledge of various bodies, he achieves command of ten things: 
wisdom-knowledge. In command of these ten things, he is called the one with inconceivable wisdom-knowledge, the one with immeasurable wisdom-knowledge, the one with vast wisdom-knowledge, and the one with indestructible wisdom-knowledge. **** Doing Faultless Karmas **** “With such attainment, this Bodhisattva does faultless body karmas, voice karmas, and mind karmas because his body, voice, and mind karmas follow his wisdom, and because of his advanced practice of the wisdom pāramitā . 
Led by great compassion and equipped with skillful means, he excels in differentiating dharmas and making great vows. Protected by the power of Buddhas, he diligently acquires wisdom-knowledge to benefit sentient beings and differentiate all things in countless worlds. 
“Buddha-Son, whatever body, voice, and mind karmas are done by this Bodhisattva, abiding on the Motionless Ground, can bring forth the entire Buddha Dharma. 
**** Abiding in Ten Powers **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva on this ground abides in ten powers: 
the power of Tathāgatas’ support because sarvajña-jñāna, the knowledge of all knowledge, is revealed to him. 
This Bodhisattva has acquired great power of wisdom-knowledge, and he can display all his actions, which have no faults. 
**** Names of the Eighth Bodhisattva Ground **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva wisdom ground is called the Motionless Ground because it is indestructible; it is called the Irreversible Ground because his wisdom never regresses; it is called the Hard-to-Reach Ground because no one in the world can imagine its state; it is called the Truthfulness-of-Youth Ground because he is free from faults; it is called the Birth Ground because it is the beginning of doing everything without effort; it is called the Completion Ground because he has completed his training that requires effort; it is called the Ultimate Ground because his wisdom makes right choices; it is called the Manifestation Ground because he manifests things at will; it is called the  Supported Ground because no one can move it; it is called the Effortless Ground because all efforts have been made. 
**** Entering the Realm of Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva, who has acquired great wisdom, enters the realm of Buddhas, follows Their awesome deportments, and is illuminated by  Their virtues. As the realm of Buddhas is revealed to him, he is constantly protected and remembered by Tathāgatas. He is welcomed by Brahmakings, the god-king Śakra, and the four god-kings, and is attended by two strong vajra-wielding guards. He never abandons great samādhis and can manifest innumerable different bodies, each equipped with great powers. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva thus enters Mahāyāna assemblies, masters great transcendental powers, emits vast radiance, and enters the hindrance-free dharma realm. He knows the differences among worlds, displays his great merits, and does whatever he wishes with ease. He understands the past and future, and knows how to subjugate all māras. He enters deeply into the realm of Tathāgatas and does Bodhisattva training in countless worlds. 
**** Training under All Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this Motionless Ground, through his samādhi power, comes to see innumerable Buddhas, and constantly attends Them and makes offerings to Them. 
In every kalpa and every world, this Bodhisattva sees innumerable hundreds of Buddhas, innumerable thousands of Buddhas, and even innumerable hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Buddhas. He reveres, honors, and attends Them, and offers Them life-supporting things. 
“Under every Buddha, he acquires the store of the profound Dharma and receives immeasurable dharma illumination, such as  the differences among worlds. 
If faced with challenging questions, such as the differences among worlds, he is never at a loss. 
“After countless hundreds of kalpas, countless thousands of kalpas, or even countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of kalpas, his roots of goodness become more radiant and pure. 
As an analogy, the precious crown of the king of Jambudvīpa, made of genuine gold, is unrivaled by the ornaments of his ministers and subjects. 
Likewise the roots of goodness of a Bodhisattva on this ground are unrivaled by those of riders of the Two Vehicles and even those of Bodhisattvas on the seventh ground. the radiance of his great wisdom on this ground universally dispels the darkness of sentient beings’ afflictions and opens the wisdom door . 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the great Brahma-king , who rules a thousand worlds, can fill those worlds with his universal lovingkindness and radiance. 
Likewise a Bodhisattva on this ground can emit radiance to illuminate worlds as numerous as the dust particles in a million Buddha Lands, enabling sentient beings to extinguish the fire of their afflictions and acquire coolness. 
It is not that he refuses to practice them, but that he practices them according to his ability and at his discretion. 
“This is a brief description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva training on the eighth ground, the Motionless Ground. 
An extensive explanation cannot be finished in countless kalpas. 
**** Becoming the Great Brahma-King of the Second Dhyāna Heaven **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abiding on this ground usually becomes the great Brahma-king , who rules a thousand worlds. With supreme ease, he well expounds the meanings . He can indicate the path of pāramitās to voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and Bodhisattvas. 
If he is challenged by the question about the differences among worlds, he is never at a loss. 
As he carries out almsgiving, loving words, beneficial actions, and collaborative work , he constantly thinks of the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha, and even of acquiring sarvajña-jñāna, the knowledge of all knowledge. 
“He thinks, ‘Among all sentient beings, I should be excellent, especially excellent; wonderful, especially wonderful; superb, especially superb. To all sentient beings, I should be leader, guide, general, and teacher. I should even be the reliance for those who seek the knowledge of all knowledge.’     “If this Bodhisattva makes energetic progress, in one thought he enters samādhis as numerous as the dust particles in a million Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold Worlds and manifests, as his retinue, Bodhisattvas as numerous as the dust particles in those worlds. 
Through the power of his excellent vows, what this Bodhisattva can do with ease far exceeds these things. 
It cannot be known by figuring for even 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas.” **** Summarizing Stanzas **** Then, to restate his meaning, Vajra Store Bodhisattva spoke in verse: On the seventh ground, a Bodhisattva cultivates applied wisdom And trains to complete the elements of bodhi. Supported by the World-Honored_One, Seeking superb wisdom, he ascends to the eighth ground. 
He accumulates merit and exudes lovingkindness and compassion, His wisdom as vast as the open sky. From hearing the Dharma, he has acquired the power of resolve. Thus he realizes nirvāṇa and acquires Endurance in the Realization of the No Birth of Dharmas. 
He knows that dharmas have neither birth nor death, Neither completion nor destruction, nor change. Apart from existence , they are equal, free from differentiation. Beyond one’s perception, they abide as does the sky. 
Having acquired this endurance, he transcends all ludicrous doctrines. His profound mind remains motionless, abiding in nirvāṇa, A state unknown to all in the world. 
Having left behind perceptions and attachments, Abiding on this eighth ground, he makes no differentiations, Like a bhikṣu who has entered the Samādhi of Total Halt, Like someone awakened from his dream of crossing a river, And like a Brahma god, who has no desire-realm afflictions. 
Because of the power of his original vows, Buddhas praise his endurance, Pour sweet dew on his head, and give him guiding instructions: “You have not yet acquired what we have, So you should make energetic progress. 
Although you have extinguished the fire of your afflictions, The fire of afflictions of all in the world is still ablaze. You should always remember your original vows to deliver sentient beings And to enable them to produce the causes of their liberation. 
The realization that the nature of dharmas is true_suchness, apart from one’s thoughts, Is attainable by riders of the Two Vehicles. One becomes a World-Honored One not because of this attainment, But because one acquires the profound hindrance-free wisdom knowledge.” Hence Buddhas, who are worthy of offerings from gods and humans, give him This wisdom-knowledge and instruct him to make observations. Thus he acquires the boundless Buddha Dharma and, In one thought, transcends all his past training. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on this wisdom ground Acquires vast transcendental powers. In one thought he manifests bodies everywhere  in the ten directions, Like a ship sailing effortlessly in the ocean with the wind. 
Through the power of his wisdom-knowledge, Without effort he knows the formation, continuation, and destruction of worlds, Their sizes, and their immeasurable differences, As well as the differences of the Three Realms of Existence. 
He also knows the differences among worlds contained in the Three Thousand Large Thousandfold World, among the four domains , And among sentient beings that make the six life-journeys. Observing with his wisdom-knowledge without missing anything, He even knows the number of dust particles contained in a treasure. 
This Bodhisattva knows all kinds of bodies. To transform sentient beings, he manifests bodies compatible with theirs. There are worlds with immeasurable differences, And he appears in all of them. 
As the sun and the moon abide in the open sky, Casting their reflections in all bodies of water, Likewise he abides without motion in the dharma realm, And manifests bodies everywhere at will. 
According to the different minds and preferences of multitudes, He manifests himself in their midst, As a voice-hearer, a Pratyekabuddha, a Bodhisattva, Or even a Buddha. 
All kinds of bodies are equal, such as the body of a world, a sentient being’s body, A karmic requital body, a holy one’s body, the wisdom body, The dharma body, and the body of the open sky. He manifests all kinds of bodies to benefit sentient beings. 
Using ten kinds of wisdom-knowledge, he makes observations. Out of lovingkindness and compassion, he does  karmas. He masters the entire Buddha Dharma And observes the precepts as resolutely as Mount Sumeru stands motionless. 
He acquires ten indestructible powers, And no māra can sway him. He is protected and remembered by Buddhas, welcomed by god-kings, And attended by two strong vajra-wielding guards. 
The virtues of this ground are immeasurable, And cannot be described in 100,000 koṭi kalpas. As he makes offerings to all Buddhas, his radiance is like that of The gold crown on a king’s head. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on the eighth ground usually becomes The great Brahma-king , who rules a thousand worlds. He endlessly expounds the Three Vehicles And emits the radiance of lovingkindness to remove sentient beings’ afflictions. 
In one thought he enters samādhis As numerous as the dust particles in a million worlds, And does his Bodhisattva work in the same way. Through the power of his vows, what he can do far exceeds these things. 
I have briefly described to you all The eighth Bodhisattva ground, the Motionless Ground. An extensive explanation Cannot be finished in a koṭi kalpas. 
**** The Ninth Ground, the Good Wisdom Ground **** When the eighth Bodhisattva ground was being expounded, The Tathāgata displayed His great transcendental powers, Which shook countless koṭis of worlds In the ten directions. 
The body of the unsurpassed honored omniscient one Emitted vast radiance, Which illuminated countless worlds And gave sentient beings peace and joy. 
Innumerable hundreds of thousands of koṭis of Bodhisattvas Jumped up into the open sky and stood there. To the foremost expounder , they made wonderful offerings That surpassed all celestial offerings. 
The god-king Maheśvara  and the god-king of Paranirmita-vaśa-vartin Heaven  Were both filled with immeasurable joy. They each made all kinds of offerings To the  deep ocean of virtue. 
Ten million koṭi goddess-daughters, Whose body and mind were filled with joy, Played countless kinds of music As an offering to the great guiding teacher to gods and men. 
As all kinds of music, in a billion koṭi wonderful tones, Were performed in concert, Through the awesome spiritual power of the Sugata, The goddess-daughters praised in unison: “Quiet, gentle, and taint free, A Bodhisattva excels in training on whatever ground he has entered. His mind like the open sky, he visits worlds in the ten directions And widely expounds the Buddha Dharma to enlighten sentient beings. 
Everywhere in heaven and on earth, There is unexcelled splendor Produced by the merits of the Tathāgata , So that viewers may delight in Buddha wisdom. 
Having ended the sounds, words, and thoughts in his mind, He expounds the Dharma with sounds like echoes. 
For those with a lowly mind, He teaches them the voice-hearer path. 
For those who have a clear mind and delight in Pratyekabuddhahood, He teaches them the path of the Middle Vehicle. 
For those who have lovingkindness and compassion and delight in benefiting others, He teaches them the Bodhisattva Way. 
For those with a superb wisdom-mind, He reveals to them the unsurpassed Dharma of Tathāgatas. 
Though a magician performs many tricks, The conjured shapes and forms are unreal. 
Likewise Bodhisattva wisdom artfully manifests illusory things, Which are apart from existence and nonexistence.” Thus in millions of beautiful tones, the multitude of goddess daughters sang songs in praise of the Buddha, Then with great joy fell silent. 
Liberation Moon Bodhisattva requested Vajra Store Bodhisattva, “This multitude is pure. 
I pray that you will describe the training on the ninth ground.” **** Entering the Ninth Ground **** Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva told Liberation Moon Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva ponders and observes with immeasurable wisdom because he seeks nirvāṇa, liberation, and Tathāgata wisdom. He enters into the secrets of Tathāgatas, ponders the nature of Their inconceivable great wisdom, purifies dhāraṇī doors and samādhi doors, masters vast transcendental powers, enters the realm of differentiations, trains for the Ten Powers, the Four Fearlessnesses, and the Eighteen Exclusive Dharmas, follows Buddhas to turn the Dharma wheel, and abandons neither his great compassion nor his original vows. Then this Bodhisattva enters the ninth ground, the Good Wisdom Ground ]. 
**** Acquiring Wisdom-Knowledge of Sentient Beings **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abiding on this Good Wisdom Ground knows dharmas as they truly are, such as good, evil, or neither; worldly or supraworldly; conceivable or inconceivable; definite or indefinite; saṁskṛta or asaṁskṛta. He also knows the ways of voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and Bodhisattvas. He also knows the Tathāgata Ground. 
“With such wisdom, this Bodhisattva truly knows sentient beings’ minds, afflictions, karmas, capacities, understandings, natures, preferences, dormant afflictions , rebirths, and habits, each of which is like a dense forest, as well as their three groups, also like a dense forest. 
Their Minds     “This Bodhisattva knows the features of sentient beings’ minds, such as mixed arising; rapidly changing; perishing or not perishing; intangible; boundless; pure; tainted or untainted; fettered or unfettered; illusory; matching their life forms. 
He knows a billion koṭi and even countless features of minds as they truly are. 
Their Afflictions     “He knows the features of sentient beings’ afflictions, such as ever following ; endlessly arising; never abandoned throughout life; essentially the same, dormant or active; responsive or unresponsive to the mind; accompanying each rebirth to make a life-journey; different in the Three Realms of Existence; including love, wrong views, delusion, and arrogance, which are deeply lodged, like an arrow; continuing endlessly as the cause of the three karmas . He even knows 84,000 features of afflictions as they truly are. 
Their karmas     “He knows the features of sentient beings’ karmas as they truly are, such as good, evil, or neither; with or without signs; arising inseparably with the mind; never failing to bring corresponding requitals in the right order, though each karma is gone instantly; producing or not producing requitals; functioning as an immeasurable field; yielding corresponding requitals: black, white, or neither; different among ordinary beings and among holy beings; bringing requitals in the present, next, or a future life; bringing definite or indefinite requitals to those riding and those not riding  the Three Vehicles. He even knows 84,000 features of karmas as they truly are. 
Their Capacities     “He also knows the features of sentient beings’ capacities, such as weak, middling, or strong; different or same from past to future; low, middling, or high ]; inseparably together with afflictions; definite or indefinite for those riding and those not riding  the Three Vehicles; mature or immature; changing and declining with the six_faculties; excellent and indestructible; regressing or not regressing; different because each rebirth is a karmic requital. 
He even knows 84,000 features of capacities as they truly are. 
Their Understandings, Natures, and Preferences     “He also knows the features of sentient beings’ understandings, such as weak, middling, or strong; their natures, such as weak, middling, or strong; their preferences, such as weak, middling, or strong. 
He even knows 84,000 features  as they truly are. Their Dormant Afflictions     “He also knows the features of sentient beings’ dormant afflictions, such as inborn with the profound mind ; born with the mind; responsive or unresponsive to the mind; always accompanying ; never uprooted since time without a beginning; impeding meditation, samādhi, samāpatti, liberation, and transcendental powers; continuing the bondage of repeated rebirth in the Three Realms of Existence; causing endless mental activities to arise; opening the doors of the six faculties; hard to uproot; active or inactive on the Bodhisattva grounds; possible to eradicate only by taking the holy path. 
Their Rebirths     “He also knows the various features of sentient beings’ rebirths, such as reborn according to karma; reborn to make one of the six life-journeys; reborn with or without form; reborn with or without perception; reborn like a sprout germinated from the seed stored in consciousness, in the field of karmas, watered by love , and shrouded by ignorance; reborn with and inseparable from name and form ; reborn with delusion, and love of continued existence; reborn with attachment, without a beginning in time, to life and sensory experiences; reborn with attachment to the Three Realms of Existence. 
Their Habits     “He also knows the features of sentient beings’ habits, such as active or inactive; formed on a life-journey; formed by following the ways of other sentient beings; formed by following afflictions and karmas; formed by following good, evil, and neutral ways; formed to carry into subsequent lives; formed gradually in some kind of order; formed to last, so long as afflictions have not been eradicated; formed strong or weak; formed by seeing, hearing, and staying close to voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, or Bodhisattvas. Their Three Groups     “He also knows the ways of sentient beings, by which he classifies sentient beings into three groups: the group that is indecisive about its path. Those who cultivate the Five Roots fall into the first group; those who commit the five rebellious_sins fall into the second group; those who do neither fall into the third group. 
Those who follow the Eightfold_Right_Path fall into the first group; those who follow the eight_evil_ways fall into the second group; those who do neither fall into the third group. Those who walk the holy path fall into the first group; those who are deeply attached to the evil ways fall into the second group; those who do neither fall into the third group. Those who hold the right views fall into the first group; those who hold the wrong views fall into the second group; those who hold neither kind of views fall into the third group. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva who has acquired such wisdom is said to be abiding on the Good Wisdom Ground. 
Using his knowledge of the differences in sentient beings’ ways, he teaches and tames them, enabling them to achieve liberation. 
**** Expounding the Dharma **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva excels in expounding the ways of the Voice-Hearer Vehicle, the Pratyekabuddha Vehicle, the Bodhisattva Vehicle, and the Tathāgata Ground. Whatever he does, he does with wisdom. 
He teaches sentient beings differently according to their capacities, natures, preferences, and understandings, and according to which group they belong. He expounds the Dharma according to their life-paths, afflictions, dormant afflictions, fetters, karmas, and habits, enabling them to believe and understand, to expand their wisdom, and to achieve liberation by riding  the Three Vehicles. 
**** Using the Four Kinds of Unimpeded Wisdom-Knowledge **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this Good Wisdom Ground becomes a great Dharma master and acts accordingly. He excels in guarding and protecting the Dharma store of Tathāgatas. From his immeasurable applied wisdom arise the Four Kinds_of_Unimpeded_Wisdom-Knowledge. 
When he expounds the Dharma with a Bodhisattva’s words, he always employs these Four Kinds of Unimpeded WisdomKnowledge, never without them, even temporarily. 
What are these four? They are unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of  eloquent teaching. 
“Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of dharmas, this Bodhisattva knows their individual features. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of their meanings, he knows the differences in their features. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of all forms of expression, he speaks without mistakes. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of eloquent teaching, he explains that dharmas successively appear without interruption. 
“Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of dharmas, he knows their true reality . 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of their meanings, he knows their birth and death. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of all forms of expression, he establishes all dharmas and does not destroy their false names. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of eloquent teaching, he endlessly explains dharmas as established without denouncing them. 
“Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of dharmas, he knows the differences among present dharmas. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of their meanings, he knows the differences among past dharmas and among future dharmas. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of all forms of expression, he explains past, present, and future dharmas without mistakes. 
Using his unimpeded wisdomknowledge of eloquent teaching, he clearly explains countless dharmas in the past, present, and future. 
“Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of dharmas, he knows their differences. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of their meanings, he knows the differences among their meanings. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of all forms of expression, he uses the right words and sounds. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of eloquent teaching, he speaks according to the pleasure of his mind. 
“Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of dharmas, he knows that all differences  are no different. 
Using his unimpeded wisdomknowledge of their meanings, he knows that all differences found through comparison are truly differences. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of all forms of expression, he explains all differences according to worldly knowledge. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of eloquent teaching, he skillfully speaks in accord with the highest truth. 
“Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of dharmas, he knows that dharmas have the indestructible one appearance . 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of their meanings, he knows the workings of the five aggregates, the twelve_fields, and the eighteen_spheres, as well as the Four Noble_Truths and the dependent arising . 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of all forms of expression, he uses beautiful words and sounds that are easily understood by the world. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of eloquent teaching, he provides increasingly excellent explanations, giving sentient beings boundless dharma illumination. 
“Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of dharmas, he knows that the One Vehicle is founded on the equality of all dharmas. 
Using his unimpeded wisdomknowledge of their meanings, he knows the differences among the Three Vehicles. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of all forms of expression, he explains that all vehicles are no different. Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of eloquent teaching, he explains the countless features of each vehicle. 
“Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of dharmas, he knows all Bodhisattva actions, wisdom actions, and dharma actions, which follow his wisdom. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of their meanings, he knows the differences in the meanings of the Ten Grounds. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of all forms of expression, he teaches that all grounds are no different. Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of eloquent teaching, he describes the countless features of training on each ground. 
“Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of dharmas, he knows that all Tathāgatas attain true enlightenment in one thought. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of their meanings, he knows the differences in such an event transpiring at various times and in various places. 
Using his unimpeded wisdomknowledge of all forms of expression, he expounds different practices that lead to true enlightenment. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of eloquent teaching, he unceasingly explains each phrase in the Dharma for countless kalpas. 
“Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of dharmas, he knows a Tathāgata’s words, Ten Powers, Four Fearlessnesses, Eighteen Exclusive Dharmas, great lovingkindness and compassion, eloquence, skillful means, and turning of the Dharma wheel, all of which arise from His  knowledge of all knowledge. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of their meanings, he knows that a Tathāgata emits different sounds according to the minds, ways, capacities, and understandings of 84,000 kinds of sentient beings. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of all forms of expression, with a Tathāgata’s voice he teaches differently according to sentient beings’ ways. 
Using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge of eloquent teaching, with a Tathāgata’s wisdom and pure ways, he fully expounds the Dharma according to sentient beings’  faith and understanding. 
**** Acquiring All Dhāraṇīs **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on the ninth ground excels in using his unimpeded wisdom-knowledge and acquires the wondrous Dharma store of Tathāgatas. He becomes a great Dharma master and acquires dhāraṇīs, including the dhāraṇī of meanings, the dhāraṇī of dharmas, the dhāraṇī of wisdomknowledge, the dhāraṇī of radiance, the dhāraṇī of good wisdom, the dhāraṇī of abundant wealth, the dhāraṇī of awesome virtue, the dhāraṇī of hindrance-free Dharma Doors, the dhāraṇī of boundless turning , and the dhāraṇī of various meanings. “After he has acquired a million asaṁkhyeya such dhāraṇī doors, he expounds the Dharma, using a million asaṁkhyeya ways of skillful speech and eloquence, and visits innumerable Buddhas. 
Through these one million asaṁkhyeya dhāraṇī doors, under every Buddha he hears the true Dharma. Never forgetting what he hears, through the door of countless differentiations, he expounds the Dharma to others. 
“As soon as this Bodhisattva sees a Buddha and bows down to Him, he immediately acquires, then and there, countless Dharma Doors. 
Such Dharma Doors cannot be acquired in 100,000 kalpas by great voice-hearers who can retain what they hear. 
**** Expounding the Dharma **** “This Bodhisattva, having acquired such dhāraṇīs and unimpeded wisdomknowledge, sits on a Dharma seat and expounds the Dharma. 
He speaks according to the minds and preferences of sentient beings that fill a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World. 
The radiance of his awesome virtue is unrivaled, except by that of Buddhas, and Bodhisattvas who have received the position . 
“Seated on the Dharma seat, this Bodhisattva emits one sound to multitudes to make them understand, and they understand. 
Sometimes he wants to emit various sounds to enlighten multitudes. 
Sometimes he wants to emit vast radiance to reveal Dharma Doors. 
Sometimes he wants to emit various Dharma sounds from each and every pore. 
Sometimes he wants all things, with or without forms, in a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World to emit wonderful sounds of Dharma words. 
Sometimes he wants to emit the sound of one word to reach everywhere in the dharma realm and enable all to understand it. 
Sometimes he wants the sounds of all words to become Dharma sounds and last forever. 
Sometimes he wants all songs, music, and musical instruments, such as pipes, flutes, bells, and drums, in all worlds to play Dharma sounds. 
Sometimes he wants a single word to include all different Dharma phrases and sounds. 
Sometimes he wants each of the dust particles of earth, water, fire, and wind in countless worlds to reveal inconceivable Dharma Doors. 
All thoughts in his mind materialize without exception. 
**** Answering Challenging Questions **** “Buddha-Son, if all sentient beings in a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World come to this Bodhisattva and simultaneously challenge him with different questions in countless languages and sounds, he takes all questions in one thought. Then he answers them with one sound according to the askers’ preferences, to delight them. 
In the same way, if all sentient beings in countless worlds, in a kṣaṇa , simultaneously challenge him with different questions in countless languages and sounds, he takes all questions in one thought. Then he answers them with one sound according to the askers’ preferences, to delight them. 
“Even to sentient beings that fill countless worlds, this Bodhisattva can expound the Dharma according to their preferences, capacities, and understandings. Through the power of Buddhas, he widely does Buddha work and is the reliance for all sentient beings. 
**** Acquiring and Retaining All Dharma Doors **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva makes further energetic progress and attains radiant wisdom. 
Suppose that on the tip of one hair, there are Buddha assemblies as numerous as the dust particles in countless worlds. Suppose that in each assembly there are sentient beings as numerous as the dust particles in countless worlds. Suppose that all these sentient beings have different natures and preferences, which are as numerous as the dust particles in countless worlds. Suppose that Buddhas give them different Dharma Doors according to their natures and preferences. 
As such an event transpires on the tip of one hair, so too it transpires everywhere in the dharma realm. 
This Bodhisattva can acquire all such countless Dharma Doors in one thought, and never forget or lose any of them. 
**** Training under All Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on the ninth ground makes energetic progress day and night without second thoughts. He enters the realm of Buddhas and stays close to Tathāgatas. He achieves profound Bodhisattva liberation and abides in samādhi. He constantly sees Buddhas, without interruption. 
In every kalpa he sees innumerable Buddhas: innumerable hundreds of Buddhas, innumerable thousands of Buddhas, and even innumerable hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Buddhas. He reveres, honors, and attends all Buddhas, and makes offerings to Them. He asks Them questions and receives the dhāraṇī for expounding the Dharma. 
“Then his roots of goodness become more radiant and pure. As an analogy, a skillful goldsmith uses genuine gold to make a jeweled crown to adorn a WheelTurning King’s head. It is unrivaled on the four continents by the ornaments of lesser kings, their ministers, and their subjects. 
Likewise the roots of goodness of a Bodhisattva on the ninth ground are unrivaled by those of voicehearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and Bodhisattvas on lower grounds. 
As an analogy, the radiance emitted by the body of the great Brahma-king  illuminates the two thousand worlds ruled by him, and dispels the darkness there, even in hidden places. 
Likewise the radiance emitted by the roots of goodness of a Bodhisattva on this ground illuminates sentient beings and dispels the darkness of their afflictions. 
“Of the ten pāramitās, he practices the ninth pāramitā, the power pāramitā , more than the other nine pāramitās. 
It is not that he refuses to practice them, but that he practices them according to his ability and at his discretion. 
**** Becoming the Great Brahma-King of the Third Dhyāna Heaven **** “Buddha-Son, this is a brief description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva training on the ninth ground, the Good Wisdom Ground. 
An extensive explanation cannot be finished in countless kalpas. 
Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abiding on this ground usually becomes the great Brahma-king , who rules two thousand worlds. He excels in governing and benefiting sentient beings with ease. He can expound the training in the pāramitās to all voicehearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and Bodhisattvas. 
He knows sentient beings’ minds and is never at a loss facing their challenging questions. 
Whatever karmas he does, such as almsgiving, loving words, beneficial actions, and collaborative work , he constantly thinks of the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha, and even of acquiring sarvajña-jñāna, the knowledge of all knowledge. 
“He thinks, ‘Among all sentient beings, I should be excellent, especially excellent; wonderful, especially wonderful; superb, especially superb. To all sentient beings, I should be leader, guide, general, and teacher. I should even be the reliance for those who seek the knowledge of all knowledge.’     “If this Bodhisattva makes energetic progress, in one thought he enters samādhis as numerous as the dust particles in a million asaṁkhyeya worlds and manifests, as his retinue, Bodhisattvas as numerous as the dust particles in those worlds. 
Through the power of his excellent vows, what this Bodhisattva can do with ease far exceeds these things. 
It cannot be known by figuring for even 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas.” **** Summarizing Stanzas **** Then, to restate his meaning, Vajra Store Bodhisattva spoke in verse: Excelling in observing with the power of immeasurable wisdom, Which is supreme, wondrous, and hard to know, This Bodhisattva enters into the secrets of Tathāgatas, Benefits sentient beings, and enters the ninth ground. 
Having acquired dhāraṇīs and samādhis with ease, He masters vast transcendental powers and visits countless worlds. Seeking a Tathāgata’s wisdom, Ten Powers, Four Fearlessnesses, and Eighteen Exclusive Dharmas, Through the power of his vows and great compassion, he enters the ninth ground. 
Abiding on this ground, he retains the Dharma store. He knows dharmas, whether good, evil, or neither, With or without afflictions, worldly or supra-worldly, Conceivable or inconceivable. 
Observing the Three Vehicles, He knows their practices, whether definite or indefinite, Saṁskṛta or asaṁskṛta, and knows their differences. 
With such wisdom-knowledge, he walks in the world. Using his wisdom-knowledge, He knows the features of sentient beings’ minds as they truly are, such as Rapidly changing, deteriorating or not deteriorating, Formless, and boundless. 
He also knows that their endless afflictions, Dormant or active, continue through successive life-paths. He also knows their different karmas, And that karmic requital arrives  though its cause is gone. 
their capacities, such as weak, middling, or strong, In the past and future, with immeasurable differences. 
Sentient beings’ afflictions and wrong views, Like a dense forest that has not been removed since time without a beginning, Are born with their minds, And always follow them and unceasingly fetter their minds. 
However, thoughts are not real. Having no place to stay, they are not apart from the mind. As afflictions subdued by the power of meditation may still arise, Their ultimate eradication is achieved only on the vajra path. Reborn to make one of the six life-journeys, One rises in the field of karmas, and is watered by love  and shrouded by ignorance. 
Consciousness is the seed that sprouts name and form life after life In the Three Realms of Existence since time without a beginning. 
One is repeatedly reborn to make a life-journey because one’s mind is filled with afflictions, karmas, and habits, Without which one will no longer be reborn. 
Sentient beings are classified into three groups. As the first group walks the bodhi path, the second group sinks in the wrong views . 
According to sentient beings’ different minds, capacities, Preferences, and needs, He expounds the Dharma with unimpeded eloquence. 
Seated on the Dharma seat, he is like the lion-king, The ox-king, and the king of treasure mountains. He is also like the dragon-king that spreads dense clouds And rains down sweet dew to fill immense oceans. 
He knows well the nature of dharmas and their profound meanings, And eloquently explains them with the right forms of expression. He acquires a million asaṁkhyeya dhāraṇīs, Like an ocean that accepts all rains. 
His dhāraṇīs and samādhis being pure, In one thought he sees innumerable Buddhas. Under every Buddha, he hears the Dharma And expounds it with wonderful sounds. 
He teaches and transforms all sentient beings In the Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World, Like a cloud that canopies all without exception, And he delights them according to their capacities and preferences. 
As Buddhas in worlds on the tip of one hair are innumerable, So too the preferences of sentient beings are countless. He gives them Dharma Doors according to their minds, And does the same in the entire dharma realm. 
This Bodhisattva makes energetic progress And accumulates excellent merit. He acquires Dharmas Doors and retains them all, Like the great earth that stores all seeds. 
Innumerable sentient beings from worlds in the ten directions Come to sit in his assembly And ask him questions in their minds. He fully answers them all with one sound. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on this ground becomes a Dharma master And tirelessly teaches others according to their capacities. He sees Buddhas day and night without interruption, And attains profound nirvāṇa, gaining wisdom and achieving liberation. 
He makes offerings to all Buddhas, And his roots of goodness become more radiant and pure, Like the jeweled crown on a Wheel-Turning King’s head. He enables sentient beings to eradicate their afflictions, Like the great Brahma-king’s radiance that shines everywhere. 
A Bodhisattva abiding on this ground usually becomes the Brahma-king , And always transforms sentient beings by means of the Three Vehicles. All his good karmas are for benefiting sentient beings And acquiring the knowledge of all knowledge. 
On the same scale, he sees Buddhas and expounds the Dharma. Through the power of his vows, what he can do far exceeds these things. 
This is the ninth ground, the Good Wisdom Ground, A place walked by Bodhisattvas of great wisdom, A place profound, wonderful, and hard to know. Buddha-Son, I have briefly described it to you. 
*** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 38 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  ***** **** The Tenth Ground, the Dharma Cloud Ground **** When nayutas of gods from pure_abode_heavens Heard the superb training on this ground , Standing in the sky, with exuberance and joy They devoutly made offerings to the Buddha. 
Elated were an innumerable multitude of Bodhisattvas, Who stood in the sky. They offered the choicest pleasing fragrances, Which suffused the multitude and purified them. 
The god-king of Paranirmita-vaśa-vartin Heaven  And countless koṭis of gods, As an offering to the Buddha, scattered in the sky a billion celestial garments, Which fell like colorful confetti. 
Innumerable beautiful goddess-daughters Joyfully made offerings to the Buddha. They each played various kinds of wonderful music And praised with these words: “The Buddha remains seated in one world And manifests Himself in all worlds. His countless koṭis of sublime bodies Appear everywhere in the vast dharma realm. 
Each of His pores emits radiance, Which universally dispels the darkness of afflictions in the world. While the number of dust particles in a world can be known, The number of His beams of light cannot be imagined. 
One may see the Tathāgata adorned with various excellent physical marks, Or see Him turn the wheel of the unsurpassed true Dharma. One may see Him visit various Buddha Lands, Or see Him quietly remain still. 
He may display His abiding in the palace of Tuṣita Heaven  Or His descending into His mother’s womb. He may display His staying in the womb or His being born, And enable all in countless worlds to see such an event. 
He may display His renouncing family life to train for bodhi Or His attaining true enlightenment in the bodhimaṇḍa. He may display His expounding the Dharma or His entering parinirvāṇa, And enable all  in the ten_directions to see such an event. 
As a magician knows the arts of illusion And performs magic amid multitudes, Likewise the wisdom of the Tathāgata Can manifest His bodies everywhere in the world. 
The Buddha abides in the profound dharma nature, Which is quiet and has no appearance, like the open sky. In accord with the highest meaning, He displays various kinds of work. 
The things that He does to benefit sentient beings Are in accord with dharma nature. Seeing no difference between appearance and no appearance, One realizes that dharmas in true reality have no appearance. 
One who seeks Tathāgata wisdom Should discard all differentiations. 
If one realizes the equality of existence and nonexistence, One will quickly become a great guiding teacher to gods and humans.” After this innumerable multitude of goddess-daughters Praised  with the sounds of various words, They felt peace and joy in their body and mind. 
Reverently gazing upon the Tathāgata, they fell silent. Then Liberation Moon Bodhisattva, Knowing that the multitude was quiet, Requested Vajra Store Bodhisattva, “True Buddha-Son, the fearless great one! 
I pray that the wise one will describe The features of the virtuous training  To enter the tenth ground from the ninth ground, And describe his transcendental powers and displays.” **** Ready to Enter the Tenth Ground **** Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva told Liberation Moon Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, on the first through ninth grounds, using immeasurable wisdom, a BodhisattvaMahāsattva observes dharmas and excels in pondering and training. 
He does all white dharmas , trains to complete countless elements of bodhi, expands his merit and wisdom, and does wide-ranging work with great compassion. He knows the differences among worlds, enters the realm of sentient beings, which is like a dense forest, and traces the footsteps of Tathāgatas. He follows Their quiet ways and observes Their Ten_Powers, Four_Fearlessnesses, and Eighteen_Exclusive_Dharmas. He is said to be ready to receive the position to acquire sarvajña-jñāna, the knowledge of all knowledge. 
**** Acquiring Bodhisattva Samādhis **** “Buddha-Son, as soon a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva with such wisdom reaches the ground for receiving the position, he acquires ten Bodhisattva samādhis: the Samādhi of All Buddhas Present before One. “A million asaṁkhyeya samādhis such as these are revealed to him. 
This Bodhisattva has the ability to enter and exit all these samādhis and knows the differences in their purposes. 
The last one is called the Samādhi of Receiving the Position to Acquire the Knowledge of All Knowledge. 
**** The Huge Jeweled Lotus Flower **** “As soon as this samādhi is revealed to him, a huge jeweled lotus flower suddenly appears. 
This flower is vast, the size of a million Three-Thousand Large_Thousandfold_Worlds. 
It is adorned with diverse wonderful treasures that surpass all things in the world, because it is produced by his supra-worldly roots_of_goodness and by his knowledge that dharmas are illusory processes. It constantly emits radiance that universally illuminates the dharma realm. 
Nonexistent in any heaven, it has a platform made of finest sandalwood, a stem made of precious aquamarine , stamens made of emerald, and leaves made of gold  from the Jambu River. This flower contains multitudinous treasures, is covered all over by jeweled nets, and constantly emits immeasurable radiance. As its retinue, it has lotus flowers as numerous as the dust particles in ten Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold Worlds. 
“Then this Bodhisattva sits on this flower seat, which matches his body size. 
He is surrounded by an innumerable retinue of Bodhisattvas, each of whom sits on a lotus flower and acquires a million samādhis. Single-mindedly they all gaze upon this great Bodhisattva with reverence. 
“Buddha-Son, as this great Bodhisattva and his retinue sit on their flower seats, radiance and sounds of words pervade dharma realms in the ten directions, all worlds tremble, suffering on all evil life-paths halts, all worlds are purified, Bodhisattvas walking the same path congregate, celestial and human music sound simultaneously, and all sentient beings receive peace and joy. As this Bodhisattva and his retinue make inconceivable offerings to all Buddhas, all Buddha assemblies are revealed. 
**** Emitting Radiance to Make Offerings **** “Buddha-Son, as this Bodhisattva sits on this huge lotus-flower seat, his feet emit a million asaṁkhyeya beams of light that illuminate enormous hells  in the ten directions and remove the suffering of hell dwellers; his knees emit a million asaṁkhyeya beams of light that illuminate animal realms  in the ten directions and remove the suffering of animals; his navel emits a million asaṁkhyeya beams of light that illuminate King Yama’s dominions  in the ten directions and remove the suffering of hungry ghosts; his sides emit a million asaṁkhyeya beams of light that illuminate human realms  in the ten directions and remove the suffering of humans; his hands emit a million asaṁkhyeya beams of light that illuminate all the palaces of god-kings and asuras  in the ten directions; his shoulders emit a million asaṁkhyeya beams of light that illuminate voicehearers  in the ten directions; the back of his neck emits a million asaṁkhyeya beams of light that illuminate Pratyekabuddhas  in the ten directions; his face emits a million asaṁkhyeya beams of light that illuminate all Bodhisattvas  in the ten directions who range from newly resolved ones to those on the ninth ground. 
The white hair between his eyebrows emits a million asaṁkhyeya beams of light that illuminate Bodhisattvas  in the ten directions who have received the position, and make māras’ palaces invisible. 
“The top of his head emits beams of light, as numerous as the dust particles in a million asaṁkhyeya Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold Worlds, that illuminate all assemblies of Buddha-Tathāgatas in all worlds in the ten directions and circle  to the right ten times. Hovering in the sky, they form a web of radiance, called Glowing Radiance. To every Buddha, it makes great offerings unrivaled by those of Bodhisattvas who range from newly resolved ones to those on the ninth ground. Their offerings are less than one hundredth or any fraction of these offerings by calculation or analogy. 
“This web of radiance reaches all Tathāgata assemblies  in the ten directions. Over each and every assembly, it rains down offerings, such as choice incense, garlands, garments, banners, jeweled canopies, and jewels. All of them are produced by this Bodhisattva’s supra-worldly roots of goodness, and they surpass all things in the world. 
Those who see and know such an event will never regress from the anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi_mind. 
Buddha-Son, after making such offerings to  all Buddha assemblies in all worlds in the ten directions, this vast radiance circles each Buddha assembly ten times and enters the feet of the Buddha there. 
**** Receiving Radiance from Position Recipients and Buddhas **** “Then all Buddhas and Bodhisattvas know that, in a certain world, a certain Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, who has done comprehensive training, is ready to receive the position. 
Buddha-Son, from the ten directions, innumerable Bodhisattvas up through those on the ninth ground come to surround this Bodhisattva and reverently make him offerings. 
As they single-mindedly observe him, they each acquire 10,000 samādhis. 
“ in the ten directions, all Bodhisattvas who have received the position, from the swastika on their chests, emit vast radiance, called Destroying Māras, which is accompanied by a million asaṁkhyeya beams of light as its retinue. All radiance universally illuminates worlds in the ten directions and, through the immeasurable transcendental powers , displays magnificent events. 
Then it enters into this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s chest, which is marked with a swastika. 
“Then, all Buddhas  in the ten directions, from the white hair between their eyebrows, emit pure radiance, called Expanding All Wisdom and Transcendental Powers, which is accompanied by countless beams of light as its retinue. All radiance illuminates all worlds in the ten directions and circles each ten times. It reveals the great freedom and ease of Tathāgatas and enlightens innumerable hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Bodhisattvas. It makes all Buddha Lands tremble, removes the suffering on all evil life-paths, makes all māras’ palaces invisible, displays the magnificence and virtues of all Buddha assemblies, and reveals the bodhimaṇḍas, where Buddhas attain bodhi. 
After illuminating the dharma realm in all worlds in the domain of space, it comes to this Bodhisattva’s assembly, circles it to the right, and manifests various magnificent things. 
Then it enters into the top of this great Bodhisattva’s head, while all its retinue beams of light enter into the tops of the heads of the Bodhisattvas in his retinue. 
This Bodhisattva immediately acquires a million samādhis that he never had before. When the vast radiance  enters into the top of his head, he is said to have received the position to enter the realm of Buddhas, to acquire the Ten Powers, and to become a Buddha. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, a Wheel-Turning_King’s crown prince is born with a well-endowed body, and his mother is the queen. 
The Wheel-Turning King has his crown prince sit on the jeweled golden seat mounted on a white elephant. He has huge nets spread, great banners erected, incense burnt, and music played. He has water drawn from the four immense oceans and saved in a gold vase. Holding this vase, he pours the water onto the head of his crown prince. 
“Buddha-Son, likewise a Bodhisattva receives his position because Buddhas pour the water of wisdom onto the top of his head. 
This ceremony is called receiving the position to acquire the Ten Powers of a Tathāgata and become a Buddha. 
Buddha-Son, this is called a Bodhisattva receiving the position of great wisdom. 
Holding this position, this Bodhisattva can do a billion koṭi nayuta things that are hard to do, and can expand his merit and wisdom immeasurably. This is called abiding on the tenth ground, the Dharma Cloud Ground. 
**** Acquiring Great Wisdom-Knowledge **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abiding on this Dharma Cloud Ground truly knows all causes and conditions in the desire realm, the form realm, the formless realm, the dharma realm, the saṁskṛta realm, the asaṁskṛta realm, the realm of sentient beings, the spheres of consciousness, the domain of space, and the nirvāṇa realm. 
Moreover, he truly knows all causes and conditions for afflictions, views, and actions; for the formation and destruction of a world; for the ways of voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and Bodhisattvas. Moreover, he truly knows all causes and conditions for acquiring a Tathāgata’s Ten Powers, Four Fearlessnesses, Eighteen Exclusive Dharmas, dharma body, physical body, and the knowledge of all knowledge; for attaining bodhi and turning the Dharma wheel; for acquiring the definite wisdom-knowledge to differentiate all dharmas. 
With all-encompassing wisdom-knowledge, he knows all causes and conditions for all dharmas as they truly are. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva with such superb wisdom truly knows the changes in sentient beings, karmas, afflictions, views, worlds, the dharma realm, voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, Bodhisattvas, and Tathāgatas. He knows that all changes found by differentiation, in true reality, are no change. 
“Moreover, he truly knows the sustaining powers of the Buddha, the Dharma, the Saṅgha, karmas, afflictions, time, vows, offerings, practices, kalpas, and wisdom-knowledge. He knows all such sustaining powers as they truly are. 
“Moreover, he truly knows a Tathāgata’s subtle wisdom during His  training, during His death, during His birth, during His renunciation of family life, during His demonstration of transcendental powers, during His attainment of true enlightenment, during His turning of the Dharma wheel, during His sustainment of His lifespan, during His parinirvāṇa, and during His prolonging the abiding of the Dharma in the world. He knows all such subtle wisdom of a Tathāgata as it truly is. 
“Moreover, he truly knows a Tathāgata’s secrets, such as the secret of His body, the secret of His voice, the secret of His mind, the secret of His determining the right or wrong timing, the secret of His bestowing upon a Bodhisattva the prophecy of attaining bodhi, the secret of His taming sentient beings, the secret of His providing different vehicles to sentient beings, the secret of His differentiating sentient beings’ capacities and ways, the secret of His penetrating the workings of karmas, and the secret of His attaining bodhi through training. He knows all such secrets of a Tathāgata as they truly are. 
“Moreover, he truly knows a Tathāgata’s wisdom-knowledge of  kalpas, such as one kalpa encompassed in asaṁkhyeya kalpas, asaṁkhyeya kalpas encompassed in one kalpa, calculable kalpas encompassed in incalculable kalpas, incalculable kalpas encompassed in calculable kalpas, one thought encompassed in one kalpa, one kalpa encompassed in one thought, kalpas encompassed in nonkalpas, non-kalpas encompassed in kalpas, kalpas with presence of Buddhas encompassed in kalpas without presence of Buddhas, kalpas without presence of Buddhas encompassed in kalpas with presence of Buddhas, past and future kalpas encompassed in the present kalpa, the present kalpa encompassed in past and future kalpas, past kalpas encompassed in future kalpas, future kalpas encompassed in past kalpas, long kalpas encompassed in short kalpas, and short kalpas encompassed in long kalpas. He knows the mutual encompassing of all kalpas as it truly is. 
“Moreover, he truly knows a Tathāgata’s wisdom-knowledge to do anything, such as to enter pores, dust particles, the body of a world, a sentient being’s body, a sentient being’s mind, a sentient being’s ways, and all places; to reveal universal ways, conforming ways, and nonconforming ways; to reveal conceivable and inconceivable ways; to reveal ways known or unknown to the world; to reveal the ways of voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, Bodhisattvas, and Tathāgatas. 
Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this ground knows the immeasurable wisdom-knowledge of all Buddhas as it truly is. 
**** Achieving Great Liberation **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva- Mahāsattva abiding on this ground achieves ten Bodhisattva liberations: 
the attaining-all-spiritual-states-without-exception liberation.     "On this tenth ground, through these ten liberation doors, he acquires countless hundreds of thousands of asaṁkhyeyas of liberation doors. 
Moreover, he acquires countless hundreds of thousands of asaṁkhyeyas of samādhi doors, dhāraṇī doors, and doors of transcendental powers. 
**** Why This Ground is Called the Dharma Cloud Ground **** “This Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva attains such wisdom, seeks the immeasurable bodhi, and acquires the power of skillful memory. In one thought he takes in, accepts, handles, and retains the great dharma illumination, the great dharma shine, and the great Dharma rain of innumerable Buddhas  in the ten directions. 
As an analogy, the dragon-king Sāgara pours down great rains. Except for the immense ocean, no place else can take in, accept, handle, and retain them. 
Likewise, except for Bodhisattvas on the tenth ground, no sentient beings, voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, or even Bodhisattvas on the ninth ground can take in, accept, handle, and retain the great dharma illumination, the great dharma shine, and the great Dharma rain in the secret store of Tathāgatas. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the immense ocean can take in, accept, handle, and retain not only the great rains poured down by one dragon-king, but those poured down by two, three, and even innumerable dragon-kings. 
Likewise a Bodhisattva abiding on this Dharma Cloud Ground can take in, accept, handle, and retain the dharma illumination, the dharma shine, and the Dharma rain of not only one Buddha, but two, three, and even innumerable Buddhas. In one thought he can expound the Dharma. 
Hence this ground is called the Dharma Cloud Ground.”     Liberation Moon Bodhisattva asked, “Buddha-Son, from how many Tathāgatas can a Bodhisattva on this ground, in one thought, take in, accept, handle, and retain Their great dharma illumination, great dharma shine, and great Dharma rain?”     Vajra Store Bodhisattva answered, “Buddha-Son, the number cannot be known by calculation. 
I should give you an analogy. Buddha-Son, in each of the ten directions there are worlds as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta Buddha Lands. Each sentient being in his world attends his Buddha, acquires the dhāraṇī for hearing and retaining the Dharma, and becomes foremost among voice-hearers in hearing the Dharma, like the bhikṣu Great Victory, who attends Vajra Lotus Flower Superior Buddha. 
The teachings received by each sentient being are not to be received by another. 
Buddha-Son, what is your opinion? 
Are the teachings received by all sentient beings in those worlds measurable or immeasurable?”     Liberation Bodhisattva answered, “The total is huge, immeasurable, and boundless.”     Vajra Store Bodhisattva said, “Buddha-Son, I will explain to make you understand. 
Buddha-Son, the Dharma heard and retained in total by all sentient beings in those worlds is less than one hundredth of one Buddha’s dharma illumination, dharma shine, and Dharma rain taken in, accepted, handled, and retained by a Bodhisattva on this Dharma Cloud Ground. 
Although Buddhas in countless worlds in the ten directions are innumerable, this Bodhisattva can take in, accept, handle, and retain all Their dharma illumination, dharma shine, and Dharma rain. 
Hence this ground is called the Dharma Cloud Ground. “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva on this ground, through the power of his vows, spreads the cloud of great compassion; rumbles the great Dharma thunder; flashes the lightning of transcendental powers, illumination, and fearlessness; forms the dense cloud of merit and wisdom; manifests various kinds of bodies, which move about like swirling clouds. In one thought he is present everywhere in worlds as numerous as the dust particles in hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Buddha Lands, expounding the great Dharma and subjugating māras. 
Even more, in worlds as numerous as the dust particles in countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Buddha Lands, according to sentient beings’ preferences, he showers down sweet dew to extinguish the fire of their afflictions. 
Hence this ground is called the Dharma Cloud Ground. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva on this ground, according to the minds of sentient beings that he should deliver, displays Buddha work that begins with descending from Tuṣita Heaven  and ends with entering parinirvāṇa. 
He displays it not only in one world, but in two, three, and even worlds as numerous as the dust particles just described. Even more, he displays it in worlds as numerous as the dust particles in countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Buddha Lands. 
Hence this ground is called the Dharma Cloud Ground. 
**** Using Inconceivable Transcendental Powers **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva on this ground has radiant wisdom and commanding transcendental powers. 
According to his thoughts, he can change a small world into a large world, and a large world into a small world; an impure world into a pure world, and a pure world into an impure world. 
As countless worlds appear orderly, disorderly, upright, or inverted, he can change any world into another. 
“According to his thoughts, he can put in a dust particle a world with its Mount Sumeru, mountains, and rivers. As the dust particle remains the same, it clearly displays this world, undiminished in size. 
He can put in a dust particle two, three, or even countless worlds, each with its Mount Sumeru, mountains, and rivers. As the dust particle remains the same, it clearly displays these worlds. 
“According to his thoughts, he can display in one world the magnificent things in two or even countless worlds; he can display in two or even countless worlds the magnificent things in one world. 
“According to his thoughts, without harming sentient beings, he can put in one world the sentient beings of countless worlds; he can put in countless worlds the sentient beings of one world. 
He can display in a pore the splendors in the realm of Buddhas. 
“According to his thoughts, he can manifest bodies as numerous as the dust particles in countless worlds. Each body manifests hands as numerous as dust particles; each hand holds garlands, incense boxes, splendid canopies, and banners, which are as numerous as the sands of the Ganges, and offers them to Buddhas  in the ten directions. 
Each body manifests heads as numerous as dust particles; each head manifests tongues as numerous as dust particles, which reach everywhere  in the ten directions and, thought after thought, praise the merits of Buddhas. 
“According to his thoughts, in one thought he can be present everywhere  in the ten directions and adorn each Buddha Land with magnificent events, which range from his attaining true enlightenment to his entering parinirvāṇa. 
He can manifest bodies throughout past, present, and future. In each body, he displays innumerable Buddhas and Their awe-inspiring events in countless Buddha Lands, as well as the formation and destruction of worlds. 
He can emit from a pore all kinds of winds without harming sentient beings. 
“According to his thoughts, he can change countless worlds into an immense ocean. From its water emerges a huge lotus flower with vast radiance, which pervades countless, boundless worlds and displays magnificent events, such as  sitting under a great bodhi tree and acquiring the knowledge of all knowledge. 
“He can display in his body the light in worlds in the ten directions, such as the light of precious jewels, the sun, the moon, the stars, clouds, and lightning. 
From his mouth he can blow air to shake countless worlds in the ten directions without startling or scaring their sentient beings. 
He can display  disasters of wind, fire, or water  in the ten directions. 
“According to sentient beings’ preferences, he can manifest a body adorned with all the physical marks . 
He can manifest his body as a Buddha’s body or manifest a Buddha’s body as his body. 
He can manifest a Buddha’s body as his Buddha Land or manifest his Buddha Land as a Buddha’s body. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva on this Dharma Cloud Ground can display with ease immeasurable hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of transcendental powers such as these.” **** Demonstrating Transcendental Powers **** At that time in the assembly, Bodhisattvas, gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, and asuras, as well as the four god-king protectors of the world, the god-king Śakro-Devānām-Indra , Brahma gods, gods from pure abode heavens, the god-king Maheśvara , and god-sons, thought, “If this Bodhisattva has such wisdom and transcendental powers, what about a Buddha?”     Liberation Moon Bodhisattva, knowing the thoughts of the multitude, asked Vajra Store Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, this huge multitude, having heard this Bodhisattva’s wisdom and transcendental powers, have fallen into a web of doubts. 
Benevolent One, to resolve their doubts, please show a few magnificent things as a demonstration of a Bodhisattva’s spiritual power.”     Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva immediately entered the Samādhi of the Essence of All Buddha Lands, during which all Bodhisattvas and all others in the huge multitude saw themselves inside Vajra Store Bodhisattva’s body. 
They saw a bodhi tree with the circumference of 100,000 Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold Worlds, the height of a million Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold Worlds, and branches and leaves that could shade a koṭi Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold Worlds. Matching the tree’s measurements was a lion throne, on which sat a Buddha, called All Wisdom and Power King. 
All in this huge multitude saw this Buddha sitting on the lion throne under the bodhi tree. He was adorned with excellent physical marks, a description of which could not be finished in a koṭi kalpas. 
Having demonstrated such great spiritual power, Vajra Store Bodhisattva made all in the multitude realize that they were still in their original places. 
The multitude, struck in wonderment of what they had never before seen, fell silent. Single-mindedly they gazed upon Vajra Store Bodhisattva with reverence. 
Then Liberation Moon Bodhisattva asked Vajra Store Bodhisattva, “BuddhaSon, this samādhi is rare and powerful. 
What is its name?”     Vajra Store Bodhisattva answered, “This samādhi is called the Essence of All Buddha Lands.”     “What does it reveal?”     “Buddha-Son, while a Bodhisattva is in this samādhi, according to his thoughts, his body can display Buddha Lands as numerous as the dust particles in worlds as numerous as the sands of the Ganges. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on the Dharma Cloud Ground acquires countless hundreds of thousands of great samādhis like this one. Therefore, this Bodhisattva’s body and body karmas are beyond imagination. Also beyond imagination are his voice and voice karmas, his mind and mind karmas, and his commanding transcendental powers. 
his experience in samādhi that observes past, present, and future; the extent of his wisdom; his entrance through all liberation doors; his work using his manifestations, spiritual powers, and radiance. Even a Dharma prince abiding on the Good Wisdom Ground  cannot know what he does, even the simple act of raising his foot and putting it down. 
“Buddha-Son, this is a brief description of the attainments of a Bodhisattva on the Dharma Cloud Ground. 
An extensive explanation cannot be finished in countless hundreds of thousands of asaṁkhyeyas of kalpas.” **** The Wisdom and Power of a Buddha **** Liberation Bodhisattva asked, “Buddha-Son, if a Bodhisattva’s transcendental powers can produce such great outcomes, what about a Buddha’s transcendent powers?”     Vajra Store Bodhisattva answered, “Buddha-Son, as an analogy, someone takes a small chunk of dirt from a world with four continents and asks, ‘Which is bigger, the dirt in the boundless world or this chunk of dirt?’ Your question is similar. 
A Tathāgata’s wisdom is boundless and matchless. How can it be compared with a Bodhisattva’s? 
Moreover, the chunk of dirt taken from the fourcontinent world is small while the rest of the dirt there is immeasurable. 
In countless kalpas, I can describe only a small part of the wisdom and transcendental powers of a Bodhisattva on this Dharma Cloud Ground, much less those  on the Tathāgata Ground. 
“Buddha-Son, I now use examples to help you understand the attainments of a Tathāgata. 
Buddha-Son, suppose in each of the ten directions, there are Buddha Lands as numerous as the dust particles in countless worlds. Each Buddha Land is filled with Bodhisattvas on this ground, who are as numerous as sugar canes, rice plants, bamboos, reeds, forests, and hemp. The wisdom developed by these Bodhisattvas after training on the Bodhisattva Way for hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of kalpas is less than one hundredth of the wisdom of a Tathāgata and less than any fraction of it by upaniṣad  measure. 
**** Training under All Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva with such wisdom does karmas that are no different from a Buddha’s body, voice, and mind karmas, and never abandons the power of Bodhisattva samādhis. For countless kalpas, he attends all Buddhas and, in each and every kalpa, makes Them all kinds of offerings. 
Supported by the spiritual power of Buddhas, his wisdom becomes more radiant. He excels in answering all challenging questions raised in the dharma realm and, for 100,000 koṭi kalpas, is never at a loss facing such questions. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, a goldsmith makes an ornament with genuine gold set with superb precious jewels. It is worn by the god-king of Paranirmitavaśa-vartin Heaven  and is unrivaled by the ornaments worn by other gods. 
Likewise the wisdom of a Bodhisattva on this ground is unrivaled by that of Bodhisattvas on the first through ninth grounds. 
His radiant wisdom can enable sentient beings to acquire the knowledge of all knowledge while that of Bodhisattvas on lower grounds cannot. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the radiance of the god-king Maheśvara can cool sentient beings’ body and mind, and is unrivaled. 
Likewise the radiance of the wisdom of a Bodhisattva on this ground can cool all sentient beings and enable them to acquire the knowledge of all knowledge. It is unrivaled by the radiance of the wisdom of voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddha, and even Bodhisattvas on the ninth ground. 
“Buddha-Son, as this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abides in such wisdom, BuddhaBhagavāns further impart to him the wisdom-knowledge of past, present, and future, the wisdom knowledge to differentiate all things in the dharma realm, the wisdom-knowledge that pervades all worlds, the wisdom-knowledge that illuminates all worlds, the wisdom-knowledge to think of all sentient beings with lovingkindness, and even the wisdom-knowledge of all knowledge. 
“Of the ten_pāramitās, he practices the tenth pāramitā, the wisdomknowledge pāramitā , more than the other nine pāramitās. 
“Buddha-Son, this is a brief description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva training on the tenth ground. 
An extensive explanation cannot be finished in countless asaṁkhyeya kalpas. 
**** Becoming the God-King Maheśvara of the Fourth Dhyāna Heaven **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva abiding on this ground usually becomes the god-king Maheśvara . In command of dharmas, he teaches the practice of Bodhisattva pāramitās to sentient beings, voice-hearers, and Pratyekabuddhas. He is never at a loss facing challenging questions raised in the dharma realm. 
As he carries out almsgiving, loving words, beneficial actions, and collaborative work , he constantly thinks of the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha, and even of acquiring sarvajña-jñāna, the knowledge of all knowledge. 
“He thinks, ‘Among all sentient beings, I should be excellent, especially excellent; wonderful, especially wonderful; superb, especially superb. To all sentient beings, I should be leader, guide, general, and teacher. I should even be the reliance for those who seek the knowledge of all knowledge.’     “If he makes energetic progress, in one thought he enters samādhis as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta worlds and manifests, as his retinue, Bodhisattvas as numerous as the dust particles in those worlds. 
Through the power of his excellent vows, what this Bodhisattva can do with ease far exceeds these things. His spiritual training, faith, understanding, adornments, karmas, bodies, words, radiance, faculties, sounds, and actions cannot be known by figuring for even 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas. 
**** The Ten Grounds **** **** The Ten Grounds Compared to the Ten Mountains **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva does his training on the Ten Grounds step by step, heading for  the knowledge of all knowledge. 
As an analogy, from Lake Anavatapta flow four great rivers that water everywhere in Jambudvīpa. Inexhaustible, they surge and enter the ocean, filling it. 
Buddha-Son, likewise, from a Bodhisattva’s bodhi_mind flows the water of his roots of goodness and great vows, which nurtures sentient beings by means of the Four Drawing-in Dharmas. Inexhaustible, it surges and enters the ocean of all knowledge, filling it. 
“Buddha-Son, the ten Bodhisattva grounds differ though they all arise from Buddha wisdom. As an analogy, the great earth has ten great kings of mountains. 
What are these ten? 
They are the Snow  Mountain, the Intoxicating Fragrance  Mountain, the Vaidhari Mountain, the Ṛṣi Mountain, the Yugaṁdhara Mountain, the Horse Ear  Mountain, the Nimiṁdhara Mountain, the Cakravāḍa Mountain, the Ketumati Mountain, and the Sumeru Mountain.     “Buddha-Son, the Snow Mountain grows all medicinal plants, which cannot be depleted by harvesting; likewise the Joyful Ground is where a Bodhisattva masters all worldly texts, skills, writing, and incantations, a description of which cannot be finished. 
Buddha-Son, the Intoxicating Fragrance Mountain holds all fragrances, which cannot be depleted by collecting; likewise the Taint-Free Ground is where a Bodhisattva wears the fragrance of observing the precepts and his deportments, a description of which cannot be finished. 
Buddha-Son, the Vaidhari Mountain is made of treasures and stores all treasures, which cannot be depleted by mining; likewise the Radiant Ground is where a Bodhisattva masters meditation, transcendental powers, liberation samādhi, and samāpatti, a description of which cannot be finished. 
Buddha-Son, the Ṛṣi Mountain is made of treasures and inhabited by countless ṛṣis with the five transcendental_powers; likewise the Flaming Wisdom Ground is where a Bodhisattva attains superb wisdom, a description of which cannot be finished. 
Buddha-Son, the Yugaṁdhara Mountain is made of treasures and inhabited by countless yakṣas and great spirits; likewise the Hard-to-Conquer Ground is where a Bodhisattva masters commanding transcendental powers, a description of which cannot be finished. 
Buddha-Son, the Horse Ear Mountain is made of treasures and bears all kinds of fruit, which cannot be depleted by harvesting; likewise the Revealing Ground is where a Bodhisattva fathoms the principle of dependent arising of dharmas and expounds the voice-hearer fruits, a description of which cannot be finished. 
Buddha-Son, the Nimiṁdhara Mountain is made of treasures and inhabited by countless mighty dragons; likewise the FarGoing Ground is where a Bodhisattva acquires skillful means and wisdom, and expounds Pratyekabuddhahood, a description of which cannot be finished. 
BuddhaSon, the Cakravāḍa Mountain is made of treasures and inhabited by countless ones with self-mastery; likewise the Motionless Ground is where a Bodhisattva does everything effortlessly in the world of diversity, a description of which cannot be finished. 
Buddha-Son, the Ketumati Mountain is made of treasures and inhabited by countless powerful asuras; likewise the Good Wisdom Ground is where a Bodhisattva acquires the wisdom-knowledge of all processes of birth and death in the world, a description of which cannot be finished. 
Buddha-Son, the Sumeru Mountain is made of treasures and inhabited by countless awesome gods; likewise the Dharma Cloud Ground is where a Bodhisattva does all kinds of Buddha work and is certain to acquire a Tathāgata’s Ten Powers, Four Fearlessnesses, and Eighteen Exclusive Dharmas, a description of which cannot be finished. 
“Buddha-Son, these ten kings of treasure mountains, which rise from the immense ocean, receive their names because of their differences. 
Likewise the ten Bodhisattva grounds encompassed in Buddha wisdom receive their names because of their differences. 
**** The Ten Grounds Compared to the Ten Characteristics of the Ocean **** “Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the immense ocean is called an ocean because of its ten characteristics. 
What are these ten? 
First, it gradually becomes deeper. 
Second, it does not allow a corpse to lodge. 
Third, waters that flow into the ocean lose their original names. 
Fourth, its water everywhere has the same flavor. 
Fifth, it contains immeasurable treasures. 
Sixth, its bottom is hard to reach. 
Seventh, it is immense. 
Eighth, it is inhabited by giant creatures. 
Ninth, its rising tides do not breach their bounds. 
Tenth, it accepts torrential rains and never overflows. 
“Likewise Bodhisattva training is called Bodhisattva training because of its ten characteristics, which are unrivaled. 
What are these ten? 
First, the Joyful Ground produces great vows that progressively become deeper. 
Second, the Taint-Free Ground does not accept anyone who violates the precepts as if he were a corpse. 
Third, the Radiant Ground discards false names in the world. 
Fourth, the Flaming Wisdom Ground has the same flavor as that of Buddhas’ merits. 
Fifth, the Hard-to-Conquer Ground produces immeasurable skillful means and transcendental powers, like treasures. 
Sixth, the Revealing Ground reveals the profound principle of dependent arising of dharmas. 
Seventh, the Far-Going Ground produces applied wisdom for making choices. 
Eighth, the Motionless Ground displays wide-ranging majestic things. 
Ninth, the Good Wisdom Ground reveals profound liberation and supports worldly ways without exceeding bounds. 
Tenth, the Dharma Cloud Ground accepts the great dharma illumination and the great Dharma rain of all Buddha-Tathāgatas, never overloaded. 
What are these ten? 
First, it comes from the immense ocean. 
Second, it is worked on by a skillful jeweler. 
Third, it is perfect, without flaws. 
Fourth, it is pure, free from impurities. 
Fifth, it is translucent throughout. 
Sixth, its hole is skillfully bored. 
Seventh, it is threaded with a jeweled string. 
Eighth, it is placed atop a high cylindrical banner made of aquamarine. 
Ninth, it emits all kinds of radiance. 
Tenth, it can rain down treasures at the king’s will, to fulfill sentient beings’ wishes. 
“Buddha-Son, know that likewise a Bodhisattva  surpasses other holy ones for ten reasons. 
What these ten? 
On the second ground, he observes the precepts and practices the dhūta way of life, training in purity. 
On the third ground, his meditation and samādhi are perfect and flawless. 
On the fourth ground, his training for bodhi is pure, free from impurities. 
On the fifth ground, his skillful means and transcendental powers are apparent. 
On the sixth ground, his wisdom penetrates the dependent arising of dharmas. 
On the seventh ground, he connects dharmas with the string of applied wisdom. 
On the eighth ground, he places himself atop the high cylindrical banner of commanding transcendental powers. 
On the ninth ground, he observes sentient beings’ ways and emits the radiance of wisdom acquired by hearing and retaining the Dharma. 
On the tenth ground, he receives the position to acquire Buddha wisdom, become a Buddha, and do Buddha work to benefit sentient beings. 
**** The Ten Grounds Expounded Everywhere **** “Buddha-Son, if sentient beings do not plant their roots of goodness, they cannot hear the virtuous Dharma Door of Bodhisattva training that leads to the Knowledge of all Knowledge.”     Liberation Moon Bodhisattva asked, “How much merit does one acquire by hearing this Dharma Door?”     Vajra Store Bodhisattva answered, “As acquiring the knowledge of all knowledge brings merit, so too does hearing this Dharma Door. 
Because one must hear this virtuous Dharma Door that leads to the knowledge of all knowledge, in order to have faith and understanding, accept and uphold it, and train accordingly. 
Then one will arrive at the ground of knowledge of all knowledge.”     Then, through the spiritual power of the Buddha, as the way things naturally are, in the ten directions, worlds as numerous as the dust particles in ten koṭi Buddha Lands moved in six different ways, displaying eighteen characteristics: 
moving, everywhere moving, everywhere equally moving; rising, everywhere rising, everywhere equally rising; shifting, everywhere shifting, everywhere equally shifting; quaking, everywhere quaking, everywhere equally quaking; roaring, everywhere roaring, everywhere equally roaring; knocking, everywhere knocking, everywhere equally knocking. 
The sky rained down celestial flowers, chaplets, garments, and jeweled ornaments, as well as banners and silky canopies. 
In harmonious melodies, celestial music praised in unison the virtues of the ground of all wisdom-knowledge and the superb training on the Ten Grounds. 
As this Dharma Door  was expounded in this world, in the palace of the god-king of Paranirmita-vaśa-vartin Heaven , so too it was expounded in all worlds in the ten directions. 
Then, through the spiritual power of the Buddha,  beyond worlds in the ten directions, which are as numerous as the dust particles in ten koṭi Buddha Lands, Bodhisattvas as numerous as the dust particles in ten koṭi Buddha Lands came to this assembly. They said, “Very good, very good! Vajra Store Bodhisattva, you have well expounded the features of Bodhisattva training on the Ten Grounds. 
We are all called Vajra Store. 
The different worlds where we reside are all called Vajra Virtue, and the Buddhas there are all called Vajra Banner. 
Residing in our own worlds, through the spiritual power of the Tathāgata, we expound this Dharma Door. Our assemblies equal this assembly, and the words and meanings we pronounce are the same as those pronounced here, neither more nor less. 
Through the spiritual power of the Buddha, we have come to this assembly to testify for you. 
As we come to this world to testify, so too we go to all worlds in the ten directions to testify.” **** Summarizing Stanzas **** Then Vajra Store Bodhisattva observed all assemblies everywhere in dharma realms in the directions. 
To praise the activation of the bodhi mind, to reveal the attainments of Bodhisattvas, to purify Bodhisattva training, to promote the path to the knowledge of all knowledge, to remove all taints in the world, to give all sentient beings  the overall wisdom-knowledge, to display the majesty of inconceivable wisdom, to describe different merits that adorn Bodhisattvas, and to clarify the meanings of the Ten Grounds explained earlier, through the power of the Buddha, he spoke in verse: 
The Ten Grounds arise from Buddha wisdom, Like the ten kings of mountains standing majestically. 
The first ground provides all texts and skills, like the Snow Mountain, which grows medicinal plants. 
The second ground produces  observing the precepts and hearing the Dharma, like the Intoxicating Fragrance Mountain, which grows fragrant plants. 
The third ground cultivates radiant wisdom, like the Vaidhari Mountain, which grows splendid flowers. The fourth ground provides endless Dharma treasures, like the Ṛṣi Mountain, where the benevolent ones reside. 
The fifth ground produces transcendental powers, like the Yugaṁdhara Mountain, where yakṣas reside. 
The sixth ground reveals the principle of dependent arising of dharmas, like the Horse Ear Mountain, which bears abundant fruit. 
The seventh ground reveals great wisdom, like the Nimiṁdhara Mountain, where dragons reside. 
The eighth ground provides effortless training, like the Cakravāḍa Mountain, where those with self-mastery reside. 
The ninth ground reveals unimpeded wisdom-knowledge, like the Ketumati Mountain, where asuras reside. 
The tenth ground reveals immeasurable virtues, like the Sumeru Mountain, where gods reside. 
On the first ground, a Bodhisattva is led by his great vows; on the second ground, he observes the precepts. 
On the third ground, he accumulates merit; on the fourth ground, he practices meditation. 
On the fifth ground, he does wonderful things; on the sixth ground, he fathoms the profound principle. 
On the seventh ground, he acquires vast wisdom; on the eighth ground, he adorns all Buddha Lands. 
On the ninth ground, he ponders the subtle meanings  and transcends all worldly paths. 
On the tenth ground, he receives and retains the Dharma of Buddhas. Thus, the ocean of Bodhisattva training is never drained. 
On the fourth ground, he purifies his training; on the fifth ground, he comes to achievement. On the sixth ground, he masters the principle of dependent arising of dharmas; on the seventh ground, he acquires thorough understanding. On the eighth ground, he stands atop the vajra banner. On the ninth ground, he observes the dense forest of sentient beings. 
If worlds in the ten directions are pulverized into dust particles, In one thought one can know their number. Even the number of dust particles throughout space can be known, But the virtues of training on the Ten Grounds cannot be described in a koṭi kalpas. 
Then, in the Universal Radiance Palace Hall, He entered the Buddha Samādhi of a Kṣaṇa. Using the transcendental power of His  overall wisdomknowledge, He revealed a Tathāgata’s body, which is pure, hindrance free, reliance free, and not attached to anything. Abiding in the quietest śamatha,  with awesome virtue and without taints, He enabled all beholders to come to spiritual realization. He appeared to them in suitable and timely ways, as He abided in the one_appearance of no appearance. He was with Bodhisattvas as numerous as the dust particles in ten Buddha Lands. 
With profound wisdom, they expounded the true meanings . Equipped the overall wisdom-knowledge, they subjugated the māras. As they walked in the world, their minds were always quiet, abiding in the Bodhisattva liberation, which abides nowhere. Such Bodhisattvas included Vajra Wisdom Bodhisattva, Unequaled Wisdom Bodhisattva, Meanings and Words Wisdom Bodhisattva, Supreme Wisdom Bodhisattva, Equability Wisdom Bodhisattva, Dragon Wisdom Bodhisattva, Achievement Wisdom Bodhisattva, Harmony Wisdom Bodhisattva, Powerful Wisdom Bodhisattva, Inconceivable Wisdom Bodhisattva, Unhindered Wisdom Bodhisattva, Higher Wisdom Bodhisattva, Universal Offering Wisdom Bodhisattva, In Accord with the Truth Wisdom Bodhisattva, Skillful Wisdom Bodhisattva, Mastery of the Dharma Wisdom Bodhisattva, Dharma Wisdom Bodhisattva, Silent Wisdom Bodhisattva, Open Sky Wisdom Bodhisattva, One Appearance Wisdom Bodhisattva, Good Wisdom Bodhisattva, Illusion Wisdom Bodhisattva, Vast Wisdom Bodhisattva, Powerful Wisdom Bodhisattva, Worldly Wisdom Bodhisattva, Buddha Ground Wisdom Bodhisattva, True Wisdom Bodhisattva, Superb Wisdom Bodhisattva, Knowledge Light Wisdom Bodhisattva, Boundless Wisdom Bodhisattva, Mindfulness as Adornment Bodhisattva, Reaching the Limit of Emptiness Bodhisattva, Nature as Adornment Bodhisattva, Profound State Bodhisattva, Understanding Right or Wrong Bodhisattva, Great Radiance Bodhisattva, Constant Radiance Bodhisattva, Understanding the Buddha-Character Bodhisattva, Mind King Bodhisattva, One Action Bodhisattva, Displaying Transcendental Powers Bodhisattva, Wisdom Sprout Bodhisattva, Merit Place Bodhisattva, Dharma Lamp Bodhisattva, Illuminating the World Bodhisattva, Upholding the World Bodhisattva, Best Peace and Stability Bodhisattva, Supreme Bodhisattva, Unexcelled Bodhisattva, Unequaled Bodhisattva, Peerless Bodhisattva, Unhindered Action Bodhisattva, Radiant Flame Bodhisattva, Moonlight Bodhisattva, One Dust Particle Bodhisattva, Staunch Action Bodhisattva, Pouring the Dharma Rain Bodhisattva, Superb Banner Bodhisattva, Universal Adornment Bodhisattva, Knowledge Eye Bodhisattva, Dharma Eye Bodhisattva, Wisdom Cloud Bodhisattva, Total Retention King Bodhisattva, Wishing to Abide Nowhere Bodhisattva, Knowledge Store Bodhisattva, Mind King Bodhisattva, Inner Awareness Wisdom Bodhisattva, Abiding in Buddha Wisdom Bodhisattva, Vigorous Power of Dhāraṇī Bodhisattva, Power to Sustain the Earth Bodhisattva, Wonderful Moon Bodhisattva, Sumeru Summit Bodhisattva, Jewel Crest Bodhisattva, Universal Illumination Bodhisattva, Awesome Virtue King Bodhisattva, Knowledge Wheel Bodhisattva, Mighty Virtue Bodhisattva, Great Dragon Appearance Bodhisattva, Upright Action Bodhisattva, No Regress Bodhisattva, Upholding the Dharma Banner Bodhisattva, No Memory Loss Bodhisattva, Assisting Life Journeys Bodhisattva, Inconceivably Resolute Wisdom Bodhisattva, Boundless Knowledge to Be Playful Bodhisattva, Endless Dharma Store Bodhisattva, Knowledge Sun Bodhisattva, Dharma Sun Bodhisattva, Knowledge Store Bodhisattva, Knowledge Pool Bodhisattva, Universal Sight Bodhisattva, View of Dharmas Being Not Empty Bodhisattva, Vajra Passage Bodhisattva, Vajra Knowledge Bodhisattva, Vajra Flame Bodhisattva, Vajra Wisdom Bodhisattva, Universal Eye Bodhisattva, Buddha Sun Bodhisattva, Holding a Buddha’s Vajra Secret Bodhisattva, Adorned with the Knowledge of the Universal Eye Bodhisattva, and other Bodhisattvas. 
Such Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas were as numerous as the dust particles in ten Buddha Lands. In the past, together with Vairocana Tathāgata, they all had taken Bodhisattva actions to develop their roots_of_goodness. 
**** Seeking to See Samantabhadra Bodhisattva **** Then Universal Eye Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, through the spiritual power of the Buddha, rose from his seat, bared his right shoulder, and knelt his right knee on the floor. Joining his hands, he asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, I have some questions to ask the Tathāgata, the Samyak-Saṁbuddha. 
May I have Your permission?”     The Buddha answered, “You may ask any questions you wish. 
I will answer them to make you happy.”     Universal Eye Bodhisattva asked, “How many samādhis are attained by Samantabhadra Bodhisattva and Bodhisattvas who constantly carry out his universally worthy action vows? How do they enter, exit, or abide in their great samādhis? 
If a Bodhisattva excels in entering and exiting inconceivable great samādhis, he achieves command of all samādhis and displays transcendental powers without rest.”     The Buddha answered, “Very good! 
Universal Eye, you ask about these meanings to benefit past, present, and future Bodhisattvas. 
Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, who is rarely encountered, is here now. He has achieved inconceivable command of transcendental_powers, surpassing all other Bodhisattvas. 
He is born from immeasurable Bodhisattva actions. He has purified his great Bodhisattva vows, and his actions never regress. He has acquired immeasurable pāramitā doors, dhāraṇī doors, and eloquence doors, all of which are pure and hindrance free. Through the power of his original vows, he tirelessly benefits all sentient beings with great compassion throughout the endless future. 
You should ask him to describe his samādhi, mastery, and liberation.”     When the Bodhisattvas in the assembly heard Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s name, they immediately attained countless inconceivable samādhis, and their minds became quiet, motionless, and hindrance free. 
Their wisdom vast and immeasurable, and their profound state unexcelled, they all saw innumerable Buddhas present before them and acquired the powers of Tathāgatas. With the same Tathāgata nature, they clearly saw into past, present, and future. They acquired endless merits and full transcendental powers. 
With reverence for Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, these Bodhisattvas longed to see him. They looked all around the assembly but could see neither him nor his seat. 
This was caused by the Tathāgata’s spiritual power as well as by Samantabhadra’s transcendental power. 
Then Universal Eye Bodhisattva asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, where is Samantabhadra Bodhisattva now?”     The Buddha answered, “Universal Eye, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva is now amid the multitude in this bodhimaṇḍa. 
He is near where I am and has not moved.”     Then Universal Eye and the other Bodhisattvas again scanned the assembly in this bodhimaṇḍa, looking for him everywhere. 
They said to the Buddha, “WorldHonored One, we still cannot see Samantabhadra Bodhisattva or his seat.”     The Buddha said, “Indeed. 
Good men, why can you not see him? 
Good men, because Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s attainment is profound and indescribable. 
He has acquired the boundless wisdom door and entered the Samādhi of a Lion’s Thrust. He has achieved unsurpassed command of uses  and entered the pure and hindrance-free state. He produces a Tathāgata’s Ten Powers, uses the dharma realm as his body, and receives the protection and concern from all Tathāgatas. In one thought he can access the differentiationfree wisdom-knowledge of past, present, and future Buddhas. That is why none of you can see him.”     Upon hearing the Tathāgata’s description of Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s pure virtues, Universal Eye Bodhisattva attained 10,000 asaṁkhyeya samādhis. 
Using the power of samādhi, he again scanned everywhere, anxious to see Samantabhadra Bodhisattva. 
Yet he still could not see him, nor could the other Bodhisattvas. 
Then Universal Eye Bodhisattva rose from his samādhi and said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, I entered 10,000 asaṁkhyeya samādhis, seeking to see Samantabhadra, but still could not see him. Nor could I perceive his body and body karmas, his voice and voice karmas, or his mind and mind karmas. Nor could I see his seat or his place.”     The Buddha said, “Indeed, indeed! 
Good man, know that Samantabhadra Bodhisattva abides in the power of inconceivable liberation. 
Universal Eye, what is your opinion? 
Can anyone describe the places of the illusions given in a book of magic?”     “No, no one can.”     The Buddha said, “Universal Eye, if even the appearances of illusions cannot be described, how can anyone enter and see Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s secret states of body, voice, and mind? 
Why not? 
Because Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s attainment is profound, inconceivable, immeasurable, and beyond measure. 
In all, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, with his vajra wisdom, enters everywhere in the dharma realm, but neither walks nor abides in any world. He knows that, neither coming nor going, the bodies of sentient beings  are no body. He has achieved command of indestructible and differentiation-free transcendental powers. With no reliance, no action, and no motion, he has reached the ultimate edge of the dharma realm. 
“Good man, whoever comes to see Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, hear his name, attend him, ponder his teachings, think of him, elicit faith in  and acquire an understanding of it, make observations, seek or find the right directions, or make vows endlessly, will receive benefits. 
His effort will never be futile.”     Then Universal Eye and the other Bodhisattvas, who admired Samantabhadra Bodhisattva and longed to see him, said: 
Namo Samantabhadra Bodhisattva!” Three times they spoke these words as they bowed their heads down to the floor. 
Then the Buddha told Universal Eye Bodhisattva and the other Bodhisattvas in the assembly: “Buddha-Sons, you all should bow to Samantabhadra and earnestly beseech him. 
You should also intently observe in the ten_directions, visualize Samantabhadra appearing before you, and think that he is everywhere in the dharma realm. 
With profound faith and understanding, you should discard everything and resolve to make the same action vows as Samantabhadra’s: To enter into the truth that dharmas are non-dual , to manifest bodies in all worlds, to know sentient beings’ diverse capacities, and to collect the universally worthy ways everywhere. 
If you make such a great vow, you will come to see Samantabhadra Bodhisattva.”     Following the Buddha’s words, Universal Eye and the other Bodhisattvas all made prostrations, beseeching to see the great one, Samantabhadra. 
**** Appearance of Samantabhadra Bodhisattva **** Then Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, using the transcendental power of liberation, responded by revealing his body. He enabled all Bodhisattvas there to see that he was near the Tathāgata and was seated on a lotus flower amid the Bodhisattvas. 
They also saw him coming from where all Buddhas were in other worlds. 
They also saw him, in places where all Buddhas were, expound all Bodhisattva actions, indicate the path of  the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge, explain all Bodhisattva transcendental powers, differentiate the awesome virtues of all Bodhisattvas, and manifest as all past, present, and future Buddhas. 
Upon seeing these spiritual displays, Universal Eye Bodhisattva and the other Bodhisattvas felt exuberance and great joy in their hearts. They all bowed down to Samantabhadra Bodhisattva with great respect, as if seeing all Buddhas  in the ten directions. 
Then, through the awesome spiritual power of the Buddha, the power of faith and understanding of the Bodhisattvas, and the power of the original vows of Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, from 10,000 kinds of clouds, the sky rained down flowers, chaplets, incense, powdered incense, canopies, garments, ornaments, jewels, burning incense, and colorful fabrics. 
Countless worlds quaked in six different ways. 
Celestial music played and was heard in countless distant worlds. 
Vast radiance illuminated countless worlds, purifying them all, ending the three evil life-journeys, and enabling innumerable Bodhisattvas to begin their universally worthy actions, to complete their universally worthy actions, and to fulfill their universally worthy action vows and attain anuttara-samyaksaṁbodhi. 
Then Universal Eye Bodhisattva said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva is one who abides in great awesome virtues, in being unequaled, in being unexcelled, in having  no regress, in the equality , in indestructibility, in differentiated dharmas, in undifferentiated dharmas, in the realm of all sentient beings’ skillful minds, and in the Samādhi of the Innate Liberation of All Dharmas.”     The Buddha said, “Indeed, indeed! 
Universal Eye, as you say, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva has an asaṁkhyeya pure virtues, such as unequaled majestic virtues, immeasurable precious virtues, inconceivable ocean-like virtues, immeasurable appearances of virtues, boundless cloud-like virtues, limitless praiseworthy virtues, endless dharma virtues, ineffable virtues, all Buddha virtues, and virtues whose praises cannot end.” **** The Ten Great Samādhis and Their Benefits **** Then the Tathāgata told Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, “Samantabhadra, you should expound the ten great samādhis to Universal Eye and the other Bodhisattvas in the assembly, enabling them to enter them and fulfill all their universally worthy action vows. 
A description of these ten great samādhis by BodhisattvaMahāsattvas enabled past Bodhisattvas to transcend the world, enable present Bodhisattvas to transcend the world, and will enable future Bodhisattvas to transcend the world. 
What are these ten great samādhis? 
They are  Samādhi of the Hindrance-Free Wheel. “Only great Bodhisattvas can excel in entering these ten great samādhis. Past, present, and future Buddhas pronounced, do pronounce, and will pronounce them. 
A Bodhisattva who appreciates and values them, and practices them without indolence, will attain them. Such a one is called Buddha, Tathāgata, one who has acquired the Ten_Powers, guiding teacher, great guiding teacher, all-seeing one, one with  the overall wisdom-knowledge, with command of all dharmas, and without hindrance, and one who knows all things. 
“Such a Bodhisattva enters all worlds but has no attachment to any world. 
He enters the realm of all sentient beings but takes nothing from them. 
He enters all bodies hindrance free. 
He enters all dharma realms and knows that each has no bounds. 
He stays close to all past, present, and future Buddhas, and clearly sees Their Dharma. He uses all words skillfully and knows all false names. He completes the pure Bodhisattva Way and takes all Bodhisattva actions. 
In one thought he acquires all past, present, and future wisdom-knowledge . He knows all past, present, and future dharmas. He widely expounds all Buddhas’ teachings and turns the no-regress Dharma wheel. In each of his past, present, and future lives, he walks all bodhi paths. 
On every bodhi path, he fully understands all Buddhas’ words. 
“ are the Bodhisattva door of penetrating dharma appearances, the Bodhisattva door of wisdom and enlightenment, the unexcelled door of  the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge, the door of Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s action vows, the wish-fulfilling door of keen transcendental powers, the door of eloquence and total retention , the door of differentiating past, present, and future dharmas, the door of all Buddhas’ appearances in worlds, the door of establishing all sentient beings in sarvajña, the door of purifying all worlds by a Buddha’s spiritual power. 
“If a Bodhisattva enters these samādhis, he acquires the endless power of the dharma realm and walks across the open sky hindrance free. 
He acquires with immeasurable ease the position of a Dharma king, like being enthroned in the world through a ceremony with water poured on his head. 
He acquires boundless wisdom-knowledge of all things, and great power in ten fulfilling ways. 
He acquires the mind of no contention and enters quietness . 
He has great compassion and is fearless like a lion. 
He becomes a man of wisdom and kindles the bright lamp of the true Dharma. 
No one can finish praising his virtues, which are beyond the imagination of voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas. 
“He acquires the wisdom-knowledge of the dharma realm and, as he abides in quietness, he expounds the Dharma, following the ways of the world. 
He abides in  no appearance and excels in differentiating their appearances. 
He acquires the pure store of his true nature  and is born into the Tathāgata family. 
He opens various doors to differentiating dharmas, using the wisdom that  they are no different. 
He knows the right timing to give the Dharma as alms to enlighten all. He is called a wise one who excels in drawing in sentient beings to make them pure. 
Using applied wisdom-knowledge, he manifests attainment of Buddhahood but continues to train endlessly on the Bodhisattva Way. 
He abides in the overall wisdom-knowledge and uses skillful means to display various great transcendental powers. 
Therefore, Samantabhadra, you should expound in detail the ten great samādhis of all Bodhisattvas. 
All in this assembly wish to hear you.” **** The First Great Samādhi, the Samādhi of Universal Radiance **** Then Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, at the Tathāgata’s command, looked upon Universal Eye and the other Bodhisattvas, and said, “Buddha-Son, what is a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s Samādhi of Universal Radiance? 
A BodhisattvaMahāsattva who abides in this samādhi has endless wisdom-knowledge of ten dharmas. 
What are these ten? 
Buddha-Son, these are called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s  ten dharmas. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva activates ten boundless minds. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the boundless mind to manifest various bodies with ease and enter the assemblies in all Tathāgatas’ bodhimaṇḍas. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has the wisdom-knowledge to enter this samādhi in ten different ways. 
What are these ten? 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of useful wisdomknowledge to enter this great samādhi. 
What are these ten? 
Fifth, in each small world, he manifests 100 koṭi bodies. Sixth, each body enters hundreds of koṭis of Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold Worlds. Seventh, in each small world contained in those Worlds, he manifests hundreds of koṭis of Bodhisattvas training for bodhi. Eighth, through training, each Bodhisattva acquires hundreds of koṭis of clear understandings. 
All manifested bodies are neither one nor many, and enter and exit this samādhi without any confusion. 
“Buddha-Son, for example, the asura-king Rahula has a body 700 yojanas tall and can manifest a body 168,000 yojanas tall. Rising above the ocean, the top half of this body is as tall as Mount Sumeru. 
“Buddha-Son, an asura-king has greed, anger, and delusion, as well as arrogance. 
However, even he can manifest bodies, not to mention a BodhisattvaMahāsattva who has a deep understanding that mental activities are like illusions, all things in the world are like dreams, the appearances of Buddhas in worlds are like reflections, all worlds are like manifestations, and spoken words and other sounds are like echoes. When he sees seemingly real dharmas, he uses them as his body. He knows that all dharmas are inherently pure, and that body and mind have no substance. As his body everywhere abides in an immeasurable state, he uses the vast radiance of Buddha wisdom to do all trainings for bodhi. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi transcends the world and has no attachment to it. Nothing can disturb him and no one can surpass him. 
For example, as a bhikṣu visualizes the impurities inside his body, he sees his body filled with impurities. 
Likewise, as a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abiding in this samādhi observes his dharma body, he sees all worlds entering his body. Although he clearly sees in his body all worlds and their adornments, he has no attachment to them. 
Buddha-Son, this is a description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s first great samādhi, the Samādhi of Universal Radiance, and his useful wisdom-knowledge. 
**** The Second Great Samādhi, the Samādhi of Wondrous Radiance **** “Buddha-Son, what is a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s Samādhi of Wondrous Radiance? 
In each world, he manifests bodies as numerous as the dust particles in a ThreeThousand Large Thousandfold World. Each body emits beams of light as numerous as the dust particles in a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World. Each beam displays colors as numerous as the dust particles in a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World. Each color illuminates worlds as numerous as the dust particles in a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World and tames sentient beings as numerous as the dust particles in a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World. 
This Bodhisattva knows all these worlds and their differences, such as impurities, purities, causes, formations, continuations, radiant colors, and comings and goings. 
As this Bodhisattva enters all these worlds, likewise they enter his body. Yet they do not become chaotic, and their various adornments are not destroyed. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the sun rises, revolves around Mount Sumeru, and shines on the seven treasure mountain ranges, which encircle Mount Sumeru. The sun shines on these seven treasure mountain ranges and casts its reflection in each ocean between every two mountains. 
As the sun shining on the seven treasure mountain ranges casts its reflections in the seven oceans, these reflections shine on the seven treasure mountain ranges. One can say that the sun rises at the seven treasure mountain ranges or the seven oceans. One can also say that the sun enters the seven treasure mountain ranges or the seven oceans. 
However, there are no boundaries between the sun’s appearances and its reflections. They have neither substance nor no substance. They neither abide in the mountain ranges nor are apart from them; they neither abide in the water nor are apart from it. 
“Buddha-Son, likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this great Samādhi of Wondrous Radiance destroys neither the established worldly dharmas nor their appearances. 
He abides neither inside nor outside the world. 
He neither differentiates nor destroys the appearances of worldly dharmas. 
He observes that all dharmas abide in the one appearance of no appearance but do not lose their own appearances. He abides in true_suchness of dharma nature, never leaving it. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, a magician versed in the art of illusion performs tricks at crossroads. He changes the present day or moment into a day or a night, seven days or seven nights, a half month or a whole month, a year or a hundred years. He can conjure up things at will, such as cities, villages, springs, streams, rivers, seas, the sun, the moon, clouds, rains, palaces, and houses. 
The long duration of the conjured years does not destroy the actual day or moment, and the short duration of the actual day or moment does not preclude the conjured days, months, or years. 
As the conjurations appear, the actual time scale is not destroyed. 
“Likewise, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this great Samādhi of Wondrous Radiance manifests an asaṁkhyeya worlds that enter one world. 
Each of these worlds has earth, water, fire, and wind , and is complete with various adornments, such as oceans, mountains, cities, villages, gardens, houses, and palaces of gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, and mahoragas. 
Each world comprises the desire realm, the form realm, and the formless realm , as well as the small thousandfold world and the large thousandfold world. Sentient beings receive requitals for their karmas, as they die in one place and are reborn in another place. 
Each world has its time scales, such as a moment, a day and a night, a half month, a whole month, a year, a hundred years, the formation kalpa, and the destruction kalpa. Each world can be an impure land, a pure land, a vast land, or a small land. Buddhas appear in pure Buddha Lands and are surrounded by Bodhisattvas in their assemblies. Buddhas display commanding spiritual powers, and teach and transform sentient beings. 
Wherever a world is, it is filled with innumerable sentient beings in diverse shapes, making different life-journeys. These sentient beings are innumerable, countless, and inconceivable. Through the power of their past, present, and future pure karmas, immeasurable treasures appear. 
This Bodhisattva manifests all such things. When he enters one world, he sees all things clearly. When he enters all worlds, using his endless wisdom-knowledge he observes, ponders, and knows all things as they truly are. The multiplicity of worlds does not destroy a single world, and the singularity of a world does not destroy multiple worlds. 
“Why? 
Because this Bodhisattva knows that every dharma has no self, he is called one who enters no lifespan and no action. Because he trains in having no contention in the world, he is called one who abides in having no self. 
Because he truly sees that all bodies arise from conditions, he is called one who abides in being no sentient being. 
Because he knows that all dharmas undergoing birth and death arise through causes and conditions, he is called one who abides in being no pudgala . 
Because he knows that all dharmas are equal , he is called one who abides in having no intention to be reborn and abides in having no mānava . 
Because he knows that all dharmas are quiet by nature, he is called one who abides in nirvāṇa. 
Because he knows that all dharmas have the one appearance , he is called one who abides in making no differentiations. 
Because he knows that the dharma realm has no differentiated dharmas, he is called one who abides in inconceivable dharmas. 
Because he diligently trains to acquire all skillful means to tame sentient beings, he is called one who abides in great compassion. 
“Buddha-Son, thus this Bodhisattva can put an asaṁkhyeya worlds into one world, know the various differences among sentient beings, see innumerable Bodhisattvas each setting off on the Way, observe that innumerable Buddhas appear everywhere, see that each Tathāgata expounds the Dharma, which is accepted by Bodhisattvas, and see himself training amid them. 
However, he does not leave this place to see that place, nor does he leave that place to see this place. There is no difference between his body there and his body here, because both are in the dharma realm. He diligently makes observations without rest and never abandons his wisdom, which never regresses. 
“As an analogy, when a magician performs tricks in an actual place, his conjured place does not destroy the actual place, and his conjured day does not destroy the actual day. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva manifests a world where there is no world, and manifests the disappearance of an existing world. 
He manifests sentient beings where there is no sentient being, and manifests the disappearance of existing sentient beings. 
He manifests forms where there is no form, and manifests the disappearance of existing forms. 
How things were before does not disrupt how they appear later; how things appear later does not disrupt how things were before. 
“This Bodhisattva knows that all worldly dharmas are like illusions. 
Knowing that dharmas are illusory, he knows that knowledge is illusory. 
Knowing that knowledge is illusory, he knows that karmas are illusory. 
Knowing that knowledge and karmas are illusory, he acquires the wisdom-knowledge of illusion. An illusion is not displayed outside a place, and a place is not outside an illusion. 
Likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva does not enter a world from outside the open sky, nor does he enter the open sky from outside a world. 
Because there is no difference between the world and the open sky. As he abides in the world, so too he abides in the open sky. 
A BodhisattvaMahāsattva in the open sky can see and do diverse magnificent karmas in the world. In one thought he can know countless worlds in formation or destruction, as well as the succession of kalpas. 
In one thought he can manifest countless kalpas without lengthening that thought. 
“A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who acquires the wisdom-knowledge of inconceivable liberation from illusions arrives at the opposite shore. Abiding in the understanding of illusion, he enters worldly illusions and ponders that all dharmas are illusory. 
Not going against the illusory world, he applies his wisdom-knowledge of illusion. He knows that past, present, and future are but illusions, and that the mind is boundless. 
As Tathāgatas abide in the wisdom-knowledge of illusion with Their minds in equability, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva knows that all worldly things are illusory. With no fixation on having a self and its belongings, he has no attachment to any place. 
When a magician performs tricks, he does not live with his conjurations, nor is he captivated by them. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva knows that all dharmas are already on the opposite shore. He does not need to calculate in order to enter dharmas, nor does he become confused by them. 
This is a description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s second great samādhi, the Samādhi of Wondrous Radiance, and his useful wisdom-knowledge.” *** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 40 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  ***** **** Chapter 27b – The Ten Samādhis Continued **** **** The Third Great Samādhi, the Samādhi of the Transcendental Power to Go to All Buddha Lands ****  “Buddha-Son, what is a BodhisattvaMahāsattva’s Samādhi of the Transcendental Power to Go to All Buddha Lands? 
A Bodhisattva passes countless worlds in the east, and passes worlds as numerous as the dust particles in those worlds. In all worlds passed, he enters this samādhi. He enters it for a kṣaṇa or a moment, or again and again; for one four-hour period, whether morning, midday, afternoon, evening, midnight, or post-midnight; for one day or five days; for a half month or a whole month; for one year, or 100, 1,000, or 100,000 years; for one koṭi or 100,000 koṭi years, or 100,000 nayuta koṭi years; for one kalpa, or 100 or 100,000 kalpas, or 100,000 nayuta koṭi kalpas; for countless kalpas, measureless kalpas, boundless kalpas, unequaled kalpas, uncountable kalpas, indefinable kalpas, inconceivable kalpas, immeasurable kalpas, ineffable kalpas, or ineffably ineffable kalpas. 
“A Bodhisattva enters this samādhi for a long or short time, but does not differentiate between them. With no attachment, he does not identify dharmas as dual or non-dual, or by their general or particular features. Though making no differentiations, when he skillfully uses his transcendental power to rise from this samādhi, he never forgets anything experienced. 
“As an analogy, the sun moves incessantly, day and night. 
After sunrise, it is called day; after sunset, it is called night. Day is not the sun’s birth, and night is not its death. 
Likewise, in countless worlds a Bodhisattva enters this Samādhi of Transcendental Power, during which he clearly sees countless worlds. 
Buddha-Son, this is a description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s third great samādhi, the Samadhi of the Transcendental Power to Go to All Buddha Lands, and his useful wisdom-knowledge . 
A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi knows that the number of Buddhas equals that of sentient beings, and sees Buddhas more numerous than the dust particles in an asaṁkhyeya worlds. 
To every Tathāgata, he makes all kinds of offerings, such as choice incense, wonderful flowers, canopies as immense as an asaṁkhyeya Buddha Lands, superb adornments that surpass those in all worlds, fabulous treasures, ornaments that decorate the places for walking meditation, countless stores of superb jewels, excellent objects of offering collected from all Buddha Lands by using his spiritual power, and superb food and drink like those manifested through a Buddha’s spiritual power, which surpass celestial food and drink. 
To every Tathāgata, with reverence and veneration, he bows his head and prostrates himself on the ground. He asks questions about the Buddha Dharma, praises the equality of Buddhas, and extols Their vast merits. In the place of every Buddha, He enters into the great compassion that Buddhas enter into, and acquires the hindrancefree power that Buddhas equally have. 
In one thought, in all places where Buddhas are, he diligently seeks the wondrous Dharma. He knows that appearances, such as a Buddha’s being born into the world and His entering parinirvāṇa, cannot be captured. 
As an unfocused mind discerns objects, it is not concerned about what conditions cause it to rise or fall. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva never differentiates appearances, such as a Buddha’s being born into the world and His entering parinirvāṇa. 
It stays neither on land nor in the water. It is neither existent nor nonexistent, neither good nor bad, neither clear nor unclear, neither pure nor impure. It has neither substance nor no substance, neither taste nor no taste. Because of certain conditions, a mirage appears like water, as perceived by one’s consciousness. 
Likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva does not try to capture the appearances of a Tathāgata’s being born into the world and His entering parinirvāṇa. 
A Buddha’s appearance and disappearance are differentiations of the mind. 
“Buddha-Son, this samādhi is called Samādhi of Pure and Profound Mental Abilities. 
If a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters this samādhi, when he rises from it, he does not lose it. 
As an analogy, someone awakes from his sleep and remembers his dream. Although the things in his dream are not present in his waking state, he remembers them and does not forget them. 
Likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters this samādhi, sees Buddhas, and hears the Dharma. After he rises from this samādhi, he remembers everything. He uses what he has learned to enlighten multitudes in all bodhimaṇḍas and to adorn all Buddha Lands. He achieves a clear understanding of the immeasurable meanings and tenets , purifies all Dharma Doors, lights the torch of great wisdom, grows the Buddha seeds, achieves fearlessness, acquires endless eloquence, and expounds the teachings in the profound Dharma store. 
This is a description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s fourth great samādhi, the Samādhi of Pure and Profound Mental Abilities, and his useful wisdom-knowledge. 
**** The Fifth Great Samādhi, the Samādhi of the Knowledge of the Store of Past Adornments **** “Buddha-Son, what is a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s Samādhi of the Knowledge of the Store of Past Adornments? A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi can know the appearances of past Buddhas. 
This means that he knows successive worlds in successive kalpas, successive kalpas of successive worlds, successive appearances of Buddhas in successive kalpas, Their successive expounding of the Dharma during Their successive appearances, Their changing preferences for Their successive expounding of the Dharma, Their successive faculties that empowered Their changing preferences, Their successive taming  using Their successive faculties, Their successive lifespans for Their successive taming , and successive koṭis of nayutas of years of Their successive lifespans. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva systematically acquires boundless wisdom-knowledge. Therefore, he knows past Buddhas, past worlds, past Dharma Doors, past kalpas, past dharmas, past minds, past understandings, past procedures, past sentient beings, past afflictions, and past purities. BuddhaSon, this samādhi is also called the Samādhi of the Store of Past Purities. 
In one thought he can enter 100, 1,000, or 100,000 kalpas, or 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas; can enter countless kalpas, measureless kalpas, boundless kalpas, unequaled kalpas, uncountable kalpas, indefinable kalpas, inconceivable kalpas, immeasurable kalpas, ineffable kalpas, or ineffably ineffable kalpas. 
“Buddha-Son, when a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters this samādhi, he neither destroys the present nor depends on the past. 
Buddha-Son, when he rises from this samādhi, he receives ten blessings with nectar poured on his head by Tathāgatas. As he acquires them, is purified by them, achieves them, enters them, realizes them, fulfills them, and keeps them, he truly knows the purity of a Buddha’s three wheels . What are these ten? First, his explanations do not contradict his statements. Second, he endlessly expounds the Dharma. 
Tenth, he masters the wondrous Dharma. 
When a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva rises from this samādhi, he immediately receives these blessings from Tathāgatas without interruption. 
when a kalala  enters the womb, in one thought its consciousness comes to life. 
Likewise, when a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva rises from this samādhi, in one thought he receives these ten blessings. 
Buddha-Son, this is a description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s fifth great samādhi, the Samādhi of the Store of Past Adornments, and his useful wisdom-knowledge. 
**** The Sixth Great Samādhi, the Samādhi of the Store of Wisdom Light **** “Buddha-Son, what is a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s Samādhi of the Store of Wisdom Light? 
A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi can know all Buddhas in all future worlds in all future kalpas, though They have or have not been identified, have or have not received the prophecy of Buddhahood. He knows Their various names, such as countless names, measureless names, boundless names, unequaled names, uncountable names, inconceivable names, immeasurable names, and ineffable names. 
They will appear in worlds, benefit sentient beings, become Dharma kings, do Buddha work, explain its benefits, praise goodness, expound the meanings of white  karmas, purify evils, abide in virtues, reveal the highest truth , enter the position to receive blessings with nectar poured on their heads, and acquire  the overall wisdom-knowledge. 
These Tathāgatas-to-be will do perfect training, make perfect vows, acquire perfect wisdom-knowledge, be followed by perfect multitudes, be equipped with perfect adornments, accumulate perfect merits, master the perfect Dharma, harvest perfect fruit, acquire perfect physical appearances, and attain perfect enlightenment. 
He knows everything about Them, such as Their clans and family names, skillful means, displays of transcendental powers, bringing of sentient beings to  maturity, and entrance into parinirvāṇa. 
“In one thought this Bodhisattva can enter one kalpa, or 100, 1,000, or 100,000 kalpas, or 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas, or kalpas as numerous as the dust particles in Jambudvīpa , a world comprising four continents, a small thousandfold world, a medium thousandfold world, or a large thousandfold world. He can enter kalpas as numerous as the dust particles in one Buddha Land, 100,000 Buddha Lands, or 100,000 koṭi nayuta Buddha Lands; in countless Buddha Lands, measureless Buddha Lands, indefinable Buddha Lands, inconceivable Buddha Lands, immeasurable Buddha Lands, ineffable Buddha Lands, or ineffably ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Thus this Bodhisattva has the wisdomknowledge of all worlds in all future kalpas. 
“Because of this wisdom-knowledge, his mind enters ten retention doors. 
What are these ten? First, entering the retention door of Buddhas, he receives the protection and concern of Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffable number of Buddha Lands. 
Second, entering the retention door of the Dharma, he acquires the radiance of ten dhāraṇīs of endless eloquence. 
Third, entering the retention door of action, he makes excellent and perfect vows. 
Fourth, entering the retention door of power, he becomes unsurpassed and insuperable. 
Fifth, entering the retention door of wisdom-knowledge, he carries out the Buddha Dharma hindrance free. 
Sixth, entering the retention door of great compassion, he turns the pure Dharma wheel of  no regress. 
Seventh, entering the retention door of skillful differentiation of words, he turns the wheel of words and purifies the ground of all Dharma Doors. 
Eighth, entering the retention door of a lion’s birth, he opens the locks on the Dharma and leaves the mire of desires. 
Ninth, entering the retention door of the power of wisdom, he trains on the Bodhisattva Way without rest. 
Tenth, entering the retention door of a good friend’s power, he enables all sentient beings to achieve purity. 
Eleventh, entering the retention door of the power to abide nowhere, he enters ineffably ineffable kalpas. 
Twelfth, entering the retention door of the power of the Dharma, with his hindrance-free applied wisdom he knows that all dharmas are inherently pure. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi skillfully abides in ineffably ineffable kalpas and worlds. He skillfully knows ineffably ineffable kinds of sentient beings, their ineffably ineffable different appearances, their ineffably ineffable same or different karmic requitals, and their ineffably ineffable energetic progresses, capacities, habits, different actions, and pure and impure thoughts. He skillfully knows the various meanings of the ineffably ineffable Dharma, countless words, and spoken expressions. He skillfully knows the ineffably ineffable appearances of Buddhas in worlds, including Their clans, timings, physical appearances, teachings, Buddha work, and entering of parinirvāṇa. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, at sunrise, one with eyes can see all kinds of things in the world, such as villages, cities, palaces, houses, mountains, lakes, birds, animals, woods, flowers, and fruits. 
Buddha-Son, the impartial sunlight enables one’s eyes to see various appearances. 
Likewise the essence of this great samādhi is impartiality. Free from making differentiations, it enables a Bodhisattva to know 100,000 koṭi nayuta different appearances that are ineffably ineffable. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva with such wisdom-knowledge enables sentient beings to benefit from ten kinds of non-emptiness. 
What are these ten? 
First, the non-emptiness of views enables sentient beings to develop roots of goodness. 
Second, the non-emptiness of hearing  enables them to come to  maturity. 
Third, the non-emptiness of abiding  enables them to tame their minds. 
Fourth, the non-emptiness of initiative enables them to do what they say they will do, in order to understand the meanings of the Dharma. 
Fifth, the non-emptiness of action enables them to purify countless worlds. 
Sixth, the non-emptiness of staying close to  enables them, in the places of Tathāgatas in ineffably ineffable Buddha Lands, to end their ineffably ineffable doubts. 
Seventh, the non-emptiness of wishing enables them to make excellent offerings in order to fulfill their wishes. 
Eighth, the non-emptiness of skillful means enables them to abide in the pure wisdom-knowledge of hindrance-free liberation. 
Ninth, the non-emptiness of pouring Dharma rains motivates him to reveal skillfully the overall wisdom-knowledge to sentient beings with ineffably ineffable capacities, enabling them to walk the path to Buddhahood. 
Tenth, the nonemptiness of appearances motivates him to manifest countless appearances to illuminate all sentient beings. 
“Buddha-Son, when a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi uses these ten kinds of non-emptiness, god-kings come to bow to him, dragon-kings spread great clouds of fragrance, yakṣa-kings bow their heads down at his feet, asura-kings respectfully make offerings to him, garuḍa-kings surround him, Brahma-kings come to beseech him, kiṁnara-kings and mahoraga-kings praise him, gandharva-kings stay close to him, and human kings attend him and make offerings to him. 
Buddha-Son, this is a description of a BodhisattvaMahāsattva’s sixth great samādhi, the Samādhi of the Store of Wisdom Light, and his useful wisdom-knowledge. 
**** The Seventh Great Samādhi, the Samādhi of the Knowledge of Buddha Adornments in All Worlds **** “Buddha-Son, what is a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s Samādhi of the Knowledge of Buddha Adornments in All Worlds? 
Buddha-son, why is this samādhi called Knowledge of Buddha Adornments in All Worlds? 
He can enter all worlds and see Buddhas there and Their spiritual powers, playful deeds, vast virtues, supreme freedom, lion’s roar, actions, various adornments, and displays of spiritual power. He also sees assemblies of Bodhisattvas and their purity, magnificence, one_appearance, many appearances, locations, places, docility,  maturity, and awesome virtues. He clearly sees all these. 
“He also sees that the size of those assemblies equals that of Jambudvīpa , a world comprising four continents, a small thousandfold world, a medium thousandfold world, or a Three-Thousand_Large Thousandfold_World. 
He also sees that those assemblies fill 100,000 koṭi nayuta or an asaṁkhyeya Buddha Lands; fill Buddha Lands as numerous as the dust particles in 100 or 1,000 Buddha Lands, or 100,000 koṭi nayuta Buddha Lands; fill Buddha Lands as numerous as the dust particles in countless Buddha Lands, measureless Buddha Lands, boundless Buddha Lands, unequaled Buddha Lands, uncountable Buddha Lands, indefinable Buddha Lands, inconceivable Buddha Lands, immeasurable Buddha Lands, ineffable Buddha Lands, or ineffably ineffable Buddha Lands. 
He also sees Buddhas, in assemblies held in Their bodhimaṇḍas, manifesting transcendental powers, various appearances, shapes, times, worlds, changes, adornments, enterprises, and control. 
“This Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva also sees himself present in those assemblies, and sees himself expounding the Dharma, accepting and upholding every Buddha’s words, knowing well the dependent arising of dharmas, standing in the open sky, and abiding in his dharma body, free from attachment, differentiation, and weariness. He also sees himself entering all wisdomknowledge, knowing all meanings , entering all grounds , making all life-journeys, knowing all skillful means, standing before all Buddhas, and entering all powers, true_suchness, no contention, and all dharmas. 
“As he sees such things, he does not differentiate among worlds, among sentient beings, among Buddhas, or among dharmas, and he has no attachment to bodies, body karmas, minds, or mindsets. 
As an analogy, although dharmas do not differentiate their natures or the sounds , they do not lose their natures or names. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abandons neither his actions nor the ways of the world, but he has no attachment to either of them. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva sees a Buddha’s immeasurable colorful radiance and His immeasurable physical appearances, which are perfectly formed and equally pure. 
He clearly sees each and every feature. He sees a Buddha’s body with all kinds of radiance, a Buddha’s body with a halo one yojana across, or a Buddha’s body in boundless pure colors: golden, reddish blue, or the color of wonderful light, a full sun, a vajra, or a great blue jewel. 
“He sees a Buddha’s body seven, eight, nine, ten, twenty, or thirty cubits tall, or even 100 or 1,000 cubits tall. 
He sees a Buddha’s body measuring a krośa, a half yojana, a whole yojana, or 10, 100, 1,000, or 100,000 yojanas. He sees a Buddha’s body the size of Jambudvīpa , a world comprising four continents, a small thousandfold world, a medium thousandfold world, a large thousandfold world, or 100, 1,000, or 100,000 large thousandfold worlds, or 100,000 koṭi nayuta large thousandfold worlds. He sees a Buddha’s body the size of countless large thousandfold worlds, measureless large thousandfold worlds, boundless large thousandfold worlds, unequaled large thousandfold worlds, uncountable large thousandfold worlds, indefinable large thousandfold worlds, inconceivable large thousandfold worlds, immeasurable large thousandfold worlds, ineffable large thousandfold worlds, or ineffably ineffable large thousandfold worlds. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva sees Buddhas’ immeasurable appearances, shapes, manifestations, radiance, and webs of radiance. He sees such radiance pervading the dharma realm, illuminating all in the dharma realm, and enabling all to acquire unsurpassed wisdom. 
He sees that a Buddha’s body has no taints or hindrances, and is sublime and pure. 
Buddha-Son, although this Bodhisattva sees a Buddha’s body in different sizes, His body does not become larger or smaller. 
As an analogy, as the open sky does not diminish in a worm hole in a mustard seed, it does not expand in countless worlds. 
Likewise a Buddha’s body does not become larger when seen large, nor does it become smaller when seen small. 
Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the moon does not become smaller when people in Jambudvīpa see it small, nor does it become larger when people living on the moon see it large. 
Likewise, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi follows the pleasures of his mind. As he sees Buddhas manifest various appearances, hears Them expound the Dharma, and accepts Their teachings and remembers them, each Tathāgata’s body neither increases nor decreases. 
As an analogy, when someone is about to be reborn, he see pure things because he is not apart from his mind. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva sees pure things because he is not apart from this profound samādhi. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi achieves ten kinds of swiftness. 
What are these ten? 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva also acquires ten Dharma seals to endorse all dharmas. 
What are these ten? 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who has the door of skillful means to know Buddha adornments in all worlds is one with no teacher. Untaught by another, he masters the entire Buddha Dharma on his own. 
He is a man who can enlighten all sentient beings. 
He is a pure one who knows that the mind is innately pure. 
He is a foremost one who can deliver all in the world. 
He is a comforter who can open all sentient beings’ minds. 
He is a settler who enables whose who have not abided in the Buddha character-type to abide in it. 
He is a true knower who enters the door of the overall wisdom-knowledge. 
He is one without second thoughts, who does not speak contradictory words. 
He is one who abides in the Dharma store, and vows to master the entire Buddha Dharma. 
He is a pourer of Dharma rains, which benefit sentient beings according to their preferences. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the god-king Śakra has an extraordinary jewel placed on his topknot. Through the power of this jewel, his awesome light becomes more radiant. 
When he acquired this jewel, he acquired ten dharmas that surpass those of all other gods in the Thirty-three Heavens . 
What are these ten? 
His ten dharmas surpass those of all other gods in the Thirty-three Heavens. 
“Likewise, when a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva attains this samādhi, he acquires the store of ten kinds of vast wisdom-knowledge. 
What are these ten? 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi also acquires a pure body with ten most pure and awesome virtues. 
What are these ten? 
First, to illuminate ineffably ineffable worlds, it emits ineffably ineffable orbs of radiance. 
Second, to purify all worlds, it emits ineffably ineffable orbs of radiance in innumerable colors. 
Third, to tame sentient beings, it emits ineffably ineffable orbs of radiance. 
Fourth, to stay close to all Buddhas, it manifests ineffably ineffable bodies. 
Fifth, to attend and make offerings to all Buddhas, it showers down ineffably ineffable kinds of wonderful fragrances and flowers, like clouds. 
Sixth, to attend and make offerings to all Buddhas and to tame all sentient beings, it emits ineffably ineffable kinds of music from each of its pores. 
Eighth, to ask all Buddhas  in the ten_directions, who assume various names, questions about the Dharma, it takes one step to go to ineffably ineffable worlds. 
Ninth, to enable sentient beings to know that what they see and hear is not empty, it manifests ineffably ineffable kinds of pure physical bodies. 
Tenth, to reveal secret dharmas to sentient beings, it emits ineffably ineffable kinds of sounds and words. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who has a body with these ten pure and awesome virtues can enable sentient beings to accomplish ten things. 
What are these ten? 
“Buddha-Son, after a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has enabled sentient beings to accomplish these ten things, he does ten kinds of Buddha work for them. 
What are these ten? First, to bring sentient beings to  maturity, he does Buddha work using sounds. 
Second, to tame them, he does Buddha work using shapes and forms. 
Third, to purify them, he does Buddha work with mindfulness. 
Fourth, to enable them to leave the evil life-paths, he does Buddha work by shaking the world. 
Fifth, to enable them not to lose mindfulness, he does Buddha work using skillful awareness. 
Sixth, to enable them to abide in right mindfulness, he does Buddha work by appearing in their dreams. 
Seventh, to draw in all sentient beings, he does Buddha work by emitting vast radiance. 
Eighth, to enable them to abide in excellent vows, he does Buddha work as he trains on the Bodhisattva Way. 
Ninth, to enable them to know illusions, he does Buddha work by attaining true enlightenment. 
Tenth, to expound the Dharma to multitudes at the right times, he does Buddha work by turning the wondrous Dharma wheel. 
Eleventh, to tame all sentient beings, he does Buddha work throughout his present lifespan. 
Twelfth, he does Buddha work by demonstrating his entrance into parinirvāṇa because he knows that sentient beings can become weary. 
Buddha-Son, this is a description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s seventh great samādhi, the Samādhi of the Knowledge of Buddha Adornments in All Worlds, and his useful wisdom-knowledge.” *** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 41 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  ***** **** Chapter 27c – The Ten Samādhis Continued **** **** The Eighth Great Samādhi, the Samādhi of Sentient Beings’ Diverse Bodies ****  “Buddha-Son, what is a BodhisattvaMahāsattva’s Samādhi of Sentient Beings’ Diverse Bodies? 
A BodhisattvaMahāsattva who abides in this samādhi has no attachment to ten things. 
What are these ten? 
These are the ten. 
**** Entering and Exiting This Samādhi **** “Buddha-Son, how does a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enter and exit this samādhi? 
Buddha-Son, he enters this samādhi inside his body and exits it outside his body; enters it outside his body and exits it inside his body; enters it in this body and exits it in a different body; enters it in a different body and exits it in this body; enters it a human’s body and exits it in a yakṣa’s body; enters it in a yakṣa’s body and exits it in dragon’s body; enters it in a dragon’s body and exits it in an asura’s body; enters it in an asura’s body and exits it in a god’s body; enters it in a god’s body and exits it in a Brahmaking’s body; enters it in a Brahma-king’s body and exits it in a desire-realm body. 
“He enters this samādhi in heaven and exits it in hell; enters it in hell and exits it on the human life-path; enters it on the human life-path and exits it on other life-paths. 
He enters it in a thousand bodies and exits it in one body; enters it in one body and exits it in a thousand bodies; enters it in a nayuta bodies and exits in one body; enters it in one body and exits it in a nayuta bodies. 
“He enters this samādhi amid inhabitants of Jambudvīpa in the south and exits it amid inhabitants of Aparagodānīya in the west; enters it amid inhabitants of Aparagodānīya in the west and exits it amid inhabitants of Uttarakuru in the north; enters it amid inhabitants of Uttarakuru in the north and exits it amid inhabitants of Pūrvavideha in the east; enters it amid inhabitants of Pūrvavideha in the east and exits it amid inhabitants of the other three continents; enters it amid inhabitants of any three continents and exits it amid inhabitants of all four_continents; enters it amid inhabitants of all four continents and exits amid inhabitants of all seas; enters amid inhabitants of all seas and exits it amid gods of all seas; enters it amid gods of all seas and exits it in the domain of water of all seas. 
“He enters this samādhi in the domain of water of all seas and exits it in the domain of earth of all seas; he enters it in the domain of earth of all seas and exits it in the domain of fire of all seas; enters it in the domain of fire of all seas and exits it in the domain of wind of all seas; enters it in the domain of wind of all seas and exits it in all four_domains; enters it in all four domains and exits it in dharmas that have no birth; enters it in dharmas that have no birth and exits it in Mount Sumeru. 
“He enters this samādhi in Mount Sumeru and exits it in the seven treasure mountains; enters it in the seven treasure mountains and exits it on the ground, amid various crops, woods, and black mountains; enters it on the ground, amid various crops, woods, and black mountains, and exits it in the splendor of all wonderful fragrances and flowers; enters it in the splendor of all wonderful fragrances and flowers and exits it amid sentient beings reborn below or above a world comprising four continents. 
“He enters this samādhi amid sentient beings being reborn below or above a world comprising four continents and exits it amid sentient beings in a small thousandfold world; enters it amid sentient beings in a small thousandfold world and exits it amid sentient beings in a medium thousandfold world; enters it amid sentient beings in a medium thousandfold world and exits it amid sentient beings in a large thousandfold world; enters it amid sentient beings in a large thousandfold world and exits it amid sentient beings in 100,000 koṭi nayuta Three-Thousand_Large_Thousandfold_Worlds; enters it amid sentient beings in 100,000 koṭi nayuta Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold Worlds and exits it amid sentient beings in countless worlds. 
“He enters this samādhi amid sentient beings in countless worlds and exits it amid sentient beings in measureless worlds; enters it amid sentient beings in measureless worlds and exits it amid sentient beings in boundless worlds; enters it amid sentient beings in boundless worlds and exits it amid sentient beings in unequaled worlds; enters it amid sentient beings in unequaled worlds and exits it amid sentient beings in uncountable worlds; enters it amid sentient beings in uncountable worlds and exits it amid sentient beings in indefinable worlds; enters it amid sentient beings in indefinable worlds and exits it amid sentient beings in inconceivable worlds; enters it amid sentient beings in inconceivable worlds and exits it amid sentient beings in immeasurable worlds; enters it amid sentient beings in immeasurable worlds and exits it amid sentient beings in ineffable worlds; enters it amid sentient beings in ineffable worlds and exits it amid sentient beings in ineffably ineffable worlds; enters it amid sentient beings in ineffably ineffable worlds and exits it amid impure sentient beings; enters it amid impure sentient beings and exits it amid pure sentient beings; enters it amid pure sentient beings and exits it amid impure sentient beings. 
“He enters this samādhi through the eye and exits it through the ear; enters it through the ear and exits it through the eye; enters it through the nose and exits it through the tongue; enters it through the tongue and exits it through the nose; enters it through the body and exits it through the mind; enters it through the mind and exits it through the body; enters it through his own faculties and exits it through another’s faculties; enters it through another’s faculties and exits it through his own faculties; enters it through one dust particle and exits it through the dust particles in countless worlds; enters it through the dust particles in countless worlds and exits it through one dust particle. 
“He enters this samādhi as a voice-hearer and exits it as a Pratyekabuddha; enters it as a Pratyekabuddha and exits it as a voice-hearer; enters it in his own body and exits it in a Buddha’s body; enters it in a Buddha’s body and exits it in his own body; enters it in one thought and exits it after a koṭi kalpas; enters it for a koṭi kalpas and exits in one thought; enters it in this time and exits it in another time; enters it in another time and exits it in this time; enters it to be in the past and exits it to be in the future; enters it to be in the future and exits it to be in the past; enters it to be in the past and exits it to be in the present; enters it to be in the present and exits it to be in the past; enters it to be in the past, present, and future, and exits it in a kṣaṇa; enters it in a kṣaṇa and exits it to be in the past, present, and future; enters it in true_suchness  and exits it through words; enters it through words and exits it in true suchness. 
**** Four Analogies of Bodies **** “Buddha-Son, as an analogy, someone who is possessed by a ghost cannot stop his body from shaking, which is caused by the ghost, though it does reveal itself. 
Likewise, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi enters it in his own body and exits it in another’s body; enters it in another’s body and exits it in his own body. 
Buddha-Son, as an analogy, a corpse can be enabled by the power of incantation to rise, walk, and do things successfully. Although the corpse and the incantation are different things, they can come together to achieve something. 
Likewise, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi enters it through this object and exits it through different objects; enters it through different objects and exits it through this object. 
BuddhaSon, as an analogy, a bhikṣu who has mastered his mind can manifest one body as many bodies; many bodies as one body. The one body does not perish as many bodies appear; the many bodies do not perish as the one body appears. 
Likewise, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi enters it in one body and exits it in many bodies; enters it in many bodies and exits it in one body. 
Buddha-Son, as an analogy, although the earth has only one flavor, it produces crops with various flavors. 
Likewise, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi makes no differentiations. He enters it in one way and exits it in many ways; enters it in many ways and exits it in one way. 
**** Ten Good Names, Ten Kinds of Radiance, Understanding of Ten Things **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi receives ten good names because of his ten praiseworthy attainments. 
What are these ten? 
First, he is called a Tathāgata because he enters into true suchness . 
Second, he is called a Buddha because he realizes  all dharmas. 
Third, he is called a Dharma master because he is praised by the whole world. 
Fourth, he is called one with  the overall wisdomknowledge because he knows all dharmas. 
Fifth, he is called the reliance because the whole world relies on him. 
Sixth, he is called a guiding teacher because he provides skillful means to do all things. 
Seventh, he is called a great guiding teacher because he guides all sentient beings to take the path to sarvajña. 
Eighth, he is called the light because he serves as a lamp for the whole world. 
Ninth, he is called one with command of the Ten_Powers because he has fulfilled his aspirations, received benefits, completed his work, and abides in the hindrance-free wisdom-knowledge, for he knows all dharmas. 
Tenth, he is called an all-seeing one because he knows all Dharma wheels. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi is illuminated by ten kinds of radiance. 
What are these ten? 
First, he acquires the radiance of all Buddhas because he is Their equal. 
Second, he acquires the radiance of all worlds because he adorns them all. 
Third, he acquires the radiance of all sentient beings because he tames them all. 
Fourth, he acquires the radiance of fearlessness because he expounds the Dharma, using the dharma realm as a forum. 
Fifth, he acquires the radiance of freedom from differentiation because he knows that all dharmas have no difference in their true nature. 
Sixth, he acquires the radiance of skillful means because he has achieved freedom from desire for dharmas. 
Seventh, he acquires the radiance of truth because, with freedom from desire for dharmas, his mind abides in equability. 
Eighth, he acquires the radiance of all spiritual powers in the world because he is constantly supported by Buddhas. 
Ninth, he acquires the radiance of good contemplation because he has arrived at the shore of freedom of all Buddhas. 
Tenth, he acquires the radiance of true suchness of all dharmas because he well explains everything through even one of his pores. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi acquires understanding of ten things that have no action. What are these ten? 
These are the ten. 
**** Six Analogies for Freedom in This Samādhi **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi has countless different meditation states. 
He enters it in one and exits it in many; enters it in many and exits it in one; enters it in sameness and exits it in variation; enters it in variation and exits it in sameness; enters it in fineness and exits in coarseness; enters it in coarseness and exits in fineness; enters it in largeness and exits it in smallness; enters it in smallness and exits it in largeness; enters it in conformity and exits it in nonconformity; enters it in nonconformity and exits it in conformity; enters it without a body and exits it with a body; enters it with a body and exits it without a body; enters it without appearance and exits it with appearance; enters it with appearance and exits it without appearance; enters it while exiting it; exits it while entering it. 
Such are the states of freedom in this samādhi. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, a magician who is accomplished in incantation can conjure up various different shapes and appearances. 
Incantation is different from illusion but can create illusions. Incantation is but sounds that can create illusions perceived by eye consciousness as various colors; by ear consciousness as various sounds; by nose consciousness as various scents; by tongue consciousness as various flavors; by body consciousness as various tactile sensations; by mental consciousness as various mental objects. 
Likewise, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi enters it in sameness and exits it in variation; enters it in variation and exits it in sameness. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, when gods in the Thirty-three Heavens  do battle with asuras, gods win and asuras retreat in defeat. 
An asura-king is 700 yojanas tall, surrounded by four types of troops in countless tens of millions. He can use the power of magic to have his army walk into a hole in a lotus root. 
It is similar for a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi. He has arrived on the ground of the wisdomknowledge of illusion. The wisdom-knowledge of illusion is this Bodhisattva; this Bodhisattva is the wisdom-knowledge of illusion. Therefore, he enters this samādhi without differentiation and exits it with differentiation; enters it with differentiation and exits it without differentiation. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, a farmer sows seeds in the field. The seeds are below the ground but the fruits are above the ground. 
Likewise, a BodhisattvaMahāsattva who abides in this samādhi enters it in one way and exits it in many ways; enters it in many ways and exits in one way. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, when an ovum and a sperm unite for the rebirth of a sentient being, their union is called a kalala . Then it stays in the mother’s womb for ten months. 
Through the power of good karmas, it gradually develops body parts, faculties, and a clear mind. 
A kalala and a body with six_faculties are different physical forms. However, through karmic power, a kalala can gradually grow into a sentient being to receive various same and different kinds of karmic requitals. 
It is similar for a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi. From the overall wisdom-knowledge likened to a kalala, his faith, understanding, and the power of his vows gradually grow. 
With a vast mind that moves with ease, he enters samādhi through nothing and exits it through something; enters it through something and exits it through nothing. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the palace of dragons stands on the ground, not in the open sky. Dragons live in their palace, not in the sky. However, they can form clouds and spread them all over the sky. 
Whoever looks up and sees a palace should know that it is but a gandharva’s conjuration, not the dragon palace. 
Buddha-Son, while dragons live under the sky, clouds spread above. 
Likewise, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi enters it without appearance and exits it with appearance; enters it with appearance and exits it without appearance. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the palace of the great Brahma-king Wonderful Light is called Supreme Pure Store in All Worlds. 
In this great palace, a god sees the Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World, in which there are  worlds, each comprising four continents; palaces of gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, and mahoragas; human dwellings and the three evil life-paths; Mount Sumeru and other mountains, immense seas, rivers and streams, ponds and lakes, springs, cities, villages, forests, and treasures. In this Brahma palace, a god sees all such adornments that spread to the edge of the great iron mountain range, and sees even dust particles floating in the sky, as clearly as he sees his reflection in a clear mirror. 
Likewise, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this Samādhi of Sentient Beings’ Diverse Bodies knows various worlds, sees various Buddhas, delivers various sentient beings, realizes various truths, completes various trainings, achieves various understandings, enters various samādhis, displays various transcendental powers, acquires various kinds of wisdom-knowledge , and abides in various moments. 
**** Arriving at Ten Shores of Transcendental Powers **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva arrives at ten shores of transcendental powers. 
What are these ten? 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, this is a description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s eighth great samādhi, the Samādhi of Sentient Beings’ Diverse Bodies, and his useful wisdom-knowledge. 
**** The Ninth Samādhi, the Samādhi of Command in the Dharma Realm **** “Buddha-Son, what is a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s Samādhi of Command in the Dharma Realm? 
A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva can enter this samādhi through any of his six faculties: 
**** Command in the Dharma Realm **** “A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi naturally can know the world, worldly dharmas, and all worlds, such as a koṭi nayuta worlds, an asaṁkhyeya worlds, and worlds as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffable number of Buddha Lands. 
He sees Buddhas in all worlds filled with assemblies of Bodhisattvas, which are radiant, pure, good, unadulterated, huge, majestic, and adorned with various treasures. 
“There, this Bodhisattva trains in Bodhisattva actions without rest for one kalpa, or 100 or 1,000 kalpas, or one koṭi or 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas; for countless kalpas, measureless kalpas, boundless kalpas, unequaled kalpas, uncountable kalpas, indefinable kalpas, inconceivable kalpas, immeasurable kalpas, ineffable kalpas, or ineffably ineffable kalpas; for kalpas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. 
“During such countless kalpas, he abides in this samādhi, also enters or exits it. He supports the world and tames sentient beings. He knows everything in the dharma realm and everything throughout past, present, and future. He expounds the Dharma, displays great transcendental powers, and uses various skillful means without hindrance or attachment to them. 
Because he has achieved command in the dharma realm, he excels in differentiating eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind, and his differentiations are thorough. 
Having acquired good knowledge and  views, he emits the radiance of 10,000 koṭi dhāraṇīs, completes 10,000 koṭi pure actions, acquires 10,000 koṭi faculties, acquires 10,000 koṭi transcendental powers, enters 10,000 koṭi samādhis, acquires 10,000 koṭi spiritual powers, develops 10,000 koṭi powers, cultivates 10,000 koṭi profound minds, uses 10,000 koṭi powerful supports, produces 10,000 koṭi manifestations, completes 10,000 koṭi Bodhisattva actions hindrance free, completes 10,000 koṭi Bodhisattva elements of bodhi, collects 10,000 koṭi stores of Bodhisattva dharmas, reveals 10,000 koṭi Bodhisattva skillful means, expounds 10,000 koṭi meanings , fulfills 10,000 koṭi vows, transfers 10,000 koṭi merits, purifies 10,000 koṭi Bodhisattva positions, enters 10,000 koṭi Dharma Doors, imparts 10,000 koṭi teachings, and cultivates 10,000 koṭi Bodhisattva purities. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has countless virtues, measureless virtues, boundless virtues, unequaled virtues, uncountable virtues, indefinable virtues, inconceivable virtues, immeasurable virtues, ineffable virtues, and endless virtues. 
Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva is adorned with such virtues. He has developed them, completed them, accumulated them, purified them, kept them, and made them glow. They are complete, enduring, and praiseworthy. 
**** Drawn In by All Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi is drawn in by Buddhas in worlds in the east, whose names are as numerous as the dust particles in 10,000 asaṁkhyeya Buddha Lands, and each name is also assumed by Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in 10,000 asaṁkhyeya Buddha Lands. 
They pronounce the past, present, and future Tathāgata character-type, display a Tathāgata’s immeasurable physical appearances, expound the Dharma, which is under the protection and in the thoughts of all Tathāgatas, emit a Tathāgata’s wonderful Dharma tones, differentiate among all Buddha Lands, praise all samādhis of Buddhas, display all Buddha assemblies  one after another, protect the inconceivable Dharma of Buddhas, explain that all dharmas are illusory, elucidate that dharma nature never changes, reveal all unsurpassed Dharma wheels, and praise a Tathāgata’s immeasurable virtues. They enable him to enter all samādhis, which are like clouds, and to know that his mind is illusory, boundless, and endless. 
“Buddha-Son, when a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abides in this Samādhi of Command in the Dharma Realm, in worlds in the ten_directions, there are Tathāgatas whose names are as numerous as the dust particles in 10,000 asaṁkhyeya Buddha Lands, and each name is also assumed by Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in 10,000 asaṁkhyeya Buddha Lands. All of them simultaneously protect and think of him. They enable him to acquire a boundless body and hindrance-free mind. 
They enable him to remember the entire Dharma and acquire definitive wisdom arising from the entire Dharma. 
They enable him to become more intelligent, grasp the entire Dharma, and understand the entire Dharma. 
They enable him to have keen faculties and use transcendental powers skillfully. 
They enable him to encounter no hindrance in any situation and to walk everywhere in the dharma realm without rest. 
They enable him to acquire the hindrance-free wisdom-knowledge and ultimate purity, and to use his transcendental powers to demonstrate in all worlds attainment of Buddhahood. 
**** Ten Oceans, Ten Kinds of Excellence, Ten Powers **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi acquires ten oceans. 
What are these ten? 
First, he acquires the ocean of Buddhas because he sees Them all. 
Second, he acquires the ocean of sentient beings because he tames them all. 
Third, he acquires the ocean of dharmas because he knows them all, using wisdom. 
Fourth, he acquires the ocean of worlds because he visits them all, using transcendental powers, which have no self-essence and no action. 
Fifth, he acquires the ocean of merits because he completes all trainings. 
Sixth, he acquires the ocean of transcendental powers because he widely displays them to awaken others. 
Seventh, he acquires the ocean of faculties because he knows well all their various differences. 
Eighth, he acquires the ocean of minds because he knows all sentient beings’ immeasurable minds and their differences. 
Ninth, he acquires the ocean of actions because he completes them, using the power of his vows. 
Tenth, he acquires the ocean of vows because he fulfills them all with ultimate purity. 
“Buddha-Son, after a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has acquired these ten oceans, he achieves ten kinds of excellence. 
What are these ten? 
“Buddha-Son, after a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has achieved these ten kinds of excellence, he acquires ten powers to train  in the realm of sentient beings. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the power of discourse because he has boundless wisdom. 
“Buddha-Son, these ten powers are vast, supreme, enduring, cumulative, insuperable, immeasurable, unshakable, and indestructible. They are the powers of wisdom, attainment, excellent samādhi, purity, great purity, the dharma body, the radiance of the Dharma, the Dharma lamp, the Dharma Door, bold valor, a great man, a man’s good training, and the roots of goodness accumulated in the past. They are the power to attain true enlightenment, abide in countless roots of goodness, abide in the power of Tathāgatas, and increase a Bodhisattva’s joy, pure faith, and bold valor. They are the power of the bodhi_mind, a pondering mind, a Bodhisattva’s pure, excellent, and profound mind, a Bodhisattva’s development of his roots of goodness, the hindrance-free body, and the pure and wondrous Dharma. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva can develop all such immeasurable virtues, achieve them, perfect them, reveal them, personify them, personify them in every way, expand them, strengthen them, increase them, purify them, and purify them in every way. 
No one can tell the limits of this Bodhisattva’s virtues, wisdom, training, Dharma Doors, freedom, ascetic practices, attainments, purity, transcendence , or mastery of the Dharma. 
What this Bodhisattva has acquired, attained, mastered, materialized, experienced, observed, realized, purified, and known, and the Dharma Doors he has established, cannot be described in countless kalpas. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi can know all samādhis, which are countless, measureless, boundless, unequaled, uncountable, indefinable, inconceivable, immeasurable, ineffable, and ineffably ineffable. His state in each samādhi is immeasurable and vast. 
Whether he enters or exits it, or abides in it, he clearly sees all appearances, manifestations, activities, comparable occurrences, distinctive natures, riddance , and transcendence . 
**** Analogies of the Heatless Lake and the Four Rivers **** “Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the great dragon-king Anavatapta’s palace is a lake called Heatless ], and four rivers flow out of this lake. They are not turbid, polluted, or filthy, and their sheen and color are like those of the open sky. 
This lake has four sides, each with a mouth, from which a river flows. From the elephant’s mouth flows the Gangā ; from the lion’s mouth flows the Śitā ; from the ox’s mouth flows the Sindhu ; from the horse’s mouth flows the Vakṣu . 
The mouth for the Gangā flows silver dust; the mouth for the Śitā flows diamond  dust; the mouth for the Sindhu flows gold dust; the mouth for the Vakṣu flows aquamarine  dust. 
The mouth for the Gangā is silver color; the mouth for the Śitā is diamond color; the mouth for the Sindhu is gold color; the mouth for the Vakṣu is aquamarine color. The mouth for each river is one yojana wide. 
Flowing from its mouth, each of the four rivers makes seven circles around the lake. Then it flows away in its own direction, surging and rushing into the immense sea. 
“Between every two meandering rivers, there are flowers made of celestial treasures, such as padma  flowers, kumuda  flowers, and puṇḍarīka  flowers, all with extraordinary fragrances and pure colors. 
The flower petals, stamens, and pistils are made of treasures with natural luster, and they emit light and shine on one another. 
“This Heatless Lake is fifty yojanas across. Its bottom is covered with treasure dust and various jewels; its shore is adorned with countless wonderful treasures suffused with sandalwood fragrance. This lake is filled with flowers made of treasures, such as utpala  flowers, padma flowers, kumuda flowers, puṇḍarīka flowers. As breezes blow, their fragrances carry far. 
The sun shines on all things inside and outside the lake and the rivers, and their reflections jointly form a web of radiance. 
Whether far or near, high or low, wide or narrow, coarse or fine, such things, including even a grain of sand and a dust particle, are all wonderful treasures with pervasive radiance. These radiant reflections under the sun reflect one another and form more reflections. 
In true_reality such reflections neither increase nor decrease, neither joined nor dispersed. Yet they are clearly seen. 
“Buddha-Son, as the Heatless Lake, out of its four mouths, sends four rivers to enter the immense sea, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva uses four kinds_of_unimpeded_wisdom-knowledge to take many actions, which ultimately enter the ocean of  the overall wisdom-knowledge. 
As the silvercolored elephant’s mouth flows silver dust into the great Gangā River, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva uses his wisdom-knowledge of meanings to explain all the meanings pronounced by all Tathāgatas, in order to produce all pure and white  dharmas, and ultimately to enter the ocean of hindrance-free wisdom. 
As the diamond-colored lion’s mouth flows diamond dust into the Śitā River, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva uses his wisdom-knowledge of dharmas to speak vajra words to all sentient beings, in order to bring out their vajra wisdom and enable them ultimately to enter the ocean of hindrancefree wisdom. 
As the gold-colored ox’s mouth flows gold dust into the Sindhu River, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva uses his wisdom-knowledge of suitable expressions to pronounce skillfully the principle of dependent arising of dharmas in the world, in order to enlighten and delight sentient beings, to bring them to  maturity, and to enable them ultimately to enter the ocean of dharmas that arise dependently. 
As the aquamarine-colored horse’s mouth flows aquamarine dust into the Vakṣu River, likewise this BodhisattvaMahāsattva uses his wisdom-knowledge of endless eloquence to shower down 100,000 koṭi nayuta teachings, in order to benefit the hearers and enable them ultimately to enter the Dharma of Buddhas. 
“As the four great rivers encircle the Heatless Lake and flow in four directions into the sea, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva is accomplished in doing body karmas, voice karmas, and mind karmas in accord , and accomplished in using wisdom to guide his body karmas, voice karmas, and mind karmas to flow in four directions and ultimately enter the ocean of the overall wisdom-knowledge. 
Buddha-Son, what are a Bodhisattva’s four directions? 
“As the four great rivers encircle the great lake and are covered everywhere with utpala flowers, padma flowers, kumuda flowers, and puṇḍarīka flowers, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, in his bodhi mind, never abandons sentient beings, but expounds the Dharma to tame them and enables them to attain countless samādhis and see the purity and majesty of Buddha Lands. 
“As the Heatless Lake is surrounded by jeweled trees, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva manifests Buddha Lands that surround him, inspiring sentient beings to head for bodhi. 
As the Heatless Lake is fifty yojanas in length and width, and its water is pure and not muddled, likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s bodhi mind is boundless and filled with roots of goodness, which are pure and not muddled. 
As the Heatless Lake has countless treasures that adorn its shore and waft sandalwood fragrance everywhere, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has a million koṭi kinds of wisdomknowledge as treasures that adorn the shore of his bodhi mind and great vows, and waft wonderful fragrances everywhere. 
As the Heatless Lake has its bottom covered with gold dust and adorned with various intermingled jewels, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva observes everything with wondrous wisdom-knowledge, is adorned with a Bodhisattva’s inconceivable liberation and various intermingled Dharma treasures, acquires the hindrance-free radiance of the entire Dharma, abides where all Buddhas abide, and applies all profound skillful means. 
“As the dragon-king Anavatapta has forever left behind a dragon’s burning afflictions, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has forever left behind all worldly anxiety and distress. Although he manifests rebirths, he has no afflictions or attachments. 
“As the four great rivers water the entire ground of Jambudvīpa and enter the immense sea, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva uses four rivers of wisdom-knowledge to nurture gods, humans, śramaṇas, and Brahmins, enabling them to enter the great ocean of anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi, which is adorned with the Ten Powers. 
What are these four rivers? They are  the river of the wisdom-knowledge of great compassion to rescue all sentient beings with ease, skillfully draw them in without rest, enter the door of secret virtues, and ultimately enter the great ocean of the Ten Powers. 
“As the four great rivers flow out of the Heatless Lake, surge endlessly, and enter the immense sea, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva uses the power of his great vows to do Bodhisattva training, acquire  endless knowledge and views, and ultimately enter the ocean of the overall wisdomknowledge. 
As the four great rivers enter the immense sea and no one can obstruct their entrance, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva diligently carries out his universally worthy action vows, acquires all radiant wisdom, abides in the elements of bodhi taught by all Buddhas, and acquires a Tathāgata’s wisdom-knowledge hindrance free. 
As the four great rivers rush into the sea for kalpas without weariness, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, carrying out his universally worthy action vows, does Bodhisattva training throughout future kalpas without weariness and enters the ocean of Tathāgatas. 
“Buddha-Son, at sunrise, in the Heatless Lake, the gold dust, silver dust, diamond dust, and aquamarine dust, and other treasures are bathed in sunlight. 
All treasures, such as gold dust, in turn manifest their reflections and shine upon one another hindrance free. 
Likewise, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi can see in each of his pores Buddha-Tathāgatas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands, and can see himself present in the assemblies in every Buddha’s bodhimaṇḍa, hearing the Dharma, accepting and upholding it, believing in it, understanding it, and making offerings to it. He sees himself doing so for ineffably ineffable koṭis of nayutas of kalpas without thinking about the duration of time. 
Because he uses his wondrous mind to enter the boundless dharma realm; to receive unequaled different karmic requitals; to enter the inconceivable state of samādhi, contemplation, and a Buddha’s mastery; to receive the protection and concern of all Buddhas; to acquire the great spiritual power of all Buddhas; to acquire the hard-to-get and hard-to-know Ten Powers of Tathāgatas; to enter the state of completion of Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s actions; to acquire the tireless transcendental power of all Buddhas. 
**** A Bodhisattva’s Freedom and Perception **** “Buddha-Son, although a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva can enter or exit a samādhi in one thought, he does not forego abiding in it for a long time, nor does he have any attachment to it. 
Although he does not dwell on his meditation states, he does not abandon his meditation objects. 
Even when he enters samādhi for a kṣaṇa, he tirelessly displays a Buddha’s transcendental powers to benefit all sentient beings. 
Although he enters everywhere in the dharma realm, he cannot reach its boundaries. 
Although he abides nowhere and has no given place, he constantly walks the path of the overall wisdom-knowledge, and uses the power of manifestation to enter innumerable multitudes of sentient beings and fully adorn all worlds. 
Although he has transcended the ground of differentiation and discarded inverted worldly differentiations, he does not abandon various appearances . 
Although he is equipped with skillful means , he is always pure. 
Although he does not differentiate the Bodhisattva grounds, he has entered them all. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the open sky can contain all things, but has no perception of their existence or nonexistence. 
Likewise this BodhisattvaMahāsattva enters the entire world, but has no perception of that world. 
Although he diligently delivers sentient beings, he has no perception of sentient beings. 
Although he deeply knows all dharmas, he has no perception of dharmas. 
Although he delights in seeing all Buddhas, he has no perception of Buddhas. 
Although he excels in entering various samādhis, he knows that the true nature of all dharmas is suchness, and he is free from afflictions and attachments. 
Although he delivers endless Dharma words with endless eloquence, his mind abides in a state free from words. 
Although he delights in his wordless presentation of the Dharma, he always voices pure sounds. 
Although he abides in a state free from words, he always displays various physical appearances. 
Although he teaches and transforms sentient beings, he knows that all dharmas are ultimately empty. 
Although he cultivates great compassion to deliver sentient beings, he knows that the realm of sentient beings has no end and no dissolution. 
Although he understands that the dharma realm is eternal and changeless, he uses his body, voice, and mind to tame sentient beings without rest. 
Although he abides where Tathāgatas abide, with pure wisdom and fearless mind he expounds the Dharma and turns the Dharma wheel without rest. 
Buddha-Son, this is a description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ninth great samādhi, the Samādhi of Command in the Dharma Realm, and his useful wisdomknowledge.” *** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 42 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  ***** **** Chapter 27d – The Ten Samādhis Continued **** **** The Tenth Samādhi, the Samādhi of the Hindrance-Free Wheel ****  “Buddha-Son, what is a BodhisattvaMahāsattva’s Samādhi of the Hindrance-Free Wheel? 
Buddha-Son, when a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters this samādhi, he abides in hindrance-free body karmas, voice karmas, and mind karmas. He lives in a hindrance-free Buddha Land, acquires the hindrance-free wisdom-knowledge to bring sentient beings to  achievement, and acquires the hindrance-free wisdom-knowledge to tame sentient beings. He emits hindrance-free radiance, displays a web of hindrance-free radiance, produces hindrance-free manifestations, turns the hindrance-free pure Dharma wheel, and achieves a Bodhisattva’s hindrance-free command. He enters the power of Buddhas, abides in the wisdom-knowledge  of Buddhas, does what Buddhas do, purifies what Buddhas purify, displays Their transcendental powers, and delights Them. 
**** Taking All Bodhisattva Actions without Tiring **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi observes  the overall wisdom-knowledge, observes it in general and in particulars, follows it, reveals it, holds it, sees it, and sees it in general and in particulars. Without interruption or rest, regress or digression, weariness or boredom, distraction or disorder, he always expands and continues  Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s vast mind, vast vows, vast actions, vast purposes, vast realizations, vast radiance, vast manifestations, vast protection and concern, and vast path. 
Because this BodhisattvaMahāsattva, in the midst of dharmas, carries out his great vows, launches the Mahāyāna , and enters the ocean of great skillful means within the Buddha Dharma. 
Through the power of his excellent vows, he develops skill in taking Bodhisattva actions with radiant wisdom. Equipped with a Bodhisattva’s transcendental powers and ability to manifest, he is well able to protect and think of all sentient beings as do all past, present, and future Buddhas. 
He elicits great compassion for sentient beings and attains a Tathāgata’s changelessness. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, someone places a crystal on his colored clothes. Although the crystal takes on the color of his clothes, it does not abandon its own nature. 
Likewise, although a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva acquires wisdom and uses it as a jewel of his mind to reveal the overall wisdomknowledge, he does not abandon Bodhisattva actions. 
Why not? 
Because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva makes a great vow to benefit all sentient beings, comfort all sentient beings, deliver all sentient beings, attend all Buddhas, purify all worlds, and go deep into the Dharma ocean. 
To purify the realm of sentient beings, he displays great mastery, gives alms to sentient beings, and illuminates the whole world. He enters the Dharma Door of boundless manifestations without regress or digression, weariness or boredom. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the open sky contains myriad worlds in formation or continuation, without weariness or boredom, debility or decay, dissolution or damage, change or variation, and it does not abandon its own nature. 
Why not? 
Because the nature of the open sky is naturally what it is. 
Likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva makes an immeasurable great vow to deliver all sentient beings, and his mind is never weary or bored. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, innumerable past, present, and future sentient beings pass away into nirvāṇa, never weary or bored. 
Why not? 
Because the true nature of all dharmas is purity, called nirvāṇa. How can they tire of it? 
Likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva appears in the world to deliver all sentient beings. How can his mind be weary? 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, sarvajña  enables all past, present, and future Bodhisattvas to have been born and to be born into the Buddha family, and enables them to attain the unsurpassed bodhi, but it is never weary or bored. 
Why not? 
Because the overall wisdom-knowledge is no different from the dharma_realm and has no attachment to any dharma. 
Likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s mind abides in equability and the overall wisdomknowledge. How can it be weary or bored? 
**** The Vast Lotus Flower **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has a lotus flower that spans the space to the far reaches of the ten_directions. It is adorned with ineffable petals, treasures, and fragrances. 
The ineffable treasures each manifest various treasures, which are pure, wonderful, and secure. 
This flower always emits colorful radiance, illuminating all worlds in the ten directions, hindrance free. 
Covering this flower is a net made of pure gold. 
Jeweled bells sway gently and emit wonderful sounds that expound the overall wisdomknowledge. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva sits cross-legged on this flower, and his body size matches the flower’s. 
Supported by the spiritual power of all Buddhas, each of his pores emits beams of light as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. Each beam manifests jewels as numerous as the dust particles of a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. These jewels are all called the Store of Universal Radiance. They are formed by immeasurable virtues and adorned with various colors and splendors. 
“Each jewel manifests towers as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each tower manifests lion thrones as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each lion throne emits beams of light as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each beam of light manifests colors as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each color manifests orbs of radiance as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each orb manifests sunshiny jeweled flowers as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each jeweled flower manifests platforms as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each platform manifests Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each Buddha manifests in ways as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each manifestation purifies multitudes as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each multitude manifests Buddha commands as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each Buddha command rains down Buddha Dharmas as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each Buddha Dharma contains sūtras as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each sūtra pronounces Dharma Doors as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each Dharma Door leads to Dharma wheels as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. Such Dharma wheels, accessed through vajra wisdom-knowledge, expound the Dharma with different words. 
Each Dharma wheel brings to  maturity realms of sentient beings, which are as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. 
Each realm contains sentient beings as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. These sentient beings are tamed through the Buddha Dharma. 
**** Abiding in True Reality and Doing Inconceivable Things **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi displays such states of transcendental powers in countless variations. Knowing that they are illusory, he has no attachment to them. 
He abides in the boundless and ineffable Dharma, the purity of true nature, the true_reality of the dharma realm, the Tathāgata character-type, and the hindrance-free state, which is neither coming nor going, neither before nor after. Although it is bottomless, it can be attained by direct measure through wisdom, without others’ help. 
His mind free from confusion and differentiation, he is praised by past, present, and future Buddhas. He flows from the power of Buddhas and enters Their realm. 
His nature accords with true reality, his pure eye sees , and his wisdom-eye sees everything. He acquires the Buddha-eye and becomes a bright lamp for the world. He walks in the realm seen by his wisdomeye and widely expounds the wondrous Dharma Doors. He activates the bodhi_mind and heads forward to become a great man. 
Whatever he does is done skillfully, and his virtues, understandings, and purposes are pure, wondrous, complete, and perfect. His wisdom is vast, like the open sky, and he excels in observing the states of holy ones. His faith, his actions, and the power of his vows are strong and unwavering, and his endless virtues are praised by the world. 
“He gathers wondrous treasures from the store observed by all Buddhas, from the place of great bodhi, and from the ocean of the overall wisdomknowledge. He becomes a man of great wisdom, whose nature is pure, like a lotus flower, and those who see him are delighted and receive benefits. 
The radiance of his wisdom shining everywhere, he sees innumerable Buddhas and purifies all dharmas. His actions being quiet, he has no hindrance to mastering the Dharma of Buddhas. 
He always uses skillful means to abide in Buddha bodhi, and is born from virtuous actions. Equipped with Bodhisattva wisdom-knowledge, he is a leader of Bodhisattvas, and receives the protection and concern of all Buddhas. 
He acquires a Buddha’s awesome spirit and realizes a Buddha’s dharma body. With inconceivable mindfulness, he holds one object in his mind as if holding no object. His actions are wide ranging, free from appearances and hindrances, and are equal to the measureless and boundless dharma realm. 
The bodhi he has attained is like the open sky, unfettered and boundless. “He brings to the whole world great benefits, which flow from the ocean of the overall wisdom-knowledge and his roots_of_goodness. 
He fully understands immeasurable meditation states and is accomplished in pure almsgiving. Abiding in the Bodhisattva mind, he purifies Bodhisattva seeds, which then produce Buddha bodhi. He skillfully achieves understanding of the Buddha Dharma and takes wondrous actions, which become an enduring power. 
He knows the freedom and awesome spirit of all Buddhas, which sentient beings find hard to comprehend. He enters the door of non-duality  and abides in the no appearance . 
Although he has forever abandoned all appearances, he can widely expound various teachings of the Dharma to sentient beings according to their preferences, purposes, and understandings, in order to tame and delight them. 
Free from differentiation, he uses the dharma realm as his body, and the realm of his wisdom is boundless. While his aspirations are always boldly valiant, his mind abides in equability. 
He sees the ultimate scope of the virtues of all Buddhas, and knows the order of all kalpas. He expounds the entire Dharma, abides in all worlds, and purifies and adorns all Buddha Lands. He displays the radiance of the entire Dharma and expounds the Dharma of all past, present, and future Buddhas. 
He indicates where Bodhisattvas reside and becomes a bright lamp for the world. He develops roots of goodness, forever transcends the world, is always born in places where Buddhas are, and acquires a Buddha’s foremost wisdom and understanding. 
Drawn in by all Buddhas, he has joined future Buddhas. “He is born from  beneficent learned friends, and his aspirations never fail to bear fruit. 
With great awesome virtues, he abides in the higher mind. He can explain whatever he has heard, and advocate developing roots of goodness by hearing the Dharma. 
He abides in true reality, and his mind is unhindered by dharmas. 
Not abandoning actions, he makes no differentiations, and his mind does not produce thoughts of dharmas. 
The radiance of his wisdom dispels the darkness of ignorance and illuminates the entire Buddha Dharma. Not destroying things in existence, he is born amid them. 
He knows all things in existence have always had no action.     “His body, voice, and mind karmas are boundless. Although he follows the worldly ways to use countless words, he never destroys that which is beyond words. 
Going deep into the ocean of Buddhas, he knows that all dharmas have only false names. 
He has no attachment to any dharma because he understands that all dharmas are empty, nonexistent in true reality. His actions are born from the dharma realm, which is like the open sky with no shape and no appearance. 
He observes the ground of the Ten_Powers and trains for them with wisdom-knowledge , which is the bridge to sarvajña. Using his wisdom-eye, he sees that dharmas are hindrance free. He enters the grounds  and knows various meanings . He knows every Dharma Door, and all his great vows come to fulfillment. 
He pronounces what is the door of hindrance-free skillful means; what can bring assemblies of Bodhisattvas; what is a state of samādhi; what can lead to sarvajña; what can reveal samādhi doors; what can enter all worlds hindrance free; what can tame all sentient beings; what can abide in the realm of no sentient beings; what can reveal the entire Buddha Dharma; what does not capture any meditation states. 
“Although he teaches all the time, he is free from differentiating thoughts. 
Although he knows that dharmas have no action, he can display doing karmas. 
Although he knows that Buddhas are no different, he can manifest all Buddhas. 
Although he knows that there are no five_aggregates—form, sensory reception, perception, mental process, and consciousness—he explains them all, because he uses the Dharma wheel to explain everything. 
Although he knows that dharmas have no birth, he constantly turns the Dharma wheel. 
Although he knows that dharmas are no different , he explains their differences. 
Although he knows that dharmas have neither birth nor death, he describes all their appearances of birth and death. 
Although he knows that dharmas are neither coarse nor fine, he explains their appearances of coarseness and fineness. 
Although he knows that dharmas cannot be classified as high, middle, and low, he expounds the highest truth . 
Although he knows that dharmas are indescribable, he expounds them with pure words. 
Although he knows that dharmas are neither inside nor outside, he explains all internal and external dharmas. 
Although he knows that dharmas are unknowable, he teaches observing dharmas with wisdom. 
Although he knows that dharmas are illusory, he indicates the path to true reality. 
Although he knows that dharmas are ultimately endless, he expounds ending one’s afflictions. 
Although he knows dharmas are not contradictory or contentious, he recognizes their differences among one another. 
Although he knows that dharmas cannot be taught by a teacher, he always respects all teachers and elders. 
Although he knows that realization of the truth is not given by another, he always respects beneficent learned friends. 
“Although he knows that dharmas never change, he turns the Dharma wheel. 
Although he knows that dharmas do not arise, he indicates the causes and conditions . 
Although he knows that dharmas have no past, present, or future, he thoroughly explains their past, present, and future. 
Although he knows that dharmas have no doer, he explains the doing of karmas. 
Although he knows that dharmas have no causes and conditions, he explains the convergence of causes and conditions. 
Although he knows that dharmas cannot be compared, he explains the path of equality and the path of inequality. 
Although he knows that dharmas speak no words, he explains past, present, and future dharmas. 
Although he knows that dharmas have no reliance, he teaches relying on good dharmas to transcend the world. 
Although he knows that the dharma body is no body, he thoroughly describes the dharma body. 
Although he knows that past, present, and future Buddhas are innumerable, he declares that there is only one Buddha. 
Although he knows that dharmas have no form, he manifests their various forms. 
Although he knows that dharmas have no views, he thoroughly expounds various views. 
Although he knows that dharmas have no appearance, he describes their various appearances. 
Although he knows that dharmas have no states, he describes the states of wisdom. 
Although he knows that dharmas have no difference, he explains different actions and their different results. 
Although he knows that dharmas have no liberation, he teaches pure actions for liberation. 
Although he knows that dharmas have always been ever-abiding, he describes their changes. 
Although he knows that dharmas have no illumination, he thoroughly describes illuminating dharmas. 
**** Entering Inconceivable States **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who acquires the wisdom-knowledge of such a mighty and virtuous samādhi can enter the entire Buddha Dharma and can understand, accumulate, elucidate, abide in, and carry out , in accord with the true nature of all dharmas. However, he does not think about how many Bodhisattvas there are, how many Bodhisattva teachings, how many ultimate states of a Bodhisattva, how many ultimate states of an illusion, how many ultimate states of a manifestation, how many kinds of transcendental powers to acquire, how many kinds of wisdom-knowledge to acquire, how many kinds of contemplation, how many realizations, how many aspirations, how many meditation states. “Why not? 
Because such is the essence, the boundlessness, and the excellence of this Bodhisattva samādhi. This samādhi has various states, various powers, and various depths. 
It enters the door of ineffable wisdomknowledge; enters the majesty of making no differentiations; enters immeasurable excellent pāramitās; enters countless samādhis; enters 100,000 koṭi nayuta ineffable kinds of vast wisdom-knowledge; enters the sight of the inexhaustible excellent treasure stores of Buddhas; enters meditation states without rest; enters the elements_of_bodhi with pure faith and understanding; enters the great transcendental powers of his keen faculties; enters meditation states with no hindrance in his mind; enters the eye that sees the equality of Buddhas; enters accumulation of universally worthy aspirations; enters the godking Nārāyaṇa’s body of wonderful wisdom-knowledge; enters the ocean that reveals Tathāgata wisdom; enters manifestations that bring immeasurable freedom and ease; enters the door that leads to the endless wisdom-knowledge of all Buddhas; enters the state of seeing the presence of all Buddhas; enters Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s wisdom-knowledge of freedom and ease; enters the wisdom-knowledge of the unequaled universal door; enters the wisdom-knowledge of all subtle states in the dharma realm; enters the manifestations of all subtle states in the dharma realm; enters the radiance of all excellent wisdomknowledge; enters ultimate freedom and ease; enters the Dharma Door of all eloquence; enters the wisdom body that pervades the dharma realm; enters the pervasive path of achievement everywhere; enters proficiency in abiding in all different samādhis; enters the wisdom-knowledge of the minds of all Buddhas. 
**** Training in Universally Worthy Actions **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva trains in universally worthy actions and, thought after thought, enters a million ineffable samādhis. However, he does not see the past adorned by Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s samādhi and a Buddha’s state. 
Why not? 
Because he knows that ultimately all dharmas are endless, all Buddha Lands are countless, the realm of all sentient beings is inconceivable, the past has no beginning, the future has no ending, the present that pervades the open sky and the dharma realm is ineffable, the state of all Buddhas is inconceivable, Bodhisattva actions are countless, the states eloquently described by all Buddhas are ineffable and boundless, and the objects in all illusory minds are immeasurable. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the wish-fulfilling jewel fulfills all wishes of countless wishers to their satisfaction, and its power is never exhausted. 
It is similar for the mind. A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi knows that the mind is illusory, and that it ceaselessly produce all dharmas in various states everywhere, never lacking any power. Because he has acquired the wisdom-knowledge of universally worthy hindrance-free actions. 
He observes immeasurable vast illusions, like reflections without increase or increase. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, an ordinary being’s mind rises endlessly. It rose, is rising, and will rise without limits, interruption, or an end. 
The continuity of the flowing mind is inconceivable. 
It is similar for this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva. He enters the Samādhi of the Door of Universal Illusion, which is boundless and immeasurable. 
Because he knows immeasurable dharmas through Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s door of universal illusion. 
“Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the dragon-kings Nanda, Upananda, and Manasvati, and other great dragons pour down rains . 
Although the raindrops fall like axles revolving without bounds, the clouds are not used up by such rains. 
It is similar for a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi. He enters Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s door of samādhis, door of wisdom-knowledge, door of dharmas, door to see Buddhas, door to go places, door of the free mind, door of support, door of manifestations, door of transcendental powers, door of illusions, door of illusion-like dharmas, door filled with an ineffably ineffable number of Bodhisattvas, door to stay close to Tathāgatas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddhas Lands, door of ineffably ineffable, vast webs of illusions, door of knowing an ineffably ineffable number of different vast Buddha Lands, door of knowing an ineffably ineffable number of worlds with or without substance, door of knowing the perceptions of an ineffably ineffable number of sentient beings, door of knowing ineffably ineffable different times, door of knowing the formations and destructions of an ineffably ineffable number of worlds, and door of knowing an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands facing up or down. In one thought, he knows all these things as they truly are. 
“When he enters a door, he sees no boundary and no end. He trains without interruption or rest, weariness or boredom, regress or failure. 
In the midst of dharmas, he does not abide in the wrong places. He always ponders properly, his mind neither sluggish nor restless. 
He seeks  the overall wisdomknowledge, never regressing or giving up. Serving as a bright lamp that illuminates all Buddha Lands, he turns the ineffably ineffable Dharma wheel. 
He eloquently asks Tathāgatas questions without end. He explains that attainment of Buddhahood is boundless, and tames sentient beings, never abandoning them. He diligently carries out his universally worthy action vows without rest. He ceaselessly manifests countless ineffably ineffable physical bodies. 
“Why? 
As an analogy, when fire is ignited, it continues to burn through  conditions. 
It is similar for this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva. He observes that the realm of sentient beings, the dharma realm, and worlds are boundless, like the open sky. In one thought, he can go to Buddhas as innumerable as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. 
Under every Buddha, he enters various dharmas that arise from his ineffably ineffable overall wisdom-knowledge. 
He enables sentient beings in their ineffably ineffable realm to renounce family life to train for bodhi, develop roots of goodness, and achieve ultimate purity. 
He enables an ineffably ineffable number of Bodhisattvas who are indecisive about making the universally worthy action vows, to decide to enter the universally worthy door of wisdom. 
“Using countless skillful means, he enters the ineffably ineffable different kalpas of worlds in formation, continuation, and destruction, in the past, present, and future. In different worlds in ineffably ineffable stages of formation, continuation, and destruction, he elicits great compassion for innumerable sentient beings and makes great vows to tame all of them without omission. 
Because this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, who is resolved to deliver all sentient beings, trains in universally worthy actions, acquires universally worthy wisdom-knowledge, and fulfills all universally worthy action vows. 
**** Every Bodhisattva Should Train **** “Therefore, every Bodhisattva should diligently train in such actions and enter such vast meditation states, such immeasurability, such inconceivability, such universal illumination, such sight of the presence of all Buddhas, such protection and concern of all Tathāgatas, such completion of past roots of goodness, and such a mind that abides in samādhi motionless and hindrance free. He should diligently train without weariness or boredom, and leave behind burning afflictions, never to regress. He should make a profound resolve with bold valor and fearlessness, and follow the states of this samādhi onto the ground of inconceivable wisdom-knowledge. 
He should not rely on words, nor should he have any attachment to the world. He should neither grasp dharmas nor differentiate them. Untainted by worldly matters, he should not differentiate their states. He should abide in his wisdom-knowledge of dharmas, but not measure it. 
This means that he should abide in the overall wisdom-knowledge, attain Buddha bodhi, acquire the radiance of the Dharma, and give his roots of goodness to all sentient beings. 
He should rescue them from the dominion of māras and enable them to enter the realm of the Buddha Dharma, to walk the path of liberation, to expand their pure states, to achieve the pāramitās, to acquire profound faith in and understanding of all Buddhas, and never to abandon their great vows. 
“Every Bodhisattva should always observe the nature of all dharmas without stopping even temporarily; should know the equality of his own nature and that of dharmas; should understand the worldly ways and impart wisdom and skillful means in accord with Dharma; should always make energetic progress without rest; should regard his roots of goodness as few and diligently increase others’ roots of goodness; should train on the path of the overall wisdomknowledge; should diligently expand Bodhisattva states; should delight in staying close to beneficent learned friends; should unite with those walking the same path; should not differentiate among Buddhas; should not abandon mindfulness; should abide in the dharma realm of equality; should know that all states of the mind and consciousness are illusory; should know that all processes in the world are like dreams; should know that Buddhas’ appearances through the power of Their vows are like reflections; should know that all vast karmas are like manifestations; should know that all words are like echoes; should observe that dharmas are illusory; should know that all dharmas that undergo birth and death are like sounds; should know that all Buddha Lands have no self-essence; should ask Tathāgatas for the Buddha Dharma without tiring; should diligently teach all in the whole world to enlighten them, never abandoning them; should expound the Dharma at the right times to tame all sentient beings without rest. 
“Buddha-Son, in this way, every Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should train in universally worthy actions, perfect his Bodhisattva states, understand the path of liberation, and accept and uphold the past, present, and future Buddha Dharma. In this way, he should observe the door of the overall wisdomknowledge, ponder the truths that never change, purify his higher aspirations, believe in and understand all Tathāgatas, know the vast power of Buddhas, uncover the hindrance-free mind, and draw in all sentient beings. 
**** Receiving Support from All Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, when a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s samādhi of such great wisdom, there are an ineffably ineffable number of worlds in the ten directions, and each world has names of Tathāgatas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. Each name is also assumed by Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. They all appear before him and give him a Tathāgata’s power of mindfulness, enabling him never to forget a Tathāgata’s states. 
They give him the ultimate wisdom of all dharmas, enabling him to enter the overall wisdom-knowledge and realize the dharma realm. 
They give him the wisdom of definitive meanings of all dharmas, enabling him to accept and retain the entire Buddha Dharma, hindrance free. 
They give him the unsurpassed Buddha bodhi, enabling him to enter the overall wisdom-knowledge and enlighten  the dharma realm. 
They give him a Bodhisattva’s ultimate wisdom, enabling him to acquire the radiance of the entire Dharma, free from darkness. 
They give him the wisdom-knowledge of  no regress, enabling him to tame sentient beings by skillful means when they are ready to be tamed. 
They give him a Bodhisattva’s unimpeded_eloquence, enabling him to understand the boundless Dharma and ceaselessly expound it. 
They give him transcendental powers to produce manifestations, enabling him to manifest an ineffably ineffable number of bodies with countless different appearances to enlighten sentient beings. 
They give him a perfect voice, enabling him to produce ineffably ineffable different sounds and words to enlighten sentient beings. 
They give him powers that are never futile, enabling those who see him or hear the Dharma from him to come to  achievement without fail. 
**** A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s Attainments **** “Buddha-Son, because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva completes universally worthy actions in this way, he acquires a Tathāgata’s power, purifies the path of liberation, and fully acquires the overall wisdom-knowledge. Using unimpeded eloquence and displays of transcendental power, he ultimately tames all sentient beings. 
Equipped with a Buddha’s awesome virtues, he purifies universally worthy actions, walks the universally worthy path, and turns the wondrous Dharma wheel of Buddhas in order to tame all sentient beings, throughout the endless future. 
Buddha-Son, because in this way this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva carries out excellent great vows and Bodhisattva actions. 
“Then he becomes a Dharma master of the whole world; the Dharma sun of the whole world; the wisdom moon of the whole world; Mount Sumeru, the king of mountains, which towers over the whole world and firmly stands still; an ocean of boundless wisdom-knowledge in the whole world; a bright lamp of the true Dharma for the whole world, continuously shining everywhere. 
He displays boundless pure virtues to all sentient beings, enabling them to abide in their virtues and roots of goodness. 
Following his overall wisdom-knowledge and his great vow of equality, he trains in universally worthy vast actions, and always teaches and inspires innumerable sentient beings. Abiding in this ineffably ineffable samādhi of vast actions, he displays great freedom and ease. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva acquires such wisdom-knowledge and attains such a samādhi. As he abides in such a samādhi, he sees everything with clarity and acquires such spiritual power. 
He abides in such meditation states, produces such manifestations, and displays such transcendental powers. 
He always abides in great compassion, benefits sentient beings, shows them the safe right path, and erects the radiant banner of merit and wisdom. 
He achieves inconceivable liberation, abides in it with his overall wisdom-knowledge, and arrives at the shore of liberation, as do Buddhas. He has come to achievement through the door of inconceivable liberation and skillful means, and enters without error the door of differentiation in the dharma realm. He enters Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s ineffably ineffable samādhi with playfulness and ease, and abides in the wisdom-knowledge of the Samādhi of a Lion’s Thrust, with no hindrance in his mind. 
“His mind constantly abides in ten great dharma stores. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the observation  of all past, present, and future Buddhas, which transpire in a kṣaṇa, as Buddhas each are born, renounce family life, visit the bodhimaṇḍa, attain perfect enlightenment, turn the Dharma wheel, and enter parinirvāṇa. 
Buddha-Son, these ten great dharma stores are vast, measureless, countless, indefinable, inconceivable, ineffable, endless, and hard to maintain. They cannot be described by any worldly knowledge. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has arrived at the opposite shore through his universally worthy actions, and achieved purity through the power of his great aspirations. He reveals to sentient beings their countless roots of goodness and increases Bodhisattvas’ powers. In one thought after another, he perfects all Bodhisattva virtues and completes all Bodhisattva actions. He acquires dhāraṇīs from all Buddhas, and accepts and upholds Their words. 
Although he constantly abides in true_suchness, he follows worldly words and tames all sentient beings. 
Because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi naturally does so. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, through this samādhi, acquires the vast wisdom-knowledge of all Buddhas, the eloquence to describe skillfully the vast freedom of all dharmas, the most excellent and pure fearlessness in the whole world, the wisdom-knowledge to enter all samādhis, the skillful means of all Bodhisattvas, and the illumination door of the entire Dharma. He arrives at the opposite shore to comfort the whole world. He delivers sentient beings when they are ready to be delivered, and shines everywhere in worlds in the ten directions. He enables all sentient beings to acquire excellent wisdomknowledge and serves as the unsurpassed teacher in the whole world. 
Because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva does such training to benefit sentient beings, increase his great compassion, stay close to his beneficent learned friends, see all Buddhas, know all dharmas, visit worlds, go to all places, enter the whole world, realize the equality of all dharmas, know the equality of all Buddhas, and abide in the overall wisdomknowledge. 
Thus, he does these karmas, not other karmas. 
He abides in a mind that is neither complacent nor chaotic. He abides in single-mindedness, diligence, resolve, and persistence. 
In this way, he ponders and does karmas, training for his ultimate enlightenment. 
**** Ten Analogies for This Bodhisattva **** “Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva speaks no contradictory words and takes no contradictory actions. He speaks consistent words and takes consistent actions. 
Vajra is known for its indestructibility, and it never abandons its indestructibility. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva is known for his actions, and he never abandons his actions. 
Pure gold is known for its wonderful color, and it never abandons its wonderful color. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva is known for his good karmas, and he never abandons his good karmas. 
The sun is known for its radiant orb, and it never abandons its radiant orb. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva is known for his wisdom light, and he never abandons his wisdom light. 
Mount Sumeru, the king of mountains, is known for its four peaks that rise high above the ocean, and it never abandons its four peaks. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva is known for his roots of goodness, which are exalted in the world, and he never abandons his roots of goodness. 
The great earth is known for bearing everything, and it never abandons this ability. 
Likewise this BodhisattvaMahāsattva is known for delivering all sentient beings , and he never abandons his great compassion. 
The immense ocean is known for its water, and it never abandons its water. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva is known for his great vow to deliver sentient beings, and he never abandons his vow. 
A military general is known for his practice of fighting skills, and he never abandons his practice. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva is known for his practice of this samādhi until acquiring  the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge, and he never abandons his practice. 
A Wheel-Turning_King who rules a world comprising four_continents diligently protects all sentient beings, keeping them from accidental deaths and giving them happiness. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, who enters great samādhis such as this one, diligently delivers all sentient beings, enabling them to achieve ultimate purity. 
A seed sown below ground can grow stems and leaves. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, who trains in universally worthy actions, can enable all sentient beings to increase their good dharmas. 
“A huge cloud pours down great rains in hot summer months, enabling all seeds to grow. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, who enters great samādhis such as this one, trains in Bodhisattva actions and showers down great Dharma rains, enabling all sentient beings to achieve ultimate purity and to attain nirvāṇa and peace. He enables them ultimately to arrive at the opposite shore, acquire joy, and resolve their doubts. He becomes the ultimate fortune field of sentient beings and purifies their almsgiving. He enables them to walk the path of no regress and acquire the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge. 
Because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who has attained this samādhi has wisdom and clear understanding. He enters the door of the dharma realm and purifies a Bodhisattva’s countless inconceivable actions. 
This means that he can purify wisdom-knowledge because he follows his overall wisdom-knowledge; he can purify sentient beings because he tames them; he can purify worlds because he always transfers his merits; he can purify dharmas because he knows them all; he can purify fear because he has no timidity; he can purify his unimpeded eloquence because he speaks with skillfulness; he can purify dhāraṇīs because he has command of dharmas; he can purify his closeness with Buddhas because he always sees Them appearing in the world. 
“Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi acquires 100,000 koṭi nayuta such ineffably ineffable pure virtues because he has mastered such states of samādhi; because he is supported by all Buddhas; because his virtues flow from his own roots of goodness; because he enters the wisdom ground with awesome power; because he has the guiding power of beneficent learned friends; because he subjugates the power of all māras; because he uses the pure power of his roots of goodness shared with others, the power of his vast vows and aspirations, and the power of the capability of his roots of goodness; because he transcends the endless fortunes in the world without any opposing force. 
**** Doing Ten Things, As Do Buddhas **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in this samādhi does ten things, as do all past, present, and future Buddhas. 
What are these ten? 
First, he acquires excellent appearances and adornments, as do Buddhas. 
Second, he emits vast pure radiance like a web, as do Buddhas. 
Third, he displays transcendental powers and produces manifestations, as do Buddhas. 
Fourth, he acquires a boundless physical body and a pure and perfect voice, as do Buddhas. 
Fifth, he displays pure Buddha Lands according to sentient beings’ karmas, as do Buddhas. 
Sixth, he retains all sentient beings’ words without forgetting or losing them, as do Buddhas. 
Seven, he uses endless eloquence to turn the Dharma wheel according to sentient beings’ minds, in order to bring out their wisdom, as do Buddhas. 
Eighth, he roars a lion’s roar without fear and uses the immeasurable Dharma to enlighten sentient beings, as do Buddhas. 
Ninth, he uses great transcendental powers to enter in one thought the past, present, and future. 
Tenth, he displays to all sentient beings the majesty of Buddhas, Their awesome power, and Their states, as do Buddhas.” **** A Bodhisattva or a Buddha? 
**** Then Universal Eye Bodhisattva asked Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, if this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has done these ten things, as do Tathāgatas, why is he not called a Buddha? 
Why is he not called  the Ten Powers? 
Why is he not called  all wisdom-knowledge? 
Why is he not called one who has attained bodhi amid all dharmas? 
Why is he not called  the universal eye? 
Why is he not called a hindrance-free seer of all things? 
Why is he not called one who has realized  all dharmas? 
Why is he not called one who abides in the same way as do past, present, and future Buddhas? 
Why is he not called one who abides in true reality? 
Why does he still train in universally worthy actions without rest? 
Why can he not encompass the dharma realm and abandon the Bodhisattva Way?”     Then Samantabhadra Bodhisattva told Universal Eye Bodhisattva, “Very good. 
Buddha-Son, indeed as you ask, if this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva is the same as all Buddhas, why is he not called a Buddha, and why can he not abandon the Bodhisattva Way? 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva is already able to carry out the various action vows of all past, present, and future Bodhisattvas. He who enters the sphere of all wisdom-knowledge is called a Buddha. 
He who without rest does Bodhisattva training under Tathāgatas is called a Bodhisattva. 
He who has acquired a Tathāgata’s powers is called  the Ten Powers. 
He who, though he has acquired the Ten Powers, without rest takes universally worthy actions is called a Bodhisattva. 
He who knows the entire Dharma and can expound it is called  all wisdom-knowledge. 
He who, though he can expound all dharmas, without rest skillfully ponders every dharma is called a Bodhisattva. 
He who knows that all dharmas have the same appearance is called one who has realized  all dharmas. 
He who skillfully observes the differences between dual and non-dual dharmas, and without rest expands his observations is called a Bodhisattva. 
He who clearly sees the objects of the universal eye is called  the universal eye. 
He who, though he can see the objects of the universal eye, without rest enhances his sight, thought after thought, is called a Bodhisattva. 
He who clearly sees all dharmas hindrance free is called a hindrance-free seer. 
He who diligently thinks of his hindrance-free seeing is called a Bodhisattva. 
He who has acquired the wisdom-eye of Buddhas is called one who has realized  all dharmas. 
He who observes with self-discipline Tathāgatas’ wisdom-eye of true enlightenment is called a Bodhisattva. 
He who abides where Buddhas abide and is no different from Them is called one who abides in the same way as do Buddhas. 
He who is drawn in by Buddhas to develop wisdom is called a Bodhisattva. 
He who has verified the true reality of the whole world is called one who abides in true reality. 
He who, though he always observes the true reality of dharmas, neither verifies nor abandons it is called a Bodhisattva. 
He who forever ends differentiation, such as neither coming nor going, neither same nor different, is called one who has laid his vows to rest. 
He who trains to completion in vast areas and never regresses is called one who has not laid his universally worthy vows to rest. 
He who, though he knows that the dharma realm is boundless, perceives various appearances of dharmas and, without weariness or boredom, elicits great compassion to deliver sentient beings throughout the endless future without weariness or boredom, is called Samantabhadra Bodhisattva. 
**** Analogy of the Elephant-King **** “Buddha-Son, as an analogy, the elephant-king Airāvaṇa lives on the Golden Flank Mountain, in a cavern laden with the seven_treasures. This cavern is surrounded by a fence made of the seven treasures and by rows of jeweled tāla  trees, covered by a net made of pure gold. 
This elephant’s body is white as snow, and carried on its back is a golden cylindrical banner. It wears a gold chaplet, and covering its trunk is a jeweled net with hanging jeweled bells. It has seven limbs and six tusks. It looks so majestic and proper that all beholders are delighted. 
When the god-king Śakra wants to travel, this elephant-king immediately knows his intention. Then it disappears from its treasure cavern and appears before Śakra, god-king of Trayastriṁśa_Heaven . Through its transcendent powers, it manifests thirty-three heads; each head manifests seven tusks; each tusk manifests seven ponds; each pond contains seven lotus flowers; each flower seats seven exquisite maidens, who simultaneously play 100,000 kinds of celestial music. 
“Then the god-king Śakra rides this precious elephant from his unexcelled palace to his flower garden, which is filled with puṇḍarīka  flowers. 
Upon arrival at this flower garden, he dismounts and enters a hall adorned with all kinds of treasures. He is attended by innumerable exquisite maidens, who sing and play music for his enjoyment. 
Then this elephant-king uses its transcendental powers to hide its elephant’s body and appears, in this garden of puṇḍarīka flowers, in a god’s body to frolic with gods and exquisite maidens of the Thirty-three_Heavens . Its manifested appearance, radiance, clothes, deportments, talks, smiles, and gazes are like a god’s, and no difference can be found. 
This elephant looks like a god. 
“Buddha-Son, when this elephant-king Airāvaṇa stays on the Golden Flank Mountain, in its cavern laden with the seven treasures, it does not change its form. However, when it appears in the Thirty-three Heavens to make offerings to the god-king Śakra, it manifests various pleasurable things and enjoys celestial happiness, the same as a god does. 
“Buddha-Son, it is similar for this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva. He trains in Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s actions and samādhis, using them as adornments made of treasures. He uses the Seven_Bodhi_Factors as his body; he emits radiance to form a jeweled net; he erects the great Dharma banner, rings the great Dharma bell, and uses great compassion as his cavern; he uses his firm vows as his tusks. “He has wisdom and a lion’s fearlessness, and ties a Dharma scarf around his head. 
To be seated in a bodhi seat, he acquires the overall wisdom-knowledge and attains the supreme enlightenment. Never regressing or resting, he expands his universally worthy vast action vows. Never ending or abandoning his great compassion, he makes energetic progress in delivering suffering sentient beings, throughout the endless future. Never abandoning the universally worthy path, he demonstrates attainment of true enlightenment. 
**** Turning the Hindrance-Free Dharma Wheel in All Worlds **** “He reveals the ineffably ineffable door of attaining true enlightenment, the ineffably ineffable door of turning the Dharma wheel, and the ineffably ineffable door of abiding in the profound mind. 
In ineffably ineffable, vast worlds, he reveals the door of nirvāṇa and manifestation. 
In ineffably ineffable different worlds, he manifests his rebirths to train in universally worthy actions, and manifests as ineffably ineffable Tathāgatas. 
In ineffably ineffable, vast worlds, under every bodhi tree he demonstrates attainment of the supreme enlightenment, surrounded by ineffably ineffable multitudes of Bodhisattvas. 
“Whether for one thought or a short while, whether for one four-hour period, one day, a half month, or a whole month, whether for one year or countless years, whether for one kalpa or an ineffably ineffable number of kalpas, he trains in universally worthy actions and attains true enlightenment. 
In all Buddha Lands, he becomes a leader, stays close to Buddhas, makes obeisance and offerings to Them, and asks Them about observing illusory states. He trains in a Bodhisattva’s immeasurable actions with purity, and trains to produce various manifestations and to acquire countless kinds of wisdomknowledge, various awesome virtues, various kinds of wisdom, various meditation states, various transcendental powers, various freedoms, various liberations, various dharma illuminations, and various ways to teach and tame sentient beings. 
“Buddha-Son, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva manifests such amazing things everywhere through the power of his action vows, but his body does not perish. 
Because he wants to use his universally worthy effortless spiritual power to tame all sentient beings; because he wants an ineffably ineffable number of sentient beings to achieve purity; because he wants to enable them to end forever their cycles of birth and death; because he adorns vast worlds; because he sees all Tathāgatas; because he goes deep into the Dharma stream of all Buddhas; because he thinks of the seeds of past, present, and future Buddhas; because he remembers the Dharma and the dharma bodies of all Buddhas in worlds in the ten directions; because he trains in all Bodhisattva actions to complete them; because he enters the universally worthy stream with ease and can acquire the overall wisdom-knowledge. 
“Buddha-Son, you should observe that this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva never abandons universally worthy actions or the Bodhisattva Way. He sees all Buddhas, acquires all wisdom-knowledge, and uses it with ease. 
As an analogy, the elephant-king Airāvaṇa does not abandon its elephant’s body. Summoned by the god-king, it goes to the Thirty-three Heavens. Then it enjoys celestial happiness and frolics, attends the god-king, and plays with celestial maidens, no different from a god. 
“Buddha-Son, it is similar for this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva. He abandons neither universally worthy Mahāyāna actions nor his vows, and he acquires a Buddha’s freedom, overall wisdom-knowledge, and liberation, hindrance free. Having achieved purity, he has no attachment to any world and does not differentiate  the Buddha Dharma. 
Although he knows that dharmas are equal and have the same appearance, he clearly sees that all worlds are different. 
Although he is the  equal of past, present, and Buddhas, he continues to train in Bodhisattva actions without interruption. 
“Buddha-Son, know that a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in his universally worthy vast action vows has acquired a pure mind. 
This is a description of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s tenth great samādhi, the Samādhi of the Hindrance-Free Wheel, and his excellent mind and vast wisdom-knowledge. 
“Buddha-Son, these are the ten great samādhis of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who always takes universally worthy actions.” *** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 43 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  *** **** Notes ****     1. 
***** **** Chapter 28 – The Ten Transcendental Powers **** At that time Samantabhadra Bodhisattva told the other Bodhisattvas in the assembly, “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten transcendental_Powers. 
What are these ten? 
**** The First Transcendental Power, the Ability of Telepathy **** “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, through the first transcendental power, the ability of telepathy, knows the minds of sentient beings in a ThreeThousand_Large_Thousandfold_World and their differences, such as a benevolent mind or a malevolent mind, a broad mind or a narrow mind, a large mind or a small mind, a mind turning toward repeated birth and death or a mind turning away from repeated birth and death; a voice-hearer’s mind, a Pratyekabuddha’s mind, or a Bodhisattva’s mind; a mind that follows a voice-hearer’s ways, a Pratyekabuddha’s ways, or a Bodhisattva’s ways; a god’s mind, a dragon’s mind, a yakṣa’s mind, a gandharva’s mind, an asura’s mind, a garuḍa’s mind, a kiṁnara’s mind, or a mahoraga’s mind; a human mind, a nonhuman mind, a hell dweller’s mind, an animal’s mind, King Yama’s mind, a hungry ghost’s mind, or the mind of a sentient being in difficulties.     “He knows various sentient beings’ minds and their countless differences. 
As he knows them all in one world, so too he knows them all in 100, 1,000, and 100,000 worlds, and even 100,000 koṭi nayuta worlds. He even knows the minds of all sentient beings in worlds as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s first transcendental power, the ability of telepathy. 
**** The Second Transcendental Power, the Ability of the God-Eye **** “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, through the second transcendental power, the ability of the hindrance-free pure god-eye, sees sentient beings in worlds as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. 
He sees them all, pure or impure, dying in one place and being reborn in another place, making a good or an evil life-journey, assuming a fortunate or an unfortunate appearance, looking beautiful or ugly. Such innumerable kinds of sentient beings include gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, and mahoragas; humans, nonhumans, tiny sentient beings, and huge sentient beings; small groups and large groups. 
“Using his hindrance-free eye, he clearly sees various sentient beings accumulating karmas, experiencing pain or pleasure, and following their minds, their differentiations, their views, their words, their causes, their conditions, their karmas, and whatever arises. Without error, he clearly sees them all. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s second transcendental power, the ability of the hindrance-free god-eye. 
**** The Third Transcendental Power, the Ability to Know the Past **** “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, through the third transcendental power, the ability to recall the past, knows the events in the past lives of himself and all sentient beings in worlds as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands, in kalpas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. 
He knows their birthplaces, names, family names, clans, food and drink, pain and pleasure. 
He knows that, without a beginning in time, sentient beings in the Three_Realms_of Existence have thrived through causes and condition and endlessly transmigrated, life after life. He knows their various kinds, various worlds, various life-paths, various shapes and appearances, various karmic actions, various afflictions, various thoughts, various causes and conditions, and differences in rebirths. 
He knows all such things. “He also remembers Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in a Buddha Land, in worlds as numerous as the dust particles in a Buddha Land, in kalpas as numerous as the dust particles in a Buddha Land. Each Buddha assumed such and such a name, appeared in such and such a world,  such and such assemblies, had such and such parents, such and such attendants, and such and such voice-hearer disciples, including two foremost disciples. Each Buddha lived in such and such a city, renounced family life in such and such a way, attained the supreme enlightenment under such and such a bodhi tree, sat in such and such a seat in such and such a place, pronounced such and such sūtras, did such and such Buddha work, gave such and such benefits to sentient beings there, lived out His lifespan there, and entered the nirvāṇa without remnant. 
“He also remembers the names of Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. Each name was also assumed by Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. Each Buddha began with His initial resolve, made vows, trained for bodhi, made offerings to Buddhas, tamed sentient beings, expounded the Dharma in assemblies, lived out His lifespan, displayed transcendental powers, and entered the nirvāṇa without remnant. After His parinirvāṇa, His Dharma remained in the world for a short or long time, and well-adorned memorial pagodas  were built, which inspired sentient beings to plant their roots of_goodness. 
This is called a BodhisattvaMahāsattva’s third transcendental power, the ability to know the past. 
**** The Fourth Transcendental Power, the Ability to See the Future **** “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, through the fourth transcendental power, the ability to see the endless future, knows all kalpas of worlds as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. In each kalpa, all sentient beings will die and be reborn life after life. He knows their karmic actions and corresponding requitals, whether good or bad, achieving or not achieving liberation, decisive or indecisive about their paths, definitely walking or not walking the path to bodhi, having roots of goodness with or without afflictions, completing or not completing their roots of goodness, developing or not developing their roots of goodness, expanding or not expanding their roots of goodness, accumulating or not accumulating their sins. He knows all such things. 
“He also knows worlds as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands, and kalpas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands, throughout the endless future. In each kalpa, there will be names of Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. Each name will also be assumed by Buddha-Tathāgatas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. Each Tathāgata will begin with His initial resolve, make vows, train for bodhi, make offerings to Buddhas, teach and transform sentient beings, expound the Dharma in assemblies, live out His lifespan, display transcendental powers, and enter the nirvāṇa without remnant. 
A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva knows all such things. This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s fourth transcendental power, the ability to see the endless future. 
**** The Fifth Transcendental Power, the Ability of the God-Ear **** “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, through the fifth transcendental power, the ability of the hindrance-free pure god-ear, which is perfect, vast, keen, hindrance free, and fully developed, hears or does not hear sounds at will. 
Buddha-Sons, in the east, there are Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. As They pronounce, indicate, reveal, expound, establish, teach, arrange, think of, and differentiate Their profound, vast, and pure teachings, which contain various differences, countless skillful means, and immeasurable purity, he can receive and retain them all. 
He can receive and retain all the words and meanings  imparted to one person or multitudes according to their languages, intellects, understandings, behaviors, receptiveness, mental states, reliance, and liberation paths. He retains all teachings without forgetting or losing them and without interruption or regress, confusion or bewilderment. 
Then, without missing a word or phrase, he expounds the Dharma to others, enabling them to understand it. 
As he receives and retains the teachings of Buddhas in worlds in the east, so too he receives and retains the teachings of Buddhas in worlds in the south, west, and north, in worlds in the four intermediate directions, and in worlds above and below. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s fifth transcendental power, the ability of the hindrance-free pure god-ear. 
**** The Sixth Transcendental Power, the Ability to Go to All Buddha Lands **** “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abides in transcendental powers, which have no self-essence, no action, no reliance, no_regress, and no cessation. They are equal, vast, immeasurable, indestructible, growing, arising or not arising, prompted by thoughts, and in accord with actions. 
He hears the names of Buddhas in extremely faraway worlds, countless worlds, measureless worlds, and even worlds as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. 
When he hears Their names, he sees himself present in Their places. 
Their worlds are facing up or down, in various shapes and locations, and have various other differences. 
Such various worlds in various kalpas are countless, hindrance free, and adorned with countless virtues. 
Tathāgatas appear in them, display Their spiritual powers, and pronounce Their countless different names. 
“When this Bodhisattva hears Their names, without leaving his own place, he sees himself present in Their places, making obeisance with respect, attending Them and making offerings to Them, asking for Bodhisattva teachings, and entering Buddha wisdom. He knows the assemblies in the bodhimaṇḍas in Buddha Lands, and knows the Dharma expounded there with no attachment to it, as he heads for his ultimate enlightenment. “Thus, for kalpas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands, he travels in the ten_directions without abiding anywhere. He visits Buddha Lands, beholds Buddhas, hears the Dharma, and asks for the bodhi path, never stopping or giving up. 
Without rest or weariness, he trains on the Bodhisattva Way, fulfills his great vows, and never regresses, because he wants the great Tathāgata character-type never to end. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s sixth transcendental power, the ability to go to all Buddha Lands without motion. 
**** The Seventh Transcendental Power, the Ability to Differentiate Words **** “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, through the seventh transcendental power, the ability to differentiate all sentient beings’ words, knows various words of sentient beings in worlds as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. 
He knows the words of holy ones, ordinary ones, gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, mahoragas, humans, nonhumans, and even ineffably ineffable sentient beings. All these beings’ words have distinctive expressions and various differences. He knows them all. 
“This Bodhisattva knows the natures and desires of all sentient beings in the world he has entered, and uses words suitable for their natures and desires, enabling all sentient beings to understand and have no doubts. 
As an analogy, when the sun rises, it shines on all things, enabling those with eyes to see them clearly. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva does so. Using his ability to differentiate words, he goes deep into the cloud of all words, enabling intelligent ones in the world to understand all words. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s seventh transcendental power, the ability to differentiate words. 
**** The Eighth Transcendental Power, the Ability to Manifest Bodies **** “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, through the eighth transcendental power, the ability to manifest countless asaṁkhyeyas of bodies as adornment, knows that all dharmas are apart from physical appearances. They have no differentiated appearances, no diverse appearances, no countless appearances, no distinctive appearances, and no appearances in colors, such as blue, yellow, red, or white. 
Thus this Bodhisattva enters the dharma_realm and can manifest his body in various forms, such as boundless forms, measureless forms, pure forms, majestic forms, universal forms, unequaled forms, universally illuminating forms, superior forms, conforming forms, forms with various appearances, forms without evils, powerful forms, respectable forms, endless forms, forms with mixed wonderful features, stately forms, immeasurable forms, well-guarded forms, forms that can ripen, forms that suit those being taught, hindrance-free forms, lucid forms, taint-free forms, extremely pure forms, robust forms, forms with inconceivable skillful means, indestructible forms, flawless forms, unveiled forms, well-settled forms, wonderfully adorned forms, forms with stately features, forms with excellent characteristics, noble forms, forms in wonderful states, well-polished forms, forms arising from the pure and profound mind, radiant forms, most excellent huge forms, uninterrupted forms, reliance-free forms, peerless forms, forms filled with ineffable Buddha Lands, growing forms, firm and receptive forms, forms with supreme virtues, forms that follow the mind’s pleasure, forms with pure understanding, forms that are an aggregate of wonders, forms that make skillful decisions, impediment-free forms, forms as pure as the sky, pure and delightful forms, forms without afflictions, immeasurable forms, forms with wonderful sights, forms with universal sights, forms displayed according to timing, quiet forms, forms without greed, forms that are true fortune_fields, forms that can bring peace, forms without fears, forms free from foolish actions, forms with wisdom and bold valor, forms with unhindered physical appearances, forms that travel everywhere, forms with the reliance-free mind, forms arising from great lovingkindness, forms manifested by great compassion, forms that abide in equality and liberation, forms adorned with merit and wisdom, forms that follow thoughts, forms with countless treasures, forms with the radiance of treasure stores, forms trusted and liked by sentient beings, forms that reveal  the overall wisdom-knowledge, forms with the joyful eye, forms adorned with foremost treasures, forms that abide nowhere, forms displayed at will, forms with various transcendental powers, forms born in the Tathāgata family, forms beyond analogies, forms that pervade the dharma realm, forms visited by multitudes, varying forms, forms for achievement, forms for liberation, forms with awesome deportments that suit those being taught, forms beheld insatiably, forms with various purities, forms that emit countless webs of radiance, forms with various kinds of ineffable radiance, forms with inconceivable fragrance and radiance that surpass those in the Three Realms of Existence, forms with the radiance of the immeasurable sun, forms that display the unequaled moon, forms with countless lovely splendid clouds, forms that produce various clouds of garlands of lotus flowers as adornment, forms that surpass the fragrant flames suffusing the whole world, forms that produce all Tathāgata stores, forms that expound the entire Dharma with ineffable sounds, and forms that complete all universally worthy actions. 
“Buddha-Sons, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, even if going deep into the formless realm, can manifest various physical bodies to be seen and thought of by those being taught, and to turn the Dharma wheel to benefit them. According to their timings and appearances, he enables them to get close  and to be enlightened. 
He displays to them various transcendental powers and various kinds of mastery, and does whatever he can for them. 
“Through diligent training a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva acquires this power to deliver all sentient beings. This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s eighth transcendental power, the ability to manifest countless physical bodies. 
**** The Ninth Transcendental Power, the Ability to Know All Dharmas **** “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, through the ninth transcendental power, the ability to know all dharmas, knows that dharmas have neither names nor character-types, neither selves nor  comparison, neither birth nor death, neither motion nor destruction, neither the one_appearance nor no appearance. They are neither coming nor going, neither same nor different, neither diverse nor not diverse, neither dual nor non-dual, neither real nor unreal, neither existent nor nonexistent, neither dharmas nor non-dharmas, neither conforming nor nonconforming to the world, neither karmas nor not karmas, neither requitals nor not requitals, neither saṁskṛta nor asaṁskṛta, neither the highest_truth  nor not the highest truth, neither bodhi nor not bodhi, neither liberated nor not liberated, neither measurable nor immeasurable, neither worldly nor supra-worldly, neither born nor not born from causes, neither definite nor indefinite, neither achievements nor not achievements, neither exiting nor not exiting, neither differentiated nor not differentiated, neither in accord nor not in accord with principles. 
“This Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva neither subscribes to worldly truths nor abides in the highest truth, neither differentiates dharmas nor establishes words. He follows the quiet nature , but does not abandon his vows. He knows dharmas through their meanings, spreads the Dharma cloud, and pours down the Dharma rain. 
Although he knows that the true_reality  is beyond words, he systematically expounds their meanings by skillful means and with endless eloquence. 
He is skilled in using words to explain dharmas, and his great lovingkindness and compassion are pure. From dharmas beyond words, he can produce words that are in accord with their meanings, without contradiction. To expound the dependent arising of dharmas, he uses words but has no attachment to them. 
He expounds all dharmas with endless eloquence, establishing them, developing them, indicating them, and differentiating them, in order to fully reveal the nature of dharmas, destroy the web of doubts, and achieve purity. 
As he draws in sentient beings, he never abandons the true reality of dharmas and never regresses from  the nonduality of dharmas. He always expounds the hindrance-free Dharma Door, using wonderful sounds. According to sentient beings’ minds, he timely pours down the Dharma rain on them all. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ninth transcendental power, the ability to know all dharmas. **** The Tenth Transcendental Power, the Ability to Abide in the Samādhi of the Emptiness of All Dharmas. 
However, he neither regresses on the Bodhisattva Way nor abandons Bodhisattva work, nor does he abandon his great lovingkindness and compassion. He practices the pāramitās without rest and observes all Buddha Lands without weariness or boredom. He neither abandons his vow to deliver sentient beings nor interrupts his work of turning the Dharma wheel. He neither ends his karmas of teaching sentient beings nor abandons his actions of making offerings to Buddhas, nor does he abandon the Dharma Door that leads to the realization that dharmas are hindrance free. 
Knowing that all dharmas are equal and hindrance free, he masters the entire Buddha Dharma with ease and fulfills all his excellent vows. He knows the differences among all worlds, enters the Buddha character-type, and arrives at the opposite shore. In each and every world, he studies all dharmas and understands that dharmas have no appearance. 
Although he knows that dharmas have no self-essence and arise through conditions, he explains them using worldly skillful means. 
Although his mind does not abide in dharmas, he skillfully explains various dharmas to sentient beings according to their capacities and preferences. 
“When a Bodhisattva enters this samādhi, at his mind’s pleasure he abides in it for one kalpa, or 100 or 1,000 kalpas; for one koṭi, or 100, 1,000, or 100,000 koṭi kalpas; for one nayuta koṭi, or 100, 1,000, or 100,000 nayuta koṭi kalpas; for countless kalpas, measureless kalpas, or even an ineffably ineffable number of kalpas. 
When a Bodhisattva abides for kalpas in this Samādhi of Ending All Dharmas, his body does not disintegrate. It neither wastes away nor changes, neither sees nor does not see, neither perishes nor deteriorates, neither fatigues nor relaxes, nor can it be used up. 
“Although he does nothing to bring about his existence or nonexistence, he can accomplish Buddha work. 
This means that he never abandons any sentient beings, but teaches and transforms them at the right times. As he enables them to increase  the entire Buddha Dharma, he completes his Bodhisattva actions. 
To benefit all sentient beings, he displays transcendental powers without rest. Like light illuminating everything, he quietly abides in this samādhi without motion. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s tenth transcendental power, the ability to abide in the Samādhi of the Emptiness of All Dharmas. 
“Buddha-Sons, how a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abides in these ten transcendental powers is inconceivable to all gods, sentient beings, voicehearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and other Bodhisattvas. 
This Bodhisattva’s body karmas, voice karmas, and mind karmas are inconceivable. His mastery of samādhi and the scope of his wisdom are inconceivable. Except for Buddhas and other Bodhisattvas who have also acquired these transcendental powers, no one can rightly describe or praise his virtues. 
“Buddha-Sons, these are a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ten transcendental powers. 
If a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abides in them, he acquires all transcendental powers arising from his past, present, and future hindrance-free wisdom-knowledge.” **** Chapter 29 – The Ten Endurances **** Then Samantabhadra Bodhisattva told the other Bodhisattvas, “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten endurances. 
If he acquires these ten endurances, he arrives on the ground of all Bodhisattvas’ hindrance-free endurance, and masters the entire Buddha Dharma, hindrance free. 
What are these ten? 
They are  endurance in sky-likeness. All past, present, and future Buddhas have pronounced, do pronounce, and will pronounce these ten endurances. 
**** The First Endurance, the Endurance in the Sounds **** “Buddha-Sons, what is meant by a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s endurance in hearing the sounds? 
It means that when he hears the Dharma pronounced by Buddhas, he is neither shocked nor terrified, nor even anxious. Instead, he deeply believes and understands it, appreciates and follows it, intently remembers it, abides in it, and carries out its teachings. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s first endurance, the endurance in hearing the sounds. 
**** The Second Endurance, the Endurance in Accord **** “Buddha-Sons, what is meant by a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s endurance in accord? 
It means that he ponders and observes that all dharmas are equal . He achieves understanding in accord with the true reality of dharmas, purifies his mind, correctly carries out the teachings, and heads for spiritual attainment. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s second endurance, the endurance in accord. 
**** The Third Endurance, the Endurance in No Birth **** “Buddha-Sons, what is meant by a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s endurance in no birth? 
Buddha-Sons, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva sees that dharmas have neither birth nor death. 
Why not? 
If there is no death, there is no end. If there is no end, there are no taints. If there are no taints, there is no decay. If there is no decay, there is no motion. 
This is called a BodhisattvaMahāsattva’s third endurance, the endurance in no birth. 
**** The Fourth Endurance, the Endurance in Illusion-Likeness **** “Buddha-Sons, what is meant by a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s endurance in illusion-likeness? 
Buddha-Sons, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva knows that all dharmas are like illusions because they arise through causes and conditions. Through one dharma, he understands many dharmas; through many dharmas, he understands one dharma. 
Knowing that dharmas are like illusions, this Bodhisattva fully understands worlds, sentient beings, and the dharma realm. He fully understands the equality of dharmas in the world, the equality of Buddhas appearing in worlds, and the equality of the three time frames . He displays various transcendental powers and produces manifestations. 
“An illusion is neither an elephant nor a horse, neither a chariot soldier nor a foot soldier, neither a man nor a woman, neither a boy nor a girl, neither a tree nor a leaf, neither a flower nor a fruit, neither earth nor water, neither fire nor wind, neither day nor night, neither the sun nor the moon, neither a half month nor a whole month, neither one year nor a hundred years, neither one kalpa nor many kalpas, neither stable nor unstable, neither pure nor impure, neither same nor different, neither wide nor narrow, neither many nor few, neither measurable nor immeasurable, neither coarse nor fine. An illusion is none of these. Various things are not an illusion; an illusion is not various things. However, an illusion can appear to be various things. 
“This Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva observes that all worlds are like illusions, such as the world of karmas, the world of afflictions, the world of Buddha Lands, the world of dharmas, the world of time frames, the world of lifejourneys, the world of formations , the world of destructions , the world of actions, and the world of fabrications. 
When he observes that all worlds are like illusions, he sees that sentient beings, worlds, and dharmas have neither birth nor death. 
He sees neither that the past can be differentiated nor that the future has the act of arising, nor that the present can abide in a thought. 
He neither observes nor grasps at bodhi. 
He sees neither the appearance nor the parinirvāṇa of a Buddha. 
He sees neither his abiding in great vows nor his entering the right position, nor does he lose  the equality of dharmas. 
Although he forms Buddha Lands, he knows that they are no different. 
Although he enables sentient beings to come to  achievement, he knows that they are no different. 
Although he observes the dharma realm, he abides in dharma nature, which is quiet and still. 
Although he knows the equality of the three time frames, he does not oppose differentiating them. 
Although he is composed of the five_aggregates and the twelve_fields, he forever ends his reliance on them. 
Although he delivers sentient beings, he knows that, in the equality of the dharma realm, dharmas have no differences. 
Although he knows that all dharmas are beyond words and cannot be described, he always explains dharmas with endless eloquence. 
Although he has no attachment to his work of delivering sentient beings, he ceaselessly turns the Dharma wheel to deliver them all with great compassion. 
Although he explains past causes and conditions, he knows that their nature never changes. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s fourth endurance, the endurance in illusion-likeness. 
**** The Fifth Endurance, the Endurance in Mirage-Likeness **** “Buddha-Sons, what is meant by a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s endurance in miragelikeness? 
Buddha-Sons, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva knows that all dharmas in the world are like mirages. 
A mirage has neither directions nor locations. It is neither inside nor outside, neither existent nor nonexistent, neither unceasing nor ceasing, neither uniform nor multiform, nor formless. 
This Bodhisattva observes dharmas as they truly are. He understands them and fully realizes their true reality. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s fifth endurance, the endurance in mirage-likeness. 
**** The Sixth Endurance, the Endurance in Dream-Likeness **** “Buddha-Sons, what is meant by a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s endurance in dreamlikeness? 
Buddha-Sons, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva knows that all dharmas in the world are like dreams. 
A dream has neither birth nor death. It is neither impure nor pure, neither of nor not of the world, neither in the desire realm nor in the form realm, nor in the formless realm. Yet it appears. 
“This Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva knows that all dharmas in the world are the same as dreams, without any difference, because they have the nature and appearances of a dream. As does a dream, they have no self-essence and, through one’s perceptions, entertain one’s delusions, differentiations, and attachments. They come to nothing, like being awakened from a dream. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s sixth endurance, the endurance in dream-likeness. 
**** The Seventh Endurance, the Endurance in Echo-Likeness **** “Buddha-Sons, what is meant by a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s endurance in echolikeness? 
Buddha-Sons, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva hears the Dharma expounded by Buddhas, observes dharma nature, trains for spiritual attainment, and arrives at the opposite shore. 
He knows that all sounds are like echoes, neither coming nor going, yet appearing. 
Buddha-Sons, this BodhisattvaMahāsattva understands that a Tathāgata’s sounds come from neither inside nor outside, nor both. 
Although he knows that sounds come from neither inside nor outside, nor both, he skillfully speaks like an echo arising through conditions, not contradicting dharma nature, and enables sentient beings to achieve understanding that suits their kind, and to train and learn accordingly. 
For example, the god-king Śakra’s queen, an asura-daughter, is named Śakrī. As her one tone encompasses a thousand tones, she does not need to think in order to voice such tones. 
“Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters the realm of no differentiation, skillfully voices tones that suit different kinds of sentient beings, and constantly turns the Dharma wheel in countless worlds. He is well able to observe all sentient beings and, using his wide-ranging and farreaching tongue, expounds the Dharma with hindrance-free sounds that reach everywhere in worlds in the ten directions, enabling the hearers to hear different teachings according to their needs. 
Although he knows that sounds have no birth, he emits sounds everywhere. Although he knows that there is nothing to expound, he widely expounds teachings in wonderful tones, which equally enable different kinds of sentient beings to achieve different understandings through their intellect. 
This is called a BodhisattvaMahāsattva’s seventh endurance, the endurance in echo-likeness. 
**** The Eighth Endurance, the Endurance in Reflection-Likeness **** “Buddha-Sons, what is meant by a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s endurance in reflection-likeness? 
Buddha-Sons, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva neither is born nor dies in the world. 
He is neither inside nor outside the world, neither the same as nor different from the world, neither coming nor not coming to the world, neither abiding nor not abiding in the world. 
He is neither worldly nor supra-worldly, neither real nor unreal. 
He neither walks nor does not walk in the world, neither trains in Bodhisattva actions nor abandons his great vows. 
Although he carries out the teachings of the entire Buddha Dharma, he still can have many worldly accomplishments. He neither follows the worldly stream nor abides in the Dharma stream. 
“As an analogy, the sun, the moon, men, women, houses, mountains, and forests can cast their reflections in water, oil, crystal, or a clear mirror. 
A reflection neither flows away in a river nor sinks in a pond or well. 
However, observers know that a particular reflection appears in a particular place, not elsewhere. 
Objects far from and near a medium can cast their reflections, which are neither far nor near as are the objects themselves. 
“This Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva knows that all his and others’ states are states of wisdom. He does not perceive himself and others as dual objects. However, he can simultaneously appear everywhere in his world and other worlds. 
A seed does not contain roots, stems, branches, or leaves, but it can grow these things. 
Likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva can use skillful means to identify non-dual dharmas as dual, hindrance free. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s eighth endurance, the endurance in reflectionlikeness. 
“A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who has acquired this endurance can appear in all Buddha Lands in the ten directions, though he does not actually travel to them. 
He neither leaves one place nor arrives at another place. Like reflections that appear everywhere, his actions are hindrance free. 
He enables sentient beings to see different bodies appear to be as solid as the world. However, such differences are no difference because there is no barrier between differences and no difference. 
This Bodhisattva is born from the Tathāgata character-type, and his body, voice, and mind are hindrance free. Therefore, he can acquire a pure body with countless physical appearances. 
**** The Ninth Endurance, the Endurance in Manifestation-Likeness **** “Buddha-Sons, what is meant by a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s endurance in manifestation-likeness? 
Buddha-Sons, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva knows that all dharmas in the world are like manifestations. 
This means that all sentient beings’ mind karmas are like manifestations because they arise from perceptions; all actions in the world are like manifestations because they arise from differentiations; all pains and pleasures are like manifestations because they arise from delusion and attachments; all dharmas in the world are like manifestations because they are shaped by words; all afflictions and differentiations are like manifestations because they arise from thinking; taming sentient beings is like a manifestation because it displays the purity of no differentiation; one’s past, present, and future lives are like manifestations because they are equal in their no birth; the power of a Bodhisattva’s vows is like a manifestation because it arises from his vast spiritual training; a Tathāgata’s great compassion is like a manifestation because it is displayed by skillful means; turning the Dharma wheel by skillful means is like a manifestation because the Dharma is expounded with wisdom, fearlessness, and eloquence. 
“Thus this Bodhisattva knows that the worldly and the supra-worldly are like manifestations. His wisdom-knowledge , which arises from his realization of things as they truly are, is vast, boundless, effortless, and true. It cannot be changed by wrong views, or corrupted even when following the worldly ways. 
It neither circulates in the world nor leaves the world. It is tied to neither one place nor many places. It is neither measurable nor immeasurable, neither tiring nor ceasing, nor untiring or unceasing. It is neither ordinary nor holy, neither impure nor pure, neither alive nor dead, neither wise nor foolish, neither seen nor unseen, neither relying on the world nor entering the dharma realm, neither quick-witted nor dull-witted, neither grasping nor not grasping, neither saṁsāra nor nirvāṇa, neither existent nor nonexistent. 
“Thus this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva uses skillful means to walk in the world and train on the Bodhisattva Way. He knows the worldly ways and manifests copies of his body. 
With no attachment to the world, he has no attachment to himself because he does not differentiate between the world and himself. 
He neither abides in nor leaves the world, neither abides in nor separates from dharmas. 
Because of his original vows, he neither abandons even one sentient being nor tames only a few sentient beings. 
He neither differentiates nor does not differentiate dharmas. He knows that dharma nature has neither comings nor goings. Although dharmas are like manifestations, neither existent nor nonexistent, he is equipped with the Buddha Dharma. 
Buddha-Sons, when a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abides in his endurance in manifestation-likeness, he can complete the bodhi path of Buddhas and benefit sentient beings. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ninth endurance, the endurance of manifestation-likeness. 
“If a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has acquired this endurance, whatever he does is like a manifestation. Like a manifested person, he has neither reliance on any Buddha Land nor attachments in the world, nor does he differentiate the teachings of the Buddha Dharma. Yet he heads for Buddha bodhi without idling or tiring and trains in Bodhisattva actions without holding any inverted views. Although he has no body, he manifests all bodies. 
“Buddha-Sons, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva is called a liberated one because he does not rely on any dharma; he is called a subduer because he has discarded all faults; he is called one with transcendental powers because, without motion or change, he enters all assemblies of every Tathāgata; he is called one with no regress because he has acquired endurance in his realization that dharmas have no birth; he is called a hindrance-free one because he has acquired all powers, and because even Mount Sumeru and the iron mountain range cannot hinder him. 
**** The Tenth Endurance, the Endurance in Sky-Likeness **** “Buddha-Sons, what is meant by a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s endurance in skylikeness? 
Buddha-Sons, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva knows that the entire dharma realm is like the open sky because it has no appearance; the whole world is like the open sky because it has no birth; all dharmas are like the open sky because they are non-dual ; the actions of all sentient beings are like the open sky because all actions are no action; all Buddhas are like the open sky because they are no different; all powers of Buddhas are like the open sky because they are no different; all meditations are like the open sky because past, present, and future are equal; all teachings pronounced are like the open sky because they are beyond words; all bodies of Buddhas are like the open sky because they have no attachments and no hindrances. 
Thus this Bodhisattva uses the apt analogy of the open sky to understand that all dharmas are nonexistent. 
“Buddha-Sons, when this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva uses his enduring wisdomknowledge of sky-likeness to understand all dharmas, he acquires a sky-like body and body karmas, a sky-like voice and voice karmas, and a sky-like mind and mind karmas. 
As the open sky, relied upon by all dharmas, has neither birth nor death, likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s dharma body has neither birth nor death. 
As the open sky is indestructible, likewise a BodhisattvaMahāsattva’s wisdom and powers are indestructible. 
As the open sky, though relied upon by the whole world, itself relies on nothing, likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, though relied upon by all dharmas, himself relies on nothing. 
As the open sky, with neither birth nor death, can sustain the whole world with births and deaths, likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, with neither aspirations nor attainments, can reveal his aspirations and attainments, inspiring the world to train for purity. 
As the open sky, with neither directions nor reaches, can allow boundless directions and reaches, likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, with neither karmas nor karmic requitals, can manifest various karmas and karmic requitals. 
As the open sky, neither moving nor abiding, can display various splendors, likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, neither walking nor standing still, can differentiate among all actions. 
As the open sky, neither a form nor not a form, can display various forms, likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, in neither a worldly nor a supra-worldly form, can manifest all forms. 
As the open sky, born neither a long time nor a short time ago, can abide for a long time and display all things, likewise a BodhisattvaMahāsattva, born neither a long time nor a short time ago, can abide for a long time and display all Bodhisattva actions. 
As the open sky, neither pure nor impure, is not separate from the purities and impurities of worlds, likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, neither with nor without hindrances, is not separate from hindrances and no hindrances. 
The open sky has all worlds appearing there, but to it their appearances are no appearance. 
Likewise a BodhisattvaMahāsattva has all dharmas appearing before him, but to him their appearances are no appearance. 
As the open sky enters everywhere and has no boundaries, likewise a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters all dharmas, and his mind has no boundaries. 
“Why? 
Because whatever this Bodhisattva does is like the open sky. 
His training, his purities, and his attainments are equal, in one essence, one flavor, and one kind, measuring like the open sky, and with purity pervading everywhere. 
Thus he observes all dharmas but does not differentiate them, purifies all Buddha Lands, perfects his body that relies on nothing, and knows all directions without confusion. He acquires powers that cannot be destroyed, acquires all boundless virtues, reaches the depths of dharmas, and achieves all pāramitās. He sits in all vajra seats, voices all  tones that suit the hearers’ kind, and turns the Dharma wheel for the whole world at the right times. 
This is called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s tenth endurance, the endurance in sky-likeness. 
“A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who has acquired this endurance acquires a body that does not come because it does not go; acquires a body with no birth because it has no death; acquires an immovable body because it does not perish; acquires an unsubstantial body because it is free from false appearances; acquires a body with one appearance because it has no appearance; acquires an immeasurable body because the power of Buddhas is immeasurable; acquires a body that equals all other bodies because each is an appearance of suchness; acquires a body free from differentiation because he observes the equality of the three time frames; acquires a body that goes everywhere because his pure eye equally illuminates all places, hindrance free; acquires a body with no desire  because he knows that all dharmas neither converge nor diverge; acquires a boundless body that equals the open sky because his endless store of merit and wisdom is like the open sky; acquires a body with eloquence that equals the uninterruptible and endless dharma nature because he knows that all appearances of dharmas are only one appearance, and that dharma nature is no nature, like the open sky; acquires a body that emits countless sounds hindrance free, like the open sky; acquires a body fully equipped with all skillful Bodhisattva actions because it has no hindrances anywhere, like the open sky; acquires a body that continues to sail the ocean of the entire Buddha Dharma because it is endless, like the open sky; acquires a body that displays, in every Buddha Land, countless Buddha Lands because he is free from greed and attachment, like the open sky; acquires a body that without rest displays all dharmas with ease because it is like the open sky; acquires an indestructible, firm, and powerful body because it sustains the whole world, like the open sky; acquires an indestructible vajra body with keen faculties because it is like the open sky, which cannot be burnt away by the fires at the end of a kalpa; acquires a body with the power to support the whole world because the power of his wisdom is like the open sky. 
“Buddha-Sons, these are called a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ten endurances.” **** Summarizing Verses **** Then, to restate his meaning, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva spoke in verse: When someone in a world hears The location of a treasure store, Delight rises in his mind Because he can acquire the treasures. 
When a Bodhisattva, a true Buddha-son, Who has great wisdom, Hears the Buddha Dharma As an appearance of profound nirvāṇa, His mind finds peace and calm In the profound Dharma. He is neither shocked nor terrified, Nor is he even anxious. 
When a great one who aspires to bodhi Hears the sounds , His pure mind can endure in hearing them And harbor no doubts. 
He knows that, by hearing The profound wondrous Dharma, He will acquire  the overall wisdom-knowledge And become a great guiding teacher to gods and humans. 
When a Bodhisattva hears these sounds, With great joy in his mind He makes a firm resolve To seek the Dharma of Buddhas. 
Because he delights in attaining bodhi, His mind is gradually tamed. As his faith grows stronger, He never opposes or maligns the Dharma. 
Therefore, when he listens to the sounds , His mind can endure in hearing them. Abiding in the Dharma without motion, He trains in Bodhisattva actions. 
To seek bodhi, He walks only the bodhi path. Making energetic progress without thoughts of turning back, He never abandons good precepts. 
To seek bodhi, His mind has no fear. Hearing the Dharma increases his bold valor, And He makes offerings to Buddhas to delight Them. 
* * * * * * * * * * If someone greatly fortunate Has found a store of pure gold, To satisfy his personal needs, He makes gold ornaments. 
Likewise, a Bodhisattva who hears The profound meanings of the Dharma Ponders them to increase the ocean of his wisdom-knowledge And to train in accordance with the Dharma. 
Thus he knows dharmas in existence And dharmas in nonexistence. Following true_suchness, He knows dharmas as they truly are. 
He acquires a pure mind, which is Lucid and filled with great joy. 
Knowing that dharmas arise through conditions, He diligently trains to Observe all dharmas with the same impartiality And understand their nature. Never damaging the store of the Buddha Dharma, He realizes  all dharmas. 
His aspirations always firm, He adorns Buddha bodhi. Immovable as Mount Sumeru, He single-mindedly seeks true enlightenment. 
Resolved to make energetic progress, He trains in profound samādhi. For countless kalpas, he diligently trains Without regress or failure. 
The dharmas this Bodhisattva enters Are the places walked by Buddhas. He fully understands them, His mind neither tiring nor idling. 
Following the words of the unsurpassed one, He impartially observes all dharmas. Only by acquiring endurance in equality Can he acquire the wisdom-knowledge of equality. 
Following the words of Buddhas, He attains this endurance. He knows dharmas as they truly are, But does not differentiate them. 
* * * * * * * * * * In the Thirty-three_Heavens , All gods use The same vessels for food, But each eats different food. 
Their various kinds of food Do not come from the ten directions, But naturally appear in their vessels According to the karmas they have done. 
Thus a Bodhisattva observes That all dharmas Arise through causes and conditions. Because there is no birth, there is no death. Because there is no death, there is no end. Because there is no end, there are no taints. 
Thinking only of the Buddha Dharma, His mind is neither distracted nor swayed. Honoring vows made out of compassion, He skillfully acts in the world. 
Diligently seeking to acquire the Ten_Powers, He follows the ways of the world but does not abide in the world. Neither coming nor going, He well expounds the Dharma by skillful means. 
With this supreme endurance , He understands that dharmas have no end. He truly enters the dharma realm, Knowing that his entrance is no entrance. 
A Bodhisattva who abides in this endurance Sees all Tathāgatas Simultaneously bestowing upon him the prophecy Called receiving a Buddha’s position. 
He fully understands that past, present, and future dharmas Are pure appearances of nirvāṇa. He can transform sentient beings And set them on the path of goodness. 
* * * * * * * * * * Various dharmas in the world Are all like illusions. With this understanding, His mind is never moved by anything. 
Karmas are born from the mind, So the mind is said to be like an illusion. If one discards differentiation, One’s life-journeys in the Three Realms of Existence come to an end. 
As an analogy, an artist Paints colorful images, Which merely satisfy the greed and pleasure of multitudes, Who however cannot obtain anything portrayed in a painting. 
Likewise all things in the world Are like illusions. With no self-essence and no birth, They appear to be various things. 
Although illusions are not sentient beings, Sentient beings are no different from illusions. 
Sentient beings, worlds, And dharmas in the past, present, and future Are all like illusions, With no exception. 
An illusion can appear to be a man, a woman, An elephant, a horse, a cow, a sheep, A house, a pond, a spring, A garden, a flower, a fruit, or anything else. 
An illusion has no awareness, Nor does it have a place. It is in ultimate nirvāṇa, But appears according to one’s differentiations. 
A Bodhisattva can see that, Existent or nonexistent, All dharmas in the world Are like illusions. 
Sentient beings and worlds Are produced by various karmas. He enters the realm of illusions, But has no attachment to them. 
Standing on the hindrance-free ground , He displays awesome powers everywhere. 
* * * * * * * * * * Buddha-sons, who are boldly valiant, Should follow and enter the wondrous Dharma, And observe their perceptions, which are like A fettering net in their worlds. 
Perceptions are like mirages, Which lead sentient beings to misconceptions. A Bodhisattva should know well his perceptions And discard all inverted views. 
Sentient beings are different and Do not come in only one shape or one kind. He fully understands that all such differences Are perceptions and hence unreal. 
Sentient beings  in the ten directions are All shrouded by their perceptions. If they can discard their inverted views, They can end perceptions of their worlds. 
The world is like a mirage, And one’s perceptions produce differences . If one knows that the world abides in one’s perceptions, One will be free from the three inversions. As an analogy, when a mirage appears in hot air, It is perceived by the world as water. Actually there is no water, And the wise should not seek it. 
Likewise sentient beings should know that Their worlds and life-journeys are nonexistent. They are like mirages that abide in perceptions, Which do not hinder the states of the mind. 
If one discards one’s perceptions, One will be free from ludicrous statements And can enable the foolish, who are attached to their perceptions, To achieve liberation. 
Discarding arrogance, Abandoning perceptions of worlds, And ending what is endless Are a Bodhisattva’s skillful means. 
* * * * * * * * * * A Bodhisattva knows that dharmas in the world Are all like dreams. Neither with nor without a place, Their essence is nirvāṇa. 
Dharmas are beyond differentiation, Like dreams, which are no different from the mind. Worlds and the three time frames, Are all like dreams. 
The essence of a dream has neither birth nor death, Nor does it have a direction or place. Those who see the essence of the Three Realms of Existence in the same light Liberate their minds. 
A dream is neither in the world Nor not in the world. If one does not differentiate between these two, One enters the ground of endurance . 
As one sees in a dream Various appearances, Likewise one sees them in the world, No different from those in a dream. 
He who abides in the Dream Samādhi Knows that the world is like a dream. All things are neither same nor different, Neither one nor various. 
Whether they are worlds, sentient beings, or their karmas, He knows that all of them, Pure or impure, Are like dreams. 
Whether they are a Bodhisattva’s actions Or great vows, He knows that all of them are like dreams, As is the world. 
Although he knows that the world is empty, He does not destroy dharmas in the world, Such as long and short things, As if they are in a dream. 
This is called endurance in dream-likeness, Through which he understands dharmas in the world, Quickly acquires the hindrance-free wisdom-knowledge, And widely delivers sentient beings. 
Training in these actions Brings him profound understanding of The nature of dharmas With no attachment to them. 
* * * * * * * * * * Various sounds in The whole world Are neither internal nor external dharmas, And are like echoes. 
When hearing various sounds, One’s mind should not differentiate them. 
Hence, when a Bodhisattva hears sounds, His mind does not differentiate them. 
He beholds Tathāgatas with reverence And listens to Their Dharma tones. As They pronounce countless sūtras, He has no attachment to what he hears. 
As echoes come from nowhere, Likewise do the sounds heard. Nevertheless, he can differentiate dharmas, Not contradicting their meanings. 
He well understands sounds, But does not differentiate them. Knowing that sounds are empty, He voices pure tones. 
Understanding that dharmas are beyond words, He enters the wordless state. Nevertheless, he speaks words, which are Like echoes pervading the world. 
He knows that usage of words Includes sounds. Although he Knows that the nature of sounds is empty, He speaks words in worldly tones. 
As all sounds in the world Are presented as differentiated dharmas, His tones reach everywhere To enlighten sentient beings. 
When a Bodhisattva attains this endurance , His pure tones transform the world. He skillfully explains past, present, and future, And has no attachment to the world. 
To benefit the world, He is resolved to attain bodhi. He enters dharma nature, But does not differentiate it. 
He observes that all dharmas in the world Have no self-essence and are in nirvāṇa. To benefit sentient beings, He trains for bodhi with an unwavering resolve. 
He neither abides in the world Nor leaves the world. He does not rely on the world Because the place for reliance cannot be found. 
He knows the nature of the world But has no attachment to this nature. Although he does not rely on the world, He transforms all in the world and enables them to transcend the world. 
He knows the true nature of All dharmas in the world. He knows that dharmas are non-dual, But has no attachment to non-duality. 
His mind neither abides in the world Nor leaves the world. He does not train outside the world To acquire the overall wisdom-knowledge. 
* * * * * * * * * * As a reflection in the water Is neither inside nor outside the water, A Bodhisattva who seeks bodhi Understands that the world is not the world as perceived. 
He neither abides in nor leaves the world Because the world is ineffable. Neither inside nor outside , The world appears as does a reflection. 
He who fathoms this profound meaning Has discarded taints and become lucid. Never abandoning his original vows, He illuminates everything as does a wisdom lamp. 
Countless dharmas in the world Are equal in  wisdom-knowledge. He transforms all sentient beings And enables them to discard their attachments. 
He studies the profound Dharma And benefits sentient beings. Then he enters into wisdom-knowledge And trains for bodhi. 
* * * * * * * * * * A Bodhisattva observes dharmas And knows that they are like manifestations. Nevertheless, he takes manifestation-like good actions And never abandons them. 
Following manifestation-like natures, He trains on the bodhi path. As all dharmas are like manifestations, So too are Bodhisattva actions. 
All things in the world And immeasurable karmas Are equally like manifestations, And forever abide in nirvāṇa. 
All past, present, and future Buddhas Are also like manifestations. A Bodhisattva trains for bodhi to fulfill his original vows And transforms into a Tathāgata. 
A Buddha, out of His great lovingkindness and compassion, Using the power of manifestation, expounds the Dharma And delivers manifestation-like sentient beings, Whose deliverance is also like a manifestation. 
He who knows that all things in the world are like manifestations Does not differentiate them. Differences in manifestation-like things Are all caused by different karmas. 
He who trains in Bodhisattva actions is Adorned with the store of manifestations. Using immeasurably good adornments, He does good karmas for the world. 
A manifestation is beyond differentiation, And does not differentiate dharmas. As manifestations and dharmas are both in nirvāṇa, So too are Bodhisattva actions. 
Wisdom-knowledge reveals the ocean of manifestations, And the nature of manifestations imprints the world. As manifestations have neither birth nor death, So too does wisdom. 
* * * * * * * * * * The tenth endurance is acquired by clearly seeing that The essence of sentient beings and dharmas Is nirvāṇa, Which is like the sky, without a place. 
He who acquires this wisdom-knowledge of sky-likeness Forever discards grasping and attachment. What is like the sky has no varieties And no hindrance in the world. 
He who acquires the power of endurance in sky-likeness Is like the endless sky. All mental objects are like the open sky, Beyond differentiation. 
The open sky has neither self-essence Nor termination, Nor varieties, And the power of wisdom-knowledge is like the open sky. 
The open sky has no beginning, No middle, and no end. As it cannot be measured, So too a Bodhisattva’s wisdom-knowledge cannot be measured. 
Observing dharma nature in this way, He sees that all dharmas acquired by a Bodhisattva Are like the open sky, With neither birth nor death. 
He abides in sky-like dharmas, And explains their sky-likeness to sentient beings. He subjugates all māras, Using his endurance in sky-likeness as skillful means. 
All different appearances in the world Are empty and are no appearance. He enters the place of no appearance, where All appearances are equal. 
Using only one skillful means, He enters all worlds Because he knows that the three time frames Are equal in the nature of the open sky. 
So too, wisdom, sounds, And a Bodhisattva’s bodies Are equal in the nature of the open sky Because all dharmas are in nirvāṇa. 
* * * * * * * * * * These ten endurances Are a Buddha-son’s trainings. His mind well abiding in them, He expounds them to sentient beings. 
Developing and learning well these endurances, He acquires vast power. The power of the Dharma and the power of wisdom-knowledge Are the skillful means to attain bodhi. 
He who enters this door of endurances Acquires the hindrance-free wisdom-knowledge. Surpassing all multitudes, He turns the unsurpassed Dharma wheel. 
The vast actions he trains in Are beyond measure. Only a Buddha, a tamer-teacher, who has an ocean of wisdom-knowledge, Can know them all. 
He who discards fixation on having a self and trains for bodhi Enters the profound dharma nature. His mind abiding in pure dharmas, He gives them as alms to all sentient beings. 
Although the number of sentient beings and dust particles in a world Can be known, The limits of a Bodhisattva’s virtues Cannot be determined. 
If a Bodhisattva can acquire These ten endurances, No sentient being can comprehend His wisdom and actions. 
Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment ***** *** Translated from Sanskrit into Chinese in the Tang Dynasty by The Tripiṭaka Master Śikṣānanda from Yutian *** ***** Fascicle 45  ***** **** Chapter 30 – The Ineffable **** At that time Mind King  Bodhisattva asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, Buddha-Tathāgatas use numbers, such as asaṁkhyeya, measureless, boundless, unequaled, uncountable, indefinable, inconceivable, immeasurable, ineffable, and ineffably ineffable. 
World-Honored One, what are their meanings, from asaṁkhyeya to ineffably ineffable?”     The Buddha told Mind King Bodhisattva, “Very good, very good! 
Good man, to enable the world to fathom the meanings of numbers only Buddhas know, you ask the Tathāgata, the Samyak-Saṁbuddha. 
Good man, hearken, hearken. 
I will explain to you. 
Ponder what I say.”     Then Mind King Bodhisattva said, “Yes, I accept your teachings.”     The Buddha said, “Good man, a hundred lakṣa is a koṭi. A koṭi times a koṭi is an ayuta. 
A nirabhilapya times a nirabhilapya is a nirabhilapya parivarta. A nirabhilapya parivarta times a nirabhilapya parivarta is an ineffably ineffable . A nirabhilapya nirabhilapya times a nirabhilapya nirabhilapya is a nirabhilapya nirabhilapya parivarta.”     Then, to Mind King Bodhisattva, the World-Honored One spoke in verse: The ineffably ineffable Fills all that is ineffable. 
In an ineffable number of kalpas, A description of what is ineffable cannot be finished. Suppose an ineffable number of Buddha Lands Are pulverized into dust particles. In one dust particle, there are an ineffable number of worlds. As it is with one, so it is with all. 
It is ineffable that this ineffable number of worlds Are pulverized into dust particles in one thought. Also ineffable is that they are pulverized thought after thought, Throughout an ineffable number of kalpas. 
As it is ineffable that a dust particle contains worlds, Even more ineffable is that they are pulverized into dust particles. 
Using an ineffable method of calculation,  calculate these numbers for an ineffable number of kalpas, Or for kalpas as numerous as dust particles, Using one dust particle to represent 100,000 kalpas. If you praise one Samantabhadra Bodhisattva throughout those kalpas, You still cannot finish praising his virtues. 
As it is with one hair, So it is with all hairs in the dharma_realm. 
As the worlds on the tip of one hair Are countless and ineffable, So too are worlds on The tips of hairs across space. 
The worlds on the tip of a hair Are of countless kinds. There are ineffably different kinds of worlds And ineffably same kinds of worlds. 
On the ineffable tip of a hair, There are an ineffable number of pure worlds With an ineffable number of diverse adornments And an ineffable number of wonderful things. 
On the tip of a hair, An ineffable number of names of Buddhas are pronounced. Every name is assumed by Tathāgatas, Whose numbers are ineffably ineffable. 
On every Buddha’s body, There are an ineffable number of pores. Every pore displays An ineffable number of colors. 
This ineffable number of pores emits An ineffable number of radiances. In every radiance appear An ineffable number of lotus flowers. 
Every lotus flower contains An ineffable number of flower petals. Every flower petal displays An ineffable number of colors. 
Every color displays An ineffable number of flower petals. The radiances of the flower petals are ineffable, The colors of the radiances are ineffable. 
This ineffable number of colors each emit An ineffable number of radiances. In every radiance appear an ineffable number of moons. Every moon manifests an ineffable number of moons. 
This ineffable number of moons each emit An ineffable number of radiances. In every radiance appear An ineffable number of suns. 
This ineffable number of suns each display An ineffable number of colors. This ineffable number of colors each emit An ineffable number of radiances. 
In every radiance appear An ineffable number of lion thrones With an ineffable number of adornments And an ineffable number of radiances. 
The wonderful colors of the pure radiances are ineffable, The pure radiances of the colors are ineffable. Every radiance displays Various wonderful radiances. 
These radiances in turn display various radiances, Which are ineffably ineffable. In such various radiances appear Wonderful treasures  like Mount Sumeru. 
The treasures that appear in every radiance Are ineffably ineffable. As one Sumeru Mountain of wonderful treasures displays An ineffable number of worlds, So all Sumeru Mountains of treasures, without exception, Display an ineffable number of worlds. 
When a world is pulverized into dust particles, The physical appearance of a dust particle is ineffable. 
Likewise the appearances of dust particles of pulverized worlds Are ineffably ineffable. The various appearances of these dust particles Emit an ineffable number of radiances. 
In such radiances appear an ineffable number of Buddhas, And the Dharma They expound is ineffable. The wonderful stanzas in the Dharma are ineffable, Hearers of these stanzas achieve ineffable understanding. 
Every thought with ineffable understanding Affirms the ineffable true_reality  And reveals all future Buddhas, Who will endlessly expound the Dharma. 
Every Buddha’s Dharma is ineffable, His various purities are ineffable. He voices an ineffable number of wonderful tones And turns an ineffable number of Dharma wheels. Turning every Dharma wheel, He pronounces an ineffable number of sūtras. 
In every sūtra, There are an ineffable number of different Dharma Doors. 
Through every Dharma Door, He expounds an ineffable number of teachings. 
Through every teaching, He tames an ineffable number of sentient beings. 
On the tip of a hair, He abides for an ineffable number of kalpas. As it is on the tip of one hair, so it is on the tips of all hairs For an ineffable number of kalpas. 
His mind hindrance free and ineffable, He manifests an ineffable number of Buddhas. Every manifested Tathāgata Manifests an ineffable number of Tathāgatas. 
A Buddha’s dharma body is ineffable, His manifested copies of His body are ineffable. His immeasurable adornments are ineffable, His going everywhere  in the ten directions is ineffable. His visiting all worlds is ineffable, His observing sentient beings is ineffable. His purifying sentient beings is ineffable, His taming sentient beings is ineffable. 
His adornments are ineffable, His spiritual powers are ineffable. His command of dharmas is ineffable, His miraculous manifestations are ineffable. 
His transcendental_powers are ineffable, His states are ineffable. His support  is ineffable, The world where He resides is ineffable. 
His realization of the true reality  is ineffable, The sūtras He pronounces are ineffable. 
Through every Dharma Door, The teachings He expounds are ineffable. 
In every teaching, The definitive dharmas He pronounces are ineffable. 
Through every definitive dharma, His taming sentient beings is ineffable. 
Whether ineffable dharmas of the same kind, Ineffable minds of the same kind, Ineffable dharmas of different kinds, Ineffable minds of different kinds, Ineffable faculties of different kinds, or Ineffable words of different kinds, In His sphere of action, His taming sentient beings, thought after thought, is ineffable. 
All his miraculous manifestations are ineffable, All his appearances are ineffable. Such manifestations are produced in ineffable kalpas And have ineffable differences. While a Bodhisattva can explain all these things in detail, No one else, though versed in calculation, can figure them out. 
Worlds on the tip of a hair are large or small, Pure or impure, coarse or fine. Although all such worlds are ineffable, He knows every one of them and can describe each in detail. 
Suppose a world is pulverized into dust particles, Whose countless numbers are ineffable. Worlds as numerous as these dust particles Gather on the tip of a hair. 
This ineffable number of worlds Gathered on the tip of a hair are not too crowded, Nor do they cause the tip of the hair to enlarge In order for them to gather there. 
The shapes and appearances of All these worlds remain the same as before, without any disorder. As one world is not in disorder, So all worlds are not in disorder. 
The domain of space is boundless, And filled with hairs. A Bodhisattva can describe in one thought Worlds on the tips of all such hairs. 
One after another, An ineffable number of worlds enter a tiny pore. While the pore can accept all these worlds, They cannot fill up the pore. 
The number of kalpas during which they enter is ineffable, The number of kalpas during which they are accepted is ineffable. The number of kalpas during which This line of worlds is settled is ineffable. Having been accepted and having settled there, Their states are ineffable. 
Their various teachings are ineffable, Their compassion for the world is ineffable. For an ineffable number of kalpas,  praise the ineffable virtues of Buddhas. Although an ineffable number of kalpas can come to an end, Praising Their ineffable virtues can never end. 
Even if an ineffable number of Tathāgatas, With Their ineffable number of tongues Praise the ineffable virtues of Buddhas, They cannot finish praising in an ineffable number of kalpas. 
Suppose that all sentient beings  in the ten directions Simultaneously attain true enlightenment. Every Buddha in this group Can manifest an ineffable number of bodies. 
Every one of the ineffable number of bodies manifests An ineffable number of heads. 
Every one of the ineffable number of heads manifests An ineffable number of tongues. 
Every one of the ineffable number of tongues emits An ineffable number of sounds. 
Every one of the ineffable number of sounds Abides for an ineffable number of kalpas. 
As it is with one body, so it is with all bodies. As it is with one head, so it is with all heads, As it is with one tongue, so it is with all tongues. As it is with one sound, so it is with all sounds, Which praise Buddhas for an ineffable number of kalpas. Although an ineffable number of kalpas can come to an end, Praising the virtues of Buddhas can never end. 
In every dust particle, There are an ineffable number of lotus flower worlds. In every lotus flower world There is an ineffable Tathāgata, a worthy leader. 
Throughout the dharma realm, All dust particles contain Worlds in formation or destruction, Whose numbers are countless and ineffable. 
A tiny dust particle has no boundaries, and Countless worlds enter it. Their directions and differences are ineffable, Their distribution in oceans of worlds is ineffable. 
The actions of Buddhas are ineffable, Their profound and wondrous Dharma is ineffable. Their transcendental powers and spiritual strength are ineffable, Their hindrance-free wisdom-knowledge is ineffable. Their wondrous wisdom is ineffable, Their profound states are ineffable. Their acquiring the Ten_Powers is ineffable, Their realizing bodhi is ineffable. 
Although various numbers are ineffable, They know them all. 
Although various shapes are ineffable, They know them all. 
Although various samādhis are ineffable, They abide in them for kalpas. In the places of an ineffable number of Buddhas,  pure actions are ineffable. 
He acquires the ineffable hindrance-free mind, and Goes everywhere  in ten directions. His displays of spiritual powers are ineffable, His limitless actions are ineffable. His visits to worlds are ineffable, His understanding of Buddhas is ineffable. His energetic progress and bold valor are ineffable, His wisdom and knowledge are ineffable. 
Neither using nor not using dharmas, His entering  states is ineffable. For an ineffable number of large kalpas, His going everywhere  in the ten directions is ineffable. 
His applied wisdom-knowledge is ineffable, His true wisdom-knowledge is ineffable. His transcendental powers and wisdom are ineffable, His displays , thought after thought, are ineffable. 
His knowledge of everything in The Dharma of Buddhas is ineffable. He can attain bodhi at one time Or at various times. 
He visits all these worlds, and Beholds an ineffable number of Tathāgatas there. 
He realizing the one true_suchness is ineffable, His entering the Buddha seed is ineffable. Although there are an ineffable number of Buddha Lands, He can visit all of them and attain bodhi in all of them. 
Although worlds, sentient beings, and Buddhas Have different natures, which are ineffable, And although past, present, and future things are ineffable, A Bodhisattva clearly sees them all. 
**** Chapter 31 – Time Scales **** Then Mind King Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva told the other Bodhisattvas in the assembly, “Buddha-Sons, a kalpa in this Sahā_World, which is Śākyamuni Buddha’s land, is a day and a night in the World of Ultimate Bliss, which is Amitābha Buddha’s land. 
A kalpa in the World of Ultimate Bliss is a day and a night in the World of Kaṣāya Banner, which is Vajra Sturdiness Buddha’s land. 
A kalpa in the World of Kaṣāya Banner is a day and a night in the World of the No-Regress Wheel of Sounds, which is the land of the Buddha called Benevolent Radiance of the Blooming Lotus Flower. 
A kalpa in the World of the No-Regress Wheel of Sounds is a day and a night in the Taint-Free World, which is Dharma Banner Buddha’s land. 
A kalpa in the Taint-Free World is a day and a night in the World of the Lamp of Goodness, which is Lion Buddha’s land. 
A kalpa in the World of the Lamp of Goodness is a day and a night in the World of Wonderful Radiance, which is Radiance Store Buddha’s land. 
A kalpa in the World of Wonderful Radiance is a day and a night in the Hard-to-Surpass World, which is the land of the Buddha called Dharma Radiance of the Blooming Lotus Flower. 
A kalpa in the Hard-to-Surpass World is a day and a night in the World of Majestic Wisdom, which is the land of the Buddha called Radiance of All Transcendental Powers. 
A kalpa in the World of Majestic Wisdom is a day and a night in the World of Mirror Radiance, which is Moon Wisdom-Knowledge Buddha’s land. 
“Buddha-Sons, it goes on in this way even for more than a million asaṁkhyeya worlds. A kalpa in the last of these worlds is a day and a night in the World of the Superb Lotus Flower, which is Worthy Victory Buddha’s land. 
There reside Samantabhadra Bodhisattva and other great Bodhisattvas who walk the same path.” **** Chapter 32 – Bodhisattva Abodes **** Then Mind King Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva told the other Bodhisattvas in the assembly, “Buddha-Sons, in the east there is a place called Ṛṣi Mountain, where past Bodhisattvas resided. At present, the Bodhisattva there is called Vajra Victory, who has a retinue of 300 Bodhisattvas. 
In the south there is a place called Excellent Tower Mountain, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
At present, the Bodhisattva there is called Dharma Wisdom, who has a retinue of 500 Bodhisattvas. He constantly expounds the Dharma to them. 
In the west there is a place called Vajra Flame Mountain, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
At present, the Bodhisattva there is called Vigorous Fearless Action, who has a retinue of 300 Bodhisattvas. He constantly expounds the Dharma to them. 
In the north there is a place called Fragrance Mass Mountain, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
At present, the Bodhisattva there is called Fragrant Elephant, who has a retinue of 3,000 Bodhisattvas. He constantly expounds the Dharma to them. 
In the ocean there is a place called Vajra Mountain, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
At present, the Bodhisattva there is called Dharma Rising, who has a retinue of 1,200 Bodhisattvas. He constantly expounds the Dharma to them. 
“In the northeast there is a place called Cool Mountain, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
At present, the Bodhisattva there is called Mañjuśrī, who has a retinue of 10,000 Bodhisattvas. He constantly expounds the Dharma to them. 
In the southeast there is a place called Caitya Mountain, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
At present, the Bodhisattva there is called Celestial Crown, who has a retinue of 1,000 Bodhisattvas. He constantly expounds the Dharma to them. 
In the southwest there is a place called Radiant Mountain, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
At present, the Bodhisattva there is called Worthy Victor, who has a retinue of 3,000 Bodhisattvas. He constantly expounds the Dharma to them. 
In the northwest there is a place called Fragrant Wind Mountain, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
At present, the Bodhisattva there is called Fragrant Light, who has a retinue of 5,000 Bodhisattvas. He constantly expounds the Dharma to them. In the ocean there is a place called Majestic Cavern, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
“South of the kingdom of Vaiśālī is a place called Abiding Roots, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
In the city of Mathurā is a place called Satisfying Cave, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
In the city of Kucina is a place called Dharma Seat, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
In the city of Pure Opposite Shore is a place called Mucilinda Cave, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
In the kingdom of Magadha is a place called Built by the Unimpeded Dragon-King, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
In the kingdom of Kamboja is a place called Eliciting Lovingkindness, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
In Cīna-sthāna  is a place called Nārāyaṇa Cave, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
In the kingdom of Khāsa is a place called Ox Head Mountain, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
In the kingdom of Kaśmīra is a place called Udeśin Mountain, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
In the city of Increasing Joy is a place called Cave of the Honored Ones, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
In the kingdom of Abhurima is a place called Seeing a Koṭi Stores of Radiance, where past Bodhisattvas resided. 
In the kingdom of Gandhāra is a place called Jambhala Cave, where past Bodhisattvas resided.” *** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 45 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  *** **** Notes ****     1. A lakṣa is 100,000, and a koṭi is 100 lakṣa, or 10 million. 
***** **** Chapter 33a – The Inconceivable Dharmas of Buddhas **** At that time in the huge assembly, some Bodhisattvas thought, “Why are Buddhas’ lands inconceivable? 
Why are Buddhas’ original vows inconceivable? 
Why are Buddhas’ character-types inconceivable? 
Why are Buddhas’ appearances in worlds inconceivable? 
Why are Buddhas’ bodies inconceivable? 
Why are Buddhas’ tones inconceivable? 
Why is Buddhas’ wisdom inconceivable? 
Why is Buddhas’ command of spiritual powers inconceivable? 
Why is Buddhas’ hindrance-free abiding inconceivable? 
Why is Buddhas’ liberation inconceivable?”     Then the World-Honored_One, knowing these Bodhisattvas’ thoughts, supported Blue Lotus Flower Store Bodhisattva with His spiritual power, drew him in with His wisdom, illuminated him with His radiance, and filled him with His awesome might, enabling him to abide in a Buddha’s fearlessness, enter a Buddha’s dharma_realm, acquire a Buddha’s awe-inspiring virtues and command of transcendental_powers, make a Buddha’s vast, hindrance-free observations, know the character-types of all Buddhas in succession, and acquire the skillful means of the ineffable Buddha Dharma. 
Thus Blue Lotus Flower Store Bodhisattva was enabled to fully understand the hindrance-free dharma realm, continue his hindrance-free profound actions, fulfill the great vows taught by Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, and master the entire Buddha Dharma. With great compassion, he observed sentient beings, intending to enable them to achieve purity and train diligently without tiring or idling. He accepted and carried out all Bodhisattva teachings. In one thought, he acquired Buddha wisdom, entered the door of all endless wisdomknowledge , and fully acquired dhāraṇī and eloquence. 
Through the Buddha’s spiritual power, he told Lotus Flower Store Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have countless kinds of abiding, such as  abiding in the ability to expound the hindrance-free ultimate Dharma. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Tathāgatas have ten immeasurable, boundless dharmas that pervade the dharma realm. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas have a boundless body with pure physical appearances, which remains untainted after entering various life-paths of all sentient beings. 
Second, all Buddhas have the boundless hindrance-free eye, which clearly sees all dharmas. 
Third, all Buddhas have the boundless hindrance-free ear, which understands all sounds. 
Fourth, all Buddhas have the boundless nose, which arrives at the shore of Buddha freedom. 
Fifth, all Buddhas have the wide-ranging and far-reaching tongue, which emits wonderful tones that pervade the dharma realm. 
Sixth, all Buddhas have boundless bodies, which appear to sentient beings in response to their minds. 
Seventh, all Buddhas have the boundless mind, which abides in the same hindrance-free dharma body. Eighth, all Buddhas have the boundless hindrance-free liberation and display Their inexhaustible great transcendental powers. 
Ninth, all Buddhas have the boundless pure world and, according to sentient beings’ preferences, manifest Buddha Lands with countless diverse adornments, with no attachment to them. 
Tenth, all Buddhas fulfill boundless Bodhisattva action vows, acquire complete wisdom-knowledge, act with ease as if in play, and fully understand the entire Buddha Dharma. 
Buddha-Son, these are the ten boundless dharmas of all Tathāgatas, the Samyak-Saṁbuddhas, that pervade the dharma realm. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns appear in countless worlds and use ten kinds of wisdom-knowledge to do things in one thought. 
What these ten? 
First, all Buddhas descend from heaven. 
Second, all Buddhas are born as a Bodhisattva. 
Fourth, all Buddhas attain true enlightenment under a bodhi tree. 
Fifth, all Buddhas turn the wondrous Dharma wheel. 
Sixth, all Buddhas teach sentient beings to make offerings to Buddhas. 
Seventh, all Buddhas manifest various ineffable Buddha bodies. 
Eighth, all Buddhas appear with various immeasurable adornments, a Tathāgata’s command, and the store of all wisdom-knowledge. 
Ninth, all Buddhas purify innumerable sentient beings. 
Tenth, all Buddhas reveal past, present, and future Buddhas; Their various natures, characters, and energetic work; Their actions and understandings; and Their attaining samyak-saṁbodhi in the past, present, and future. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten right timings. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas attain samyak-saṁbodhi at the right time. 
Second, all Buddhas bring those with the right conditions to  maturity at the right time. 
Third, all Buddhas bestow the prophecy of attaining Buddhahood upon Bodhisattvas at the right time. 
Fourth, all Buddhas display Their spiritual powers according to sentient beings’ minds at the right time. 
Fifth, all Buddhas manifest Their bodies according to sentient beings’ understandings at the right time. 
Sixth, all Buddhas enter parinirvāṇa at the right time. 
Seventh, all Buddhas enter villages or cities at the right time. 
Eighth, all Buddhas draw in those with pure faith at the right time. 
Ninth, all Buddhas tame recalcitrant sentient beings at the right time. 
Tenth, all Buddhas display Their inconceivable transcendental powers at the right time. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten unsurpassed inconceivable states. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas can sit cross-legged  to be in countless worlds in the ten_directions. 
Second, all Buddhas can speak one word to expound the entire Buddha Dharma. 
Third, all Buddhas can emit one beam of light to illuminate all worlds. 
Fourth, all Buddhas can manifest in one body all bodies. 
Fifth, all Buddhas can manifest in one place all worlds. 
Sixth, all Buddhas can use one wisdom-knowledge to know all dharmas hindrance free. 
Seventh, all Buddhas in one thought can go to all worlds in the ten directions. 
Eighth, all Buddhas in one thought can reveal a Tathāgata’s immeasurable aweinspiring virtues. 
Ninth, all Buddhas in one thought can know past, present, and future Buddhas and sentient beings, without confusion. 
Tenth, all Buddhas in one thought can see that all past, present, and future Buddhas have the same essence. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns can impart ten kinds of wisdom-knowledge. 
What are these ten? 
First, although all Buddhas know that dharmas have no intentions, They impart the wisdom-knowledge to make pure vows. 
Second, although all Buddhas know that dharmas have no bodies, They impart the wisdomknowledge of the dharma body. 
Third, although all Buddhas know that dharmas are non-dual, They impart the wisdom-knowledge to attain enlightenment. 
Fourth, although all Buddhas know that all dharmas are neither selves nor sentient beings, They impart the wisdom-knowledge to tame sentient beings. 
Fifth, although all Buddhas know that dharmas have no appearance, They impart the wisdom-knowledge of their appearances. 
Sixth, although all Buddhas know that all worlds have neither formation nor destruction, They impart the wisdomknowledge of formations and destructions. 
Seventh, although all Buddhas know that all dharmas are free from fabrication, They impart the wisdom-knowledge of karmic requital. 
Eighth, although all Buddhas know that dharmas have no speech, They impart the wisdom-knowledge of words. 
Ninth, although all Buddhas know that dharmas are neither pure nor impure, They impart the wisdom-knowledge of purities and impurities. 
Tenth, although all Buddhas know that dharmas have neither birth nor death, they impart the wisdom-knowledge to end the cycle of birth and death. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten kinds of internal dharmas. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas use pure, sublime bodies to enter the past, present, and future. 
Second, all Buddhas use the three commands  to transform all sentient beings. 
Third, all Buddhas use dhāraṇīs to retain the entire Buddha Dharma. 
Fourth, all Buddhas use the four kinds of unimpeded eloquence to turn the pure Dharma wheel everywhere. 
Fifth, all Buddhas have universal great compassion and never abandon any sentient beings. 
Sixth, all Buddhas have attained profound samādhi and constantly observe all sentient beings. 
Seventh, all Buddhas have altruistic roots_of_goodness and tame sentient beings without rest. 
Eighth, all Buddhas have the hindrance-free mind and abide in the entire dharma realm. 
Ninth, all Buddhas use hindrancefree spiritual powers to manifest in one thought past, present, and future Buddhas. 
Tenth, all Buddhas use hindrance-free wisdom to establish in one thought all past, present, and future kalpas. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns can do ten hard-to-believe great dharmas. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas can vanquish all māras. 
Second, all Buddhas can subjugate all those who take any non-Buddhist paths. 
Third, all Buddhas can tame all sentient beings and make them happy. 
Fourth, all Buddhas can go to all worlds, and teach and transform all kinds of sentient beings there. 
Fifth, all Buddhas can use Their wisdom-knowledge to verify the profound dharma realm. 
Sixth, all Buddhas can use Their non-dual body to manifest various bodies in order to be everywhere in all worlds. 
Seventh, all Buddhas can use the four kinds of unimpeded eloquence to expound the Dharma in pure tones without interruption, never failing to induce faith and acceptance. 
Eighth, all Buddhas can manifest, in a pore, Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in all worlds. 
Ninth, all Buddhas can manifest, in a dust particle, worlds as numerous as the dust particles in all Buddha Lands. The dust particle is not large, and the manifested worlds are not small. In these worlds with superb adornments, Buddhas constantly turn the Dharma wheel to teach and transform sentient beings as, with wisdom, They constantly abide in the dharma realm. 
Tenth, all Buddhas fully understand the pure dharma realm and use Their radiant wisdom to dispel the darkness in the world, enabling sentient beings to understand the Buddha Dharma and follow Tathāgatas, who have the Ten_Powers. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten great virtues, faultless and pure. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas have always had great awe-inspiring virtues, faultless and pure. 
Second, all Buddhas are born into past, present, and future Tathāgata families in honorable clans, faultless and pure. 
Third, all Buddha’s minds abide nowhere throughout the endless future, faultless and pure. 
Fourth, all Buddhas have no attachment to past, present, and future dharmas, faultless and pure. 
Fifth, all Buddhas know that all natures are but one nature, which comes from nowhere, faultless and pure. 
Sixth, all Buddhas’ past and future merits are as endless as the dharma realm, faultless and pure. 
Seventh, all Buddhas’ boundless bodies are everywhere in worlds in the ten directions, and tame sentient beings at the right times, faultless and pure. 
Eighth, all Buddhas have the Four_Fearlessnesses and roar the lion’s roar in assemblies to explicate all dharmas, faultless and pure. 
Ninth, all Buddhas enter parinirvāṇa in an ineffably ineffable number of kalpas, and sentient beings acquire immeasurable merit by hearing Their names, no different from that acquired by hearing present Buddhas’ names, faultless and pure. 
Tenth, although all Buddhas reside in ineffably remote worlds, if sentient beings think of Them with single-minded right_mindfulness, they will be able to see Them, faultless and pure. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten ultimate purities. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas’ past vows have ultimate purity. 
Second, all Buddhas’ Brahma way of life has ultimate purity. 
Third, all Buddhas’ transcending worlds fraught with delusions has ultimate purity. 
Fourth, all Buddhas’ magnificent worlds have ultimate purity. 
Fifth, all Buddhas’ retinues have ultimate purity. 
Sixth, all Buddhas’ clans have ultimate purity. 
Seventh, all Buddhas’ physical bodies and their excellent characteristics have ultimate purity. 
Eighth, all Buddhas’ dharma bodies are taint free and have ultimate purity. 
Ninth, all Buddhas’  knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge is hindrance free and has ultimate purity. 
Tenth, all Buddhas’ liberation and command, completion of what They set out to do, and arrival at the opposite shore have ultimate purity. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns do ten kinds of Buddha work in all worlds and at all times. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas appear before sentient beings if they single-mindedly think of Them. 
Second, all Buddhas expound the Dharma to sentient beings even if their minds are muddled. 
Third, all Buddhas enable sentient beings to acquire countless roots of goodness if they can elicit pure faith. 
Fourth, all Buddhas know that sentient beings can enter a Dharma_position6 through realization of the truth. 
Fifth, all Buddhas teach and transform sentient beings, never tiring. 
Sixth, all Buddhas visit Buddha Lands, going to and fro hindrance free. 
Seventh, all Buddhas, out of great compassion, never abandon any sentient beings. 
Eighth, all Buddhas appear in manifested bodies without interruption or end. 
Ninth, all Buddhas display transcendental powers with ease and without rest. 
Tenth, all Buddhas abide in the dharma realm and observe all things everywhere. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten oceans of endless wisdom-knowledge. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas have the ocean of endless wisdomknowledge of the boundless dharma body. 
Second, all Buddhas have the ocean of endless wisdom-knowledge of immeasurable Buddha work. 
Third, all Buddhas have the ocean of endless wisdom-knowledge of the Buddha-eye abilities. 
Fourth, all Buddhas have the ocean of endless wisdom-knowledge of countless inconceivable roots of goodness. 
Fifth, all Buddhas have the ocean of endless wisdomknowledge to shower down sweet dew, the wondrous Dharma. 
Sixth, all Buddhas have the ocean of endless wisdom-knowledge to praise Buddhas’ virtues. 
Seventh, all Buddhas have the ocean of endless wisdom-knowledge arising from Their past vows and actions. 
Eighth, all Buddhas have the ocean of endless wisdomknowledge to do Buddha work throughout the endless future. 
Ninth, all Buddhas have the ocean of endless wisdom-knowledge of all sentient beings’ mental activities. 
Tenth, all Buddhas have the ocean of endless wisdom-knowledge of unsurpassed merit and wisdom, which are Their adornments. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten dharmas that They always do. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas always practice all pāramitās. 
Second, all Buddhas are always free from delusions over dharmas. 
Third, all Buddhas always have great compassion. 
Fourth, all Buddhas always have the Ten Powers. 
Fifth, all Buddhas always turn the Dharma wheel. 
Sixth, all Buddhas always deliver all sentient beings.7 Seventh, all Buddhas always demonstrate attainment of true enlightenment to benefit sentient beings. 
Eighth, all Buddhas always delight in taming all sentient beings. 
Ninth, all Buddhas always are mindful that dharmas are non-dual. 
Tenth, all Buddhas, after transforming sentient beings, always demonstrate entering the nirvāṇa without remnant because a Buddha’s state is boundless. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns expound the immeasurable Buddha Dharma through ten doors. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas expound the door of the realm of innumerable sentient beings. 
Second, all Buddhas expound the door of innumerable sentient beings’ actions. 
Third, all Buddhas expound the door of innumerable sentient beings’ karmic requitals. 
Fourth, all Buddhas expound the door of delivering innumerable sentient beings. 
Fifth, all Buddhas expound the door of actions to purify innumerable sentient beings. 
Sixth, all Buddhas expound the door of countless Bodhisattva actions. 
Seventh, all Buddhas expound the door of immeasurable Bodhisattva vows. 
Eighth, all Buddhas expound the door of the formation kalpas and destruction kalpas of countless worlds. 
Ninth, all Buddhas expound the door of pure Buddha Lands aspired to by innumerable Bodhisattvas. 
Tenth, all Buddhas expound the door of past, present, and future Buddhas, who appear in countless worlds, kalpa after kalpa, to reveal Buddha wisdom. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns do Buddha work for sentient beings in ten ways. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas manifest physical bodies to do Buddha work for sentient beings. 
Second, all Buddhas emit wonderful tones to do Buddha work for sentient beings. 
Third, all Buddhas do Buddha work for sentient beings, as They receive their offerings. 
Fourth, all Buddhas do Buddha work for sentient beings, as They do not receive their offerings. 
Fifth, all Buddhas use earth, water, fire, and wind to do Buddha work for sentient beings. 
Sixth, all Buddhas, using Their spiritual powers, manifest things with ease to do Buddha work for sentient beings. 
Seventh, all Buddhas assume various names to do Buddha work for sentient beings. 
Eighth, all Buddhas use the settings of Buddha Lands to do Buddha work for sentient beings. 
Ninth, all Buddhas purify and adorn Buddha Lands to do Buddha work for sentient beings. 
Tenth, all Buddhas use quietness  to do Buddha work for sentient beings. These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten supreme dharmas. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas’ great vows are firm and indestructible, and They always honor Their words, never withdrawing or changing them. 
Second, all Buddhas, to complete Their accumulation of merit, take Bodhisattva actions throughout all future kalpas without tiring or idling. 
Third, all Buddhas, to tame even one sentient being, go to an ineffably ineffable number of worlds, and do the same for all sentient beings without interrupting or stopping. 
Fourth, all Buddhas regard both believers and nonbelievers with great compassion, without any difference. 
Fifth, all Buddhas, from Their initial resolve to Their attainment of Buddhahood, never lose the bodhi_mind. 
Sixth, all Buddhas accumulate immeasurable merits, transfer them to acquiring the knowledge of all wisdomknowledge, and have no attachment to the world. 
Seventh, all Buddhas do the three karmas  only in the Buddha way, not the way of riders of the Two_Vehicles, and transfer the merit of these karmas to acquiring the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge and attaining the unsurpassed true enlightenment. 
Eighth, all Buddhas emit vast radiance, illuminating all places equally and illuminating the Dharma of all Buddhas, enabling Bodhisattvas to purify their minds and acquire all wisdom-knowledge. 
Ninth, all Buddhas, with neither greed nor attachments, discard worldly pleasures, and wish the world to leave suffering for happiness and not to uphold any ludicrous_statements . 
Tenth, all Buddhas pity sentient beings in various pains, guard the Buddha seed, abide in the Buddha state, transcend the cycle of birth and death, and arrive on the ground of the Ten Powers. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten kinds of hindrance-free abiding. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas can go to all worlds, abiding hindrance free. 
Second, all Buddhas can reside in all worlds, abiding hindrance free. 
Third, all Buddhas can walk, stand still, sit, and lie down in all worlds, abiding hindrance free. 
Fourth, all Buddhas can expound the true Dharma in all worlds, abiding hindrance free. 
Fifth, all Buddhas can stay in Tuṣita Heaven  in all worlds, abiding hindrance free. 
Sixth, all Buddhas can enter the dharma realm in the past, present, and future, abiding hindrance free. 
Seventh, all Buddhas can sit in all bodhimaṇḍas in the dharma realm, abiding hindrance free. 
Eighth, all Buddhas, thought after thought, can observe all sentient beings’ mental activities, and teach and tame them with the three commands , abiding hindrance free. 
Ninth, all Buddhas can use one body to reside in countless inconceivable places of Buddhas and all other places to benefit sentient beings, abiding hindrance free. 
Tenth, all Buddhas can expound the true Dharma, abiding hindrance free. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten unexcelled superb adornments. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas have bodies adorned with physical marks and excellent characteristics. This is the first adornment of Buddhas, the unexcelled superb physical body. 
Second, all Buddhas can emit sixty tones. Each tone comprises five hundred parts; each part is embellished with countless hundreds of thousands of pure tones. Without fear amid all multitudes in the dharma realm, They roar a great lion’s roar to expound the profound meanings of the Dharma of Tathāgatas. After hearing these teachings, all sentient beings are delighted and tamed according to their capacities and desires. 
Third, all Buddhas have the Ten Powers, great samādhis, and the Eighteen_Exclusive_Dharmas, which adorn Their mind karmas. They handle all states hindrance free, acquire the entire Buddha Dharma, and adorn Themselves with the splendor of the dharma realm. In one thought They clearly see, in the dharma realm, sentient beings’ past, present, and future mental activities, and their differences. This is the third adornment of Buddhas, the unexcelled superb mind. 
Fourth, all Buddhas can emit countless beams of light. Each beam has ineffable webs of radiance as its retinue, illuminating all Buddha Lands, dispelling the darkness in all worlds, and revealing the appearances of innumerable Buddhas. These Buddhas, whose bodies are equally pure and whose Buddha work is never futile, enable sentient beings to attain  no_regress. This is the fourth adornment of Buddhas, the unexcelled superb radiance. 
Fifth, all Buddhas, when smiling, emit from Their mouths 100,000 koṭi nayuta beams of light. Each beam has countless inconceivable, diverse colors, illuminating all worlds in the ten directions, displaying truthful words amid multitudes, and bestowing upon innumerable sentient beings the prophecy of attaining anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. This is the fifth adornment of Buddhas, the unexcelled superb smile that removes delusion in the world. 
Sixth, all Buddhas have the dharma body, which is pure and hindrance free. They fully understand all dharmas, abide in the boundless dharma realm, stay in the world without being tainted, know the true nature of dharmas, walk the supra-worldly way, end the flow of words, and transcend  the five_aggregates, the twelve_fields, and the eighteen_spheres. This is the sixth adornment of Buddhas, the unexcelled superb dharma body. 
Seventh, all Buddhas have an immeasurable constant radiance and are adorned with a store of radiance with various ineffably ineffable colors, which emits immeasurable wonderful radiance, illuminating everywhere  in the ten directions, hindrance free. This is the seventh adornment of Buddhas, the unexcelled superb ever-present radiance. 
Eighth, all Buddhas assume countless sublime forms, such as lovely forms, pure forms, manifested-at-will forms, forms that surpass all things in the Three_Realms_of_Existence, and forms that have arrived at the opposite shore. This is the eighth adornment of Buddhas, the unexcelled superb forms. 
Ninth, all Buddhas are born into past, present, and future Buddha families. They accumulate treasures of goodness, achieve ultimate purity, and have no faults, free from the scorn and slander of the world. They are adorned with pure actions that are supreme among all dharmas, and have fully acquired the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge. Their clans are pure and beyond criticism. 
Tenth, all Buddhas adorn Their bodies with the power of great compassion. Their bodies being naturally pure, They have no thirsty love  of being. Their body karmas are forever ended, Their minds are liberated, and Their beholders never tire of seeing Them. Out of great compassion, They rescue and protect the whole world. 
As the foremost fortune field, They are the unexcelled recipients of offerings. They pity and benefit all sentient beings, enabling them to increase immeasurably their accumulation of merit and wisdom. This is the tenth adornment of Buddhas, the unexcelled superb virtue of great lovingkindness and compassion. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten commands. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas have command of all dharmas, clearly know various words and expressions, and expound the Dharma with unimpeded eloquence. This is the first command of Buddhas. 
Second, all Buddhas teach and transform sentient beings at the right time, expound the true Dharma according to their preferences, and ceaselessly tame them. This is the second command of Buddhas. 
Third, all Buddhas can cause, in the entire domain of space, all worlds with countless diverse adornments to quake in six different ways, and can make them rise or fall, larger or smaller, joined or separated, without distressing even one sentient being. Sentient beings there neither sense nor know any change, and are neither suspicious nor bewildered. This is the third command of Buddhas. 
Fourth, all Buddhas can use transcendental powers to purify and adorn all worlds. In one thought They can display all worlds with taint-free adornments, which are pure beyond comparison and cannot be described in countless kalpas. They can put the adornments in all worlds into one world. This is the fourth command of Buddhas. 
Fifth, all Buddhas, for the sake of one sentient being ready to be delivered, sustain Their lifespans for an ineffably ineffable number of kalpas. Throughout the endless future, They sit cross-legged without tiring in body or mind, and intently think of that sentient being, never forgetting or giving up. They tame that sentient being by skillful means at the right time. 
As they do this for one sentient being, so too They do this for all sentient beings. This is the fifth command of Buddhas. 
Sixth, all Buddhas can go to the places of all Tathāgatas in all worlds, without abandoning the dharma realm even temporarily. 
In each of the ten directions, there are countless oceans of worlds. Each ocean of worlds contains countless world systems. Using Their spiritual powers, in one thought Buddhas go to all of them and turn the pure Dharma wheel, hindrance free. This is the sixth command of Buddhas. 
Seventh, all Buddhas, to tame all sentient beings, thought after thought, attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. They master the Buddha Dharma neither in the present nor in the future, nor on the ground of learning . They master the entire Dharma, hindrance free. With immeasurable wisdom and command, they teach and tame all sentient beings. This is the seventh command of Buddhas. 
Eighth, all Buddhas can use the eye to do Buddha work of the ear, use the ear to do Buddha work of the nose, use the nose to do Buddha work of the tongue, use the tongue to do Buddha work of the body, use the body to do Buddha work of the mind, and use the mind to abide in various worldly and supraworldly settings in all worlds. In each setting, They can do immeasurable, vast Buddha work. This is the eighth command of Buddhas. Ninth, all Buddhas can put all sentient beings into any of Their pores. 
Although each sentient being’s body is the size of an ineffable number of Buddha Lands, the pore is not crowded. Step by step, each sentient being can pass countless worlds throughout countless kalpas, and can see Buddhas appear in worlds, teach and transform sentient beings, turn the pure Dharma wheel, and expound the ineffable Dharma in the past, present, and future. 
As all these sentient beings are repeatedly reborn throughout the domain of space to make various life-journeys, carry out their deportments, come and go, and enjoy various pleasures, they have no hindrance . This is the ninth command of Buddhas. 
Tenth, all Buddhas in one thought can manifest Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in all worlds. Each manifested Buddha in the dharma realm is seated on a lion throne, in a vast magnificent world of wonderful lotus flowers, which is contained in the Lotus Flower Store, demonstrates attainment of samyaksaṁbodhi, and displays command of various spiritual powers. 
As such splendors appear in one vast magnificent world of wonderful lotus flowers, so in pure worlds in the entire dharma realm appear various ineffably ineffable adornments, states, shapes, displays, and kalpas. 
Countless asaṁkhyeyas of kalpas are in one thought. Without using even a little power of skillful means, in one thought, all things appear; in one thought, countless things abide. This is the tenth command of Buddhas. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have acquired ten immeasurable and inconceivable dharmas in fulfillment of Buddhahood. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas have acquired pure appearances, each signifying a hundred merits. 
Second, all Buddhas have mastered the entire Buddha Dharma. 
Third, all Buddhas have completed all roots of goodness. 
Fourth, all Buddhas have accumulated all merits. 
Fifth, all Buddhas can teach and transform all sentient beings. 
Sixth, all Buddhas can be leaders of sentient beings. 
Seventh, all Buddhas have formed pure Buddha Lands. 
Eighth, all Buddhas have acquired  the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge. 
Ninth, all Buddhas have acquired a body with excellent physical marks to benefit beholders without fail. 
Tenth, all Buddhas have realized the equality of true_suchness and mastered the true Dharma of Buddhas. 
Eleventh, all Buddhas, after completing Buddha work, demonstrate entering parinirvāṇa. 
These are the ten.     “Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten skillful means. 
What are these ten? 
First, although all Buddhas know that dharmas are beyond words, They explain Buddhas’ roots of goodness. This is the first skillful means. 
Second, all Buddhas know that dharmas perceive nothing, neither know one another nor achieve anything, neither receive nor accumulate anything, and have neither bondage nor liberation, and that they have arrived at the opposite shore with ease. Knowing the truth that dharmas are no different and free from differentiation, Buddhas have command of dharmas. Although They know that there is no self and no sensory reception, They do not abandon the true_reality of dharmas. Having arrived on the ground of great freedom, They always observe the entire dharma realm. 
Third, all Buddhas have forever left appearances behind. Their minds abiding nowhere, They know all things without confusion or error. Although They know that all appearances have no self-essence, They can enter them according to their natures, manifest countless physical bodies and the endless appearances of all pure Buddha Lands with various adornments, and use the wisdom lamp to destroy sentient beings’ delusions. This is the third skillful means. 
Fourth, all Buddhas abide in the dharma realm, not in the past, present, or future, because in true suchness, there is no past, present, and future. However, they can pronounce the appearances of innumerable past, present, and future Buddhas in the world, enabling the hearers to see Buddhas’ states. This is the fourth skillful means. 
Fifth, Buddhas’ body, voice, and mind karmas are free from fabrication, neither coming nor going, nor abiding. Discarding calculations, Buddhas have arrived at the opposite shore of all dharmas and become the store of dharmas. Equipped with immeasurable wisdom-knowledge, they fully understand various worldly and supra-worldly dharmas. With hindrance-free wisdom, They display immeasurable command of spiritual powers and tame all sentient beings in the dharma realm. 
Sixth, all Buddhas know that all dharmas have neither perception nor self-essence, and are neither same nor different, neither measurable nor immeasurable, neither coming nor going. However, Buddhas do not go against dharmas in the world. 
Those with the knowledge of all wisdomknowledge see all dharmas, though dharmas have no self-essence. With command of dharmas, They widely expound dharmas while constantly abiding in true suchness. This is the sixth skillful means. 
Seventh, all Buddhas know all times through one time. Equipped with pure roots of goodness, They enter the right position  but have no attachment to it. They neither abide in nor abandon time scales, such as day, month, year, kalpa, formation kalpa, and destruction kalpa. However, They can manifest the three four-hour daytime or nighttime periods, one day, seven days, a half month, a whole month, one year, one hundred years, one kalpa, many kalpas, inconceivable kalpas, ineffable kalpas, or even all possible future kalpas. 
Eighth, all Buddhas constantly abide in the dharma realm, have immeasurable fearlessness, and have eloquence that is immeasurable, uninterruptible, endless, boundless, limitless, unique, and truthful. They skillfully explain all dharmas with all eloquent words according to sentient beings’ capacities, natures, desires, and understandings. Through various Dharma Doors, They pronounce ineffably ineffable hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of sūtras, all of which contain definitive good teachings, in the beginning, in the middle, and in the end. This is the eighth skillful means. 
Ninth, all Buddhas abide in the pure dharma realm. They know that all dharmas have never had names, i.e., no past names, no present names, and no future names. 
There are no names for sentient beings, worlds or non-worlds, dharmas or non-dharmas, merits or non-merits, Bodhisattvas or Buddhas, numbers or nonnumbers, birth or death. 
There are neither names nor no names, neither one name nor various names. 
Because the essence of dharmas is ineffable, and because all dharmas have neither directions nor locations. Dharmas cannot be said to converge or diverge, or to be one or many, nor can they be captured by sounds or words. Although Buddhas follow various words used in the world, They neither pursue connections nor fabricate things. Having discarded false thinking, They have arrived at the opposite shore. 
This is the ninth skillful means. 
They have neither birth nor death, neither numbers nor no numbers, nor karmic requital, training, learning, or attainment. They are neither existent nor nonexistent, neither impure nor pure, neither coming nor going, neither abiding nor not abiding, neither tamed nor not tamed, neither sentient beings nor not sentient beings, neither living nor not living, neither causes and conditions nor not causes and conditions. 
Buddha-Son, these are the ten skillful means that Buddhas have.” *** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 44 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  *** **** Notes ****     1. 
See “dharma body” defined in the glossary’s “three bodies of a Buddha.”      3. 
See “five_aggregates” in the glossary. ***** **** Chapter 33b – The Inconceivable Dharmas of Buddhas Continued ****  “Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns do ten kinds of vast Buddha work, which are measureless, boundless, and inconceivable. No gods or humans in the world can know them, nor can past, present, and future voice-hearers or Pratyekabuddhas. They can be known only through a Tathāgata’s awesome spiritual power. 
What are these ten? 
“First, all Buddhas manifest birth in Tuṣita Heaven  in all worlds in the entire dharma realm and the domain of space, where They train in Bodhisattva actions and do great Buddha work. Equipped with countless physical appearances and immeasurable virtues, radiance, sounds, words, samādhis, and wisdom, They draw in all humans, gods, māras, Brahma gods, śramaṇas, Brahmins, asuras, and all others. With unconditional great lovingkindness and compassion, They benefit all sentient beings equally, whether They purify their faculties, tame their minds, or enable them to be reborn as gods or humans. They draw in sentient beings by means of the Three Vehicles or the perfect One_Vehicle, delivering them all from their cycles of birth and death. 
In profound samādhi, all Buddhas observe that birth in the Three_Realms_of_Existence is like an illusion, a mirage, a reflection, a manifestation, and the open sky. They graciously accept birth without limitation, hindrance, or contention, but with the wisdom-knowledge  of no attachment. Pure and free from desires, They complete the vast store of wonderful adornments for Their final body . Staying in the tower adorned with great treasures, They do Buddha work, whether by using spiritual powers, keeping right_mindfulness, displaying transcendental powers, manifesting the wisdom sun, revealing Buddhas’ vast states, emitting Buddhas’ immeasurable radiance, entering countless great samādhis, or rising from those samādhis. 
Buddha-Son, while in His mother’s womb, to benefit the whole world, a Tathāgata does Buddha work by displaying various scenes, whether being born, becoming a youth, living in the palace, renouncing family life, attaining samyak-saṁbodhi, turning the wondrous Dharma wheel, or entering parinirvāṇa. Using various skillful means, all Buddhas do Buddha work for all kinds of sentient beings in all worlds in all directions. 
This is the second kind of vast Buddha work. 
“Third, all Buddhas have done all good karmas with purity and have clear wisdom-knowledge of birth. They display Their birth to guide sentient beings from delusion to enlightenment and to doing myriads of good deeds. 
To benefit them, Buddhas are born in a royal palace . They discard carnal desires and sensuous entertainments in the palace. With no greed, They always observe that existence has no self-essence and that all pleasures are unreal. They abide by Buddhas’ pure precepts with absolute purity. 
As They observe the women in the palace, They elicit great compassion; as They observe that sentient beings are unreal, like illusions, They elicit great lovingkindness; as They observe that nothing in the world can bring happiness, They elicit great sympathetic joy; as Their minds have command of all dharmas, They elicit great equability. 
Equipped with a Buddha’s virtues, They display in the dharma realm Their birth, Their body with perfect physical marks, and Their pure retinues, but have no attachment to anything. 
Voicing tones suitable for different kinds of sentient beings, They expound the Dharma, enabling them to tire of dharmas in the world and indicating to them that their actions always have consequences. 
They give apt teachings to enable those who are immature to come to  maturity, and those who are mature to achieve liberation. They do Buddha work for both groups, enabling them not to regress. 
With vast lovingkindness and compassion, They provide various teachings to sentient beings, and use the three commands  to enlighten them and purify their minds. 
Although Their presence in the palace is seen by all, They do Buddha work in all worlds. 
Using great wisdom and vigor, They ceaselessly display Their various transcendental powers, hindrance free. 
To benefit sentient beings, They always use three skillful means: mind karmas that are profound and hindrance free. 
This is the third kind of vast Buddha work. 
“Fourth, all Buddhas reside in well-adorned palaces. They observe all adornments, tire of them, and discard them. They renounce family life to make sentient beings understand that dharmas in the world, impermanent and decaying, are their deluded perceptions, so that they will tire of them, have no attachment to them, forever end their greed and other afflictions, and take pure actions to benefit others. 
When Buddhas renounce family life, they abandon all secular ways, abide in no contention, fulfill Their original vows, and acquire immeasurable merit. They use radiant great wisdom-knowledge to dispel the darkness of ignorance in the world and serve as the unsurpassed fortune field in the world. They praise Buddhas’ virtues, enabling sentient beings to plant roots of goodness and see the truth with the wisdom-eye. 
To benefit sentient beings, They praise the purity of renouncing family life, achieving liberation, and becoming a tall wisdom banner in the world. 
This is the fourth kind of vast Buddha work. 
“Fifth, all Buddhas have  the overall wisdom-knowledge because They know and see  all dharmas. They attain anuttarasamyak-saṁbodhi under a bodhi tree, and subjugate māras, using extraordinary awe-inspiring virtues. 
Their bodies being everywhere in all worlds, what Their spiritual powers can do is boundless and endless. They follow with ease the meanings of the overall wisdom-knowledge and complete accumulation of merits. 
Their fully-adorned bodhi seats are everywhere in all worlds in the ten directions. Buddhas seated there turn the wondrous Dharma wheel and expound Bodhisattva action vows. They reveal Buddhas’ immeasurable states, enabling Bodhisattvas to enter them and train in various pure actions. 
They guide sentient beings and enable them to plant roots_of_goodness, be born on the Tathāgata ground of equality, take endless wonderful Bodhisattva actions, and acquire all excellent merits. They know all worlds, Buddha Lands, dharmas, Bodhisattvas, teachings, miraculous manifestations, sentient beings and their preferences, ways to tame them, and past, present, and future. Using wisdomknowledge, They do Buddha work. 
This is the fifth kind of vast Buddha work. 
“Sixth, all Buddhas turn the no-regress Dharma wheel because They enable Bodhisattvas not to regress. 
They turn the immeasurable Dharma wheel to enable the world to know . 
They turn the awakening-all Dharma wheel to roar the fearless great lion’s roar. 
They turn the wisdom-knowledgestore Dharma wheel to open the door of the Dharma store and annihilate the hindrance of darkness . 
They turn the hindrance-free Dharma wheel because Their wisdom equals the open sky . 
They turn the noattachment Dharma wheel because They observe that all dharmas are neither existent nor nonexistent. 
They turn the illuminating-all Dharma wheel to enable all sentient beings to purify their dharma-eye. 
They turn the impartingoverall-wisdom-knowledge Dharma wheel to reveal  all past, present, and future dharmas. 
They turn the same Dharma wheel because the Dharma of all Buddhas contains no differences. 
All Buddhas turn countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of such immeasurable Dharma wheels to do inconceivable Buddha work according to sentient beings’ different mental activities. 
This is the sixth kind of vast Buddha work. 
“Seventh, to do Buddha work for sentient beings, all Buddhas enter the capital cities of all kings, such as human kings, god-kings, dragon-kings, yakṣa-kings, gandharva-kings, asura-kings, garuḍa-kings, kiṁnara-kings, mahoraga-kings, rakṣasa-kings, and piśāca-kings. 
When They enter a city gate, the great earth quakes in six different ways, radiance pervades everywhere, the blind gain sight, the deaf gain hearing, the insane regain their minds, the naked gain clothing, and those in anxiety and pain gain peace and joy. 
All musical instruments sound without being played, all adornments emit wonderful sounds, and all hearers are delighted. 
All Buddhas have pure bodies with sublime appearances, and beholders never tire of seeing Them. 
They do Buddha work for sentient beings, whether They look about, make observations, turn around, bend, extend, walk, stand still, sit, lie down, speak, remain silent, display transcendental powers, expound the Dharma, or give instructions. 
All such things are Buddha work that They do for sentient beings. In countless worlds, all Buddhas persuade various sentient beings with an ocean of various preferences to think of Buddhas, make observations, plant roots of goodness, and train in Bodhisattva actions. 
They praise Buddhas’ physical appearances as foremost in wonderfulness and hard to be encountered by sentient beings. Whoever comes to see a Buddha will elicit faith, do immeasurable good dharmas, accumulate merits required for Buddhahood, and achieve purity. 
After praising Buddhas’ virtues, They manifest copies of Themselves in worlds in the ten directions, enabling sentient beings there to behold Them with reverence, ponder Their teachings, attend Them and make offering to Them, make observations, and plant roots of goodness. As they delight Buddhas, they grow the Buddha seed and will become Buddhas. 
Buddhas act in this way to do Buddha work. Whether They reveal Their physical bodies, voice wonderful tones, or merely smile, They enable all sentient beings to have faith and delight, make obeisance, bend over with joined palms, praise and pay tribute, or ask about a Buddha’s daily life. 
All Buddhas do such immeasurable, ineffable, inconceivable kinds of Buddha work in all worlds according to sentient beings’ preferences. Using the power of Their original vows, great lovingkindness and compassion, and the overall wisdom-knowledge, They teach and transform sentient beings by skillful means, and tame them all. 
This is the seventh kind of vast Buddha work. 
“Eighth, all Buddhas do Buddha work in wildernesses , quiet places, open places, Their abodes, or samādhi. 
They do Buddha work by remaining alone in gardens, staying hidden, using profound wisdom-knowledge, or abiding in Buddhas’ unexcelled states. 
They do Buddha work by engaging in various invisible physical activities facilitate teaching sentient beings according to their preferences, desires, and understandings. 
They do Buddha work by appearing as gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, mahoragas, humans, or nonhumans, who seek the overall wisdom-knowledge; by appearing as voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, or Bodhisattvas, who seek the overall wisdom-knowledge. 
They do Buddha work by expounding the Dharma or remaining silent; by speaking of one Buddha or many Buddhas; by expounding that all Bodhisattva actions and vows are one Bodhisattva action and vow, or that one Bodhisattva action and vow is countless Bodhisattva actions and vows; or by pronouncing that worldly states are Buddhas’ states, or that Buddhas’ states are no state. 
They do Buddha work for all sentient beings by abiding in the world for a day or a night, a half month or a whole month, a year or even an ineffable number of kalpas. 
This is the eighth kind of vast Buddha work. 
“Ninth, all Buddhas are the store of pure roots of goodness. They enable sentient beings to elicit pure faith in and achieve understanding of the Buddha Dharma, control their faculties, and transcend the world. 
They enable Bodhisattvas on the bodhi path to develop wisdom and realize the truth without others’ help. 
They do Buddha work by entering parinirvāṇa; by revealing the impermanence of the world; by describing a Buddha’s bodies; by announcing completion of what They set out to do; by announcing the perfection of Their virtues; by expounding how to destroy forever the roots of  the Three Realms of Existence; by enabling sentient beings to turn away from the world to follow the Buddha mind; by pronouncing that life always comes to an end; by pronouncing that nothing in the world can bring happiness; by persuading sentient beings to make offerings to Buddhas throughout the endless future; by announcing that Buddhas turn the pure Dharma wheel to delight the hearers; by describing Buddhas’ states to inspire sentient beings to train for bodhi; by teaching them the Samādhi of Thinking of Buddhas to enable them to see Buddhas; by teaching them to purify their faculties and seek Buddha bodhi without indolence or regress; by going to all Buddha Lands to observe their settings, and various causes and conditions; or by turning all sentient beings’ bodies into a Buddha’s body, enabling even the indolent and those lacking selfcontrol to observe Tathāgatas’ pure precepts. 
This is the ninth kind of vast Buddha work. 
“Tenth, when a Buddha enters parinirvāṇa, grieving sentient beings cry aloud in sorrow, and feel anxious and distressed. They look at one another and say, ‘The Buddha-Bhagavān has great lovingkindness and compassion, and pities and benefits the whole world. He is the rescuer and refuge of sentient beings. A Tathāgata’s appearance in the world is hard to encounter. 
Now this unsurpassed fortune field is gone forever.’ All Buddhas do Buddha work by entering parinirvāṇa, causing sentient beings to cry in sorrow and adoration. 
To deliver all gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍa, kiṁnaras, mahoragas, humans, and nonhumans, They break Their bodies into countless inconceivable relics , which inspire sentient beings to elicit pure faith, reverence, and esteem, to make offerings to the relics with joy, and to accumulate merits in full. 
To preserve the relics, such as teeth, fingernails, and hair, They have well-adorned pagodas  built in the palaces of gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍa, kiṁnaras, mahoragas, humans, and nonhumans, inspiring beholders to think of the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha with unwavering faith, reverence, and esteem, and to make offerings everywhere to accumulate merits. 
Because of these merits, they will be reborn in heaven as gods, or reborn into exalted and honorable families as humans endowed with wealth and followed by pure retinues. They will be reborn to take a good life-path, not an evil one. They will always come to see Buddhas, do white dharmas , and quickly liberate themselves from the Three Realms of Existence. They will harvest spiritual fruit by riding a holy vehicle of their choice, acknowledge receiving a Tathāgata’s kindness and requite it, and become the refuge of the world. 
Buddha-Son, after a Buddha-Bhagavān has entered parinirvāṇa, He continues to be sentient beings’ inconceivable pure fortune field, the supreme fortune field with endless virtues, enabling sentient beings to fully develop roots of goodness and fully accumulate merits. 
This is the tenth kind of vast Buddha work. 
“Buddha-Son, these ten kinds of Buddha work are inconceivable and immeasurably vast. No past, present, and future gods, humans, voice-hearers, or Pratyekabuddhas can know them, except through the support of a Tathāgata’s spiritual power. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten no-exception commands. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas bestow Their prophecies in good words, definitely with no exception. 
Second, all Buddhas can fulfill sentient beings’ wishes according to their thoughts, definitely with no exception. 
Third, all Buddhas realize the true reality of all dharmas and expound their meanings, definitely with no exception. 
Fourth, all Buddhas have the wisdom of all past, present, and future Buddhas, definitely with no exception. 
Fifth, all Buddhas know that all past, present, and future moments are one moment, definitely with no exception. 
Sixth, all Buddhas know that all past, present, and future Buddha Lands are one Buddha Land, definitely with no exception. 
Seventh, all Buddhas know that the words of all past, present, and future Buddhas are the words of one Buddha, definitely with no exception. 
Eighth, all Buddhas know that the essence of all past, present, and future Buddhas and that of sentient beings They transform are equal, definitely with no exception. 
Ninth, all Buddhas know that there is no difference between the nature of worldly dharmas and that of the Buddha Dharma, definitely with no exception. 
Tenth, all Buddhas know that the roots of goodness of all past, present, and future Buddhas are the same one root of goodness, definitely with no exception. These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten kinds of abiding in all dharmas. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas abide in Their realization of the entire dharma realm. 
Second, all Buddhas abide in Their great compassion. 
Third, all Buddhas abide in Their original vows. 
Fourth, all Buddhas abide in never giving up on taming sentient beings. 
Fifth, all Buddhas abide in the truth that dharmas have no self-essence. 
Sixth, all Buddhas abide in benefiting all sentient beings equally. 
Seventh, all Buddhas abide in Their no loss of mindfulness. 
Eighth, all Buddhas abide in the hindrance-free mind. 
Ninth, all Buddhas constantly abide in right samādhi. 
Tenth, all Buddhas abide in entering all dharmas equally without going against their true reality. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten kinds of knowledge of all dharmas, with no exception. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas know all past dharmas, with no exception. 
Second, all Buddhas know all future dharmas, with no exception. 
Fourth, all Buddhas know all languages, with no exception. 
Fifth, all Buddhas know all worldly ways, with no exception. Sixth, all Buddhas know all sentient beings’ minds, with no exception. 
Seventh, all Buddhas know all Bodhisattvas’ roots of goodness, such as high, middling, and low, with no exception. 
Eighth, all Buddhas know that Their wisdom-knowledge is complete and that Their roots of goodness neither increase nor decrease, with no exception. 
Ninth, all Buddhas know that all dharmas arise through causes and conditions, with no exception. 
Tenth, all Buddhas know all world systems, with no exception. 
Eleventh, all Buddhas know that the entire dharma realm is like the god-king Indra’s net, which comprises countless interwoven reflections, with no exception. 
These are the ten.     “Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten strengths. 
What are these ten? 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten dharmas called the mighty Nārāyaṇa Banner Buddha’s bold dharmas. 
What are these ten? 
“First, all Buddhas have indestructible bodies and unending lives. They cannot be killed by any poison in the world, nor can They be harmed by any disasters of water, fire, or wind. 
Even if all māras, gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, mahoragas, humans, and nonhumans, with all their might, simultaneously poured down, everywhere in the Three-Thousand Large_Thousandfold_World, a rain of thunderbolts  as huge as Mount Sumeru or the Iron Mountain Range, they could not astonish or terrify any Buddha, not even disturbing a single hair of His, who would continue to walk, stand still, sit, or lie down as before, without any change. 
Without a Buddha’s permission, the rain of vajras could not fall on His place or surrounding places far or near in the four directions. 
Even if He let this rain fall, it could not cause any harm. 
It could not harm even sentient beings under Buddhas’ support or in Their service, much less Tathāgatas Themselves. 
This is the first of the mighty Nārāyaṇa Banner Buddha’s bold dharmas. 
“Second, all Buddhas can put Mount Sumeru, the Iron Mountain Range, the Great Iron Mountain Range, oceans, mountains, forests, palaces, and houses in worlds in the entire dharma realm, into any of Their pores, and sentient beings cannot sense or know any change, except through the support of a Tathāgata’s spiritual power. 
Buddha-Son, as Buddhas carry all worlds in one of Their pores throughout future kalpas, They do not feel fatigued, whether They walk, stand still, sit, or lie down. 
Buddha-Son, as the open sky holds all worlds in the dharma realm without fatigue, likewise any Buddha holds all worlds in one pore without fatigue. 
This is the second of the mighty Nārāyaṇa Banner Buddha’s bold dharmas. 
“Third, all Buddhas, in one thought, can walk steps as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of worlds. With each step, he passes worlds as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. They walk in this way for kalpas as numerous as the dust particles in all worlds. 
Buddha-Son, suppose there is a huge vajra mountain the size of all Buddha Lands They pass. 
Buddhas can put into one of Their pores such huge vajra mountains as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. 
The number of pores on a Buddha’s body equals that of the pores of all sentient beings in the dharma realm. Carrying such great vajra mountains in every pore, Buddhas travel in the ten directions and enter all worlds in the entire domain of space for all kalpas, from past to future, without rest. Their bodies are neither damaged nor fatigued, and Their minds are constantly in samādhi, never distracted. 
This is the third of the mighty Nārāyaṇa Banner Buddha’s bold dharmas. 
“Fourth, all Buddhas, after a meal, sit cross-legged  for an ineffable number of past and future kalpas, experiencing a Buddha’s inconceivable bliss. Their bodies stay put and remain still, but They neither interrupt nor abandon Their work of delivering sentient beings. 
Buddha-Son, suppose someone uses the tip of a hair to measure all worlds in the entire domain of space. Buddhas can sit cross-legged on the tip of a hair for all future kalpas. 
As They do this on the tip of one hair, so too They do this on the tips of all hairs. 
Buddha-Son, suppose each sentient being in all worlds in the ten directions has a body the size and weight of worlds as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffable number of Buddha Lands. Buddhas can put all these sentient beings on a fingertip for all future kalpas. 
Carrying all sentient beings on all Their fingertips, They enter all worlds, without exception, throughout space in the entire dharma realm. Yet Their bodies and minds are not fatigued. 
This is the fourth of the mighty Nārāyaṇa Banner Buddha’s bold dharmas. 
“Fifth, all Buddhas can make a body manifest heads as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. Each head manifests tongues as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. Each tongue emits different sounds as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands, and every sentient being in the dharma realm hears all these sounds. Each sound indicates sūtra stores as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. 
Buddhas expound these meanings for kalpas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. 
After finishing these kalpas, They expound them again for kalpas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. 
They continue in this way until They finish kalpas as numerous as the dust particles in all worlds and even as numerous as all sentient beings’ thoughts. 
Although future kalpas have an end, the Dharma wheels turned by Buddhas’ manifested bodies have no end. 
Such Dharma wheels include the Dharma wheel of teaching with wisdom, the Dharma wheel of ending doubts, the Dharma wheel of illuminating all dharmas, the Dharma wheel of opening the hindrancefree store, the Dharma wheel of delighting and taming innumerable sentient beings, the Dharma wheel of teaching all Bodhisattva actions, the Dharma wheel of unveiling the sun of perfect wisdom, the Dharma wheel of the bright wisdom lamp that illuminates the whole world, and the Dharma wheel of eloquence, fearlessness, and various adornments. 
Every manifested Buddha body uses transcendental powers to turn various Dharma wheels, which are beyond all analogies in the world. 
On the tip of each hair in the entire domain of space are worlds as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. In each world, thought after thought, Buddhas manifest bodies as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. The sounds of words and their meanings, emitted by every manifested body pervade the entire dharma realm. Although sentient beings come to different understandings, Buddhas’ tones are changeless, uninterrupted, and ceaseless. 
This is Buddhas’ fifth of the mighty Nārāyaṇa Banner Buddha’s bold dharmas. 
“Sixth, all Buddhas adorn Their chests with a symbol of virtue, as indestructible as vajra, and sit cross-legged under a bodhi tree. 
The māraking’s countless troops assume various terrifying shapes. When sentient beings see them, they are struck by fear, go mad, or even die. 
When a Tathāgata sees these māra troops all over the open sky, He has no fear, His face does not change color, and not even a single hair stands on end. Neither moved nor disturbed, free from rapture and rage, making no differentiations He abides in a Buddha’s state, serene and pure. Equipped with the power of lovingkindness, compassion, and well-attuned faculties, He has no fear, and cannot be moved by māra troops. Instead, He subjugates them, and makes them change their minds and bow down to take refuge in Him. 
Then He uses the three wheels  to teach and transform them, enabling them to activate the anuttarasamyak-saṁbodhi_mind and never to regress. 
This is Buddhas’ sixth of the mighty Nārāyaṇa Banner Buddha’s bold dharmas. 
“Seventh, all Buddhas voice hindrance-free tones, which pervade worlds in the ten directions, and hearers are willingly tamed. 
The tones voiced by Tathāgatas cannot be blocked by Mount Sumeru or any other mountains. Nor can they be blocked by the palaces of gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, mahoragas, humans, or nonhumans. Nor can they be blocked by loud sounds in all worlds. 
Those ready to be delivered hear them and understand the words and their meanings. 
This is Buddhas’ seventh of the mighty Nārāyaṇa Banner Buddha’s bold dharmas. 
“Eighth, all Buddhas have the hindrance-free mind, which remains pure even beyond 100,000 koṭi nayuta ineffably ineffable kalpas. 
All past, present, and future Buddhas have the same essence, which is neither clouded nor shrouded, neither internal nor external, and has no self and its belongings. Buddhas know that dharmas are empty, and do not produce deluded perceptions. 
They rely on nothing, do nothing, make no differentiations, and do not abide in appearances. 
Pure by nature, They discard all attachments and related memories and do not contend over anything. 
Abiding in true reality, They are pure, free from desires. 
As They enter the true dharma realm and ceaselessly expound the Dharma, They discard all correct and incorrect perceptions, and end all discussions about saṁskṛta and asaṁskṛta dharmas. 
They have full understanding of the ineffably boundless state, and have acquired endless hindrance-free wisdom and skillful means. They have acquired the Ten_Powers and all merits as pure adornment. They expound various immeasurable dharmas in accord with true reality. 
They are at perfect ease with the equality of all past, present, and future dharmas in the dharma realm. 
They enter the supreme Dharma store and remember all Dharma Doors without confusion. They reside in all Buddha Lands in the ten directions without moving. 
Having acquired endless wisdom-knowledge, They know all dharmas with no exception. Having ended all afflictions, They have fully liberated Their minds and unfolded Their wisdom. They abide in true reality, hindrance-free, Their minds always in right samādhi. 
In one thought, They know all past, present, and future sentient beings’ mental activities, hindrance free. 
This is the eighth of the mighty Nārāyaṇa Banner Buddha’s bold dharmas. 
“Tenth, all Buddhas equally master the Dharma of all Tathāgatas and equally take all universally worthy actions, as do Bodhisattvas. They have fulfilled Their vows and acquired wisdom-knowledge, both equally pure and as vast as the ocean. 
Their actions are dignified and excellent, never cringing or timid. Abiding in the immeasurable states of samādhi, They indicate all paths to sentient beings and persuade them to do good and stop doing evil. 
Their wisdom-knowledge being supreme, They fearlessly expound the Dharma and well answer all questions. They use the same wisdom and purity to expound the Dharma, and Their body, voice, and mind karmas are unadulterated. They abide in the Buddha character-type and use Buddha wisdom to do Buddha work. 
Using  the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge, with no limit or boundary, They differentiate countless dharmas. Their wisdom and transcendental powers are inconceivable, beyond the comprehension of the whole world. 
Their wisdom being profound, They see all dharmas. Using their subtle, immeasurable, and boundless wisdom, They understand all past, present, and future Dharma Doors and know all worlds. 
Using supra-worldly wisdom-knowledge, They do various ineffable kinds of Buddha work in the world. Equipped with wisdomknowledge that never fades, They rise to the calling of Buddhas. 
Although They have realized what is beyond words, They use various words and phrases to teach. 
Using universally worthy wisdom-knowledge, They take all good actions. They acquire wondrous wisdom and, in one thought, know all dharmas. They give the Dharma as alms to all sentient beings according to their chosen vehicles. 
Although the states of all dharmas, worlds, sentient beings, and time scales in the dharma realm are immeasurable, They know and see them all, using Their hindrance-free wisdom-knowledge. 
Buddha-Son, for the sake of sentient beings ready to be delivered, all Buddhas, in one thought, appear in worlds. They abide in purity, attain samyak-saṁbodhi, and display transcendental powers. With right timing, They open the minds of all past, present, and future sentient beings. 
Buddha-Son, sentient beings, worlds, and dharma realms are countless; past, present, and future are immeasurable; Buddhas are supreme and boundless. Appearing amid all sentient beings, They attain samyak-saṁbodhi and, without rest, skillfully use Buddha wisdom to enlighten them. 
Buddha-Son, using transcendental powers, all Buddhas appear in the most sublime bodies and abide in the boundless state. With no hindrance in Their minds, at all times They use great compassion and skillful means to expound the wondrous Dharma to sentient beings. 
This is the tenth of the mighty Nārāyaṇa Banner Buddha’s bold dharmas. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddhas have these dharmas, called the mighty Nārāyaṇa Banner Buddha’s bold dharmas, which are immeasurable and boundless. They are inconceivable and incomprehensible to all past, present, and future sentient beings and riders of the Two_Vehicles, except through the support of a Tathāgata’s spiritual power. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns definitely do ten things. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas definitely descend from Tuṣita Heaven to be born. 
Second, every Buddha definitely stays in His mother’s womb for ten months before birth. 
Third, all Buddhas definitely tire of the world and renounce family life. 
Fourth, all Buddhas definitely sit under a bodhi tree and attain samyaksaṁbodhi. 
Fifth, all Buddhas definitely realize, in one thought,  all dharmas and display spiritual powers in the world. 
Sixth, all Buddhas definitely turn the wondrous Dharma wheel at the right times. 
Seventh, all Buddhas definitely expound the Dharma to sentient beings at the right times according to their roots of goodness, and bestow prophecies on them. 
Eighth, all Buddhas definitely do Buddha work at the right times. 
Ninth, all Buddhas definitely bestow on accomplished Bodhisattvas the prophecy . 
Tenth, all Buddhas, in one thought, definitely answer all sentient beings’ questions. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns give ten quick benefits. 
What are these ten? 
First, whoever comes to see a Buddha will quickly leave all evil life-paths. 
Second, whoever comes to see a Buddha will quickly complete accumulation of excellent merits. 
Third, whoever comes to see a Buddha will quickly complete development of vast roots of goodness. 
Fourth, whoever comes to see a Buddha will quickly be reborn in heaven. 
Fifth, whoever comes to see a Buddha will quickly end his doubts. 
Whoever comes to see a Buddha, if he has already activated the anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi mind, will quickly acquire vast faith and understanding, will never regress, and will teach those ready to be taught. 
Seventh, whoever comes to see a Buddha, if he has not entered the right position, will quickly enter it. 
Eighth, whoever comes to see a Buddha will purify his worldly and supra-worldly faculties. 
Ninth, whoever comes to see a Buddha will quickly annihilate all hindrances. 
Tenth, whoever comes to see a Buddha will quickly acquire fearlessness and eloquence. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten pure dharmas that should always be remembered. 
What these ten? 
First, all Bodhisattvas should always remember all Buddhas’ past causes and conditions. 
Second, all Bodhisattvas should always remember all Buddhas’ excellent pure actions. 
Third, all Bodhisattvas should always remember that all Buddhas have achieved all pāramitās. 
Fourth, all Bodhisattvas should always remember that all Buddhas have fulfilled Their great vows. 
Fifth, all Bodhisattvas should always remember that all Buddhas have completed accumulation of merits. 
Sixth, all Bodhisattvas should always remember that all Buddhas have perfected Their Brahma way of life. 
Seventh, all Bodhisattvas should remember that all Buddhas have demonstrated attainment of true enlightenment. 
Eighth, all Bodhisattvas should always remember all Buddhas’ countless physical bodies. 
Ninth, all Bodhisattvas should always remember all Buddhas’ immeasurable transcendental powers. 
Tenth, all Bodhisattvas should always remember all Buddhas’ Ten Powers and Four Fearlessnesses. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten kinds of abiding in wisdomknowledge. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas, in one thought, know all past, present, and future sentient beings’ minds and mental activities. 
Second, all Buddhas, in one thought, know all past, present, and future sentient beings’ karmas and karmic requitals. 
Third, all Buddhas, in one thought, know all sentient beings’ capacities and tame them with the three wheels . 
Fourth, all Buddhas, in one thought, know the mental activities of all sentient beings in the dharma realm, enable them to see Buddhas appearing everywhere, and draw them in by skillful means. 
Fifth, all Buddhas, in one thought, expound the Dharma according to the preferences, desires, and understandings of all sentient beings in the dharma realm, and tame them. 
Sixth, all Buddhas, in one thought, know the pleasures of all sentient beings in the dharma realm and display Their spiritual powers to them. 
Seventh, all Buddhas, in one thought, appear everywhere for the sake of all sentient beings ready to be delivered, and tell them to have no attachment to the Buddha body. 
Eighth, all Buddhas, in one thought, go to all sentient beings on various life-paths everywhere in the dharma realm. 
Ninth, all Buddhas, in one thought, go to sentient beings, wherever they are, if they think of Buddhas. 
Tenth, all Buddhas, in one thought, know all sentient beings’ understandings and desires, and manifest countless physical appearances to them. These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns, constantly in right samādhi, do ten inconceivable things. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas, constantly in right samādhi, in one thought appear everywhere and widely expound the Dharma to sentient beings. 
Second, all Buddhas, constantly in right samādhi, in one thought appear everywhere and pronounce to sentient beings the truth that dharmas have no selves. 
Third, all Buddhas, constantly in right samādhi, in one thought appear everywhere and enter past, present, and future. 
Fourth, all Buddhas, constantly in right samādhi, in one thought appear everywhere and enter vast Buddha Lands in the ten directions. 
Fifth, all Buddhas, constantly in right samādhi, in one thought appear everywhere and manifest countless various Buddha bodies. 
Sixth, all Buddhas, constantly in right samādhi, in one thought appear everywhere and do body, voice, and mind karmas according to sentient beings’ different minds and understandings. 
Seventh, all Buddhas, constantly in right samādhi, in one thought appear everywhere and pronounce the truth that dharmas are free from desires. 
Eighth, all Buddhas, constantly in right samādhi, in one thought appear everywhere and expound the dependent arising of dharmas. 
Ninth, all Buddhas, constantly in right samādhi, in one thought appear everywhere and manifest Buddhas with immeasurable splendor of worldly and supra-worldly ways, enabling sentient beings always to see Buddhas. 
Tenth, all Buddhas, constantly in right samādhi, in one thought appear everywhere and enable sentient beings to fully understand the entire Buddha Dharma, achieve limitless liberation, and ultimately arrive at the unsurpassed opposite shore. These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Son, Buddha-Bhagavāns have ten hindrance-free liberations. 
What are these ten? 
First, all Buddhas can manifest in a dust particle an ineffably ineffable number of Buddhas appearing in worlds in the ten directions. 
Second, all Buddhas can manifest in a dust particle an ineffably ineffable number of Buddhas turning the Dharma wheel. 
Third, all Buddhas can manifest in a dust particle Their teaching and taming of an ineffably ineffable number of sentient beings. 
Fourth, all Buddhas can manifest in a dust particle an ineffably ineffable number of Buddha Lands. 
Fifth, all Buddhas can manifest in a dust particle Their bestowing on an ineffably ineffable number of Bodhisattvas the prophecy . 
Sixth, all Buddhas can manifest in a dust particle all past, present, and future Buddhas. 
Seventh, all Buddhas can manifest in a dust particle all past, present, and future world systems. 
Eighth, all Buddhas can display in a dust particle Their past, present, and future transcendental powers. 
Ninth, all Buddhas can manifest in a dust particle all past, present, and future sentient beings. 
Tenth, all Buddhas can manifest in a dust particle all past, present, and future Buddha work. 
***** **** Chapter 34 – The Ocean of the Characteristics of a Tathāgata’s Ten Bodies **** At that time Samantabhadra Bodhisattva said to the other Bodhisattvas in the assembly, “Buddha-Sons, I now will expound to you the ocean of characteristics of a Tathāgata’s physical appearance. **** The First Thirty-two Characteristics of a Great Man **** “Buddha-Sons, the crown of a Tathāgata’s head is adorned with thirty-two treasure-adorned characteristics of a great man. One of them is called the web that emits immeasurable, vast radiance. 
It illuminates everywhere  in all directions, and is adorned with wonderful treasures, all over His soft and dense hair. Each treasure emits the light of jewels, pervading countless worlds, revealing Buddhas with perfect physical marks. 
This is the first characteristic. “The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud that emits the radiance of the Buddha-eye. It has various adornments, such as the king of gems, and emits golden radiance, like that emitted from the white hair between His eyebrows, illuminating all worlds. This is the second characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud that pervades the dharma_realm. It is adorned with the wheel of superb treasures, and emits, like lamplight, the radiance of a Tathāgata’s merit and wisdom, illuminating oceans of worlds in all dharma realms in the ten_directions. In its radiance appear all Buddhas and Bodhisattvas. This is the third characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud that displays universal illumination. It is adorned with various wonderful treasures, such as pure gold, all of which emit radiance, illuminating inconceivable Buddha Lands. In its radiance appear all Buddhas. This is the fourth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud that emits the radiance of treasures. It is pure, adorned with the king of gems and with stamens made of aquamarine . Its radiance illuminates all dharma realms in the ten directions, displaying various miraculous manifestations, praising a Tathāgata’s merit and wisdom acquired from His past actions. This is the fifth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud that displays a Tathāgata’s great command throughout the dharma realm. It uses flaming gems and Bodhisattvas’ miraculous manifestations as its crown, which has a Tathāgata’s power to enlighten. It uses orbs of the flaming light of all treasures as its chaplet. Its radiance illuminates worlds in the ten directions, revealing all Tathāgatas seated in Their bodhimaṇḍas, with the cloud of Their  overall wisdom-knowledge pervading the open sky and the immeasurable dharma realm. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud of a Tathāgata’s universal lamp. It is adorned with the treasure ocean of great commands that can shake all worlds in the dharma realm. It emits pure radiance that pervades the dharma realm, revealing an ocean of merits accumulated by Bodhisattvas  in the ten directions and an ocean of wisdom banners of past, present, and future Buddhas. This is the seventh characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the vast cloud that illuminates all Buddhas. It is adorned with Indra’s jewels, the wishfulfilling king of jewels, and the king of gems. It emits the radiance of Bodhisattvas’ flaming lamps, illuminating all worlds in the ten directions, revealing the ocean of all Buddhas’ physical appearances, the ocean of great sounds, and the ocean of pure powers. This is the eighth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud of perfect radiance. It is adorned with superb aquamarine, the king of gems, and various flowers made of treasures, all of which spread a web of great flames to reach far in the ten directions, enabling all sentient beings in all worlds to see Tathāgatas seated before them, to praise the virtues of Buddhas’ and Bodhisattvas’ dharma bodies, and to enter a Tathāgata’s pure state. This is the ninth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the radiant cloud that illuminates the store of all Bodhisattva actions. It is adorned with wonderful flowers made of treasures. The light of its treasures illuminates countless worlds, and the flames of its treasures cover all worlds in the ten directions. It pervades dharma realms in the ten directions, hindrance free, and thunders Buddha tones to expound the Dharma ocean. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud of universal light. It is adorned with aquamarine, diamond , and Indra’s jewels. Its aquamarine-colored light is bright and lucid, illuminating oceans of worlds and emitting wonderful sounds that pervade the dharma realm. All these are manifested by the ocean of Buddhas’ great virtues. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud of true enlightenment. It is adorned with various flowers made of treasures. These precious flowers emit radiance, in which appear Tathāgatas seated in Their bodhimaṇḍas in countless worlds, enabling all worlds to achieve purity and end forever their deluded perceptions and differentiations. This is the twelfth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud of radiance that dazzles. It is adorned with the mind-king’s jewel from the ocean store of flaming gems. It emits vast radiance, which reveals innumerable Bodhisattvas and what they do, Tathāgatas’ wisdom bodies and dharma bodies, and the ocean of Their physical appearances, pervading the dharma realm. This is the thirteenth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud of splendors that illuminate everywhere. It is adorned with aquamarine and flowers made of diamond. It emits vast radiance, in which appears a splendid, huge lotus flower that spans the dharma realm. It naturally expounds the four great Bodhisattva actions, and its sounds carry across oceans of dharma realms. 
This is the fourteenth characteristic. “The next characteristic of a great man is called the action cloud that reveals the ocean of Buddha samādhis. It displays in one thought a Tathāgata’s immeasurable majesty and adorns oceans of inconceivable worlds in all dharma realms. This is the fifteenth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud of the ocean of manifestations that illuminates everywhere. It is adorned with wonderful lotus flowers made of treasures, each flower as huge as Mount Sumeru. The radiance of treasures is born from a Buddha’s vows, and it endlessly displays manifestations. This is the sixteenth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud of the liberation of all Tathāgatas. It is adorned with pure, wonderful treasures, emits vast radiance to adorn all Tathāgatas’ lion thrones, and reveals the ocean of all Buddhas’ physical images, the immeasurable Buddha Dharma, and oceans of Buddha Lands. This is the seventeenth characteristic. “The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud of masterly skillful means that illuminate everywhere. 
It is adorned with flowers made of aquamarine, lotus flowers made of pure gold, lamps made of the king of gems, and the flaming cloud of the Dharma. It spreads a dense cloud of flames of all Buddha treasures. In its pure radiance, which pervades the dharma realm, appear all wonderful adornments. This is the eighteenth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud that awakens those of the Buddha character-type. It is adorned with the immeasurable light of treasures and equipped with a thousand orbs, which are pure inside and outside. It is born from His past roots_of_goodness, and its radiance illuminates worlds in the ten directions, unveiling the wisdom sun and expounding the Dharma ocean. This is the nineteenth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the commanding cloud that reveals the appearances of all Tathāgatas. It is adorned with garlands of treasures and flowers made of aquamarine, and spreads great flames of treasures that fill the dharma realm. In its radiance appear past, present, and future Buddhas, who are as innumerable as the dust particles in all Buddha Lands, and who are like lion-kings, boldly valiant, fearless, and adorned with wisdom and physical marks. This is the twentieth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud that illuminates the entire dharma realm. It is adorned with the purity of a Tathāgata’s sublime appearance. It emits vast radiance, illuminating all things everywhere in the dharma realm, revealing innumerable Buddhas’ and Bodhisattvas’ stores of wondrous wisdom. This is the twenty-first characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud of the appearance of Vairocana Tathāgata. It is adorned with flowers made of superb treasures and the pure moon made of aquamarine, all of which emit countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of radiances of jewels that pervade the entire open sky in the dharma realm. In its radiance appear countless Buddha Lands, where Tathāgatas sit cross-legged. This is the twenty-second characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the radiant cloud that illuminates all Buddhas. It is adorned with wonderful lamps made of treasures, and emits pure radiance, illuminating all worlds in the ten directions, revealing Buddhas turning the Dharma wheel. This is the twenty-third characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud that manifests all adornments. It is adorned with the flames of various treasures, and emits pure radiance that pervades the dharma realm. Thought after thought, it reveals an ineffably ineffable number of Buddhas and Bodhisattvas seated in bodhimaṇḍas. This is the twenty-fourth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud that emits all sounds in the dharma realm. It is adorned with choice sandalwood and an ocean of jewels. It spreads a web of great flames that fills the dharma realm, emitting wonderful sounds that indicate to sentient beings the ocean of all their karmas. This is the twenty-fifth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud that illuminates Buddhas’ wheels of manifestations. It is adorned with a Tathāgata’s pure eye. Its radiance illuminates all worlds in the ten directions, manifests all adornments of past, present, and future Buddhas, and emits wonderful sounds to expound the inconceivable vast Dharma ocean. This is the twenty-sixth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud that illuminates the Buddha ocean. Its radiance illuminates all worlds in the dharma realm, hindrance free, where Tathāgatas sit cross-legged. This is the twentyseventh characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud of lamps made of treasures. It emits the radiance of a Tathāgata’s vast wisdom, illuminating all dharma realms in the ten directions. In its radiance appear all Buddhas and Bodhisattvas, and the inconceivable ocean of sentient beings. This is the twenty-eighth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud of the nodifferentiation dharma realm. It emits the radiance of a Tathāgata’s great wisdom, illuminating all Buddha Lands in the ten directions, all Bodhisattva assemblies in bodhimaṇḍas, and the immeasurable Dharma ocean. Its radiance displays various transcendental powers, and emits wonderful tones to expound Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s action vows according to sentient beings’ preferences, enabling them to turn to the Dharma. This is the twenty-ninth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the illuminating cloud that abides in all oceans of worlds. It emits the radiance of treasures that pervades all open skies and dharma realms. In its radiance appear pure bodhimaṇḍas, and Buddhas’ and Bodhisattvas’ sublime bodies, enabling beholders to see what cannot be seen. This is the thirtieth characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the cloud of the pure radiant flames of all treasures. It emits the pure radiance of the wonderful jewels of innumerable Buddhas and Bodhisattvas, illuminating all dharma realms in the ten directions. In its radiance appear the ocean of Bodhisattvas, who are equipped with a Tathāgata’s spiritual power and visit the web of all worlds in the ten directions throughout the domain of space. This is the thirty-first characteristic. 
“The next characteristic of a great man is called the splendid cloud that illuminates all dharma realms. Located in the middle of the bony bulge on a Tathāgata’s head, it is adorned with Jambūnada gold and Indra’s net, and spreads the cloud of pure light that pervades the dharma realm. Thought after thought, in its radiance appear Buddhas and Bodhisattvas, assembled in bodhimaṇḍas in all worlds. This is the thirty-second characteristic. 
“Buddha-Sons, the crown of a Tathāgata’s head is adorned with these thirtytwo characteristics of a great man. 
**** The Other Sixty-five Characteristics of a Great Man **** “Buddha-Sons, between a Tathāgata’s eyebrows is a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of radiance that pervades the dharma realm. It is adorned with flowers made of jewels, and emits vast jewel-colored radiance, as lucid and pure as that of the sun and the moon. Its radiance illuminates all worlds in the ten directions, reveals all Buddhas, and emits wonderful sounds to expound the Dharma ocean. This is the thirty-third characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s eyes have a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of commanding universal sight. It is adorned with wonderful treasures, and its pure and lucid light of treasures sees all things, hindrance free. This is the thirty-fourth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s nose has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of all wisdom and transcendental powers. It is adorned with pure wonderful treasures and wrapped in treasure-colored light. In its radiance appear innumerable manifested Buddhas, seated on lotus flowers made of treasures. It visits all worlds to expound to all Bodhisattvas and all sentient beings the ocean of the inconceivable Dharma of Buddhas. 
It is adorned with wonderful treasures in myriad colors, and formed by His past roots of goodness. His wide-ranging and far-reaching tongue covers the oceans of all worlds. When a Tathāgata smiles in gladness, He emits the light of jewels, illuminating dharma realms in the ten directions, enabling all minds to cool. In its radiance gloriously appear all past, present, and future Buddhas, who emit vast and wondrous tones that pervade all worlds and abide for countless kalpas. 
The top of His tongue is flat and adorned with treasures. It emits treasure-colored light, as perfect as that emitted from between His eyebrows. Its light illuminates all Buddha Lands, which are made of dust particles, and have no self-essence. In its radiance appear innumerable Buddhas, voicing wondrous tones to expound the entire Dharma. 
“The tip of a Tathāgata’s tongue has a characteristic of a great man, called the radiant cloud that illuminates the dharma realm. It is adorned with the wish-fulfilling king of jewels, and constantly emits golden flames, in which appears the ocean of all Buddhas. It rumbles wonderful tones that pervade countless worlds. Each tone contains all tones that expound the wondrous Dharma to delight the hearers, enabling them to ponder its teachings for kalpas and not to forget them. 
“The tip of a Tathāgata’s tongue has another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that illuminates the dharma realm. It is adorned with the king of gems, and emits wonderful radiance, in myriad colors, that pervades countless worlds in the ten directions and purifies everything in the dharma realm. In its radiance appear innumerable Buddhas and Bodhisattvas, who each voice wondrous tones to impart various teachings, and all Bodhisattvas who hear and accept them. This is the thirty-ninth characteristic. 
“The roof of a Tathāgata’s mouth has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that displays the inconceivable dharma realm. It is adorned with aquamarine and Indra’s jewels. It spreads a cloud of pure light of scented lamps’ flames that pervades all dharma realms in the ten directions, displaying various transcendental powers and skillful means, and expounding in oceans of worlds the profound and inconceivable Dharma. This is the fortieth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s lower right teeth have a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of Buddha teeth. It is adorned with a swastika-shaped wheel made of jewels, and emits vast radiance, illuminating the dharma realm. In its radiance appear all Buddhas, who visit everywhere  in the ten directions to enlighten sentient beings. This is the forty-first characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s upper right teeth have a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of the Sumeru store of flames. It is adorned with a store of jewels, and emits the pure radiance of fragrant flames of diamond that pervades the dharma realm, displaying all Buddhas’ spiritual powers, and revealing Their pure bodhimaṇḍas in all worlds in the ten directions. This is the forty-second characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s lower left teeth have a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of jeweled lamps that illuminate all things everywhere. It is adorned with the fragrances of flowers made of treasures, and emits the pure radiance of the cloud of lamp flames that pervades all oceans of worlds. In its radiance appear all Buddhas, seated on lion thrones and surrounded by Bodhisattvas,  in the Lotus Flower Store. This is the fortythird characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s upper left teeth have a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that illuminates and reveals Tathāgatas. It is adorned with pure radiance, Jambūnada gold, jeweled nets, and flowers made of treasures, and releases orbs of great flames throughout the dharma realm. In the flames appear all Buddhas in the open sky, who use transcendental powers to dispense Dharma milk, Dharma lamps, and Dharma treasures, teaching and transforming all Bodhisattvas. This is the forty-fourth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s teeth have a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that displays radiance everywhere. Each space between His teeth is adorned with an ocean of splendors. When He smiles, it emits the radiance of jewel-colored flames that swirl clockwise, pervading the dharma realm, and uses Buddha words and tones to expound universally worthy actions. This is the forty-fifth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s lips have a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that reflects the light of all treasures. It emits vast radiance in the colors of Jambūnada gold, lotus flowers, and all treasures, illuminating and purifying the dharma realm. This is the forty-sixth characteristic. “A Tathāgata’s neck has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that illuminates all worlds. 
“A Tathāgata’s right shoulder has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of Buddhas’ great treasures. It emits radiance in the colors of lotus flowers and treasures, such as pure gold, forming a flaming web that illuminates all things everywhere in the dharma realm. In its radiance appear all Bodhisattvas. This is the forty-eighth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s right shoulder has another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of superb treasures that illuminate everywhere. Its colors are as pure as Jambūnada gold, and it emits the light of jewels that pervades the dharma realm. In its radiance appear all Bodhisattvas. This is the forty-ninth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s left shoulder has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of supreme light that illuminates the dharma realm. It is as well adorned as His crown and the area between His eyebrows. It emits the radiance of Jambūnada gold and treasures in the colors of lotus flowers, forming a web of great flames that pervades the dharma realm. In its radiance His spiritual powers are displayed. 
“A Tathāgata’s left shoulder has another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of pervasive radiance. It swirls clockwise, and is in the colors of Jambūnada gold, adorned with the king of gems. It emits the radiance of fragrant flames and flowers made of treasures that pervades the dharma realm. In its radiance appear all Buddhas and all pure worlds. 
“A Tathāgata’s left shoulder has another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that illuminates everywhere. It swirls clockwise in a subtle and majestic way, and spreads a cloud of Buddha-lamp flames, its pure radiance pervading the dharma realm. In its radiance appear all Bodhisattvas with various wonderful adornments. This is the fifty-second characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s chest has a characteristic of a great man, the mark of a swastika, called the cloud of the auspicious ocean. It is adorned with flowers made of treasures, and releases various orbs of flames in the colors of all treasures, pervading and purifying the dharma realm. It also emits wonderful sounds to expound the Dharma ocean. This is the fifty-third characteristic. 
“To the right of a Tathāgata’s auspicious mark  is a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that displays radiance. It is adorned with Indra’s net, and releases orbs of vast radiance that pervade the dharma realm. In its radiance appear innumerable Buddhas. This is the fiftyfourth characteristic. 
“To the right of a Tathāgata’s auspicious mark is another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that reveals Tathāgatas. It is adorned with jeweled crowns worn by Bodhisattvas, and emits vast radiance, illuminating and purifying all worlds in the ten directions. In its radiance appear past, present, and future Buddhas, seated in Their bodhimaṇḍas, displaying spiritual powers everywhere and expounding the Dharma ocean. This is the fifty-fifth characteristic. 
“To the right of a Tathāgata’s auspicious mark is another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of flowers opening. It is adorned with flowers made of treasures, and emits the pure radiance of the flames of scented lamps. Shaped like a lotus flower, this radiance pervades all worlds. This is the fifty-sixth characteristic. 
“To the right of a Tathāgata’s auspicious mark is another characteristic of a great man, called the delightful golden cloud. It is adorned with all treasures from the mind-king’s store, and with the king of gems. It emits pure radiance, illuminating the dharma realm, revealing the vast, radiant treasure store of gems, like the Buddha-eye. This is the fifty-seventh characteristic. 
“To the right of a Tathāgata’s auspicious mark is another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of the Buddha ocean. It is adorned with aquamarine, scented lamps, and splendid chaplets. It emits throughout the open sky the pure radiance of the king of gems and the great flames of scented lamps, illuminating the dharma realm. In its radiance appear all assemblies in bodhimaṇḍas. 
“To the left of a Tathāgata’s auspicious mark is a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that displays radiance. It is adorned with innumerable Bodhisattvas seated on lotus flowers made of treasures, and emits the radiance of various interweaving flames of the king of gems, purifying the ocean of all dharma realms. In its radiance appear innumerable Buddhas, voicing wonderful tones to expound the Dharma. This is the fifty-ninth characteristic. 
“To the left of a Tathāgata’s auspicious mark is another characteristic of a great man, called the radiant cloud that displays radiance pervading the dharma realm. It is adorned with an ocean of jewels, and emits radiance everywhere in all worlds. In its radiance appear all Bodhisattvas. This is the sixtieth characteristic. 
“To the left of a Tathāgata’s auspicious mark is another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of universal excellence. It is adorned with sunlight, the king of gems, and chaplets of treasures, and emits vast, flaming radiance that pervades oceans of worlds in the dharma realm. In its radiance appear all worlds, all Tathāgatas, and all sentient beings. This is the sixtyfirst characteristic. 
“To the left of a Tathāgata’s auspicious mark is another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of wonderful sounds of turning the Dharma wheel. It is adorned with the pure, fragrant wicks of all Dharma lamps, and emits vast radiance that pervades the dharma realm. In its radiance appears the ocean of all Buddhas’ appearances and the ocean of minds. This is the sixty-second characteristic. 
“To the left of a Tathāgata’s auspicious mark is another characteristic of a great man, called the splendid cloud. It is adorned with the ocean of all past, present, and future Buddhas, and emits pure radiance that adorns all Buddha Lands. In its radiance appear all Buddhas and Bodhisattvas in worlds in the ten directions and what they do. This is the sixty-third characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s right hand has another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of reflections that illuminate. It is adorned with aquamarine , Indra’s sapphire , and flowers made of jewels, and emits vast radiance, illuminating all worlds in the ten directions, such as those contained in the Lotus Flower Store and the Jewel Store, where Bodhisattvas reside. In its radiance appear innumerable Buddhas, who in Their pure dharma bodies sit under bodhi trees and shake all worlds in the ten directions. This is the sixty-fifth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s right hand has another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of chaplets of lamp flames that adorn everywhere. It is adorned with solar treasures, and emits vast radiance, forming a web of manifestations. In its radiance appear Bodhisattvas, who wear jeweled crowns and expound the ocean of actions. This is the sixty-sixth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s right hand has another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that displays all jewels. It is adorned with flaming lotus flower lamps, and emits the ocean-store radiance that pervades the dharma realm. In its radiance appear innumerable Buddhas, seated on lotus flowers. This is the sixty-seventh characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s right hand has another characteristic of a great man, called the radiant cloud. It is adorned with an ocean of flames of jewels, and emits the pure radiance of flames of treasures, fragrances, and flowers, that pervades the web of all worlds. In its radiance appear Buddhas’ bodhimaṇḍas. This is the sixty-eighth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s left hand has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of pure aquamarine lamps. It is adorned with the wonderful colors of the treasure ground, and emits a Tathāgata’s golden radiance. Thought after thought, it manifests all superb adornments. This is called the sixty-ninth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s left hand has another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of sounds of wisdom lamps in all worlds. It is adorned with Indra’s net and with flowers made of diamond, and emits the pure radiance of Jambūnada gold, illuminating all worlds in the ten directions. This is the seventieth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s left hand has another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that abides in the radiance of lotus flowers made of treasures. It is adorned with wonderful lotus flowers made of treasures, and emits vast radiance, like that of the Sumeru lamp, illuminating all worlds in the ten directions. This is the seventy-first characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s left hand has another characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that illuminates everywhere in the dharma realm. It is adorned with wonderful things, such as jeweled chaplets, jeweled orbs, jeweled vases, and Indra’s net. It emits vast radiance, illuminating all worlds in the ten directions. In its radiance appear all dharma realms, all oceans of worlds, and all Tathāgatas, seated on lotus flowers. 
This is the seventy-second characteristic. “A Tathāgata’s right fingers have a characteristic of a great man, called the swirling cloud that displays oceans of kalpas and worlds. It is adorned with the store of the water moon’s flames, the king of gems, and all flowers made of treasures, and emits vast radiance that pervades the dharma realm. Its radiance constantly emits wondrous sounds that pervade worlds in the ten directions. 
This is the seventy-third characteristic. “A Tathāgata’s left fingers have a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that abides in all treasures. It is adorned with diamond and Indra’s sapphire, and emits the radiance of the king of gems that pervades the dharma realm. In its radiance appear all Buddhas and Bodhisattvas. 
“A Tathāgata’s right palm has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that shines. It is adorned with the king of gems and the jeweled wheel with a thousand spokes, and emits the light of treasures, swirling clockwise, pervading the dharma realm. In its radiance appear all Buddhas, each with glowing body light, expounding the Dharma to deliver sentient beings and purify the world. This is the seventy-fifty characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s left palm has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of flaming orbs that display increasing numbers of bodhimaṇḍas in the dharma realm. It is adorned with sunlight, the king of gems, and the wheel with a thousand spokes, and emits vast radiance that pervades all oceans of worlds. In its radiance appear all Bodhisattvas, each expounding the ocean of universally worthy actions, entering all Buddha Lands, and enlightening innumerable sentient beings. This is the seventy-sixth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s right buttock has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of chaplets of jeweled lamps that illuminate everywhere. It is adorned with jewels, and emits the radiance of inconceivable flames that pervades all dharma realms in the ten directions. It has the same appearance as that of the open sky or the dharma realm, but can manifest all appearances. Each appearance is a display of Buddhas’ command of miraculous manifestations. 
“A Tathāgata’s left buttock has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that displays the radiance of oceans of dharma realms that pervades the open sky. Like a lotus flower, it is adorned with pure treasures, and spreads a web of radiance, illuminating everywhere in all dharma realms in the ten directions. In its radiance appear a cloud of various images. This is the seventy-ninth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s right thigh, in proportion to His calf, has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of universal manifestations. It is adorned with jewels in diverse colors, and emits the radiance of the wondrous Dharma, like the flames of jewels. In one thought it manifests an ocean of ways in which all treasure kings  walk. This is the eightieth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s left thigh has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that manifests the ocean of all Buddhas’ countless characteristics. It abides in the ocean of all treasures as its adornment. As it widely travels, it emits pure radiance, illuminating all sentient beings, inspiring them to seek the unsurpassed Buddha Dharma. This is the eighty-first characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s right calf, round, straight, and well able to walk, like that of an aiṇeya , has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of all open skies and dharma realms. It is adorned with radiant treasures, and emits pure radiance in the colors of Jambūnada gold, illuminating everywhere in all Buddha Lands. It emits loud sounds that shake everything, manifests all Buddha Lands, and abides in the open sky, adorning it with flames of treasures. In its radiance appear innumerable Bodhisattvas. 
“A Tathāgata’s left calf, like that of an aiṇeya , has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that adorns oceans. In the color of pure gold, it can go everywhere in all Buddha Lands. It emits the pure radiance of all treasures that pervades the dharma realm and does Buddha work. This is the eighty-third characteristic. 
This is the eightyfifth characteristic. “The top of a Tathāgata’s right foot has a characteristic of a great man, called the radiant cloud that illuminates all things everywhere. It is adorned with all treasures, and emits vast radiance that pervades the dharma realm and reveals all Buddhas and Bodhisattvas. This is the eighty-sixth characteristic. 
“The top of a Tathāgata’s left foot has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that reveals all Buddhas. It is adorned with a treasure store of jewels, and emits the radiance of treasures. Thought after thought, throughout future kalpas without interruption, in its radiance appear all Buddhas and Their transcendental powers, manifestations, Dharma oceans, and bodhimaṇḍas. This is the eighty-seventh characteristic. 
“Between a Tathāgata’s right toes is a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that illuminates the ocean of all dharma realms. It has various adornments, such as the Sumeru lamp, the king of gems, and the flaming wheel with a thousand spokes, and emits vast radiance that pervades oceans of worlds in all dharma realms in the ten directions. In its radiance appear all Buddhas’ various majestic appearances. This is the eighty-eighth characteristic. 
“Between a Tathāgata’s left toes is a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that displays the Buddha ocean. It is adorned with flowers made of jewels, fragrant flames, chaplets of lamps, and jeweled wheels of treasures. It constantly emits the pure radiance of an ocean of treasures that pervades the open sky in all worlds in the ten directions. In its radiance appear all Buddhas and Bodhisattvas, who have perfect voices and marks, such as the swastika, benefiting innumerable sentient beings. 
It constantly emits the radiance of a Tathāgata’s wonderful treasures. Its wonderful radiance pervades the dharma realm and looks the same everywhere, with no difference. In its radiance appear all Buddhas, seated in Their bodhimaṇḍas and expounding the wondrous Dharma. This is the ninetieth characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s left heel has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that emits wonderful sounds to expound the Dharma ocean. It is adorned with precious jewels from the ocean of manifestations, Sumeru flowers made of jewels, and aquamarine from the ocean of fragrant flames. It emits vast radiance that pervades the dharma realm. In its radiance appear Buddhas displaying Their spiritual powers. 
“A Tathāgata’s right ankle has a characteristic of a great man, called the radiant cloud that displays all adornments. Wonderful and majestic, it is made of treasures, and emits pure radiance in the colors of Jambūnada gold, illuminating all dharma realms in the ten directions. Its radiance is like a huge cloud covering all Buddhas’ bodhimaṇḍas. This is the ninety-second characteristic. 
“A Tathāgata’s left ankle has a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that displays all physical appearances. It is adorned with the store of lunar flames, solar treasures, and Indra’s sapphire. Thought after thought, it goes to oceans of dharma realms, and emits the radiance of jeweled lamps’ fragrant flames that pervades the entire dharma realm. This is the ninety-third characteristic. 
“The edges of a Tathāgata’s right foot have a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of the universal store. It is adorned with diamond and Indra’s sapphire, and emits the radiance of treasures that pervades the open sky. In its radiance appear all Buddhas in Their bodhimaṇḍas, seated on lion thrones adorned with the king of gems. This is the ninety-fourth characteristic. 
“The edges of a Tathāgata’s left foot have a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud of pervasive radiance in the dharma realm. It is adorned with flowers made of jewels, and emits vast radiance that pervades the dharma realm, revealing that all dharmas are equal in the one_appearance . In its radiance appear Buddhas and Bodhisattvas, displaying their command of spiritual powers and voicing wonderful tones to expound the endless Dharma Doors in the dharma realm. This is the ninety-fifth characteristic. 
“The tips of a Tathāgata’s right toes have a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that displays adornments. It is adorned with lovely and pure Jambūnada gold, and emits vast radiance that pervades all dharma realms in the ten directions. In its radiance appear all Buddhas and Bodhisattvas, and Their endless Dharma ocean, various virtuous works, transcendental powers, and miraculous manifestations. This is the ninety-sixth characteristic. 
“The tips of a Tathāgata’s left toes have a characteristic of a great man, called the cloud that displays all Buddhas’ miraculous manifestations. It is adorned with a Buddha’s inconceivable radiance, lunar flames, pervasive fragrance, and the wheel of jewel flames. It emits pure radiance in the colors of treasures that pervades oceans of worlds. In its radiance appear all Buddhas and Bodhisattvas, expounding Buddhas’ Dharma ocean. 
“Buddha-Sons, Vairocana Tathāgata has the characteristics of a great man that are as numerous as the dust particles in ten oceans of worlds in the Lotus Flower Store. 
Each of His body parts is adorned with treasures and wonderful characteristics. 
**** Chapter 35 – The Radiant Virtues of a Tathāgata’s Secondary Characteristics **** **** A Tathāgata’s Secondary Characteristics **** At that time the World-Honored One told Jewel Hand  Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha, has a secondary characteristic called the perfect king. 
The vast radiance it emits is called the glowing magnificence, which has seven million asaṁkhyeya beams of light as its retinue. 
“Buddha-Son, when I was a Bodhisattva in the palace of Tuṣita Heaven , I emitted vast radiance called the radiance banner king, illuminating worlds as numerous as the dust particles in ten Buddha Lands. 
When hell dwellers in those worlds encountered this radiance, they gained a respite from suffering, and acquired ten purities of their eyes, ears, noses, tongues, bodies, and minds. With great joy, they celebrated with exuberance. After death, they were reborn in Tuṣita Heaven. 
The drum in that heaven, called the most enjoyable, made sounds, telling them, ‘God-Sons, through restraining your minds, planting your roots of goodness in the places of Tathāgatas, and staying close to beneficent learned friends, and through Vairocana Bodhisattva’s great spiritual power, after you died in hell, you have been reborn in this heaven.’     “Buddha-Son, on each of this Bodhisattva’s soles is  a wheel with a thousand spokes, called the universal radiance king. 
It has a secondary characteristic called the perfect king, which constantly emits forty beams of light. 
One of them is called the pure virtue, which can illuminate worlds as numerous as the dust particles in a koṭi nayuta Buddha Lands. It enables sentient beings to come to  maturity according to their karmic actions and various preferences. 
“When sentient beings in extreme pain in Avīci_Hell encountered this radiance, after death they were reborn in Tuṣita Heaven. 
Then they heard the sounds of the celestial drum, telling them, ‘Very good, very good. 
God-Sons, Vairocana Bodhisattva has entered the Taint-Free Samādhi. You should salute him.’     “When these god-sons heard the celestial drum’s instruction, they thought, ‘How extraordinary! 
Why did it emit such mysterious sounds?’ **** Teachings of the Celestial Drum **** “Then the celestial drum told them, ‘My sounds are produced by the power of your roots of goodness. 
God-Sons, when I say “I,” I have no attachment to a self or its belongings. 
It is the same with all Buddhas. When They say that They are Buddhas, They have no attachment to a self or its belongings. 
GodSons, my sounds do not come from east, south, west, or north, nor the four intermediate directions, nor above or below. 
Likewise, receiving karmic requitals or attaining Buddhahood does not come from the ten directions. 
GodSons, for example, when you were in hell, hell and your hell bodies did not come from the ten directions, but from your evil karmas and the bondage of your ignorance. Your bodies born in hell had no roots and did not come from anywhere. 
“‘God-Sons, Vairocana Bodhisattva emitted vast radiance because of the power of his virtues, and his radiance did not come from the ten directions. 
God-Sons, likewise my sounds, the sounds of the celestial drum, do not come from the ten directions. I make these pure sounds and display command of spiritual powers through the power of samādhi, roots of goodness, and the virtues of prajñā-pāramitā. 
God-Sons, as analogy, atop Mount Sumeru, the king of mountains, is Trayastriṁśa Heaven . Its splendid palaces contain various pleasurable things, which do not come from the ten directions. 
Likewise my sounds, the sounds of the celestial drum, do not come from the ten directions. 
“‘God-Sons, suppose worlds as numerous as the dust particles in a koṭi nayuta Buddha Lands are pulverized into dust particles. As I expound the Dharma to sentient beings as numerous as these dust particles, according to their preferences, and make them happy, I never tire of it, cringe, become proud, or abandon self-restraint. 
God-Sons, it is the same with Vairocana Bodhisattva, who abides in the Taint-Free Samādhi. From the excellent mark on his right palm, he emits radiance, displaying command of immeasurable spiritual powers. Even voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas cannot know them, much less sentient beings. 
“‘God-Sons, you should visit that Bodhisattva, attend him and make offerings to him. Do not be greedy for, or even attached to, pleasurable objects of the five_desires, because attachment to the pleasures of the five desires hinders your roots of goodness. 
God-Sons, as an analogy, when the fire at the end of a kalpa blazes, even Mount Sumeru is burnt away, leaving nothing behind. 
Likewise greed and desire fetter the mind and keep it from thinking of Buddhas. 
“‘God-Sons, you should acknowledge kindness received and requite it. 
GodSons, those who do not requite kindness die accidental deaths and are reborn in hell. 
God-Sons, when you were in hell, you received light shining upon you, so you left there and were reborn here. 
You now should transfer  to expanding your roots of goodness. 
“‘God-Sons, as I, the celestial drum, neither male nor female, can do immeasurable, boundless, and inconceivable things, likewise you god-sons and goddess-daughters, neither male nor female, can enjoy various splendid celestial palaces and gardens. 
As I, the celestial drum, have neither birth nor death, so too  form, sensory reception, perception, mental processing, and consciousness have neither birth nor death. 
If you can understand these meanings, know that you will enter the Samādhi of the Reliance-Free Seal.’     “When these god-sons heard these words, they gained what they never before had. They forthwith manifested 10,000 flower clouds, 10,000 fragrance clouds, 10,000 music clouds, 10,000 banner clouds, 10,000 canopy clouds, and 10,000 praise clouds. 
After manifesting these clouds, they went to the palace where Vairocana Bodhisattva was staying, respectfully joined their palms, and stood on one side. They wanted to behold him, but could not see him. 
Then a god-son said, ‘Vairocana Bodhisattva has left here and been born in the human world, into King śuddhodana’s family. Riding in a sandalwood tower, he has entered Queen Māyā’s womb.’     “Then these god-sons saw with their god-eyes that this Bodhisattva was in the human world, in King śuddhodana’s family, and that Brahma gods and desirerealm gods attended him and made offerings to him. 
They thought, ‘We should go to greet this Bodhisattva and ask him about his daily life, and should not have even one thought of attachment to our celestial palace.’     “When these god-sons, each with a retinue of ten nayuta, were about to descend to Jambudvīpa, the celestial drum made sounds, telling them, ‘God-Sons, this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva did not die here in order to be born there. 
Using transcendental powers, he enables sentient beings to see him according to the capacities of their minds. 
God-Sons, as I, who cannot be seen by  eyes, can emit sounds, likewise this Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva in the Taint-Free Samādhi , who cannot be seen by  eyes, can manifest his births everywhere, free from differentiation, pride, and attachment. 
God-Sons, you should activate the anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi mind, purify your minds, carry out good deportments, and remove all hindrances caused by your karmas, afflictions, requitals, and wrong views. 
Using your bodies, heads, tongues, and good body, voice, and mind karmas, each as numerous as sentient beings in the dharma realm, you should remove all hindrances by repenting of your sins.’     “When these god-sons heard its words, they gained what they never before had. 
With great joy in their hearts, they asked, ‘How does a BodhisattvaMahāsattva repent of and expunge his sins?’     “Through the power of this Bodhisattva’s samādhi and roots of goodness, the celestial drum made sounds, answering them, ‘God-Sons, this Bodhisattva knows that one’s karmas do not come from east, south, west, or north, nor the four intermediate directions, nor above or below. 
They arise from inverted views and have no abode. 
He definitely sees this with clarity, without any doubt. 
God-Sons, as I, the celestial drum, expound karmas, requitals, actions, precepts, samādhis, joy, and nirvāṇa, likewise Buddhas and Bodhisattvas expound a self and its belongings, sentient beings, greed, anger, delusion, and various karmas. 
However, a self and its belongings, the six life-paths, karmas, and karmic requitals are nonexistent. They cannot be found if one seeks in the ten directions. 
“‘God-Sons, as an analogy, my sounds, with neither birth nor death, cannot be heard by gods who do evil. They can hear only wake-up calls from hell. 
Likewise all karmas have neither birth nor death. 
God-Sons, my sounds, the sounds of the celestial drum, are endless and uninterrupted for countless kalpas, and their comings and goings cannot be captured. God-Sons, if there is neither coming nor going, there is neither perpetuity nor cessation. 
No Buddha ever expounds perpetuity or cessation except when using it as a skillful means to bring sentient beings to  maturity. 
God-Sons, for example, my sounds follow the minds of sentient beings in countless worlds, enabling them to hear me. 
Likewise, all Buddhas follow the minds of sentient beings, enabling them to see Them. 
“‘God-Sons, suppose there is a mirror called the reflector. It is pure and clear, and as huge as ten worlds. 
In it appear the reflections of all mountains, rivers, and sentient beings, including hell dwellers, animals, and hungry ghosts. 
God-Sons, what is your opinion? 
Can these reflections enter into the mirror and exit from it?’     “They answered, ‘No.’     “‘God-Sons, likewise all karmas come from nowhere and go to nowhere, though they bring karmic requitals. 
God-Sons, as a magician can fool people’s eyes, so too can karmas. 
If you know this, it is a true repentance, which purifies all sins.’ **** Benefits Received from Hearing the Teachings **** “When this teaching was pronounced, god-sons in Tuṣita Heavens in worlds as numerous as the dust particles in 100,000 koṭi nayuta Buddha Lands acquired endurance in realizing that dharmas have no birth; innumerable, asaṁkhyeya, inconceivable god-sons in the six_desire_heavens activated the anuttara-samyaksaṁbodhi mind; all goddess-daughters in the six desire heavens abandoned female form and assumed male form, and resolved to attain the unsurpassed bodhi. 
“When these god-sons heard Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s vast transference , they ascended to the tenth Bodhisattva ground and were adorned with powers and samādhis. By doing pure body, voice, and mind karmas as numerous as sentient beings, they repented of their grave sins and removed all hindrances. Then they saw lotus flowers, made of the seven treasures and as numerous as the dust particles in 100,000 koṭi nayuta Buddha Lands. 
On each flower was a Bodhisattva, sitting cross-legged, emitting vast radiance. 
Every secondary mark on those Bodhisattvas emitted beams of light as numerous as sentient beings. 
In the radiance appeared Buddhas as numerous as sentient beings, sitting cross-legged, expounding the Dharma according to sentient beings’ minds, without displaying even a little power of the TaintFree Samādhi. “Using those lotus flowers, these god-sons made an offering to Vairocana Tathāgata, and a cloud of lotus flowers as numerous as sentient beings was emitted from every pore on their bodies. 
As they showered the flowers upon Him, all of them abided in His body, and fragrant clouds rained down fragrances everywhere in worlds as numerous as the dust particles in countless Buddha Lands. 
Those whose bodies were suffused with the fragrance experienced peace and joy as does a bhikṣu who has entered the fourth dhyāna, and all their karma-hindrances were removed. Those who smelled the fragrance realized that sentient beings have 500 internal afflictions and 500 external afflictions, both arising from  sense objects: 
With this realization, they fully developed pure roots of goodness with the commanding radiance of the fragrance banner cloud. 
Those who saw this cloud canopy planted roots of goodness as numerous as the sands of the Ganges, as did Pure Gold Web Wheel-Turning King. 
**** Abilities of the Pure Gold Web Wheel-Turning King **** “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva who abides in the position of this Wheel-Turning King teaches and transforms sentient beings in worlds as numerous as the dust particles in 100,000 koṭi nayuta Buddha Lands. 
Buddha-Son, for example, Moon Wisdom-Knowledge Tathāgata in the World of Clear Mirror widely recounts events in His past lives to bhikṣus, bhikṣuṇīs, upāsakas, and upāsikās from countless worlds, who come to Him in their manifested bodies to hear the Dharma, never interrupted by even one thought. 
If sentient beings hear this Buddha’s name, they definitely will be reborn in His Buddha Land. 
It is similar for a Bodhisattva who abides in the position of Pure Gold Web Wheel-Turning King. Those who encounter his radiance even briefly will ascend to the tenth Bodhisattva ground because of the power of their roots of goodness planted in their past lives. 
“Buddha-Son, those who have attained the first dhyāna can see, even before death, all the palaces in Brahma heavens and experience the peace and bliss in the Brahma world. 
So too can those who have attained dhyāna at other levels. 
A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in the position of Pure Gold Web WheelTurning King emits pure radiance from his jeweled topknot. 
If sentient beings encounter this radiance, they will ascend to the tenth Bodhisattva ground, acquire immeasurable radiant wisdom, and acquire ten pure eyes, ten pure minds, countless profound samādhis, and pure physical eyes. “Buddha-Son, suppose someone pulverizes a koṭi nayuta Buddha Lands into dust particles. Then he pulverizes into dust particles Buddha Lands as numerous as those dust particles. 
Holding these dust particles in his left hand, he travels east. Each time he passes worlds in the number of these dust particles, he drops a dust particle. He continues east until he finishes all these dust particles. Then he does the same, traveling south, west, north, in the four intermediate directions, above, and below. 
Suppose all worlds in the ten directions , whether or not they have been hit by a dust particle, are merged into one Buddha Land. 
Jewel Hand, what is your opinion? 
Is this immense and immeasurable Buddha Land conceivable?”     “No, this Buddha Land, immense, immeasurable, rare, and extraordinary, is inconceivable. 
However, it would be even more rare and extraordinary if sentient beings could elicit faith and achieve understanding after hearing this analogy.”     The Buddha said, “Jewel Hand, indeed, indeed it is as you say. 
If there are good men and good women who elicit faith after hearing this analogy, upon them I will bestow the prophecy that they will definitely attain anuttara-samyaksaṁbodhi and acquire the unsurpassed Tathāgata wisdom. 
“Jewel Hand, suppose someone pulverizes into dust particles worlds as numerous as the dust particles in 1,000 koṭi Buddha Lands, each the size of the immense Buddha Land just described. As in the preceding analogy, he drops off all these dust particles one by one, and merges all Buddha Lands  into one Buddha Land. Then he repeats this process eighty times. 
A Bodhisattva with pure karmic requitals, in one thought, can clearly see with his physical eye the dust particles in all such immense Buddha Lands. He also can see Buddhas as numerous as the dust particles in 100 koṭi vast Buddha Lands, just as the pure radiance of a crystal mirror illuminates worlds as numerous as the dust particles in ten Buddha Lands. 
Buddha-Son, all  arise from Pure Gold Web Wheel-Turning King’s profound samādhi, virtuous works, and roots of goodness.” *** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 48 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  *** **** Notes ****     1. 
***** **** Chapter 36 – Universally Worthy Actions **** At that time Samantabhadra Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva told the other Bodhisattvas in the assembly, “Buddha-Sons, what has just been revealed according to sentient beings’ capacities is a brief description of a small part of a Tathāgata’s state. 
Buddha-Bhagavāns appear in worlds because sentient beings have no wisdom, do evil, imagine a self and its belongings, have attachment to their bodies, hold inverted views, harbor doubts, make differentiations, are driven by their afflictions, and drift in the stream of birth and death, far away from the Tathāgata path. 
**** Anger Causing Hindrances to Bodhi **** “Buddha-Sons, I do not see even one fault as severe as a Bodhisattva getting angry with other Bodhisattvas. 
Because, Buddha-Sons, if a Bodhisattva gets angry with other Bodhisattvas, he opens the door of a million hindrances to bodhi. 
“What are these one million hindrances? 
“Moreover, not practicing a Bodhisattva’s equal almsgiving leads to the hindrance of inability to relinquish anything; not observing Tathāgatas’ precepts leads to the hindrance of violating the precepts; not developing endurance  leads to these hindrances: 
delusion, anger, and hurtful behavior; not making a Bodhisattva’s energetic progress leads to the hindrance of indolence; not attaining samādhi leads to the hindrance of a chaotic mind; not practicing prajñā-pāramitā leads to these hindrances: 
evil wisdom, inability to determine wisely what is right or wrong, no skillful means to deliver sentient beings, inability to observe a Bodhisattva’s wisdom, and inability to know a Bodhisattva’s ways to achieve liberation. 
“Moreover, not acquiring a Bodhisattva’s ten vast eyes leads to the hindrance of having eyes like those born blind; not hearing the hindrance-free Dharma leads to the hindrance of having a mouth like a dumb goat’s; not being equipped with the excellent marks  leads to the hindrance to the sense of smell; inability to comprehend sentient beings’ words leads to the hindrance to the sense of taste; despising sentient beings leads to the hindrance to the sense of touch; allowing the mind to rampage leads to the hindrance to the mind. 
“Moreover, doing any of the three evil karmas  leads to the hindrance of  body karmas. 
Constantly committing any of the four faults leads to the hindrance of  voice karmas. 
Harboring greed, anger, and wrong views leads to the hindrance of  mind karmas. 
the hindrance of seeking the Dharma with a thieving mind; the hindrance of turning away from the Bodhisattva state; the hindrance of cringing from a Bodhisattva’s bold valor; the hindrance of being indolent on a Bodhisattva’s liberation path; the hindrance of giving up a Bodhisattva’s radiant wisdom door; the hindrance of becoming too weak to have a Bodhisattva’s power of mindfulness; the hindrance of inability to retain a Tathāgata’s teachings; the hindrance of inability to stay on the Bodhisattva Way, which can end his rebirths in the Three_Realms_of_Existence; the hindrance of inability to train on the indestructible Bodhisattva Way; the hindrance of seeking the right position  of riders of the Two_Vehicles; the hindrance of turning away from families of past, present, and future Buddhas and Bodhisattvas. 
“Buddha-Sons, if a Bodhisattva gets angry with other Bodhisattvas, he opens the door of a hundred million hindrances. 
Because, Buddha-Sons, I do not see even one fault as severe as a Bodhisattva getting angry with other Bodhisattvas. 
**** Universally Worthy Actions **** “Therefore, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who wants to complete Bodhisattva actions quickly should diligently practice ten dharmas. 
What are these ten? 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in these ten dharmas has ten purities. 
What are these ten? 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in these ten purities has ten kinds of vast wisdom-knowledge . 
What are these ten? 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in these ten kinds of wisdom-knowledge sees ten entrances. 
What are these ten? 
All worlds enter the tip of one hair; the tip of one hair enters all worlds. 
All sentient beings’ bodies enter one body; one body enters all sentient beings’ bodies. 
An ineffable number of kalpas enter one thought; one thought enters an ineffable number of kalpas. 
The teachings of all Buddhas enter one teaching; one teaching enters the teachings of all Buddhas. 
An ineffable number of sensory fields enter one sensory field; one sensory field enters an ineffable number of sensory fields. 
An ineffable number of faculties enter one faculty; one faculty enters an ineffable number of faculties. 
All faculties enter one non-faculty; one non-faculty enters all faculties. 
All perceptions enter one perception; one perception enters all perceptions. 
All sounds of words enter the sound of one word; the sound of one word enters the sounds of all words. 
The three time frames  enter one time frame; one time frame enters all three time frames. 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who has seen these ten entrances abides in ten superb minds. 
What are these ten? 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in these ten superb minds has Buddhas’ ten skillful means. 
What are these ten? 
These are the ten. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who has heard these teachings  should resolve to accept and retain them with respect. 
Because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who retains these teachings will, with a little effort, quickly attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi and acquire the entire Buddha Dharma, which is the same as that of all past, present, and future Buddhas.” **** The Testimony of Other Bodhisattvas **** Then, through the Buddha’s spiritual power, as the way things naturally are, in the ten_directions, worlds as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands quaked in six different ways. 
The sky rained down, like clouds, all adornments, such as flowers, fragrances, powdered incense, garment canopies, banners, and jewels, that surpassed their celestial counterparts. It spread clouds that played music; clouds in which appeared images of Bodhisattvas; clouds in which appeared images of Tathāgatas; clouds that praised the ineffable goodness of Tathāgatas; clouds that emitted Tathāgata tones pervading the entire dharma realm; clouds that adorned ineffable worlds; clouds that ineffably fortified the bodhi mind; clouds that radiated ineffable light; clouds that expounded the Dharma through ineffable spiritual powers. 
It was in this world with four_continents, in the palace in the bodhimaṇḍa under the bodhi tree, that Bodhisattvas saw the Tathāgata attain samyak-saṁbodhi and expound this dharma , and the same transpired in all worlds in the ten directions. 
Then, through the Buddha’s spiritual power, as the way things naturally are, from the ten directions, beyond worlds as numerous as the dust particles in ten ineffable worlds, Bodhisattvas as numerous as the dust particles in ten Buddha Lands came to visit this world. Filling  the ten directions, they said , “Very good, very good! 
Buddha-Son, only you can expound this profound dharma of Buddha-Tathāgatas’ greatest vow to bestow the prophecy . 
All of us are called Samantabhadra. From the World of Universal Victory, where Universal Banner Command Tathāgata resides, we each came to visit this world. Through the Buddha’s spiritual power, we too expound this dharma everywhere. 
What we expound is the same as that expounded in this assembly, neither more nor less. 
Through the Buddha’s spiritual power, we came to this bodhimaṇḍa to testify for you. 
As we Bodhisattvas as numerous as the dust particles in ten Buddha Lands came to testify in this bodhimaṇḍa, we do the same in all worlds in the ten directions.”     Then Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, through the spiritual power of the Buddha and the power of his own roots of goodness, scanned everywhere in worlds in the ten directions throughout the dharma realm. 
He spoke in verse to teach Bodhisattva actions, to reveal the realm of Buddha bodhi, to reveal the realm of great vows, to account for the kalpas of all worlds, to describe Buddhas’ timely appearances, to explain that Their appearances to sentient beings with mature faculties enable them to make offerings , to affirm that Their appearances in worlds are never fruitless, to affirm that planted roots of goodness will definitely yield fruit, and to reveal that Bodhisattvas with great virtues assume appropriate forms to expound the Dharma to all sentient beings to enlighten them. All of you should rejoice And remove your  coverings. Single-mindedly listen with respect To Bodhisattva vows and actions. 
Past Bodhisattvas have become  Supreme lions among men. 
I will describe in an orderly manner Their practices, And reveal their kalpas, Worlds, and karmas, As well as those of the unsurpassed honored ones Who have appeared in the world. 
Past Buddhas Appeared in worlds because of Their great vows To benefit sentient beings and End their suffering. 
All Bodhisattvas,  lions among speakers, Ceaselessly train to Realize the equality of dharmas as taught by Buddhas And acquire the overall wisdom-knowledge. 
They see that in the past All lions among men Emitted a web of vast radiance, Illuminating everywhere  in the ten directions. 
They ponder, and make this vow: ‘I should become a lamp for the world, Acquire a Buddha’s virtues, Ten_Powers, and overall wisdom-knowledge. 
I should rescue and deliver All sentient beings Burning in greed, anger, and delusion, And end their suffering on evil life-paths.’ Having made this vow, Which is firm and never withdrawn, They take all Bodhisattva actions, And acquire the ten hindrance-free powers. 
Carrying out their vow, They train diligently, never regressing. Their actions are never false, and They become lions among speakers. 
In a worthy kalpa, A thousand Buddhas appear in the world, one at a time. 
I will describe in an orderly manner Their universal eyes. As it is this way in one worthy kalpa, So too it is in countless kalpas. I will also reveal in detail Future Buddhas’ actions. 
As they prevail in one Buddha Land, So too they prevail in countless Buddha Lands. I will now describe the actions of Future honored ones, who have the Ten Powers. 
One at a time, Buddhas appear in each world. According to Their names and vows, According to the prophecies They have received, According to their lifespans, According to the true Dharma they have carried out In pursuit of the hindrance-free bodhi, And according to  sentient beings They teach, They enable the true Dharma to remain in the world. 
According to the Buddha Lands and sentient beings They purify, They turn the Dharma wheel, Expounding the Dharma at the right times To purify sentient beings in an orderly manner. 
According to sentient beings’ karmas, Actions, and levels of faith and understanding, Whether high, middling, or low, They transform them, and make them train and learn. 
He always does universally worthy works To widely deliver sentient beings. 
His body karmas are hindrance free, His voice karmas are pure, and So are his mind karmas, Throughout his past, present, and future lives. 
A Bodhisattva trains in this way To complete walking the universally worthy path. He unveils the sun of pure wisdom, Illuminating everywhere in the dharma realm. 
Although future kalpas And worlds are ineffable, In one thought, he knows them all But does not differentiate them. 
A Bodhisattva who trains in this way can enter The supreme ground. I will briefly pronounce Such Bodhisattva works. 
His wisdom being boundless, He reaches a Buddha’s state. He can enter everywhere, And his actions never regress. 
Equipped with universally worthy wisdom, He fulfills his universally worthy vows. He acquires unsurpassed wisdom-knowledge, and I will describe his universally worthy actions. 
In a dust particle, He sees myriad worlds. If sentient beings heard this, They would be puzzled and go mad. 
As it is with one dust particle. So it is with all dust particles. It is inconceivable that Worlds enter one dust particle. 
Every dust particle contains worlds in the ten directions, In the past, present, and future. He knows and can differentiate among Countless worlds and among all life-paths. 
Every dust particle contains Countless kinds of Buddha Lands. Although their kinds are countless, He knows every one of them. 
He knows and can differentiate All things in the dharma realm, such as Their various features And their various kinds. 
He goes deep into the sphere of subtle wisdom-knowledge To differentiate among all worlds And clearly explain Their formation kalpas and destruction kalpas. 
He knows that kalpas can be shortened, Because past, present, and future are but one thought. He knows all processes and can differentiate them, Whether the same or not the same. 
He enters all worlds, Whether immense or not immense. One body contains countless worlds; One world contains countless bodies. 
He knows all worlds In the ten directions, and Their differences and Countless features. 
In the past, present, and future, There are countless worlds. Equipped with profound wisdom-knowledge, He knows their formations and destructions. 
This worthy and virtuous one knows deeply That the formations or destructions of Worlds in the ten directions Are ineffable. 
There are worlds with Various adornments. 
There are life-paths Purified by sentient beings’  karmas. 
There are worlds with Countless taints Resulting from sentient beings’  actions Driven by their afflictions. 
He enters these worlds, Whose numbers cannot be known. 
Although all worlds Enter one world, They are not merged into one, Nor are they jumbled. 
Some worlds face up or down; Some worlds are located high or low. All such differences are sentient beings’ perceptions, And he knows them all and can differentiate them all. 
Although immense worlds are Countless and boundless, He knows that many are one and One is many. 
Universally worthy Buddha-sons Can use universally worthy wisdom-knowledge To know the number of worlds, Though their number has no limit. 
They know that all worlds, Sentient beings, Buddhas, and dharmas In truth are manifestations. 
All worlds, Minute or immense, Bedecked with various adornments, Arise from karmas. 
Innumerable Buddha-sons, Who have trained well, enter the dharma realm, Displaying their command of transcendent powers Everywhere in worlds in the ten directions. 
Except for Buddhas, No one can finish saying, In kalpas as numerous as the number of sentient beings, The names of those worlds. 
As no one can finish saying, In countless kalpas, The various names of worlds and Their Tathāgatas, Much less can one describe the supreme wisdom-knowledge Contained in the Dharma of past, present, and future Buddhas, Which arises from the dharma realm And pervades the Tathāgata ground. 
uses his pure hindrance-free mindfulness And boundless hindrance-free wisdom To describe the dharma realm And arrive at the opposite shore. In one thought, he knows All past worlds, Minute or immense, With adornments brought by immeasurable karmas. 
In those worlds, lions among men Had done various kinds of training for Buddhahood, Attained samyak-saṁbodhi, And displayed the power of Their command. 
A Bodhisattva knows All future worlds in Countless successive kalpas, And all Buddhas who will appear there. 
He knows Their vows, actions, And states, And that They will train diligently To attain samyak-saṁbodhi. 
He knows Their assemblies, Lifespans, and the sentient beings They will deliver, As well as Their Dharma Doors, Through which They will turn the Dharma wheel to benefit multitudes. 
A Bodhisattva with this wisdom-knowledge Abides on the ground of universal worthy actions. He acquires illuminating wisdom That gives birth to all Buddhas. He knows that All present worlds Enter this one world And pervade the dharma realm. 
In these worlds, All present Buddhas Have achieved command of dharmas And acquired unimpeded_eloquence. 
He also knows Their assemblies, Pure Lands, and power to manifest in response , And ponders these things For countless koṭis of kalpas. 
He also knows The awesome spiritual power Of every World-Honored One, Tamer of Men, And His store of endless wisdom-knowledge. 
A Bodhisattva grows the hindrance-free eye, The hindrance-free ear, nose, and body, And the hindrance-free wide-ranging and far-reaching tongue, Delighting all sentient beings. 
He has the supreme hindrance-free mind, Which is vast, pure, And filled with wisdom, And knows the three time frames . 
Having learned well all manifestations, He manifests worlds, sentient beings, Time frames, taming of sentient beings, And his ultimate arrival on the opposite shore. 
Various differences in the world Are produced by one’s perceptions. Using a Buddha’s facilitation wisdom-knowledge, He clearly understands this. 
The number of Buddha assemblies is ineffable, and He appears in every assembly, Enabling all sentient beings to see Tathāgatas Deliver innumerable multitudes. 
A Bodhisattva knows that a Buddha’s profound wisdom Is like the sun rising in the world, And it appears in all worlds Without rest. 
He fully understands that worlds Are false names, without reality, and that Sentient beings and worlds Are like dreams, like reflections. 
He does not differentiate Dharmas in the world. His not making differentiations means that He does not even perceive differences. 
He understands that Immeasurable, countless kalpas are but one thought. He knows that thoughts are no thought, And this is the way he sees the world. 
In one thought, he passes Countless worlds Throughout countless kalpas, While remaining motionless in his original place. 
An ineffable number of kalpas Are but one moment, Without altering or shortening them. He fully understands the ultimate moment. 
The mind abides in the world; The world abides in the mind. 
Sentient beings, worlds, kalpas, Buddhas, and the Buddha Dharma Are equally Illusory manifestations in the dharma realm. 
He manifests countless bodies In worlds in the ten directions. He knows that a body is born from causes and conditions, And has no attachment to it. 
From the wisdom-knowledge of non-duality Appears a lion among men, Who has no attachment to non-duality, Because He knows that there is neither duality nor non-duality. 
A Bodhisattva knows that Dharmas are like mirages, like reflections, Like echoes, like dreams, Like illusions, like manifestations. 
Accordingly, he follows Buddhas’ footsteps And acquires universally worthy wisdom-knowledge, Illuminating everywhere in the profound dharma realm. 
Discarding all attachments to Worlds and sentient beings, He elicits great compassion and Purifies the world. 
A Bodhisattva constantly thinks of The wonderful teachings of the lion among speakers, Which are as pure as the open sky and Provide great skillful means. 
Seeing that the world is always deluded, He resolves to rescue and deliver all. His actions are always pure, Which prevail everywhere in the dharma realm. 
He who realizes the true reality of dharmas knows that Buddhas, Bodhisattvas, The Buddha Dharma, and worldly dharmas Are no different. 
A Tathāgata’s store of the dharma body Is everywhere in the world. Although it is in the world, It has no attachment to it. 
As an analogy, reflections in clear water Neither come nor go. 
Likewise, the dharma body Pervades the world. 
Free from afflictions and attachments, This body and its world are pure. It is as clear as the open sky Because dharmas have no birth. 
It is an endless body, With neither birth nor death. Neither permanent nor impermanent, It appears in the world. 
It enables Bodhisattvas to discard the wrong views, And reveals the right view that Dharma nature neither comes nor goes, And has no self and its belongings. 
As an analogy, a magician conjures Various things, Which come from nowhere And go to nowhere. 
An illusion has neither measure Nor no measure, But it can manifest measure or no measure To multitudes. 
With his mind in samādhi, A Bodhisattva develops roots of goodness, Which give birth to a Buddha, Who is beyond measure and no measure. 
Both measure and no measure are Deluded perceptions. He differentiates among all life-paths and Has no attachment to measure or no measure. 
The profound Dharma of Buddhas Is vast and abides in nirvāṇa. With immeasurable, profound wisdom-knowledge, He knows profound life-paths. 
A Bodhisattva is free from delusion, and His mind continues to be pure. Using transcendental powers, He skillfully delivers innumerable sentient beings. 
As he does so throughout the dharma realm, His mind has no attachment to anything. 
Although he abides in the true reality of dharmas, He does not enter parinirvāṇa. 
Throughout the dharma realm, He enlightens sentient beings. He knows the numbers of all dharmas and sentient beings, But has no attachment to them. He pours down the Dharma rain To water the world. 
Although thought after thought He attains true enlightenment in all worlds, He continues to train in Bodhisattva actions, Never regressing. 
He fully knows Various bodies in the world. 
Because he knows all bodies, He realizes his Buddha body. 
He knows all sentient beings, Kalpas, and worlds. All things in the ten boundless directions Are encompassed in the ocean of his wisdom-knowledge. 
Although sentient beings’ bodies are countless, He appears to every one of them. 
Although a Buddha’s body is boundless, A Bodhisattva clearly sees it. 
Praising Tathāgatas, who appear In one thought, Cannot be finished In countless kalpas. 
Buddhas who have appeared Enter parinirvāṇa everywhere. In one thought, Their countless relics  are distributed. 
In the future, Whoever seeks Buddha bodhi and Activates the immeasurable bodhi mind Will definitely acquire wisdom-knowledge. 
He who abides in taking universally worthy actions Knows all Tathāgatas Who appear in worlds In the past, present, and future. 
knows and differentiates Countless training grounds, Enters into the sphere of wisdom, And turns the no-regress Dharma wheel. 
His subtle and profound wisdom that Goes deep into a Tathāgata’s state And never regresses Is called the universally worthy wisdom. 
All unsurpassed honored ones Enter a Buddha’s state. Their training never regressing, They attain unsurpassed bodhi. 
Various karmas are accumulated Through perceptions In the immeasurable and boundless mind, and A Bodhisattva knows all of them equally well. 
Thought after thought, He knows all ineffable minds, Impure or pure, Still learning  or having nothing more to learn . 
He knows that the mind is neither dual nor non-dual, Neither impure nor pure, Nor a chaotic mixture, But that it arises from its perceptions. 
He clearly sees that All sentient beings Have various perceptions, Which form various worlds. 
Whoever uses such skillful means To train in the most excellent actions That arise from the Buddha Dharma Can be called a universally worthy one. 
Sentient beings have perceptions of Good and evil life-paths. Hence they are reborn in heaven Or in hell. 
A Bodhisattva observes the world, which is Formed by karmas and deluded perceptions. Because perceptions are endless, The world is immeasurable. 
All worlds are Manifestations of the web of perceptions. This illusory web is easy To enter in one thought. 
Eye, ear, nose, tongue, Body, and mind Are different according to worldly perceptions, But they equally can perceive sense objects. 
Every object of the eye Can be perceived by countless eyes. various appearances, Which are countless and ineffable, Perceptions  are no different, And arise without disorder. 
Everyone follows his own karmas To receive corresponding requitals. 
The universally worthy one has the immeasurable power To know them all. His great wisdom-knowledge Can fathom all eye objects. 
He can know and differentiate among All things in the world, As he trains in all actions, Never regressing. 
He knows all the words of Buddhas, Bodhisattvas, Sentient beings, and worlds, And all the words spoken In the past, present, and future. 
The future is the past; The present is the future. He clearly sees that The three time frames encompass one another. 
He uses countless ways To enlighten worlds. The limits of his wisdom-knowledge and skillful means Cannot be found. 
In his treatise Śrīmālā’s Treasure Cavern, Jizang . 15. See the phrases “still learning” and “nothing more to learn” defined in the glossary’s “voice-hearer_fruits.”  ***** **** Chapter 37a – A Tathāgata’s Appearance in the World **** **** The Buddha Empowers a Bodhisattva to Request Teachings **** At that time the World-Honored_One emitted from the white hair between His eyebrows vast radiance called the appearance of a Tathāgata, accompanied by a retinue of countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of beams of light. 
This radiance illuminated all worlds in the ten_directions throughout the domain of space and the dharma_realm. Ten times it circled  clockwise, displaying a Tathāgata’s immeasurable mastery, enlightening innumerable Bodhisattvas, shaking all worlds in the ten directions, ending the suffering on all evil life-paths, obscuring  all māra palaces, revealing all Buddha-Tathāgatas seated on bodhi seats and attaining samyaksaṁbodhi, and displaying all assemblies in Their bodhimaṇḍas. 
Having done these things, it returned, circled this assembly of Bodhisattvas clockwise, and entered the top of the head of the Bodhisattva called Wondrous Virtues Arising from Tathāgata Nature. 
Meanwhile, the huge multitude in this bodhimaṇḍa felt great and exuberant joy in body and mind. They thought, “How extraordinary! 
Now that the Tathāgata has emitted vast radiance, He definitely will expound the profound great Dharma.”     Then Wondrous Virtues Arising from Tathāgata Nature Bodhisattva bared his right shoulder, knelt on his right knee on his lotus flower seat, and joined his palms. Intent upon facing the Tathāgata, he spoke in verse: Great wisdom arising from the virtue of  true enlightenment, He masters all states, and arrives at the opposite shore as an equal of All past, present, and future Tathāgatas. Hence I now make reverent obeisance. 
Having realized that dharmas have no appearance, He displays His wondrous appearance in a sublime body. He emits a thousand beams of taint-free light, Entirely destroying the māra troops. 
Worlds in the ten directions are Shaken without exception, But not even one sentient being is terrified. 
Such is the awesome power of the Sugata. He abides in the dharma nature of equality As do the domain of space and the dharma realm. Although sentient beings are innumerable, He enables them all to end their evils and afflictions. 
After diligently training in ascetic practices for countless kalpas, He has attained unsurpassed bodhi. Having acquired hindrance-free wisdom-knowledge  of all things, He has become an equal of all Buddhas. 
This guiding teacher emits vast radiance And shakes worlds in the ten directions. After displaying immeasurable transcendental powers, His radiance returns and enters my head. 
Innumerable Bodhisattvas, who can learn well The definitive teachings, have assembled, Inspiring me to ask for teachings. Hence I now ask the Dharma King . 
The huge multitude in this assembly is pure, Well able to deliver the world. With wisdom, boundless and untainted, Such worthy elites have come to assemble. 
This honored guiding teacher benefits the world, His wisdom and vigor being immeasurable. He now illuminates this huge multitude with vast radiance, Enabling me to ask for  the unsurpassed Dharma. 
Who can truly describe The profound state of a Buddha? 
Who is the eldest son in the Buddha Dharma? 
I pray that the World-Honored One will tell us. 
**** The Buddha Empowers Samantabhadra Bodhisattva to Expound the Dharma **** Then the Tathāgata emitted from His mouth vast radiance called the fearless and hindrance free, accompanied by a retinue of 100,000 koṭi asaṁkhyeya beams of light. 
It illuminated everywhere in all worlds in the ten directions throughout the domain of space and the dharma realm. Ten times it circled  clockwise, displaying a Tathāgata’s various kinds of mastery, enlightening innumerable Bodhisattvas, shaking all worlds in the ten directions, ending the suffering on all evil life-paths, obscuring the radiance of all māra palaces, revealing all Buddha-Tathāgatas seated on bodhi seats and attaining samyaksaṁbodhi, and displaying all assemblies in Their bodhimaṇḍas. 
Having done these things, it returned, circled this assembly of Bodhisattvas clockwise, and entered Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s mouth. 
After this radiance had entered his mouth, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s body and lion throne became a hundredfold larger than their former size and the size of the other Bodhisattvas, but not that of the Tathāgata. 
Then Wondrous Virtues Arising from Tathāgata Nature Bodhisattva asked Samantabhadra Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, “Buddha-Son, the Buddha has delighted Bodhisattvas with these vast miraculous manifestations, but they are inconceivable and unknowable to the world. 
What is  this auspicious sign?”     Samantabhadra Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva answered, “Buddha-Son, in the past I saw that after Tathāgatas, also called Arhats and Samyak-Saṁbuddhas, had produced such vast miraculous manifestations, They at once expounded the Dharma Door of the appearance of a Tathāgata. 
I think that because the Tathāgata has displayed this sign, He will give this teaching.” As he spoke these words, the entire great earth shook, displaying immeasurable radiance called requesting teachings. 
**** Requesting Teachings on a Tathāgata’s Appearance **** Then Wondrous Virtues Arising from Tathāgata Nature Bodhisattva asked Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, what should a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva know about the appearances of Buddha-Tathāgatas, also called Arhats and SamyakSaṁbuddhas? 
Please tell me, Buddha-Son. 
These countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Bodhisattvas in this assembly have long trained in doing pure karmas, fully developed mindfulness and wisdom, and arrived at the shore of ultimate great splendor. They behave like Buddhas and rightly think of Buddhas, never forgetting Them. With great compassion, they observe sentient beings, and they definitely know great Bodhisattvas’ states and transcendental powers. Supported by Buddhas’ spiritual powers, they can retain the wondrous Dharma of all Tathāgatas. 
These Bodhisattvas with such immeasurable virtues have come to assemble. 
“Buddha-Son, you have attended and made offerings to countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of Buddhas, completed supreme Bodhisattva actions, achieved command of samādhi, entered the secrets of Buddhas, mastered the Dharma of Buddhas, ended your doubts, received the support of Buddhas’ spiritual powers, known the capacities of sentient beings, taught them the true ways to achieve liberation according to their preferences, expounded the Buddha Dharma in accord with Buddha wisdom, and arrived at the opposite shore. You have done such immeasurable virtuous works. 
Very good, Buddha-Son. 
I pray that you will describe a Tathāgata’s appearance in the world; His physical form, speech, and mental state; His attaining bodhi, doing Buddha work, turning the Dharma wheel, and entering parinirvāṇa; and the roots_of_goodness developed by those who see, hear, or stay close to Him. 
Please describe these things.”     Then, to restate his meaning, Wondrous Virtues Arising from Tathāgata Nature Bodhisattva spoke to Samantabhadra Bodhisattva in verse: Great is the one with vast hindrance-free wisdom, Who has realized the boundless equality ! I pray that you will describe a Buddha’s immeasurable actions. Buddha-sons who hear you will rejoice. 
What should a Bodhisattva know about Buddha-Tathāgatas’ appearances in worlds? 
What are the states of Their body, voice, and mind? 
How do Buddhas attain true enlightenment How do Tathāgatas turn the Dharma wheel? 
How do Sugatas enter parinirvāṇa? 
The multitude that hears you will be delighted. 
If someone sees a Buddha, a great Dharma King, Or stays close to Him, his roots of goodness will expand. Please describe a sentient being’s store of merits Acquired by seeing a Buddha. 
Suppose someone comes to hear the names of a Tathāgata, Whether He is in the world or in parinirvāṇa, And elicits profound belief in his store of merits. Please describe the benefits he has received. 
All these Bodhisattvas join their palms, Gazing reverently upon the Tathāgata, you , and me. Please describe the state of a Buddha, an ocean of great virtues, Who purifies sentient beings. 
Please reveal the causes and conditions  and use analogies To expound the meanings in accordance with the wondrous Dharma. After hearing you, sentient beings will activate the great bodhi mind, End their doubts, and acquire wisdom-knowledge as pure as the open sky. 
Buddhas appear in sublime bodies Throughout all worlds. Please use wonderful tones and analogies To describe Buddha bodhi They have attained. 
In tens of millions of worlds in the ten directions, Through countless koṭis of nayutas of kalpas, It is hard to see The Bodhisattvas who now have assembled. 
All these Bodhisattvas are reverent, Longing to hear the wondrous meanings. I pray that you will expound with pure mind The great matter of a Tathāgata’s appearance. 
**** Ten Past Things Contributing to a Tathāgata’s Appearance **** Then Samantabhadra Bodhisattva told Wondrous Virtues Arising from Tathāgata Nature Bodhisattva and the other Bodhisattvas in the assembly, “Buddha-Sons, this matter is inconceivable because a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha, appears in the world through countless dharmas. 
Because a Tathāgata’s appearance is not accomplished through one condition or one thing, but through ten kinds of countless hundreds of thousands of asaṁkhyeyas of things in the past. 
What are these ten? 
Buddha-Sons, upon completion of such countless asaṁkhyeyas of Dharma Doors, a Bodhisattva becomes a Tathāgata. 
**** Ten Characteristics of a Tathāgata’s Appearance **** “First, Buddha-Sons, a Three-Thousand_Large_Thousandfold_World does not form through one condition or one thing, but through countless conditions and countless things, such as forming and spreading enormous clouds, pouring down massive rains, and relying on four wind wheels. 
What are these four? 
The first is called holder, because it can hold massive waters. 
The second is called remover, because it can remove massive waters. 
The third is called maker, because it makes all places. 
The fourth is called adorner, because it skillfully distributes adornments. 
All these wind wheels arise from sentient beings’ collective karmas and Bodhisattvas’ roots of goodness, enabling all sentient beings to enjoy the world according to their needs. 
Buddha-Sons, through such countless causes and conditions, a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World forms. Such is the nature of dharmas. There is no producer, no maker, no knower, and no accomplisher. Nevertheless, a world forms. 
“Likewise a Tathāgata’s appearance is not accomplished through one condition or one thing, but through countless causes and conditions, and countless things, such as hearing, accepting, and retaining past Buddhas’ great Dharma clouds and rains, which can activate a Tathāgata’s four wind wheels of great wisdom-knowledge. 
What are these four? 
The first is the wind wheel of great wisdom-knowledge to retain and not to forget dhāraṇīs, because this wheel can hold all Tathāgatas’ great Dharma clouds and rains. 
The second is the wind wheel of great wisdom-knowledge to practice śamatha and vipaśyanā, because this wheel can remove all afflictions. 
The third is the wind wheel of great wisdomknowledge to transfer merits with skillfulness, because this wheel can develop all roots of goodness. 
The fourth is the wind wheel of great wisdom-knowledge to produce various taint-free adornments, because this wheel can enable all sentient beings taught in the past to be adorned with pure roots of goodness, and to acquire the power of a Tathāgata’s affliction-free roots of goodness. 
This is how a Tathāgata attains true enlightenment. It is attained without birth or act, because such is the nature of dharmas. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the first characteristic of the appearance of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His appearance. 
“Second, Buddha-Sons, when a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World is forming, enormous clouds pour down rains called the downpour, which cannot be held by any place, except by a large thousandfold world when it is forming. 
Buddha-Sons, likewise a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha, forms great Dharma clouds and pours down great Dharma rains called accomplishing the appearance of a Tathāgata. They cannot be retained by the narrow minds of riders of the Two_Vehicles, unless through the sustaining power of great Bodhisattvas’ minds. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the second characteristic of the appearance of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His appearance. 
“Third, Buddha-Sons, because of the power of sentient beings’ karmas, enormous clouds pour down rains, which come from nowhere and go to nowhere. 
Likewise a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha, because of the power of Bodhisattvas’ roots of goodness, forms great Dharma clouds and pours down great Dharma rains, which also come from nowhere and go to nowhere. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the third characteristic of the appearance of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. In this way a BodhisattvaMahāsattva should know His appearance. 
“Fourth, Buddha-Sons, when enormous clouds pour down massive rains, no sentient being in a large thousandfold world can know their quantity. If someone tries to calculate it, he will go mad. 
Only the god-king Maheśvara, the ruler of a large thousandfold world, because of the power of his past roots of goodness, can know it, not missing even one raindrop. 
Buddha-Sons, likewise a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha, forms great Dharma clouds and pours down great Dharma rains, which sentient beings, voice-hearers, and Pratyekabuddhas cannot know. If they try to ponder them, their minds will go wild. 
Only Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas, rulers of the entire world, because of the power of their past cultivation of bodhi wisdom, know them clearly, not missing even one word or phrase that enters a sentient being’s mind. 
BuddhaSons, this is the fourth characteristic of the appearance of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His appearance. 
“Fifth, when enormous clouds pour down massive rains, the massive rain called extinguisher can extinguish fires; the massive rain called producer can produce massive waters; the massive rain called stopper can stop massive waters; the massive rain called maker can make treasures, such as gems; the massive rain called differentiator can differentiate  the Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World. 
He forms great Dharma clouds and pours down great Dharma rains. 
The great Dharma rain called extinguisher can extinguish  all sentient beings’ afflictions; the great Dharma rain called producer can produce all sentient beings’ roots of goodness; the Dharma rain called stopper can stop all sentient beings’ wrong views; the great Dharma rain called maker can make all Dharma treasures of wisdom; the Dharma rain called differentiator can differentiate all sentient beings’ minds and preferences. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the fifth characteristic of the appearance of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. In this way a BodhisattvaMahāsattva should know His appearance. 
“Sixth, Buddha-Sons, although massive clouds rain down the one-flavored water, the rains have countless differences. 
Buddha-Sons, it is similar for the appearance of a Tathāgata. Although He rains down the one-flavored Dharma water of great compassion, He gives sentient beings appropriate teachings with countless differences. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the sixth characteristic of the appearance of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His appearance. 
“Seventh, Buddha-Sons, when a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World forms, the celestial palaces in the form realm form first, then those in the desire realm form, and then the abodes of humans and other sentient beings form. 
Buddha-Sons, it is similar for appearance of a Tathāgata. He first enables Bodhisattvas to develop their wisdom through training, then enables Pratyekabuddhas to develop their wisdom through training, and then enables voice-hearers to develop their roots of goodness and their wisdom through training. Then He enables other sentient beings to develop, through causes and conditions, their roots of goodness and their wisdom through training. 
BuddhaSons, as enormous clouds rain down the one-flavored water, the palaces formed for sentient beings differ according to their different roots of goodness. 
Likewise a Tathāgata’s one-flavored Dharma rains taste different according to sentient beings’ different capacities. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the seventh characteristic of the appearance of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His appearance. 
“Eighth, Buddha-Sons, when a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World is forming, massive water pervades it and produces a huge lotus flower called the precious adornment of virtues of a Tathāgata’s appearance. 
It spans the massive water, and its radiance illuminates all worlds in the ten directions. 
When the god-king Maheśvara and gods in the pure-abode heavens see this flower, they definitely know that, in this kalpa, Buddhas will appear in the world. 
“Buddha-Sons, then wind wheels arise. 
The wind wheel called pure radiance can build the celestial palaces in the form realm; the wind wheel called pure light that adorns can build the celestial palaces in the desire realm; the wind wheel called firm and indestructible can build the vajra mountain range, and other large and small concentric mountain ranges; the wind wheel called supremely tall can build Mount Sumeru, the king of mountains. 
“The wind wheel called immovable can build the ten kings of mountains. 
What are these ten? They are  Snow Mountain. 
“The wind wheel called abider can build the great earth; the wind wheel called adorner can build the palaces of dragons, gandharvas, and gods who reside on the earth; the wind wheel called inexhaustible store can build all immense oceans in a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World; the wind wheel called store of universal radiance can make treasures in a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World; the wind wheel called strong root can grow all wishfulfilling trees. 
Buddha-Sons, the one-flavored water poured down from enormous clouds does not differentiate its drinkers. 
However, because sentient beings’ roots of goodness are different, the wind wheels are different; because the wind wheels are different, the worlds are different. 
“Buddha-Sons, it is similar for the appearance of a Tathāgata. 
Adorned with the virtues of all roots of goodness, He emits radiances of unsurpassed great wisdom-knowledge, such as  the radiance called indestructible, which can produce a Tathāgata’s extraordinary lifespan, as endless as the domain of space and the dharma realm. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata’s one-flavored water of great compassion does not differentiate its drinkers. However, because of sentient beings’ different desires, preferences, and capacities, it activates various wind wheels of great wisdom-knowledge, enabling Bodhisattvas to become Tathāgatas and appear in the world. 
Buddha-Sons, all Tathāgatas have the same nature, and Their wheels of great wisdom-knowledge emit various radiances of wisdom. 
Buddha-Sons, you all should know that a Tathāgata produces from the one flavor of liberation various immeasurable and inconceivable virtuous works. Sentient beings may think that these are produced by a Tathāgata’s spiritual power. 
Buddha-Sons, these are not produced by a Tathāgata’s spiritual power. 
Buddha-Sons, it is impossible for any Bodhisattva to acquire a little Tathāgata wisdom without planting his roots of goodness under a Buddha. 
It is through the power of Buddhas’ awe-inspiring virtues that sentient beings are enabled to acquire a Buddha’s virtues. Yet Buddha-Tathāgatas make no differentiations, knowing that there is neither construction nor destruction, neither doer nor doing. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the eighth characteristic of the appearance of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His appearance. 
“Ninth, Buddha-Sons, four wind wheels abide in the open sky and can hold the water wheel. 
What are these four? 
The first is called abiding; the second, ever abiding; the third, everlasting; the fourth, unyielding. 
These four wind wheels can hold the water wheel. The water wheel can hold the great earth, not letting it disintegrate or decay. 
Hence the earth wheel relies on the water wheel; the water wheel relies on the wind wheels; the wind wheels rely on the open sky; the open sky relies on nothing. 
Although it relies on nothing, it can let a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World abide. 
“Buddha-Sons, it is similar for the appearance of a Tathāgata. A Buddha’s four wind wheels of great wisdom-knowledge arise from His radiant hindrancefree wisdom, and can sustain all sentient beings’ roots of goodness. 
What are these four? 
These are the four. 
BuddhaBhagavāns, with great lovingkindness rescue all sentient beings, and with great compassion deliver all sentient beings. They benefit all of them with great lovingkindness and compassion. 
However, great lovingkindness and compassion rely on great skillful means; great skillful means rely on a Tathāgata’s appearance; a Tathāgata’s appearance relies on His radiant hindrance-free wisdom; His radiant hindrance-free wisdom relies on nothing. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the ninth characteristic of the appearance of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His appearance. 
“Tenth, Buddha-Sons, after a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold Word forms, it benefits innumerable sentient beings. 
Aquatic sentient beings benefit from the water; land sentient beings benefit from the earth; sentient beings that reside in palaces benefit from the palaces; sentient beings that reside in the open sky benefit from the open sky. 
It is similar for a Tathāgata’s appearance, which benefits innumerable sentient beings in various ways. 
Those who delight in seeing a Buddha benefit from their delight; those who abide by the pure precepts benefit from the pure precepts; those who abide in meditation and the Four Immeasurable Minds benefit from acquiring supra-worldly great transcendental powers; those who abide in the radiance of Dharma Doors benefit from the indestructible cause and effect; those who abide in the truth of the emptiness  benefit from the indestructibility of all dharmas. 
That is why I say, ‘A Tathāgata’s appearance benefits all innumerable sentient beings.’ Buddha-Sons, this is the tenth characteristic of the appearance of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. 
In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His appearance. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who knows a Tathāgata’s appearance in the world knows that it is immeasurable. 
Knowing that it encompasses immeasurable works, he knows that it is vast. 
Knowing that it pervades  the ten directions, he knows that it neither comes nor goes. 
Knowing that it is free from arising, abiding, and perishing, he knows that it is free from doing and from what is done. 
Knowing that it is beyond mind, intellect, and consciousness, he knows that it has no body. 
Knowing that it is like the open sky, he knows that all dharmas are equal . 
Knowing that all sentient beings have no selves, he knows that it has no end. 
Knowing that it endlessly pervades all worlds, he knows that it never retreats. 
Knowing that it ceaselessly pervades the endless future, he knows that it never decays. 
Knowing that Tathāgata wisdom is unexcelled, he knows that it is non-dual. 
Knowing the equality of dharmas by observing saṁskṛta and asaṁskṛta dharmas, he knows that a Tathāgata’s appearance in the world benefits all sentient beings, because it is the natural fulfillment of His transferring  past actions.”     Then, to restate his meaning, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva spoke in verse: This great hero with the Ten_Powers is unsurpassed, Like the unequaled open sky. His state is vast and immeasurable, and His virtuous works are foremost, transcending the world. 
Limitless are His virtuous works, Beyond the measure of the mind and intellect. No Dharma Door of this lion among men Can be known by sentient beings in a koṭi kalpas. Suppose worlds in the ten directions are pulverized into dust particles. Perhaps someone can calculate their number. 
The virtues of one hair of this Tathagata Cannot be described in a million koṭi kalpas. 
Suppose someone uses a ruler to measure the open sky, and His companion calculates its size. As the boundary of the open sky can never be captured, The state of a Tathāgata can never be captured. 
Suppose someone can know in a kṣaṇakṣaṇa The minds of past, present, and future sentient beings. He cannot know, in kalpas as numerous as sentient beings, Even one thought of a Buddha. 
Because the dharma realm pervades everywhere, One should not take as entire what one perceives. 
True suchness is free from delusion and always quiet. With neither birth nor death, it pervades everywhere. 
Likewise the essence of Buddhas’ states is equality, With neither increase nor decrease. 
The true state  is no state. As it pervades the past, present, and future, there is nothing that pervades. 
Likewise this guiding teacher’s state Pervades the past, present, and future, hindrance free. 
Dharma nature neither acts nor changes, Like the open sky, which is always pure. 
Likewise the nature of Buddhas is pure. Their inherent nature is no nature, beyond existence and nonexistence. 
Dharma nature does not hinge upon words Because it is nirvāṇa, free from words. 
Buddhas know that dharma nature is nirvāṇa, Like traces of birds flying in the sky. Through the power of Their original vows, Buddhas appear in physical forms, Enabling sentient beings to see Their great, miraculous manifestations. 
If someone wants to see a Buddha’s state, He should make his mind as pure as the open sky, Discard deluded perceptions and wrong views, And head for bodhi, hindrance free. 
Hence Buddha-sons should hearken. I will use a few analogies to describe a Buddha’s state. Although the virtuous works of a hero with the Ten Powers are immeasurable, I now will briefly describe them to enlighten sentient beings. 
I will describe a guiding teacher’s displays of the pure states of Body karmas, voice karmas, and mind karmas, His turning the wondrous Dharma wheel, His entering parinirvāṇa, And all His roots of goodness. 
The formation of a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World Is not accomplished through one cause and condition, But through countless skillful means, Causes, and conditions. Likewise a Tathāgata’s appearance in the world Is accomplished through immeasurable virtuous works. 
While minds of sentient beings as numerous as dust particles can be known, The causes and conditions of a Buddha’s appearance cannot be measured. 
At the beginning of a formation kalpa, clouds pour down rains, And four wind wheels arise. Through sentient beings’ roots of goodness and Bodhisattvas’ powers, A Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World forms, where sentient beings reside. 
Likewise a Buddha’s Dharma clouds Activate His wind wheels of wisdom-knowledge that purify  minds And guide those to whom in the past He had transferred His merits, Enabling them to harvest the unsurpassed  fruit. 
The massive rains called the downpour Cannot be held by any place, Except through the power of great winds in the pure open sky When a world is forming. 
It is similar for the appearance of a Tathāgata. He pours down Dharma rains that pervade the dharma realm. They cannot be retained by lowly minds, Only by vast, pure minds. 
Massive rains that fall from the sky Have neither makers nor recipients. Coming from nowhere and going to nowhere, They naturally pervade everywhere. 
Likewise a Buddha’s Dharma rains Neither come nor go, nor act. Bodhisattvas with vast minds accept them Through the power of their primary training. 
When massive rains fall from clouds in the sky, No one can count the raindrops, But Maheśvava, the ruler of a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World, Knows their number because of the power of his virtues. 
Likewise a Sugata’s Dharma rains Cannot be measured by sentient beings, But a Dharma King Sees them as clearly as a jewel in His palm. 
Massive rains that fall from clouds in the sky Can extinguish , produce , and stop . They make all treasures And differentiate  a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World. 
They make the Dharma treasures of wisdom And differentiate sentient beings’ minds and preferences. 
The rains that fall from the sky come in only one flavor, But they have countless differences. The rains do not differentiate their drinkers, But they naturally give rise to different things. 
A Tathāgata’s Dharma rains are neither same nor different. Impartial and quiet, they do not differentiate their drinkers. To different sentient beings ready to be transformed, They naturally provide different teachings. 
When a world forms, The celestial palaces in the form realm form first, Then those in the desire realm form, and then the abodes in the human realm form. Gandharva palaces form last. 
It is similar for the appearance of a Tathāgata. He first activates immeasurable Bodhisattva actions, Then transforms Pratyekabuddhas, who delight in quietness , Then teaches voice-hearers, and then sentient beings. 
When gods see the lotus flower , an auspicious sign, They rejoice because they know that Buddhas will appear in the world. 
Rains activate winds, and winds bring forth a world, Where palaces, mountains, and rivers form. 
A Tathāgata emits radiance, which skillfully differentiates Bodhisattvas And bestows upon them the prophecy . 
His wheels of wisdom-knowledge are pure, Each expounding the Dharma of Buddhas. 
Trees rely on the earth in order to exist. The earth relies on water in order not to disintegrate. Water relies on wind, and wind relies on the open sky. The open sky relies on nothing. 
The entire Buddha Dharma relies on lovingkindness and compassion. Lovingkindness and compassion rely on skillful means. Skillful means rely on wisdom-knowledge, and wisdom-knowledge relies on wisdom. The hindrance-free wisdom body ] relies on nothing. 
After a world forms, All sentient beings receive its benefits. Those who reside on earth, in water, or in the sky, and Those with two feet or four feet, all receive its benefits. 
It is similar for the appearance of a Dharma King Because all sentient beings receive its benefits. He enables those who see, hear, or stay close to Him To end their afflictions. 
A Tathāgata’s appearance is Inconceivable and unknowable to the world. To enlighten sentient beings, I have used analogies to describe that which is beyond analogies. 
**** Ten Characteristics of a Tathāgata’s Body **** “Buddha-Sons, how should a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva see the body of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha? 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should use no measure to see a Tathāgata’s body. 
Because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should not see a Tathāgata through only one dharma, one thing, one body, one world, or one sentient being, but through all things. 
“First, Buddha-Sons, the open sky pervades everywhere in realms with or without form, though it neither arrives nor does not arrive. 
Because the open sky has no body. 
Likewise a Tathāgata’s body pervades all places, all sentient beings, all dharmas, and all worlds, though it neither arrives nor does not arrive. 
Because a Tathāgata’s body is no body. To benefit sentient beings, He manifests His body. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the first characteristic of a Tathāgata’s body. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should see His body. 
“Second, Buddha-Sons, the open sky is vast and formless, but it can display all forms. Yet the open sky neither differentiates among them nor makes ludicrous_statements about them. 
Likewise a Tathāgata’s body illuminates the world with the radiance of wisdom, enabling sentient beings to fully develop worldly and supra-worldly roots of goodness. Yet a Tathāgata’s body neither differentiates among them nor makes ludicrous statements about them. 
Because it has always been free from all attachments and all ludicrous statements. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the second characteristic of a Tathāgata’s body. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should see His body. 
“Third, Buddha-Sons, the sun rises in Jambudvīpa and benefits all sentient beings in countless ways, such as dispelling darkness, removing coldness and wetness, nurturing trees and grass, ripening grains and crops, lighting the open sky, opening flowers, enabling travelers to see their way, and inhabitants to do their work. 
Because the sun emits immeasurable radiance. 
BuddhaSons, likewise a Tathāgata, a wisdom sun, appears in the world and benefits all sentient beings in countless ways, such as ending their evil to produce good, changing their stupidity into wisdom, rescuing and protecting them with great lovingkindness, delivering them with great compassion, expanding their capacities, strengths, and aspirations for bodhi. 
He enables them to elicit profound belief and discard the muddled mind, to see and hear  without destroying causes and conditions, to acquire the god-eye to see the places of their births and deaths, to acquire the hindrance-free mind without damaging their roots of goodness, to develop wisdom and open the flower of enlightenment, and to activate the bodhi mind to complete all Bodhisattva actions. 
Because a Tathāgata’s body is a vast wisdom sun, which emits immeasurable radiance to illuminate all. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the third characteristic of a Tathāgata’s body. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should see His body. 
“Fourth, when the sun rises in Jambudvīpa, it first illuminates Mount Sumeru and all great kings of mountains, then the black mountain, then plateaus, and then the entire great earth. 
The sun does not think, ‘I first illuminate this, then that.’ Because the mountains and the ground each have variations in height, it illuminates them in this order. 
Likewise a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha, acquires in the boundless dharma realm the wheels of wisdom-knowledge, which constantly emit the radiance of hindrance-free wisdom. The radiance first illuminates Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas, who are like great kings of mountains, then Pratyekabuddhas, and then voicehearers. Then it illuminates sentient beings definitely on the bodhi path, imparting to them vast wisdom-knowledge according to their capacities. Then it illuminates all other sentient beings, even those definitely on the wrong paths, providing the causes and conditions for them to receive future benefits and come to  maturity. 
However, the radiance of a Tathāgata, a wisdom sun, does not think, ‘I should illuminate Bodhisattvas first and sentient beings definitely on the wrong paths last.’ It impartially emits radiance to illuminate all, hindrance free and differentiation free. 
Buddha-Sons, when the sun or the moon rises, it impartially illuminates tall mountains and deep valleys. 
Likewise a Tathāgata’s wisdom illuminates all without discrimination. However, the radiance of His wisdom-knowledge differs according to sentient beings’ preferences and capacities. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the fourth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s body. In this way a BodhisattvaMahāsattva should see His body. 
“Fifth, Buddha-Sons, when the sun rises, sentient beings born blind cannot see it. 
Although they have never seen the sun, they still benefit from sunlight. 
Because sunlight enables them to know day and night, and seasons; to enjoy food and drink, and life-supporting things, such as clothing; and to make their bodies comfortable and free from troubles, such as illnesses from coldness or dampness. 
It is similar for a Tathāgata, a wisdom sun. Those with no belief and no understanding violate the precepts, malign the right views, live an evil way of life, and cannot see a Buddha, a wisdom sun, because, like the born blind, they have no eye of belief. 
Although they do not see a Buddha, a wisdom sun, they still benefit from that wisdom sun. 
Because a Buddha’s awesome power enables sentient beings to end their physical suffering and their afflictions, which are the cause of suffering in their future lives. 
Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata emits various radiances. 
One radiance is called accumulating merits; one is called illuminating all; one is called illuminating with purity and ease; one is called emitting loud, wonderful tones; one is called understanding all languages to delight all; one is called displaying the commanding state that ends all doubts forever; one is called the reliance-free wisdom-knowledge that illuminates all with ease; one is called the commanding wisdom-knowledge that ends all ludicrous statements; one is called responsively emitting wonderful tones; one is called emitting pure and commanding tones to adorn worlds and bring sentient beings to  maturity. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata’s every pore emits a thousand kinds of such radiances. Five hundred radiances illuminate below; five hundred radiances illuminate above. 
When Bodhisattvas in various places of Buddhas in various worlds see these radiances, they at once attain a Tathāgata’s state. Every Bodhisattva’s ten heads, ten eyes, ten ears, ten noses, ten tongues, ten bodies, ten hands, ten feet, Ten Grounds, and ten kinds of wisdom-knowledge are purified. 
Because he sees these radiances, his earlier attainments on Bodhisattva grounds become purer and all his roots of goodness mature, as he heads for all wisdom-knowledge. 
Riders of the Two Vehicles end all their afflictions; a few sentient beings born blind experience happiness in their bodies, and their minds become pure, gentle, and docile, capable of cultivating mindfulness; all other sentient beings on various life-paths, including hell dwellers, hungry ghosts, and animals, experience happiness, are liberated from myriad suffering and, after death, will be reborn as gods or humans. 
BuddhaSons, those sentient beings do not know through what causes and conditions, or what spiritual power, they have been reborn as gods or humans. 
Those born blind in their previous life think, ‘I am a Brahma god. 
I am manifested by a Brahma god.’ Then a Tathāgata, who abides in the Samādhi of Universal Command, voices sixty kinds of wonderful tones, telling them, ‘All of you are neither Brahma gods nor manifestations of a Brahma god, nor products of the god-king Śakra or the four_god-king_protectors of the world. Your fortunate rebirth is accomplished through a Tathāgata’s awesome spiritual power.’ When those sentient beings hear these words, through that Buddha’s spiritual power, they come to know their past lives, and great joy arises in their hearts. 
Because of their joy,  they naturally form clouds of utpala flowers, fragrances, music, garments, canopies, banners, cylindrical banners, powdered incense, treasures, half-moon-shaped towers with lion banners, songs and praises, and various adornments, and they make that offering to that Tathāgata with reverent minds. 
Because those sentient beings have acquired the pure eye. Then that Tathāgata bestows upon them the prophecy of attaining anuttarasamyak-saṁbodhi. 
Buddha-Sons, in this way a Tathāgata, a wisdom sun, benefits sentient beings born blind, enabling them to acquire roots of goodness and come to  maturity. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the fifth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s body. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should see His body. 
“Sixth, Buddha-Sons, the moon has four extraordinary and unprecedented abilities. 
What are these four? 
It outshines all stars. 
It displays waxing and waning. 
It casts its reflection in clear waters in Jambudvīpa. 
All viewers see it before them, but the moon neither differentiates among them nor makes ludicrous statements about them. 
Buddha-Sons, likewise a Tathāgata’s body has four extraordinary and unprecedented abilities. 
What are these four? 
According to sentient beings’ different needs, it displays different lifespans, though its life neither lengthens nor shortens. 
Its reflection appears in  bodhi vessels, the pure minds of sentient beings in all worlds. 
When sentient beings see it, they say, ‘The Tathāgata appears before me alone.’ A Tathāgata expounds the Dharma to sentient beings according to their preferences, enables them to achieve liberation according to their  levels, and enables those ready to be taught to see a Buddha’s body. Yet a Tathāgata’s body neither differentiates among them nor makes ludicrous statements about them, as it completes Buddha work. 
BuddhaSons, this is the sixth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s body. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should see His body. 
“Seventh, Buddha-Sons, the great Brahma king of a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold Word, using a few skillful means, enables all sentient beings to see him present before them, though he neither makes copies of his body nor has various bodies. 
Buddha-Sons, likewise a Tathāgata neither makes copies of his body nor has various bodies. As He appears in a body according to sentient beings’ preferences, He does not think about manifesting a certain number of bodies. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the seventh characteristic of a Tathāgata’s body. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should see His body. 
“Eighth, Buddha-Sons, there is a medicine king who well knows many medicines and mantras. He uses the inexhaustible medicines in Jambudvīpa, the power of roots of goodness developed in his past lives, and the power of great mantras. Using these skillful means, he cures illnesses of sentient beings that come to see him. 
When that great medicine king realizes that his life is ending, he thinks, ‘After my death, sentient beings have no one to rely on. Now, I should demonstrate some skillful means.’ Then he prepares medicine, spreads it on his body, and recites mantras, enabling his body, after his death, neither to decompose nor to dry out. It continues to do things and to see and hear, no different from before. All the diseases it has treated are cured. 
Buddha-Sons, it is similar for a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha, who is an unsurpassed medicine king. Through countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of kalpas, He has completed His development of Dharma medicine, acquired all skillful means and illumination mantras, and arrived at the opposite shore. He is skilled in curing sentient beings’ diseases, i.e., ending their afflictions, and in sustaining His life for countless kalpas. 
His body is pure, free from deliberation and consumption, as it does Buddha work without rest. Sentient beings that see it can have their affliction-diseases cured. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the eighth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s body. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should see His body. 
“Ninth, Buddha-Sons, the immense ocean has a great gem called the solar store that collects all radiance. 
If sentient beings touch its light, they take on its color; if they see it, their eyes are purified. 
In every place illuminated by its light, the sky rains down a jewel called peace and joy, which frees sentient beings from their suffering and gives them comfort. 
Buddha-Sons, likewise a Tathāgata’s body is a great gem, a store of all virtuous works and vast wisdom. 
If sentient beings touch the precious wisdom light of a Buddha’s body, they take on the  color of the Buddha body. 
If they see it, they acquire the pure Dharma-eye. 
In every place illuminated by its light, it frees sentient beings from the suffering of poverty and gives them joy, even the joy of Buddha bodhi. 
Buddha-Sons, as a Tathāgata’s dharma body does great Buddha work for all sentient beings, it neither differentiates among them nor makes ludicrous statements about them. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the ninth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s body. In this way a BodhisattvaMahāsattva should see His body. 
“Tenth, Buddha-Sons, the immense ocean has a wish-fulfilling king of jewels, called the store of all worldly adornments, that can do a million virtuous works. Wherever it is, it ends sentient beings’ tribulations and fulfills their wishes. 
However, this wish-fulfilling jewel cannot be seen by sentient beings with meager merits. 
Likewise a Tathāgata’s body, called able to delight all sentient beings, is a wish-fulfilling jewel. If sentient beings see His body, hear His name, or praise His virtue, they are enabled to leave behind the painful tribulations of birth and death forever. 
If all sentient beings in all worlds, at the same time, single-mindedly wish to see a Tathāgata, they will be enabled to see Him and have their wishes fulfilled. 
Buddha-Sons, a Buddha’s body cannot be seen by sentient beings with meager merits, unless they are ready to be tamed by His spiritual power. 
If, after seeing Buddha’s body, sentient beings can plant their roots of goodness, they will be enabled to see a Tathāgata’s body, in order to bring them to  maturity. 
BuddhaSons, this is the tenth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s body. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should see His body. 
“ because His mind is immeasurable and pervades  the ten directions; because His actions are hindrance free, like the open sky; because He enters everywhere in the dharma realm; because He abides in true reality; because He has neither birth nor death; because He simultaneously abides in the past, present, and future; because He has forever discarded all differentiations; because He carries out His vows throughout the endless future; because He purifies all worlds; because He adorns every one of His Buddha bodies .”     Then, to restate his meaning, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva spoke in verse: The open sky extends in the ten directions, As if physical but non-physical, as if existent but nonexistent. Countless bodies of past, present, and future sentient beings Are everywhere in all worlds. 
Likewise the true bodies  of Buddhas Pervade all dharma realms. Invisible and impossible to capture, To transform sentient beings, they take shapes. 
Although the open sky cannot be captured, It allows sentient beings to do karmas. It never thinks about what it does, Why it does anything, or for whom it does anything. 
Likewise a Buddha’s body karmas Enable sentient beings to do good dharmas. They never think, “I have done various things for them.” The sun rises in Jambudvīpa, And its radiance dispels darkness without exception. Mountains, trees, lakes, flowers, other things on earth, And various sentient species receive its benefits. 
Likewise the rise of a Buddha sun Enables the good works of gods and humans to increase, Dispels the darkness of ignorance forever, and brings sentient beings the radiance of wisdom For them to find glory and joy. 
When sunlight appears, It first illuminates the kings of mountains, then other mountains, Then plateaus, and then the great earth. Yet the sun never differentiates among them. 
Likewise the radiance of a Sugata First illuminates Bodhisattvas, then Pratyekabuddhas, Then voice-hearers, and then other sentient beings. Yet a Buddha never thinks even one thought. 
Those born blind cannot see the sun, But sunlight still benefits them, Enabling them to know seasons, enjoy food and drink, Leave troubles behind, and enjoy comfort. 
Likewise nonbelievers cannot see a Buddha, But a Buddha still benefits them. Those who hear His name or touches His radiance Will for this reason attain bodhi. 
The pure moon in the sky Outshines stars and displays its waxing and waning. It casts its reflection in all waters, and All viewers think that the moon is before them. 
Likewise a Tathāgata, a pure moon, Outshines the Two Vehicles and displays an appropriate lifespan. His reflection appears in the water contained in all bodhi vessels, the pure minds of gods and humans, Who say that He is before them. 
Although the Brahma king remains in his palace, He appears everywhere in a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World. Although all humans and gods see him, He does not make copies of his body for them. 
Likewise a Buddha appears everywhere In worlds in the ten directions. Although His bodies are countless, He neither makes copies of His body nor differentiates the viewers. 
There is a medicine king versed in healing arts, and Those who see him are cured of their illnesses. He spreads medicine on this body so that, After death, he can continue to work as before. 
Likewise a Buddha, a supreme medicine king, Equipped with skillful means, all wisdom-knowledge, And  past wondrous actions, appears in a Buddha’s body. Sentient beings that see it end their afflictions. 
The king of jewels in the ocean Emits immeasurable radiance. Those who touch its radiance take on its color. Those who see its radiance open the pure eye. 
It is similar for a Buddha, a supreme treasure king. Those who touch His radiance take on His  color. Those who see His radiance open the five eyes, Dispel the darkness of ignorance, and abide on the Buddha ground. 
A wish-fulfilling jewel Fulfills all wishes. Sentient beings with meager merits cannot see it, But this king of jewels never discriminates against them. 
Likewise a Sugata, a supreme treasure king, Fulfills all wishes. Nonbelievers cannot see a Buddha, But a Sugata never abandons them. *** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 50 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  *** **** Notes ****     1. 
Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment ***** *** Translated from Sanskrit into Chinese in the Tang Dynasty by The Tripiṭaka Master Śikṣānanda from Yutian *** ***** Fascicle 51  ***** **** Chapter 37b – A Tathāgata’s Appearance in the World Continued **** **** A Tathāgata’s Voice ****  “Buddha-Sons, what should a BodhisattvaMahāsattva know about the voice of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha? 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know that a Tathāgata’s voice is pervasive, encompassing countless tones; a Tathāgata’s voice delights its hearers according their preferences because it clearly expounds the Dharma; a Tathāgata’s voice delights its hearers according to the levels of their faith and understanding because it cools their minds; a Tathāgata’s voice gives timely teachings that are heard by those ready to hear them; a Tathāgata’s voice has neither birth nor death because it is like an echo; a Tathāgata’s voice has no master because it arises from His past good karmas; a Tathāgata’s voice is profound because it is beyond measure; a Tathāgata’s voice is never twisted because it arises from the dharma_realm; a Tathāgata’s voice is ceaseless because it enters everywhere in the dharma realm; a Tathāgata’s voice never changes because it conveys the ultimate truth. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know that a Tathāgata’s voice is neither measurable nor immeasurable, has neither a master nor no master, and neither expresses nor does not express anything. 
**** Ten Characteristics of a Tathāgata’s Voice **** “First, Buddha-Sons, when a world is in the process of destruction, without a master or a maker, four sounds naturally arise. 
What are these four? 
The first sound says, ‘All of you  should know that the peace and joy of the first dhyāna are free from desire and evil, surpassing those of the desire realm.’ After hearing these words, sentient beings naturally attain the first dhyāna, abandon their desire-realm bodies, and are reborn as gods in a Brahma heaven. The second sound says, ‘All of you should know that the peace and joy of the second dhyāna are free from perception and observation, surpassing those of a Brahma heaven. 
After hearing these words, sentient beings naturally attain the second dhyāna, abandon their Brahma bodies, and are reborn in Pure Radiance  Heaven. 
The third sound says, ‘All of you should know that the peace and joy of the third dhyāna are free from faults, surpassing those of Pure Radiance Heaven.’ After hearing these words, sentient beings naturally attain the third dhyāna, abandon their bodies with pure radiance, and are reborn in Pervasive Splendor  Heaven. 
The fourth sound says, ‘All of you should know that the quietness of the fourth dhyāna surpasses that of Pervasive Splendor Heaven.’ After hearing this, sentient beings naturally attain the fourth dhyāna, abandon their bodies with pervasive splendor, and are reborn in Massive Fruition  Heaven. 
Buddha-Sons, these four sounds have neither a master nor a maker, but are produced by the power of sentient beings’ good karmas. 
“Buddha-Sons, it is similar for a Tathāgata’s voice. It has neither a master nor a maker, it neither enters nor exists anywhere, nor does it differentiate . However, through the power of a Tathāgata’s virtuous works, four pervasive sounds arise. 
What are these four? 
The first sound says, ‘All of you should know that all sentient beings as processes  undergo suffering, such as the suffering of hell dwellers, the suffering of animals, the suffering of hungry ghosts, the suffering of lacking merits, the suffering of fixation on having a self and its belongings, and the suffering of doing evil. 
Those who wish to be reborn as gods or humans should plant roots_of_goodness in order to be reborn in heaven or the human world, away from difficult places. After hearing these words, sentient beings discard their inverted views, train in good actions, leave difficult places, and are reborn as gods or humans. 
The second sound says, ‘All of you should know that all processes experience burning pains, like hot iron pellets. 
While processes are impermanent and always deteriorate to an end, nirvāṇa is quiet, peaceful, and joyful, free from burning pains and blazing suffering, beyond causes and conditions.’ After hearing these words, sentient beings diligently train in good dharmas and acquire the endurance in hearing the sounds. The third sound says, ‘All of you should know that riders of the Voice-Hearer Vehicle follow others’ words because their wisdom is low. 
There is a higher vehicle called the Pratyekabuddha Vehicle, whose riders realize the truth without a teacher. You should learn to ride it.’ After hearing these words, those who prefer a higher path abandon the path of voice-hearers and ride the Pratyekabuddha Vehicle. 
The fourth sound says, ‘All of you should know that a vehicle higher than the first two vehicles is the Mahāyāna. 
Its riders are Bodhisattvas, who practice the six_pāramitās, ceaselessly take Bodhisattva actions, never abandon the bodhi_mind, and tirelessly undergo countless births and deaths. Higher than the Two_Vehicles, this vehicle is called the Mahāyāna, the foremost vehicle, the excellent vehicle, the supreme vehicle, the superior vehicle, the unexcelled vehicle, and the vehicle that benefits all sentient beings.’ After hearing these words, sentient beings activate the bodhi mind if they have great faith and understanding, vigorous and keen faculties, roots of goodness planted in their past lives, higher aspirations, the longing to attain Buddhahood, and the support of Tathāgatas’ spiritual power. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the first characteristic of a Tathāgata’s voice. In this way a BodhisattvaMahāsattva should know His voice. 
“Second, Buddha-Sons, an echo arises from a sound in a valley. It has neither shape nor form, cannot be seen, and never differentiates . Yet it follows speech sounds. 
It is similar for a Tathāgata’s voice. It has neither shape nor form, cannot be seen, and has neither a location nor no location. 
Yet it arises according to sentient beings’ wishes and understandings. Its nature is the ultimate , without words or expressions, and cannot be described. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the second characteristic of a Tathāgata’s voice. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His voice. 
“Third, Buddha-Sons, gods have a great Dharma drum called the awakener. 
When gods act without self-restraint, it makes sounds in the sky, telling them, ‘All of you should know that all pleasures are impermanent, unreal, and inverted, perishing in a short while. Yet they swindle fools into becoming attached to them. You should never abandon self-restraint. 
If you abandon it, you will be reborn to go down an evil life-path. Then your remorse will come too late.’ When self-indulgent gods hear these words, out of anxiety and fear they relinquish the pleasures in their celestial palaces, and go to their godking, asking for ways to seek bodhi. 
Buddha-Sons, that celestial drum’s sounds have neither a master nor a maker, they neither arise nor perish, but they can benefit innumerable sentient beings. 
It is similar for a Tathāgata’s voice. To awaken sentient beings without self-restraint, He voices immeasurable, wondrous Dharma sounds, such as the sound of no attachment, the sound of exercising self-restraint, the sound of impermanence , the sound of suffering, the sound of no self, the sound of impurity, the sound of eradication , the sound of nirvāṇa, the sound of immeasurable innate wisdomknowledge , the sound of indestructible Bodhisattva actions, and the sound that arises from the ground of a Tathāgata’s effortless wisdomknowledge and reaches everywhere. He voices such sounds that pervade the dharma realm to awaken sentient beings. 
After hearing these sounds, innumerable sentient beings feel joy and diligently train in good dharmas, each seeking liberation through his chosen vehicle, whether the Voice-Hearer Vehicle, the Pratyekabuddha Vehicle, or the unsurpassed Bodhisattva Vehicle, the Mahāyāna. 
Yet a Tathāgata’s voice abides in no location and contains no words. 
BuddhaSons, this is the third characteristic of a Tathāgata’s voice. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His voice. “Fourth, Buddha-Sons, the god-king Maheśvara has a beautiful attendant called Benevolent Mouth. 
When her mouth emits a sound, it accords with 100,000 kinds of music, each producing 100,000 different tones. 
Buddha-Sons, as Benevolent Mouth can emit from her mouth a sound that produces countless tones, so too can a Tathāgata. 
Each of His sounds produces countless tones that reach all sentient beings according to their various preferences, enabling them to understand . 
Buddha-Sons, this is the fourth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s voice. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His voice. 
“Fifth, Buddha-Sons, the god-king Great Brahmā resides in his Brahma palace and emits Brahma sounds, which are heard by all Brahma gods, but not others. 
All Brahma gods think, ‘The god-king Great Brahmā speaks to me alone.’ It is similar for a Tathāgata’s voice. The multitude in His bodhimaṇḍa hears His wondrous voice, but it does not go outside that multitude. 
Why not? 
Because those with immature capacities should not hear it. 
All hearers think, ‘The Tathāgata-Bhagavān speaks to me alone.’ Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata’s voice neither arises nor abides, but it can accomplish all works. 
This is the fifth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s voice. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His voice. 
“Sixth, Buddha-Sons, all waters have the same flavor, but can be differentiated according to their vessels. Yet water neither thinks nor differentiates . 
Likewise a Tathāgata’s speaking voice has only one flavor, the flavor of liberation, but it has countless differences according to sentient beings’ different mind vessels. Yet His voice neither thinks nor differentiates . 
This is the sixth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s voice. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His voice. 
“Seventh, Buddha-Sons, the dragon-king Anavatapta  forms enormous dense clouds and pours down rains throughout Jambudvīpa, enabling all grains and crops to grow, and filling rivers and lakes. 
This vast rainwater does not come from that dragon-king’s body or mind, but it can benefit sentient beings in various ways. 
He forms clouds of great compassion that cover worlds in the ten_directions, and pours down everywhere Dharma rains of unsurpassed sweet dew, delighting all sentient beings, expanding their good works, and sustaining all vehicles . 
Buddhas-Sons, a Tathāgata’s voice comes from neither inside nor outside, but it can benefit all sentient beings. 
This is seventh characteristic of a Tathāgata’s voice. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His voice. 
“Eighth, Buddha-Sons, when the dragon-king Manasvin  wants to pour down rains, he does not do it immediately. He first forms enormous clouds that cover the open sky for seven days, waiting for sentient beings to finish their work. 
Because that great dragon-king has lovingkindness and compassion, and does not want to disturb or distress sentient beings. 
After seven days, he sprinkles light rains to wet and nurture the great earth. 
When He wants to pour down Dharma rains, He does not do it immediately. He first forms Dharma clouds to bring sentient beings to  maturity, enabling them not to be astonished or terrified. 
After they have come to maturity, He pours down everywhere Dharma rains of sweet dew, expounding the profound and wondrous Dharma, enabling sentient beings gradually to satiate themselves with the unsurpassed Dharma flavor of a Tathāgata’s  knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the eighth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s voice. In this way a BodhisattvaMahāsattva should know His voice. 
“Ninth, Buddha-Sons, in the ocean is a great-dragon king called Great Magnificence. When he pours down rains, he pours down 10, 100, 1,000, or even 100,000 kinds of magnificent rains. 
Buddha-Sons, the rainwater is the same, but that dragon-king uses his inconceivable power to make the rains magnificent, with 100,000 or even countless differences. 
When He showers down the sweet dew of the Dharma, He voices 10, 100, 1,000, 10,000, or 84,000 tones to expound 84,000 actions, or even countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of tones to expound the Dharma, delighting the hearers. 
However, a Tathāgata’s voice never differentiates its hearers. Because Buddhas have achieved perfect purity in the profound dharma realm, They can voice various speech tones to delight sentient beings according to their capacities. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the ninth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s voice. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His voice. 
“Tenth, Buddha-Sons, when the dragon-king Sāgara  wants to display a dragon-king’s commanding power to benefit and delight sentient beings, he forms a huge web of clouds that covers all places, from the four_continents to the sixth desire heaven. These clouds come in countless different colors, such as the radiant colors of Jambūnada gold, aquamarine , silver, crystal, musāragalva , emerald, red pearl, superb treasures, immeasurable fragrances, taint-free garments, pure waters, and various adornments. 
“After this web of clouds has spread everywhere, all clouds flash lightning in various colors. 
Jambūnada-gold-colored clouds flash aquamarine-colored lightning; aquamarine-colored clouds flash golden lightning; silver-colored clouds flash crystal-colored lightning; crystal-colored clouds flash silvercolored lightning; musāragalva-colored clouds flash emerald-colored lightning; emerald-colored clouds flash musāragalva-colored lightning; treasure-colored clouds flash red-pearl-colored lightning; red-pearl-colored clouds flash treasure-colored lightning; clouds in the colors of immeasurable fragrances flash lightning in the colors of taint-free garments; clouds in the colors of taint-free garments flash lightning in the colors of immeasurable fragrances; clouds in the colors of pure waters flash lightning in the colors of various adornments; clouds in the colors of various adornments flash lightning in the colors of pure waters; multicolored clouds flash one-colored lightning; onecolored clouds flash multicolored lightning. 
“After flashing lightning, these clouds rumble various thunders to delight sentient beings according to their minds. 
These thunders sound like gods playing music, goddess-daughters singing, dragon-daughters singing, gandharvadaughters singing, kiṁnara-daughters singing, the great earth quaking, waves of ocean tides lapping, animal-kings roaring, songbirds chirping, or countless other sounds. 
“After rumbling thunders, these clouds blow cool breezes to delight sentient beings’ hearts. Then they pour down various kinds of rains to benefit innumerable sentient beings, bringing them peace and joy. 
They pour down different rains in different places, from the sixth desire heaven to the earth. 
Into the immense ocean, they rain down clear and cool water called endless; in Paranirmita-vaśa-vartin Heaven , they rain down various kinds of music called beautiful, such as pipe and flute music; in Nirmāṇa-rati Heaven , they rain down huge gems called emitting vast radiance; in Tuṣita Heaven , they rain down great adornments called hanging chignons; in Yāma Heaven , they rain down huge beautiful flowers called various adornments; in Trayastriṁśa_Heaven , they rain down wonderful fragrances called mind pleasing; in the first desire heaven, ruled by the four god-kings, they rain down precious celestial garments called coverings; in dragon-kings’ palaces, they rain down red pearls called gushing radiance; in asuras’ palaces, they rain down weapons called conquering enemies; in Uttarakuru , they rain down various flowers called blooming; in the other three continents, they pour down different rains befitting different places. 
Although different rains fall in different places, that dragon-king has an impartial mind and never differentiates between this and that. Because sentient beings’ roots of goodness differ, the rains differ. 
“Buddha-Sons, it is similar for a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. In order to use the true Dharma to teach and transform sentient beings, he forms clouds of bodies that pervade the dharma realm, and appears in different bodies according to sentient beings’ desires and preferences. 
For sentient beings, He forms the cloud of bodies that arrive through birth, the cloud of miraculously manifested bodies, the cloud of bodies sustained by spiritual power, the cloud of physical bodies, the cloud of bodies with excellent characteristics, the cloud of merit bodies, the cloud of wisdom bodies, the cloud of indestructible bodies, the cloud of fearless bodies, or the cloud of dharma-realm bodies. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata forms clouds of countless bodies that cover all worlds in the ten directions. According to sentient beings’ preferences, such clouds each flash various kinds of radiant lightning. 
For sentient beings, they flash radiant lightning called reaching everywhere, radiant lightning called boundless light, radiant lightning called entering a Buddha’s secret teachings, radiant lightning called reflected radiance, radiant lightning called pure luminosity, radiant lightning called entering endless dhāraṇī doors, radiant lightning called right_mindfulness undistracted, radiant lightning called ultimately indestructible, radiant lightning called willingly entering lifepaths, or radiant lightning called fulfilling all wishes to make all happy. 
“Buddha-Sons, after flashing such countless kinds of radiant lightning, a Tathāgata, according to sentient beings’ preferences, rumbles thunders of countless samādhis, such as thunder of the samādhi of enlightenment wisdomknowledge , thunder of the samādhi of the radiant and taint-free ocean, thunder of the samādhi of command of all dharmas, thunder of the samādhi of vajra wheels, thunder of the samādhi of Mount Sumeru banners, thunder of the samādhi of the ocean seal, thunder of the samādhi of the sun lamp, thunder of the samādhi of the inexhaustible store, or thunder of the samādhi of the power of indestructible liberation. 
“Buddha-Sons, after a Tathāgata’s clouds of bodies have rumbled thunders of countless different samādhis, before pouring down Dharma rains, these clouds display an auspicious sign to enlighten sentient beings: 
they display the wind wheel of a Tathāgata’s great wisdom-knowledge,  called enabling all sentient beings to have inconceivable joy and comfort, which arises from His hindrance-free mind of great lovingkindness and compassion. 
After this sign is displayed, all Bodhisattvas’ and sentient beings’ bodies and minds cool down. 
“Then a Tathāgata’s great cloud of dharma body, great cloud of lovingkindness and compassion, and great inconceivable cloud pour down great Dharma rains, purifying all sentient beings’ bodies and minds. 
The great Dharma rain for Bodhisattvas who are seated in bodhimaṇḍas  is called the no-differentiation dharma realm. 
The great Dharma rain for Bodhisattvas in their final bodies  is called Bodhisattvas who playfully handle a Tathāgata’s secret teachings. 
The great Dharma rain for Bodhisattvas who will attain Buddhahood in their next life is called pervasive pure radiance. 
The great Dharma rain for Bodhisattvas who have had sweet dew poured on their heads  is called adorned with a Tathāgata’s adornments. 
The great Dharma rain for Bodhisattvas who have acquired endurance is called precious flower of merit and wisdom blooming and enabling Bodhisattva actions with great compassion never to end. 
The great Dharma rain for Bodhisattvas training at  transference of merit  is called entering the profound door of manifestations to take Bodhisattva actions without rest or weariness. 
The great Dharma rain for newly resolved Bodhisattvas is called eliciting a Tathāgata’s great lovingkindness and compassion to rescue and protect sentient beings. 
The great Dharma rain for sentient beings that seek the Pratyekabuddha Vehicle is called knowing deeply that realization of dependent arising of dharmas is free from duality  and leads to indestructible liberation. 
The great Dharma rain for sentient beings that seek the Voice-Hearer Vehicle is called using the sword of great wisdom to sever all afflictions. 
The great Dharma rain for those who expand their roots of goodness and those who are decisive or indecisive about their paths is called going through various Dharma doors with great joy. 
“Buddha-Sons, Buddha-Tathāgatas follow sentient beings’ minds to pour down such great Dharma rains, filling countless worlds. 
Because sentient beings’ capacities differ, His Dharma rains display differences. 
This is the tenth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s voice. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His voice. 
“Moreover, Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata’s voice is immeasurable like ten things. 
What are these ten? 
His voice is immeasurable  like a Buddha’s state because it enters a Buddha’s dharma realm. 
Buddha-Sons, the voice of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha, is immeasurable for asaṁkhyeya reasons. 
In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His voice.”     Then, to restate his meaning, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva spoke in verse: When a Three-Thousand_Large_Thousandfold_World is in the process of destruction, Through the power of sentient beings’ good karmas, a sound arises, telling them that The fourth dhyāna heaven  is quiet and free from suffering, Advising them to leave the desire realm. 
It is similar for a World-Honored_One, who has the Ten_Powers, He voices wonderful tones that pervade the dharma realm, Telling sentient beings that all processes are painful and impermanent, Advising them to cross the ocean of birth and death for good. 
A huge valley in a deep mountain Responds to sounds with echoes. Although an echo follows someone’s speech, It never differentiates its hearers. 
It is similar for a Buddha’s voice, Which is heard by sentient beings with mature capacities, Enabling them to be docile and joyful, But has no thought that it can speak. 
The celestial drum called the awakener Rumbles Dharma sounds in the sky, Admonishing god-sons without self-restraint, Enabling them to discard their attachments. 
It is similar for a Buddha’s Dharma drum. It makes various wonderful sounds, Awakening all sentient beings, Enabling them to harvest bodhi fruit. 
The god-king Maheśvara has a precious female attendant, Whose mouth emits various kinds of music. Each sound of music produces 100,000 tones, and Each tone in turn produces 100,000 tones. 
It is similar for a Sugata’s voice. His voice produces all tones, Which differ according to sentient beings’ natures and desires, Enabling the hearers to end their afflictions. 
The god-king Brahmā emits a sound, Which delights all Brahma gods But does not go outside them. Every Brahma god thinks that he alone hears it. 
It is similar for a Buddha, a Dharma King, Whose speaking voice fills the dharma realm. It benefits only those in His assemblies, not those outside, Because nonbelievers do not accept it. 
Various kinds of water are of the same nature, And even water_with_the_eight_virtues tastes the same. Water tastes of different flavors Because of its different places or vessels. 
It is similar for the voice of one with all wisdom-knowledge. Although dharma nature has only one flavor, Sentient beings hear different teachings Because of their different ways. 
The great dragon-king Anavatapta Pours down rains to water the earth of Jambudvīpa, Enabling trees and grass to grow, But the rainwater does not come from his body or mind. 
It is similar for a Buddha’s wondrous voice. It pours down Dharma rains to fill the dharma realm, Enabling sentient beings to stop doing evil and to do good, But His voice comes from neither inside nor outside. 
The dragon-king Manasvin, Before pouring down rains, forms clouds for seven days, Waiting for sentient beings to finish their work. Then he pours down rains to benefit them. 
He transforms sentient beings, bringing them to  maturity. Then He expounds the profound Dharma, Enabling the hearers not to be astonished or terrified. 
The dragon-king Great Magnificence lives in the ocean. He pours down 10, 100, 1,000, Or even 100,000 kinds of magnificent rains. Although the rainwater comes in only one flavor, the magnificent rains have differences. 
He expounds 10, 20, 100, 1,000, Or even countless Dharma Doors, But He never thinks about differentiating their users. 
The unexcelled dragon-king Sāgara Forms clouds that cover the four continents, Pours down different rains in different places, But never has any thought of differentiating them. 
It is similar for a Buddha, a Dharma King. He forms the cloud of great compassion that pervades everywhere in worlds in the ten directions, Pours down different Dharma rains for those who take different actions, But never differentiates them. 
**** Ten Characteristics of a Tathāgata’s Mind **** “Buddha-Sons, what should a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas know about the mind of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha? 
“Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata’s mind, intellect, and consciousness cannot be captured. You should come to know a Tathāgata’s mind through His immeasurable wisdom. “First, all things rely on the open sky, but the open sky relies on nothing. 
Similarly, all worldly and supra-worldly wisdom-knowledge relies on a Tathāgata’s wisdom, but a Tathāgata’s wisdom relies on nothing. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the first characteristic of a Tathāgata’s mind. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His mind. 
“Second, Buddha-Sons, the dharma realm sees the liberation of voicehearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and Bodhisattvas, but the dharma realm neither increases nor decreases. 
It is similar for a Tathāgata’s wisdom. It produces various kinds of worldly and supra-worldly wisdom-knowledge, but a Tathāgata’s wisdom neither increases nor decreases. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the second characteristic of a Tathāgata’s mind. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His mind. 
Yet the immense ocean never thinks, ‘I provide them with water.’ It is similar for the water in a Buddha’s ocean of wisdom. It flows into all sentient beings’ minds. If they observe their mental states and go through Dharma Doors, they will acquire radiant wisdom. Yet a Tathāgata’s ocean of wisdom is impartial and never thinks, ‘I give sentient beings wisdom.’ Because their mental activities are different, they acquire different kinds of wisdom. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the third characteristic of a Tathāgata’s mind. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His mind. 
“Fourth, Buddha-Sons, the immense ocean has four precious gems. They have countless virtues and can produce all treasures in the ocean. 
If the immense ocean did not have these gems, it could not have even one treasure. 
What are these four? 
The first is called accumulating treasures; the second is called inexhaustible store; the third is called free from burning; the fourth is called full of splendors. 
Buddha-Sons, ordinary beings, dragons, and gods cannot see these four precious gems. 
Why not? 
Because the dragon-king Sāgara keeps them in a secret place in his palace. 
“Buddha-Sons, it is similar for the ocean of great wisdom of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. It has four precious gems of great wisdom. They have immeasurable merit and wisdom, hence can produce gems of wisdom for all sentient beings, voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, those who are still learning , those who have nothing more to learn , and Bodhisattvas. 
What are these four? 
They are  the gem of great wisdom to transform sentient beings at the right times. If a Tathāgata’s ocean of great wisdom did not have these four precious gems, not even one sentient being could ride the Mahāyāna. 
However, sentient beings with a meager store of merits cannot see these four gems of great wisdom. 
Why not? 
Because they are kept in a Tathāgata’s secret store. 
Impartial, upright, pure, and superb, these four gems of wisdom can benefit all Bodhisattvas, enabling them to acquire radiant wisdom. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the fourth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s mind. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His mind. 
“Fifth, Buddha-Sons, at the bottom of the immense ocean are four jewels with glowing radiance. They are extremely hot, and can absorb the water poured in from hundreds of rivers. Hence the immense ocean neither increases nor decreases. 
What are these four? 
The first is called solar store; the second is called removing water; the third is called light of flames; the fourth is called nothing left behind. 
Buddha-Sons, if the immense ocean did not have these four jewels, all places, from the four continents to Akaniṣṭha Heaven , would be submerged. 
Buddha-Sons, when the radiance of the solar-store jewel touches ocean water, ocean water becomes milk; when the radiance of the removing-water jewel touches milk, milk becomes cream; when the radiance of the light-of-flames jewel touches cream, cream becomes butter; when the radiance of the nothing-left-behind jewel touches butter, like blazing fire burning away everything, butter becomes ghee. 
“Buddha-Sons, it is similar for a Tathāgata’s ocean of great wisdom. It has four jewels of great wisdom-knowledge. They have immeasurable virtue and radiance. 
Their light touches Bodhisattvas and enables them to acquire a Tathāgata’s great wisdom-knowledge. 
What are these four? 
The first is the jewel of great wisdom-knowledge of stopping all waves of intermittent goodness; the second is the jewel of great wisdom-knowledge of ending all love of dharmas;  the third is the jewel of great wisdom-knowledge of illuminating all with wisdom light; the fourth is the jewel of great wisdom-knowledge that equals a Tathāgata’s boundless and effortless wisdom-knowledge. 
Buddha-Sons, when Bodhisattvas train to complete all bodhi elements, they stir up countless waves of intermittent goodness that cannot be stopped by gods, asuras, or humans in the entire world. 
Then a Tathāgata uses the radiance of the jewel of great wisdom-knowledge of stopping all waves of intermittent goodness to touch these Bodhisattvas, enabling them to discard the waves and focus their minds on only one object, abiding in samādhi. 
Then He uses the radiance of the jewel of great wisdom-knowledge of ending all love of dharmas to touch these Bodhisattvas, enabling them to discard their attachment to the experience of samādhi and acquire vast transcendent powers. 
Then He uses the radiance of the jewel of great wisdom-knowledge of illuminating all with wisdom light to touch these Bodhisattvas, enabling them to relinquish their vast transcendental powers and take radiant and effortful actions. 
Then He uses the radiance of the jewel of great wisdom-knowledge that equals a Tathāgata’s boundless and effortless wisdom-knowledge to touch these Bodhisattvas, enabling them to outgrow their radiant and effortful actions and arrive on the Tathāgata ground of equality, completely ending all effort, with nothing left behind. 
BuddhaSons, unless touched by the radiance of a Tathāgata’s four jewels of great wisdom-knowledge, not even one Bodhisattva can arrive on the Tathāgata ground. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the fifth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s mind. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His mind. 
“Sixth, Buddha-Sons, between the water wheel  and Neither with Nor without Perception Heaven , a large thousandfold world, where all sentient beings reside in the desire realm, form realm, and formless realm, arises from and abides in the open sky. 
Because the open sky pervades everywhere. 
Yet the open sky, which contains the Three_Realms_of_Existence, makes no differentiations. 
Because all wisdom-knowledge, whether of voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, Bodhisattvas, saṁskṛta actions, or asaṁskṛta actions, arises from and abides in a Tathāgata’s wisdom. 
Because a Tathāgata’s wisdom pervades everywhere. 
Although it contains immeasurable wisdom-knowledge, it makes no differentiations. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the sixth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s mind. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His mind. 
“Seventh, Buddha-Sons, atop the Snow  Mountain is a great medicinal tree called endless roots. 
Its roots arise from the water wheel 168,000 yojanas below the vajra ground . 
When this medicinal tree grows its roots, it makes all trees in Jambudvīpa grow their roots. 
When it grows its stems, it makes all trees in Jambudvīpa grow their stems. 
Similarly, it grows its branches, leaves, flowers, and fruits. 
Its roots grow its stems; its stems grow its roots. Because its roots have no end, it is called endless roots. 
Buddha-Sons, this medicinal tree fosters growth everywhere, except two places, the abyss of hell and the midst of the water wheel. 
However, this tree never abandons them. 
“Buddha-Sons, it is similar for the great medicinal tree of a Tathāgata’s wisdom. It uses wisdom and all good dharmas activated and accomplished in its past to cover the realm of all sentient beings. It uses, as its roots, the vast vow of compassion to end the suffering on all evil life-paths. It uses, as its stems, firm and unwavering skillful means that arise from all Tathāgatas’ true wisdom and character-type. 
Buddha-Sons, why is this great medicinal tree of a Tathāgata’s wisdom called endless roots? 
Because it never rests and it never stops guiding Bodhisattva actions. 
Bodhisattva actions are Tathāgata nature; Tathāgata nature is Bodhisattva actions. Hence this great medicinal tree of a Tathāgata’s wisdom is called endless roots. 
“Buddha-Sons, when its roots grow, it enables all Bodhisattvas to grow their roots, i.e., to expand their great lovingkindness and compassion that never abandon sentient beings. 
When its stems grow, it enables all Bodhisattvas to grow their stems, i.e., to develop their firm, vigorous, and profound minds. 
When its branches grow, it enables all Bodhisattvas to grow their branches, i.e., to enhance their practice of all pāramitās. 
When its leaves grow, it enables all Bodhisattvas to grow their leaves, i.e., to acquire the virtues of a dhūta , who observes his precepts with purity and has little desire but much contentment. 
When its flowers bloom, it enables all Bodhisattvas to open their flowers, i.e., to be equipped with roots of goodness, excellent  marks, and adornments. 
When its fruits ripen, it enables all Bodhisattvas to harvest their fruits, i.e., to have endurance in realizing that dharmas have no birth and endurance in knowing that Buddhas have poured sweet dew on the crowns of their heads. 
Buddha-Sons, in only two places does this great medicinal tree of a Tathāgata’s wisdom fail to foster growth: the water of greed and tremendously wrong views, in which are drowned those who are not Dharma vessels and those with broken roots of goodness. 
However, this tree never abandons them. 
Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata’s wisdom neither increases nor decreases because its roots abide well and keep growing without rest. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the seventh characteristic of a Tathāgata’s mind. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His mind. 
“Eighth, Buddha-Sons, when the fire at end of the kalpa of a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold Word ignites, it burns away all grass and woods. Even the Iron Mountain Range and the Great Iron Mountain Range are burnt away with nothing left behind. 
Buddha-Sons, if someone throws some dried grass into that fire, will it fail to burn?”     “No, it will burn.”     “Buddha-Sons, even if it were possible that the dried grass would fail to burn, it is impossible that a Tathāgata’s wisdom fails to know something, because it knows all past, present, and future sentient beings, all worlds, all kalpas, and all dharmas. 
There is nothing that it does not know. 
Because a Tathāgata’s wisdom knows all things with equal clarity. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the eighth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s mind. In this way a BodhisattvaMahāsattva should know His mind. 
“Ninth, Buddha-Sons, when the wind catastrophe begins to destroy a world, a huge wind called the disintegrator rises, and it can destroy a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World because it breaks all things, including the Iron Mountain Range, into dust particles. 
Another huge wind called the blocker arises, and it can confine the disintegrator wind to a given Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World, blocking it from going to worlds in other directions. 
Buddha-Sons, without this blocker wind, all worlds in the ten directions would be destroyed. 
It is similar for a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a SamyakSaṁbuddha. He has a wind of great wisdom-knowledge called the terminator, and it can terminate all Bodhisattvas’ afflictions and habits. 
He has another wind of great wisdom-knowledge called the skillful supporter. It skillfully supports Bodhisattvas who have immature capacities, and prevents the terminator wind of great wisdom-knowledge from terminating all their afflictions and habits. 
Buddha-Sons, without a Tathāgata’s skillful-supporter wind of great wisdom knowledge, innumerable Bodhisattvas would fall onto the ground of voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas. 
Because of this wind, all Bodhisattvas are enabled to transcend the ground of the Two Vehicles, ultimately to assume the position of a Tathāgata. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the ninth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s mind. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His mind. “Tenth, Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata’s wisdom is everywhere. 
Because all sentient beings have a Tathāgata’s wisdom. However, because of their deluded perceptions, inverted views, and attachments, they do not realize it. 
If they can discard their deluded perceptions, then their  overall wisdomknowledge, innate wisdom-knowledge, and hindrance-free wisdom-knowledge will be revealed. 
It contains exhaustive records of all things about a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World, such as things about the Great Iron Mountain in a record the size of this mountain, things about the great earth in a record the size of the earth, things about a small thousandfold world in a record the size of that world, and things about a medium thousandfold world in a record the size of that world. 
This file contains records of all things about all places, whether the four continents, the immense ocean, Mount Sumeru, gods’ palaces on earth, celestial palaces in the desire realm, celestial palaces in the form realm, or celestial palaces in the formless realm, the record of every place being the size of the place. 
Although this enormous file is the size of a large thousandfold world, it abides in a tiny dust particle. 
As it is with one dust particle, so it is with all. 
Then someone with radiant wisdom and the pure god-eye sees that this file contained in a dust particle does not provide any benefit to sentient beings. He thinks, ‘I should use the power of my vigor to break that tiny dust particle and release this file, enabling it to benefit all sentient beings. Having had this thought, he breaks that dust particle and releases this great file, enabling all sentient beings to receive its benefits. 
As it is with one dust particle, so it is with all. 
“Buddha-Sons, it is similar for a Tathāgata’s wisdom. It is immeasurable and hindrance free, and can benefit all sentient beings. It is fully contained in sentient beings’ bodies. 
However, the ordinary and the foolish have attachments and deluded perceptions, and neither know it nor are aware of it, so they cannot receive its benefits. 
Then a Tathāgata observes all sentient beings in the dharma realm with His hindrance-free pure wisdom-eye and speaks these words: ‘Amazing! Amazing! 
Why do these sentient beings, deluded and confused, not know and not see that they have a Tathāgata’s wisdom? 
I will teach them the holy path, enabling them to discard forever their attachments and deluded perceptions. Then they will be able to see within themselves vast Tathāgata wisdom, no different from a Buddha’s.’ Then He teaches sentient beings to train on the holy path, enabling them to discard their deluded perceptions. 
After discarding their deluded perceptions, they realize their immeasurable Tathāgata wisdom, benefit all others, and bring them peace and joy. 
Buddha-Sons, this is the tenth characteristic of a Tathāgata’s mind. In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know His mind. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, through such immeasurable, hindrance-free, inconceivable, and vast characteristics, can know the mind of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha.”     Then, to restate his meaning, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva spoke in verse: 
To know a Buddha’s mind, You should observe a Buddha’s wisdom. 
Bodhisattvas’ applied wisdom-knowledge and Sentient beings’ various pleasures Rely on Buddha wisdom, But Buddha wisdom relies on nothing. 
The dharma realm sees The liberation of voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and Buddhas, But the dharma realm neither increases nor decreases. 
It is similar for a Buddha’s wisdom. It produces all wisdom-knowledge, But it neither increases nor decreases, And has neither birth nor death. 
As water flows under the ground, Those who seek water will get it. Water has neither thinking nor ending, But it is useful everywhere in the ten directions. 
It is similar for a Buddha’s wisdom, Which is fully contained in sentient beings’ minds. Those who diligently train for bodhi Will quickly acquire radiant wisdom. 
A dragon-king has four gems That can produce all treasures. They are kept in a deep and secret place, And cannot be seen by ordinary beings. 
It is similar for a Buddha’s four kinds of wisdom-knowledge That produce all other kinds of wisdom-knowledge. No one can see them, Except great Bodhisattvas. 
The ocean has four jewels That can absorb all water, Enabling the ocean not to overflow Or to increase or decrease. 
It is similar for a Tathāgata’s wisdom. It can stop all waves  and end all love of dharmas. It is vast and boundless, And can give birth to Buddhas and Bodhisattvas. 
Between the water wheel and the top heaven in the formless realm, The desire realm, the form realm, and the formless realm Rely on the open sky, But the open sky makes no differentiations. 
The wisdom-knowledge of voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, And Bodhisattvas Relies on a Buddha’s wisdom, But a Buddha’s wisdom makes no differentiations. 
The medicinal tree in the Snow Mountain Is called endless roots. It can make all trees Grow their roots, stems, leaves, flowers, and fruits. 
It is similar for a Buddha’s wisdom, Which is born from the Tathāgata seed. After it is revealed, It produces Bodhisattva actions. 
Suppose someone throws dried grass Into the fire blazing at the end of a kalpa, Which burns even the Vajra Mountain down to nothing. How can the dried grass fail to burn? 
Even if it were possible that the grass would fail to burn, It is impossible that a Buddha fails to know something. He knows all past, present, and future sentient beings, In all kalpas and in all worlds. 
At the end of a kalpa arises a wind called the disintegrator, Which can destroy a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World. 
If it were not blocked by another wind, It could destroy countless worlds. 
It is similar for a Tathāgata’s wind of great wisdom-knowledge That terminates Bodhisattvas’ afflictions. 
There is an enormous file The size of a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World. As it is contained in one dust particle, So it is contained in all dust particles. 
A wise man with the pure god-eye Sees it clearly. He breaks the dust particle and releases the file To benefit all sentient beings. 
It is similar for a Buddha’s wisdom, Which pervades sentient beings’ minds. Sentient beings, fettered by their deluded perceptions, Neither know it nor are aware of it. 
Out of great lovingkindness and compassion, Buddhas enable sentient beings to end their deluded perceptions, Reveal their Buddha wisdom, And benefit all others. 
*** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 51 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  *** **** Notes ****     1. See “eighteen_heavens_in_the_form_realm” in the glossary. A similar description of the destruction of a world is given in the Sūtra of the Upāsaka Precepts fascicle 7 . 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who has acquired hindrance-free wisdom knows that the state of a Tathāgata is the state of the entire world, the state of the three time frames , the state of all worlds, the state of all dharmas, the state of all sentient beings, the state of differentiation-free true_suchness, the state of the hindrance-free dharma_realm, the state of boundless true reality, the state of the immeasurable open sky, and the state of no state. 
Buddha-Sons, as these states, from the state of the entire world and the state of the three time frames to the state of no state, are immeasurable, so too is the state of a Tathāgata. 
As the state of no state contains nothing everywhere, so too does the state of a Tathāgata. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know that the state of a Tathāgata is the state of one’s mind. 
As the state of one’s mind is immeasurable and boundless, with neither bondage nor liberation, so too the state of a Tathāgata is immeasurable and boundless, with neither bondage nor liberation. 
Because through thinking and differentiation, immeasurable things manifest. 
“Buddha-Sons, a great dragon-king follows his mind to pour down rains, and the rains come from neither inside nor outside. 
Likewise a Tathāgata follows His thinking and differentiation, and immeasurable things manifest. They do not come from anywhere  in the ten_directions. 
Buddha-Sons, the water in the immense ocean arises from the power of the dragon-king’s mind. 
Likewise Buddha-Tathāgatas’ ocean of all wisdom-knowledge arises from Their past great vows. 
Buddha-Sons, the ocean of all wisdom-knowledge is immeasurable, boundless, inconceivable, and ineffable. 
However, I will briefly describe it with an analogy. You should hearken. 
“Buddha-Sons, in Jambudvīpa , 2,500 rivers flow into the immense ocean; in Aparagodānīya , 5,000 rivers flow into the immense ocean; in Pūrvavideha , 7,500 rivers flow into the immense ocean; in Uttarakuru , 10,000 rivers flow into the immense ocean. 
Buddha-Sons, on these four continents, 25,000 rivers continuously flow into the immense ocean. 
Is the water not copious?”     “Very copious.”     “Buddha-Sons, the dragon-king Ten Beams of Light pours into the immense ocean twice the amount of water poured by all those rivers. 
The dragon-king Hundred Beams of Light pours into the immense ocean twice the amount of water poured by Ten Beams of Light. 
Moreover, there are eighty koṭi great dragonkings, such as the dragon-kings Great Magnificence, Manasvin , Thunder Rumble, Nanda, Upananda, Immeasurable Radiance, Timely Rain, Great Victory, and Great Thrust. One after another, they pour down rains into the immense ocean, each dragon-king pouring twice the amount of water poured by the preceding dragon-king. 
The dragon-king Sāgara’s  crown prince, Jambū Banner, pours into the immense ocean twice the amount of water poured by the last of those dragon-kings. 
“Buddha-Sons, the water that flows into the immense ocean from the palace of the dragon-king Ten Beams of Light is twice the amount poured by Jambū Banner. 
The water that flows into the immense ocean from the palace of the dragon-king Hundred Beams of Light is twice the amount from the palace of Ten Beams of Light. 
The eighty koṭi great dragon-kings, such as the dragon-kings Great Magnificence, Manasvin, Thunder Rumble, Nanda, Upananda, Immeasurable Radiance, Timely Rain, Great Victory, and Great Thrust, live in their own palaces. The water that flows into the immense ocean from each palace is twice the amount from its preceding palace. 
The water that flows into the ocean from the palace of the dragon-king Sāgara’s crown prince, Jambū Banner, is twice the amount from the palace of the last of those dragon-kings. 
The dragon-king Sāgara pours into the immense ocean twice the amount of water that flows from Jambū Banner’s palace. 
The water that flows into the immense ocean from Sāgara’s palace is twice the amount poured by him. 
This water is violet in color and surges according to a schedule. That is why ocean tides are regular. 
Buddha-Sons, such an immense ocean contains immeasurable water, countless treasures, and innumerable sentient beings. 
The great earth it relies on is also immeasurable. Buddha-Sons, what is your opinion? 
Is this ocean immeasurable?”     “It is immeasurable, beyond analogy.”     “Buddha-Sons, the immeasurability of this immense ocean is less than one hundredth, one thousandth, and even one upaniṣadth  of the immeasurability of a Tathāgata’s ocean of wisdom. 
Analogies can be made according to sentient beings’ minds, but a Buddha’s state is beyond analogy. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know that a Tathāgata’s ocean of wisdom is immeasurable because He has taken all Bodhisattva actions ceaselessly since His initial activation of the bodhi_mind; he should know that a Tathāgata has accumulated immeasurable treasures because all bodhi elements  and the seeds of the Three_Jewels never end; he should know that a Tathāgata benefits innumerable sentient beings because Pratyekabuddhas, voicehearers, those who are still learning , and those who have nothing more to learn , appreciate the Dharma; he should know that the abiding grounds revealed by a Tathāgata are immeasurable because Bodhisattvas abide on these grounds, from the first ground, the Joyful Ground, to the ultimate hindrance-free ground . 
Buddha-Sons, to develop immeasurable wisdom and benefit all sentient beings, in this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know the state of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a SamyakSaṁbuddha.”     Then, to restate his meaning, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva spoke in verse: 
As the state of one’s mind is immeasurable, So too is the state of a Buddha. As the state of one’s mind arises from consciousness, One should observe the state of a Buddha through the state of one’s mind. 
A dragon-king that does not leave its own place Pours down massive rains through the power of his mind. The rainwater that comes from nowhere and goes to nowhere Falls copiously according to the dragon-king’s mind. Likewise a Buddha, who has the Ten_powers, Comes from nowhere and goes to nowhere. 
To those with pure minds, He appears In a body the size of the dharma realm, which can enter a pore. 
As the ocean’s treasures are immeasurable, So too are its sentient beings and the great earth. Although ocean water comes in only one_flavor, Sentient beings that live in it receive various benefits. 
It is similar for a Tathāgata’s ocean of wisdom Because it is immeasurable. Those who are still learning, those who have nothing more to learn, And those who abide on the Bodhisattva grounds receive its benefits. 
**** A Tathāgata’s Actions **** “Buddha-Sons, what should a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva know about the actions of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha? 
“Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata’s actions are hindrance-free actions and actions of true suchness. 
Buddha-Sons, as true suchness was not born in the past, will not change in the future, and does not arise in the present, likewise a Tathāgata’s actions have no birth, no change, and no arising. 
As the dharma realm is neither measurable nor immeasurable because it is formless, likewise a Tathāgata’s actions are neither measurable nor immeasurable because they are formless. 
“Buddha-Sons, suppose a bird flies in the sky for a hundred years. The areas of the sky it has traversed and has not traversed are immeasurable. 
Because the open sky has no boundaries. 
It is similar for a Tathāgata’s actions. Suppose someone speaks for 100,000 koṭi nayuta kalpas. What he has revealed and has not revealed is immeasurable. 
Because a Tathāgata’s actions have no boundaries. 
Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha, takes hindrance-free actions, which abide nowhere. He displays His actions to all sentient beings, and enables those who see them to leave all paths laden with hindrances. 
“Buddha-Sons, the golden-winged king of birds circles in the open sky. Using its keen eye, it observes dragon palaces in the ocean. With great valor and strength, it uses its wings to stir up and part the ocean water. Then it snatches male and female dragons whose lives are ending. 
He persistently takes hindrance-free actions. Using His pure Buddha-eye, He observes all sentient beings in their places in the dharma realm, looking for those with mature roots_of_goodness. Boldly using His Ten Powers, He uses His two wings, śamatha and vipaśyanā, to part the water of love  in the ocean of birth and death. Then He snatches those with mature roots of goodness and settles them in the Buddha Dharma, enabling them to end all deluded perceptions and ludicrous_statements, and to take a Tathāgata’s actions, which are free from differentiation and hindrance. 
“Buddha-Sons, the sun and the moon have no companions. As they travel across the open sky, benefiting sentient beings, they never think, ‘I come from somewhere and go to somewhere.’ Likewise the nature of Buddha-Tathāgatas has always been nirvāṇa, free from differentiation. They display their travels throughout all dharma realms. To benefit sentient beings, They do Buddha work without rest. 
‘I come from there and go to there.’ Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should use such immeasurable skillful means and immeasurable characteristics to know the actions of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha.”     Then, to restate his meaning, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva spoke in verse: 
As true suchness has neither birth nor death, Nor location, and cannot be seen, Likewise a Tathāgata’s actions Transcend the three time frames and are immeasurable. 
As the dharma realm is neither a realm nor not a realm, Neither measurable nor immeasurable, Likewise a Tathāgata’s actions Are neither measurable nor immeasurable because He has no body. 
Suppose a bird flies for a thousand koṭi years. The open sky before and after its flight remains the same. 
Likewise, suppose someone expounds a Tathāgata’s actions for kalpas, What he has expounded and has not expounded is immeasurable. 
A golden-winged bird hovers in the sky, observing the immense ocean. Then it parts the water and snatches male and female dragons. 
Likewise a Buddha, who has the Ten Powers, snatches those with roots of goodness Out of the ocean of karmic existence and ends their delusions. 
The sun and the moon travel across the open sky, Illuminating all without differentiation. 
Likewise a Tathāgata travels throughout the dharma realm, Teaching sentient beings without differentiating them. 
**** A Tathāgata’s True Enlightenment **** “Buddha-Sons, what should a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva know about the true enlightenment of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha? 
“Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata has attained  true enlightenment because He knows all dharmas and has no doubts about the equality of dharmas. He has attained unsurpassed enlightenment, which has no appearance, no action, no regress, no measure, and no limit, free from opposites and abiding in the Middle Way . He knows all sentient beings’ mental activities, natures, desires, and preferences. 
In one thought He knows all dharmas in the past, present, and future. 
“Buddha-Sons, the immense ocean can faithfully reflect the physical images of all sentient beings on the four continents, so it is called the immense ocean. 
Likewise Buddha bodhi reflects all sentient beings’ thoughts, natures, desires, and preferences, but does not display anything. Therefore, it is called Buddha bodhi. 
Buddha-Sons, Buddha bodhi cannot be described by words, expressed by sounds, or explained by languages, but can be revealed through skillful means to those ready to be taught. 
“Buddha-Sons, when a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a SamyakSaṁbuddha, attains true enlightenment, He acquires a body that equals all sentient beings, all dharmas, all worlds, all three time frames, all Buddhas, all languages, all vows, all actions, true suchness, the dharma realm, the domain of space, the hindrance-free realm, and the realm of nirvāṇa. 
BuddhaSons, as He acquires such a body, so too He acquires such a voice and such a mind. 
He acquires countless such pure three wheels .     “Buddha-Sons, when a Tathāgata attains true enlightenment, in His body He sees all sentient beings activate the bodhi mind, train in Bodhisattva actions, attain true enlightenment, and even enter parinirvāṇa. 
These events have the same nature, i.e., no self-essence. Therefore, dharmas have no appearance, no end, no birth, and no death. All dharmas, such as a self, a sentient being, the dharma realm, the open sky, bodhi, and attainment of bodhi, have no selfessence. 
Knowing that all dharmas have no self-essence, He acquires all wisdomknowledge and endless great compassion to deliver sentient beings. 
“Buddha-Sons, the open sky neither increases nor decreases, whether worlds form or perish. 
Because the open sky has no birth. 
Likewise Buddha bodhi neither increases nor decreases, whether anyone attains or does not attain true enlightenment. 
Because bodhi is beyond appearance and no appearance, one and many. 
Buddha-Sons, suppose someone can manifest minds as numerous as the sands of the Ganges, and every mind manifests Buddhas as numerous as the sands of the Ganges, who have no form, no shape, and no appearance. He does so without rest for kalpas as numerous as the sands of the Ganges. 
Buddha-Sons, what is your opinion. 
How many minds and Buddhas has he manifested?”     Wondrous Virtues Arising from Tathāgata Nature Bodhisattva answered, “According to my understanding of your meaning, there is no difference between what he manifests and what he does not manifest. 
Why do you ask me about their numbers?”     Samantabhadra Bodhisattva said, “Very good, very good! 
Buddha-Son, truly as you say, if all sentient beings attain true enlightenment in one thought, bodhi remains the same as when no one attains true enlightenment. 
Because bodhi has no appearance. 
If it has no appearance, it neither increases nor decreases. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know that attainment of samyak-saṁbodhi is the same as bodhi in the one_appearance of no appearance. 
When a Tathāgata attains true enlightenment through skillful means, He enters the Samādhi of Perfect Enlightenment. 
After He has entered this samādhi, His vast body of true enlightenment manifests in itself bodies as numerous as all sentient beings. 
As one vast body of true enlightenment does so, so too do all vast bodies of true enlightenment. 
Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata has countless doors for attaining true enlightenment. Therefore, the bodies He manifests are countless. 
Because they are countless, a Tathāgata’s bodies constitute an immeasurable realm, which equals the realm of sentient beings. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know that contained in a pore on a Tathāgata’s body are Buddha bodies as numerous as sentient beings. 
Because a Tathāgata has acquired the enlightenment body with neither birth nor death. 
As it is with one pore, so it is with all pores. Know that there is not even a little place where there is no Buddha body. 
Because a Tathāgata has attained true enlightenment, which pervades everywhere. 
Using His ability and power, seated on the lion throne under the bodhi tree in His bodhimaṇḍa, He attains samyak-saṁbodhi in His various bodies. 
Buddha-Sons, a BodhisattvaMahāsattva should know that, in his mind, thought after thought, there are Buddhas attaining true enlightenment. 
Because Buddha-Tathāgatas’ attainment of true enlightenment is never apart from one’s mind. 
As it is so in one’s own mind, so too in all sentient beings’ minds there are Tathāgatas endlessly attaining true enlightenment everywhere without rest and entering the Dharma Door of inconceivable skillful means. 
Buddha-Sons, in this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know a Tathāgata’s true enlightenment.”     Then, to restate his meaning, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva spoke in verse: A Tathāgata knows that all dharmas Are equal, free from duality. Their true nature is as pure as the open sky, Free from differentiation between self and non-self. 
Because the ocean reflects sentient beings’ bodies, It is called the immense ocean. 
Because bodhi reflects all sentient beings’ mental activities, It is called true enlightenment. 
As worlds form and perish, The open sky neither increases nor decreases. 
As all Buddhas appear in worlds, Bodhi remains in the one appearance of no appearance. 
Suppose someone manifests minds, which manifest Buddhas. Manifestation and no manifestation are no different in nature. 
Suppose all sentient beings attain bodhi at the same time. Bodhi neither increases nor decreases, whether or not anyone attains bodhi. 
Under the bodhi tree, a Buddha enters The Samādhi of Perfect Enlightenment. He emits beams of light as numerous as sentient beings, Enlightening all sentient beings, like lotus flowers blooming. 
Manifested in His body are The three time frames, kalpas, worlds, and sentient beings, And their thoughts, faculties, and desires. Therefore, true enlightenment is called immeasurable. 
**** A Tathāgata’s Turning of the Dharma Wheel **** “Buddha-Sons, what should a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva know about a Tathāgata’s turning of the Dharma wheel? 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know that a Tathāgata uses His mind’s commanding power, which neither arises nor turns anything, to turn the Dharma wheel, because all dharmas never arise; He uses the three turnings  that end what should be ended to turn the Dharma wheel, because He knows that all dharmas are free from diametric views ; He transcends dharmas in or not in any states to turn the Dharma wheel, because He realizes the emptiness of all dharmas; He turns the Dharma wheel without using words, because He knows that no dharma can be described; He enters nirvāṇa to turn the Dharma wheel, because He knows that the true nature of all dharmas is nirvāṇa; He uses all words and all languages to turn the Dharma wheel, because a Tathāgata’s voice reaches everywhere; He uses His knowledge that sounds are like echoes to turn the Dharma wheel, because He knows the true reality of dharmas; He voices one tone that produces all tones to turn the Dharma wheel, because He has no master; He faultlessly and endlessly turns the Dharma wheel, because He has no attachments, inside or outside. 
“Buddha-Sons, all words and languages continue without end throughout future kalpas. 
Likewise a Buddha’s turning of the Dharma wheel, established and expressed with words, continues without interruption, without end. 
Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata’s Dharma wheel pervades all words and languages, but abides nowhere. 
Words are used in all matters, all languages, and all calculations in all worldly and supra-worldly spheres, but abide nowhere. 
Likewise a Tathāgata’s voice reaches all places, all sentient beings, all dharmas, all karmas, and all karmic requitals, but abides nowhere. 
All sentient beings’ various languages are encompassed in the sound of a Tathāgata’s Dharma wheel. 
Because all sounds are the sound of the Dharma wheel. 
Buddha-Sons, in this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know a Tathāgata’s turning of the Dharma wheel. 
“Moreover, Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who wants to know a Tathāgata’s turning of the Dharma wheel should know the source of the Dharma wheel. 
What is the source of a Tathāgata’s Dharma wheel? 
Buddha-Sons, it is sentient beings’ countless different preferences and mental activities, following which a Tathāgata voices certain tones to turn the Dharma wheel. 
After He has entered this samādhi, the mouth of every one of His bodies of true enlightenment emits speech sounds as numerous as all sentient beings, every sound producing myriad different tones. 
In this way He turns the Dharma wheel, delighting all sentient beings. “If someone knows that the Dharma wheel is turned in this way, he follows the Buddha Dharma. 
If he does not know it, he is not following the Buddha Dharma. 
Buddha-Sons, in this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know that a Tathāgata turns the Dharma wheel to enter everywhere in the realm of innumerable sentient beings.”     Then, to restate his meaning, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva spoke in verse: As a Tathāgata turns the Dharma wheel throughout the three time frames, His turning is no turning, and the three time frames neither arise nor can be captured. As words continue to be used without end, Likewise a Buddha’s Dharma wheel turns without end. 
As words enter everywhere and arrive at nowhere, So too does a Buddha’s Dharma wheel. Entering all speech sounds, it enters nowhere, But can delight all sentient beings. 
A Buddha has a samādhi called Ultimate Fearlessness and Freedom from Hindrance. After entering this samādhi, He expounds the Dharma. Although sentient beings are innumerable, He voices tones and enables them to understand . 
Every tone produces Countless different speech tones. The one with great command in the world makes no differentiations, But enables all to hear His voice according to their preferences. 
Words come from neither inside nor outside. They neither are lost nor accumulate. It is amazing that a Buddha turns the Dharma wheel to benefit sentient beings, With such extraordinary ease! 
**** A Tathāgata’s Parinirvāṇa **** “Buddha-Sons, what should a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva know about the parinirvāṇa of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha? 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who wants to know a Tathāgata’s great parinirvāṇa should know the root nature . 
The nirvāṇa of a Tathāgata is the nirvāṇa of true suchness, the nirvāṇa of true reality, the nirvāṇa of the dharma realm, the nirvāṇa of the domain of space, the nirvāṇa of dharma nature, the nirvāṇa of the desire-free state, the nirvāṇa of the appearance-free state, the nirvāṇa of the selves , and the nirvāṇa of dharma nature. Why? 
Because nirvāṇa is not a dharma subject to birth or death. 
If a dharma has no birth, then it has no death, nor does it go away somewhere. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata does not describe to Bodhisattvas how Tathāgatas enter nirvāṇa. Nor does He display to them such an event. 
Because He wants them to see all Tathāgatas always present before them and to see in one thought all past and future Buddhas, in perfect physical appearances, as if in the present, without perceiving them as same or different. 
Because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should discard his attachment to perceptions for good. 
“Buddha-Sons, to delight sentient beings, Buddha-Tathāgatas appear in worlds; to make sentient beings admire and think of Them, They demonstrate entering nirvāṇa. 
In truth, a Tathāgata neither leaves the world nor enters nirvāṇa. 
Because a Tathāgata always abides in the pure dharma realm, although He demonstrates entering nirvāṇa according to sentient beings’ minds. 
“Buddha-Sons, the sun rises, and illuminates everywhere in the world. Its reflection, neither coming nor going, appears everywhere in pure water contained in all vessels, except broken vessels. 
Buddha-Sons, what is your opinion? Is it the sun’s fault that its reflection fails to appear in such vessels?”     “No, it is not the sun’s fault. 
Those vessels are broken.”     “Buddha-Sons, likewise a Tathāgata, a wisdom sun, neither coming nor going, appears everywhere in the dharma realm. He appears in all sentient beings’ clean mind-vessels. A clean mind-vessel always sees Him; a tainted or broken mind-vessel does not see Him. 
Buddha-Sons, if there are sentient beings that should be delivered through  nirvāṇa, a Tathāgata demonstrates  nirvāṇa for them. In truth, a Tathāgata has neither birth nor death, nor parinirvāṇa. 
“Buddha-Sons, fire does its work in the entire world. 
If fire in one place is extinguished—what is your opinion?—does it mean that fire everywhere in the entire world is extinguished?”     “No.”     “Buddha-Sons, likewise a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a SamyakSaṁbuddha, does Buddha work in all worlds. 
If he has completed His work in one world and demonstrates entering nirvāṇa, does it mean that Buddha-Tathāgatas in all worlds enter nirvāṇa? 
Buddha-Sons, in this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know the great parinirvāṇa of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. 
“Buddha-Sons, a magician skilled in conjuration uses his magic power to conjure bodies in cities and villages in all worlds in a Three-Thousand_Large Thousandfold_World, and to sustain them for kalpas. 
However, in places where he has ended his show, he discards his conjured bodies. 
Buddha-Sons, what is your opinion? 
If that great magician discards his body conjured in one place, does it mean that he discards all such bodies conjured in all places?”     “No.”     “Buddha-Sons, likewise a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a SamyakSaṁbuddha, who has immeasurable wisdom and skillful means, and knows various magic tricks, manifests bodies everywhere in the entire dharma realm, and enables them to abide throughout the future. 
He may finish his work in one place and demonstrate entering nirvāṇa according to sentient beings’ minds. 
Can you say that His demonstration of entering nirvāṇa in one place means His entering nirvāṇa everywhere? 
Buddha-Sons, in this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know the great parinirvāṇa of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. 
“Moreover, Buddha-Sons, when a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha, demonstrates entering nirvāṇa, He enters the Motionless Samādhi. 
After he has entered this samādhi, every one of His bodies emits countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of huge beams of light. In every beam of light appear an asaṁkhyeya lotus flowers. Every lotus flower has an ineffable number of stamens made of wonderful treasures. Standing on every stamen is a lion throne. 
If sentient beings with mature roots of goodness see a Buddha’s body, they will accept His teachings. 
Every Buddha body abides throughout the future and delivers all sentient beings at the right times. 
Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata’s body has no location and is neither real nor unreal. Through the power of His original vows, it appears to sentient beings ready to be delivered. 
In this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know the great parinirvāṇa of a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata abides in the immeasurable, hindrance-free, and ultimate dharma realm, the domain of space, true suchness, dharma nature, and true reality, and has neither birth nor death, but He may appear to sentient beings at any time. 
Sustained by His original vows, He never rests and never abandons any sentient beings, any worlds, or any dharmas.”     Then, to restate his meaning, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva spoke in verse: The sun illuminates the dharma realm, But its reflection does not appear in broken vessels without water. 
Likewise sentient beings without faith See a supreme wisdom sun enter parinirvāṇa . 
Fire does its work in the entire world, But sometimes it may be extinguished in a city. 
A supreme one among men does Buddha work throughout the dharma realm, But He demonstrates entering parinirvāṇa in a place where His work is finished. 
A magician conjures bodies in all worlds, But ends his show in a particular place. 
Likewise a Buddha enters parinirvāṇa after His work is finished in one world, But He is seen in other worlds. 
A Buddha has a samādhi called Motionless. After delivering sentient beings, He enters this samādhi. In one thought, His body emits countless beams of light. In every beam of light appear countless lotus flowers, and seated upon every flower is a Buddha. 
These countless Buddha bodies pervade the dharma realm, And can be seen by fortunate sentient beings. Every one of these countless bodies Has a lifespan and excellent adornments. 
As dharmas have no birth, a Buddha appears. As dharmas have no death, a Buddha enters parinirvāṇa. The whole meaning is complete and unequaled, Beyond words and analogies. 
**** Planting Roots of Goodness under a Tathāgata **** “Buddha-Sons, what should a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva know about one’s roots of goodness planted by seeing, hearing, or staying close to a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha? 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know that one’s roots of goodness planted by seeing, hearing, or staying close to a Tathāgata are true because they enable one to develop endless bodhi wisdom, remove all hindrances and difficulties, definitely bring the ultimate liberation, and fulfill all wishes; because they enable one not to end saṁskṛta actions, but to follow the wisdom-knowledge  of that which is asaṁskṛta, develop Buddha wisdom throughout the future, complete all kinds of excellent actions, and arrive on the ground of effortless wisdom-knowledge. 
“Buddha-Sons, suppose someone swallows a little vajra . It cannot be digested, and must pass through his body to exit. 
Vajra does not stay in a physical body filled with impurities. 
Likewise the few roots of goodness planted under a Tathāgata must pass through a body filled with afflictions that drive saṁskṛta actions, in order to arrive at the ultimate place of the wisdom-knowledge of that which is asaṁskṛta. 
Because roots of goodness, however few, do not coexist with afflictions and saṁskṛta actions driven by afflictions. 
“Buddha-Sons, suppose dried grass is piled high like Mount Sumeru. If a fire as small as a mustard seed is thrown into this pile, it will be burnt away. 
Because it is the nature of fire to burn. 
Likewise a few roots of goodness planted under a Tathāgata definitely can burn away all afflictions so that one will ultimately enter the nirvāṇa without remnant. Why? 
Because it is the nature of roots of goodness, however few, to reach the ultimate goal. 
“Buddha-Sons, in the snow mountain is a medicinal tree called good sight. 
Whoever sees it gains a pure sense of sight; whoever hears about it gains a pure sense of hearing; whoever smells it gains a pure sense of smell; whoever tastes it gains a pure sense of taste; whoever touches it gains a pure sense of touch; whoever takes some of its soil can cure his illnesses. 
Buddha-Sons, likewise a Tathāgata, also called an Arhat and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha, who is a supreme medicine king, can do anything to benefit sentient beings. 
Whoever sees His physical body gains pure eyes; whoever hears His name gains pure ears; whoever smells the fragrance of His precepts gains a pure nose; whoever tastes the flavor of His Dharma gains a pure tongue, which becomes broad and long, and speaks all languages; whoever touches His radiance gains a pure body and will ultimate realize the unsurpassed dharma body; whoever thinks of Him attains the Samādhi of Thinking of Buddhas. 
Whoever makes offerings to the ground walked by a Tathāgata or to His memorial pagodas  acquires roots of goodness, ends the trouble of his afflictions, and experiences the joy experienced by sages and holies. 
“Buddha-Sons, I now tell you this. If sentient beings see or hear a Buddha, though they do not elicit faith or delight because they are fettered by karmahindrances, they still plant their roots of goodness without fail and will ultimately enter nirvāṇa. 
Buddha-Sons, in this way a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should know that one’s roots of goodness planted by seeing, hearing, or staying close to a Tathāgata are free from all evil dharmas and imbued with good dharmas. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata uses analogies to explain various things, but no analogy can explain this Dharma Door. 
Because it is inconceivable to the way of one’s intellect. 
Buddhas and Bodhisattvas, according to sentient beings’ minds, delight them with analogies, which are not definitive explanations. 
“Buddha-Sons, this Dharma Door is called a Tathāgata’s secret place; it is called unknowable to the world; it is called entering the Tathāgata seal; it is called opening the door of great wisdom-knowledge; it is called revealing the Tathāgata character-type; it is called bringing all Bodhisattvas to achievement; it is called indestructible in the world; it is called always in accord with a Tathāgata’s state; it is called able to purify the realm of all sentient beings; it is called the inconceivable ultimate dharma that reveals a Tathāgata’s root nature. 
Buddha-Sons, a Tathāgata does not expound this Dharma Door to all sentient beings, but only to Bodhisattvas, who ride the Mahāyāna, the inconceivable vehicle. 
This Dharma Door does not fall into the hands of all sentient beings, but only into those of Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Wheel-Turning_King owns seven treasures, which prove that he is a Wheel-Turning King. These treasures will fall only into the hands of his crown prince, who, born from the queen, bears distinctive features to become a Wheel-Turning King. 
If the Wheel-Turning King did not have his crown prince with such virtues, then within seven days of his death his treasures would vanish. 
Buddha-Sons, likewise this precious sūtra falls only into the hands of a Dharma King’s true sons, who have been born into the Tathāgata family and planted roots of goodness to acquire a Tathāgata’s appearance. 
Buddha-Sons, without these true Buddha-sons, this Dharma Door will soon vanish. 
Because no rider of the Two_Vehicles hears this sūtra, much less accepts, upholds, reads and recites, copies, or expounds it. 
Only BodhisattvaMahāsattvas can do these things. 
Therefore, when a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva hears this Dharma Door, he should feel great joy and accept it with the highest esteem and reverence. 
Because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who believes and delights in this sūtra will soon attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
“Buddha-Sons, suppose for countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of kalpas, a Bodhisattva practices the six_pāramitās and trains to complete various bodhi elements. 
If he has not heard this Dharma Door of immeasurable, inconceivable hindrance-free wisdom or, after hearing it, he does not believe, understand, follow, or enter it, he is not called a true Bodhisattva because he cannot be born into the Tathāgata family. Suppose someone comes to hear this Dharma Door and, after hearing it, he believes, understands, follows, and enters it. 
Know that this person is born into the Tathāgata family, in accord with a Tathāgata’s state, and equipped with Bodhisattva dharmas, and that he abides in the sphere of all wisdom-knowledge, turns away from all worldly dharmas, supports a Tathāgata’s actions, understands the nature of all Bodhisattva dharmas, has no doubts about a Buddha’s command , abides on the teacher-free ground, and goes deep into a Tathāgata’s hindrance-free state. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who has heard this Dharma Door can use the wisdom-knowledge of equality  to know countless dharmas; can use his upright mind to make no differentiations ; can use his excellent aspirations to see Buddhas at once; can use the power of his will to enter the domain of impartial space; can use his commanding thought to travel throughout the boundless dharma realm; can use the power of his wisdom to do all virtuous works; can use his innate wisdom-knowledge  to turn away from all impurities in the world; can use the bodhi mind to enter webs of worlds in the ten directions; can use the power of his vast observation powers to know that past, present, and future Buddhas have the same nature; can use his wisdom-knowledge to transfer his roots of goodness to entering such dharmas without entering them; can use one dharma to observe all dharmas without attachment to even one dharma. 
Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who has accomplished such virtuous works acquires, with little effort, the teacher-free innate wisdom-knowledge.”     Then, to restate his meaning, Samantabhadra Bodhisattva spoke in verse: 
Someone swallows a little vajra, but It can never be digested and must exit his body. 
The merit acquired by making offerings to Buddhas Enables one to eradicate one’s afflictions and acquire vajra wisdom knowledge. 
Although a pile of dried grass is as tall as Mount Sumeru, A fire as tiny as a mustard seed will burn it away. 
The little merit acquired by making offerings to Buddhas Definitely will enable one to eradicate one’s afflictions and attain nirvāṇa. 
In the snow mountain is a medicinal tree called good sight. Those who see, hear about, smell, or touch it have their illnesses cured. 
Those who see a Buddha or hear His teachings Acquire excellent merit and Buddha wisdom. 
**** Displays of the Earth and the Sky **** Then, through the Buddha’s spiritual power, as the way things naturally are, a million koṭi nayuta ineffable worlds in each of the ten directions moved in six different ways: lifting in the east, sinking in the west; lifting in the west, sinking in the east; lifting in the south, sinking in the north; lifting in the north, sinking in the south; lifting at the edges, sinking in the middle; lifting in the middle, sinking at the edges. 
These movements displayed eighteen characteristics: moving, everywhere moving, everywhere equally moving; rising, everywhere rising, everywhere equally rising; lifting, everywhere lifting, everywhere equally lifting; quaking, everywhere quaking, everywhere equally quaking; roaring, everywhere roaring, everywhere equally roaring; knocking, everywhere knocking, everywhere equally knocking. 
The sky rained down, like clouds, all kinds of adornments, such as flowers, canopies, banners, cylindrical banners, fragrances, chaplets, solid perfumes, radiant jewels, and other things, that surpassed their celestial counterparts. It formed clouds, such as clouds of Bodhisattvas’ praises, clouds of ineffable Bodhisattvas in different bodies, clouds that displayed attainment of true enlightenment, clouds that purified inconceivable worlds, and clouds of Tathāgatas’ speech sounds, pervading the boundless dharma realm. 
The Tathāgata’s spiritual power was displayed in this way on the four continents  to delight Bodhisattvas, and the same transpired throughout all worlds in the ten directions. 
**** Testimony of Other Bodhisattvas **** Meanwhile, from everywhere beyond worlds as numerous as the dust particles in eight million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands, Tathāgatas as numerous as the dust particles in eight million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands, who were all called Samantabhadra, appeared before Samantabhadra Bodhisattva and said, “Very good, Buddha-Son! 
Through the Buddha’s awesome power, in accord with dharma nature, you have expounded this inconceivable dharma of a Tathāgata’s appearance. 
Buddha-Son, we Buddhas with the same name, who are as numerous as the dust particles in eight million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands, also expound this dharma. 
Whatever we expound, the same do all Buddhas in worlds in the ten directions. 
Buddha-Son, in this assembly, Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas as numerous as the dust particles in 100,000 Buddha Lands have acquired all transcendental powers and samādhis of a Bodhisattva. 
We bestow upon them the prophecy of attaining anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi in their next life. 
Moreover, sentient beings as numerous as the dust particles in a Buddha Land have activated the anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi_mind. 
We bestow upon them the prophecy that, after kalpas as numerous as the dust particles in an ineffable number of Buddha Lands, they will become Buddhas and assume the same name, Superb Buddha State. 
To enable future Bodhisattvas to hear this dharma, we jointly protect and preserve it. 
“As we deliver sentient beings on the four continents of this world, so too we deliver sentient beings in countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of worlds in the ten directions, and even in all worlds in the ineffably ineffable dharma realm and the domain of space. 
through the awesome spiritual power of Buddhas  in the ten directions, the power of Vairocana Buddha’s original vows, and the power of  roots of goodness. because it is the way things naturally are; because Tathāgatas elicit wisdom-knowledge without eliciting thoughts; because Tathāgatas respond to different conditions without fail; because Tathāgatas enlighten Bodhisattvas at the right times; because Tathāgatas’ past works are never lost; because Tathāgatas enable Bodhisattvas to take Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s great actions; because Tathāgatas display mastery of all wisdomknowledge.”     Moreover, from beyond worlds in each of the ten directions, which are as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands, Bodhisattvas as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands came to visit this world. They filled all dharma realms in the ten directions, displayed their great magnificence, emitted webs of vast radiance, shook all worlds in the ten directions, destroyed all māra palaces, ended the suffering on all evil life-paths, revealed the awe-inspiring virtues of all Tathāgatas, hymned praises of Tathāgatas’ countless virtuous works, showered down all kinds of  rains, manifested countless different bodies, and received the Dharma of innumerable Buddhas. 
Only you can expound this indestructible dharma of a Tathāgata’s appearance. 
We came here from the world called Universal Radiance, where Universal Banner Command Tathāgata resides. This dharma is expounded everywhere in that world. Its words, meanings, explanations, and definitiveness are the same as those given here, neither more nor less. 
Through the Buddha’s spiritual power, because we have received this dharma, we came here to testify for you. 
As we came here to do so, we do the same in all four-continent worlds in the ten directions throughout the dharma realm and the domain of space.”     Then Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, through the Buddha’s spiritual power, observed all Bodhisattvas in the assembly. 
He spoke in verse to restate the awesome virtue of a Tathāgata’s appearance, and to restate that a Tathāgata’s true Dharma is indestructible; countless roots of goodness are never futile; a Buddha’s appearance in the world always brings all superb benefits; a Buddha excels in observing sentient beings’ minds, expounding the Dharma according to their needs at the right times, and bringing forth Bodhisattvas’ immeasurable dharma illumination; Buddhas are adorned with command of miraculous manifestations; all Tathāgatas have the same one  body born from Their original great actions. All Tathāgatas’ works Are beyond worldly analogies. To enlighten sentient beings, I use non-analogies as analogies to reveal them. 
This subtle and profound dharma Is hard to hear in a billion kalpas. 
Only those who make energetic progress in acquiring wisdom Can come to hear its abstruse secret meanings. 
Those who rejoice after hearing this dharma Have made offerings to innumerable Buddhas. Buddhas accept and support them; Gods and humans praise them and make offerings to them. 
This dharma is the foremost wealth, which surpasses all riches in the world. It can rescue and deliver all sentient beings. It can lead to the pure path. All of you should retain it and never abandon self-restraint. 
10. The seven treasures of a Wheel-Turning King are described in the Sūtra of Maitreya Bodhisattva’s Attainment of Buddhahood. They are . ***** **** Chapter 38a – Transcending the World **** **** The Assembly **** At that time, in the Universal Radiance Hall, in His bodhimaṇḍa in a wilderness in the kingdom of Magadha, the World-Honored_One was seated on a lion throne from the Lotus Flower Store. He attained perfect enlightenment, forever ended the two kinds of actions, and fully understood that dharmas have no appearance. 
He abided where a Buddha abides and became an equal of Buddhas. He arrived in the hindrance-free place and the no-regress position. 
His actions hindrance free, He stablished His inconceivable teachings . He saw the equality of the three time frames  and manifested His body everywhere in all worlds. 
He knew all dharmas, completed all virtuous actions, resolved all doubts, and acquired an inconceivable body. 
Having acquired the immeasurable wisdom sought by all Bodhisattvas, He abided in the non-duality  as do all Buddhas, arrived at the opposite shore, and achieved the same liberation achieved by all Tathāgatas. He stood on the Buddha Ground of equality, the ground with neither middle nor edges, throughout the dharma_realm and the domain of space. 
He was accompanied by Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas from various worlds in other directions, who were as numerous as the dust particles in a 100,000 koṭi nayuta inconceivable Buddha Lands, and who all would attain anuttara-samyaksaṁbodhi in their next life. 
Equipped with a Bodhisattva’s facilitation wisdomknowledge, they were well able to observe all sentient beings and use skillful means to tame them, enabling them to follow Bodhisattva teachings. 
They were well able to observe all worlds and use skillful means to visit them. 
They were well able to observe the state of nirvāṇa, ponder how to leave behind all differentiations and ludicrous_statements forever, and train in wonderful actions without interruption. 
They were well able to draw in all sentient beings and use countless skillful means. They well knew that sentient beings’ emptiness does not destroy their karmas and karmic requitals. 
They well knew sentient beings’ propensities and used skillful means to deliver them according to their different capacities. 
They understood the Dharma of past, present, and future Buddhas and expounded it to others. 
They abided in countless worldly and supra-worldly dharmas and knew their true reality. 
They well observed all saṁskṛta and asaṁskṛta dharmas and knew that they are the same. 
In one thought they could acquire the wisdom of past, present, and future Buddhas. 
Thought after thought they could demonstrate attaining samyak-saṁbodhi and enable all sentient beings to activate the bodhi_mind. 
They knew all sentient beings’ states through only one sentient being’s thoughts. 
Although they entered the Tathāgata Ground of all wisdom-knowledge, they never abandoned Bodhisattva actions. Knowing that dharmas have no action, they performed works with wisdom and skillful means. 
For the sake of all sentient beings, they lived for countless kalpas, though they were hard to encounter in an asaṁkhyeya kalpas. They turned the wheel of the true Dharma to tame sentient beings without fail. They fulfilled the pure action vows of past, present, and future Buddhas. 
They accumulated such immeasurable merits that all Tathāgatas could not finish describing them in countless kalpas. 
These Bodhisattvas included Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, Universal Eye Bodhisattva, Universal Manifestation Bodhisattva, Universal Wisdom Bodhisattva, Universal Sight Bodhisattva, Universal Light Bodhisattva, Universal Observation Bodhisattva, Universal Illumination Bodhisattva, Universal Banner Bodhisattva, and Universal Enlightenment Bodhisattva. 
Such Bodhisattvas were as numerous as the dust particles in a million koṭi nayuta ineffable Buddha Lands. Having fulfilled their own profound great vows, they carried out Samantabhadra Bodhisattva’s action vows. 
They could go to all worlds where Buddhas were present and request Them to turn the Dharma wheel. 
They were well able to uphold Buddhas’ dharma eye and never allow the line of Buddhas to end. 
They well knew how Buddhas appear in worlds in a sequence of events, including Their receiving the prophecy of Their attaining Buddhahood, Their names, Their lands, Their attaining  true enlightenment, and Their turning the Dharma wheel. 
In worlds without Buddhas, they could manifest as Buddhas, enabling all impure sentient beings to achieve purity. 
They could remove all Bodhisattvas’ karma hindrances and enter the hindrance-free pure dharma realm. 
At that time Samantabhadra Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva entered the vast samādhi called Buddha Adornment. 
As he entered this samādhi, all worlds in the ten directions quaked in six different ways, displaying eighteen characteristics and emitting loud sounds, heard by all. Then he rose from this samādhi. 
**** The Two Hundred and One Questions and Answers **** Then Universal Wisdom Bodhisattva, knowing that the multitude had assembled, asked Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, “Buddha-Son, I pray that you will answer my questions.” **** The First Forty-one Questions and Answers ****  “1. 
On what kinds of things does a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva rely?”     Then Samantabhadra Bodhisattva told Universal Wisdom Bodhisattva and the other Bodhisattvas, “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva relies on ten kinds of things. 
What are these ten? 
They are  all Tathāgatas, because, like loving-kind fathers, They ceaselessly teach him. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva relies on these ten kinds of things, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom as his reliance.”     “2. 
What are his extraordinary thoughts?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten extraordinary thoughts. 
What are these ten? 
They are the thoughts that  all Tathāgatas are the same. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva abides in these ten thoughts, he will acquire unsurpassed skill in thinking.”     “3. 
What are these ten? 
They are  actions for all Tathāgatas, because he wants to attend Them with reverence. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of actions, he will take the actions that are guided by a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “4. 
What beneficent learned friends does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of beneficent learned friends. 
What are these ten? 
They are those who enable him  to enter all Buddhas’ wisdom. 
These are the ten.”     “5. 
What kinds of energetic progress does he make?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva makes ten kinds of energetic progress. 
What are these ten? 
They are energetic progress  in delighting all Tathāgatas. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of energetic progress, he will achieve a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed progress pāramitā .”     “6. How does he acquire peace of mind?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva acquires peace of mind in ten ways. 
What are these ten? 
He acquires peace of mind  by entering deep into all Tathāgatas’ endless store of wisdomknowledge  and enabling others to enter it. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva acquires peace of mind in these ten ways, he will acquire the peace of a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “7. 
What are these ten? 
He brings sentient beings to  attainment  by using various skillful means secretly to do worldly things for them. 
These are the ten. 
A Bodhisattva brings sentient beings to  maturity in these ten ways.”     “8. 
What are his precepts?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten precepts. 
What are these ten? 
They are the precepts  to restrain his faculties. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten precepts, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great precept pāramitā .”     “9. How does he know that he has received the prophecy of his attaining Buddhahood?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten ways to know that he has received the prophecy of his attaining Buddhahood. 
What are these ten? 
He knows it  because he constantly guards and protects his original vow to attain bodhi. 
These are the ten.”     “10. 
How does he join all Bodhisattvas?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva joins all Bodhisattvas through ten entrances. 
What are these ten? 
They are  his displays of rebirth. 
These are the ten. 
Through these ten entrances, a Bodhisattva joins all past, present, and future Bodhisattvas.”     “11. 
How does he join Tathāgatas?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva joins all past, present, and future Tathāgatas through ten entrances. 
What are these ten? 
They are  endless demonstration of entering nirvāṇa. 
These are the ten. 
Through these ten entrances, a Bodhisattva joins all past, present, and future Tathāgatas.”     “12. 
What kinds of sentient beings’ actions does he enter?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters ten kinds of sentient beings’ actions. 
What are these ten? 
They are sentient beings’  actions at the right or wrong times when they are being taught and tamed. 
These are the ten. 
In this way a Bodhisattva enters all sentient beings’ actions.”     “13. 
What kinds of worlds does he enter?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters ten kinds of worlds. 
They are  worlds without Buddhas. 
These are the ten. 
In this way a Bodhisattva enters all worlds in the ten directions.”     “14. 
What kinds of kalpas does he enter?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters ten kinds of kalpas. 
What these ten? 
They are  kalpas that exist in one thought. 
These are the ten. 
In this way a Bodhisattva enters all kalpas.”     “15. 
How does he explain the three time frames?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva explains the three time frames in ten ways. 
What are these ten? 
To explain the past, he explains  that the three time frames are one thought. 
These are the ten. 
In this way a Bodhisattva explains the three time frames.”     “16. 
How does he enter the three kinds of worlds?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters the three kinds of worlds through ten kinds of knowledge of them. 
What are these ten? 
He knows their  emptiness. 
These are the ten. 
In this way a Bodhisattva knows all dharmas in the three kinds of worlds.”     “17. 
What tireless minds does he activate?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva activates ten tireless minds. 
What are these ten? 
They are the tireless minds  to study and ponder the entire Buddha Dharma. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten tireless minds, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “18. 
What kinds of differentiation wisdom-knowledge does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of differentiation wisdom-knowledge. 
They are differentiation wisdom-knowledge of  languages. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of differentiation wisdom-knowledge, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed vast differentiation wisdom-knowledge.”     “19. 
What are his dhāraṇīs?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten dhāraṇīs. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the entire-Buddha-Dharma dhāraṇī, to abide fearlessly in the power of Tathāgatas. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva wishes to acquire these ten dhāraṇīs, he should diligently train and learn.”     “20. 
How does he describe a Buddha?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva describes a Buddha as ten Buddhas. 
What are these ten? 
They are  wish-fulfilling Buddha. 
What universally worthy minds does he activate?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva activates ten universally worthy minds. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the mind to achieve the wisdom pāramitā , to skillfully observe that all dharmas have no  existence. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten minds, he will quickly acquire the universally worthy facilitation wisdom-knowledge.”     “22. What kinds of universally worthy actions does he take?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva takes ten kinds of universally worthy actions. 
What are these ten? 
They are universally worthy actions  to attain the unsurpassed bodhi in all Buddha Lands. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva diligently trains in these ten kinds of universally worthy actions, he will quickly fulfill all universally worthy action vows.”     “23. 
Why does he elicit great compassion?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva elicits great compassion because of his ten observations of sentient beings. 
What are these ten? 
They are the observations that sentient beings  have lost the Buddha Dharma. 
These are the ten. 
With a compassionate mind, a Bodhisattva constantly observes sentient beings.”     “24. 
Why does he activate the bodhi mind?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva activates the bodhi mind for ten reasons. 
What are these ten? 
He activates the bodhi mind  because he wants to display Buddhas’ powers and fearlessness. These are the ten.”     “25. 
What respectful minds does he activate for his beneficent learned friends?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva activates the unsurpassed bodhi mind because he wants to acquire  the knowledge of all wisdomknowledge. When he stays close and makes offerings to his beneficent learned friends, he should activate ten minds. 
What are these ten? 
These are the ten.”     “26. 
What purities does he acquire?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who activates those ten minds acquires ten purities. 
What are these ten? 
They are the purities of  his actions, because he rides the universally worthy vehicle to transcend . 
These are the ten.”     “27. 
What pāramitās does he practice?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva practices ten_pāramitās. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the Dharma pāramitā, to enter the Dharma of all Buddhas. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten pāramitās, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom-knowledge pāramitā.”     “28. What kinds of ensuing knowledge does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of ensuing knowledge arising from his practice of the pāramitās. 
What are these ten? 
They are  ensuing knowledge that past, present, and future Buddhas take the same actions to transcend . 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of ensuing knowledge arising from his practice of the pāramitās, he will illuminate all dharmas with ease, fulfill all his vows, master in one thought the entire Buddha Dharma, and attain  true enlightenment.”     “29. 
What kinds of verified knowledge does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of verified knowledge. 
What are these ten? 
He knows  all Tathāgatas’ mastery of the Ten_Powers and attainment of true enlightenment. These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of verified knowledge, he will acquire the skillful means to master all dharmas.”     “30. 
What powers does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten powers. 
What are these ten? 
They are the powers  to enable him never to let his wisdom-knowledge fade away. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten powers, he will acquire a Buddha’s Ten Powers.”     “31. What kinds of equality does he uphold?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva upholds ten kinds of equality. 
What are these ten? 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of equality, he will acquire all Buddhas’ unsurpassed principle of equality.”     “32. 
What are his statements that reveal the true meaning of the Buddha Dharma?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva makes ten statements that reveal the true meaning of the Buddha Dharma. 
What are these ten? 
They reveal that all dharmas  constitute the dharma realm. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten statements, he will enter the unsurpassed true meaning of  the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge.”     “33. What kinds of teachings does he give?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva gives ten kinds of teachings. 
What are these ten? 
They are  teachings for all Bodhisattvas to learn the equality of all Buddhas and the states of all Tathāgatas. These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva gives these ten kinds of teachings, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed skill in expounding the Dharma.”     “34. 
What does he retain?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva retains ten things. 
What are these ten? 
They are  all Buddhas’ playful displays of transcendental powers. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva retains these ten things, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s power of retaining the unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “35. How does he use his eloquence?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva uses his eloquence to give ten kinds of teachings. 
What are these ten? 
They are teachings that  one should delight sentient beings according to their minds. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva gives these ten kinds of teachings with eloquence, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed skillful eloquence.”     “36. 
What kinds of masteries does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of masteries. 
What are these ten? 
They are masteries of  demonstrating attainment of true enlightenment to those ready to be transformed. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of masteries, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s mastery of the unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “37. To what things does he have no attachment?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has no attachment to ten things. 
What are these ten? 
They are  all Buddhas. 
These are the ten? 
If a Bodhisattva has no attachment to these ten things, he will quickly change all his perceptions and acquire the unsurpassed pure wisdom.”     “38. 
What are his impartial minds?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten impartial minds. 
What are these ten? 
They are the impartial minds toward  all Tathāgatas’ wisdom. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten impartial minds, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great impartial mind.”     “39. Whence does his wisdom arise?”     “Buddha-Sons, the arising of a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s wisdom is revealed in ten kinds of knowledge. 
What are these ten? 
He knows  the endlessness of all past, present, and future sentient beings’ Buddha seeds. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of knowledge, he will know all dharmas.”     “40. 
What kinds of manifestations does he produce?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva produces ten kinds of manifestations. 
What are these ten? 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of manifestations, he will acquire  all unsurpassed manifestations.”     “41. 
What powers sustain him?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva is sustained by ten powers. 
What are these ten? 
They are the powers of  his wisdom-knowledge. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten powers, he will be sustained by the unsurpassed commanding power of all dharmas.” *** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 53 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  *** **** Notes ****     1. 
Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment ***** *** Translated from Sanskrit into Chinese in the Tang Dynasty by The Tripiṭaka Master Śikṣānanda from Yütian *** ***** Fascicle 54  ***** **** Chapter 38b – Transcending the World Continued **** **** The Next Twenty-six Questions and Answers ****      “42. 
What kinds of great comforting joy does a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva acquire?”      “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva acquires ten kinds of great comforting joy. 
What are these ten? 
He thinks, ‘Throughout my future lives, whenever Buddhas appear in worlds, I will follow, attend, and delight Them.’ This thought brings him great comforting joy. 
He then thinks, ‘When Buddhas appear in worlds, I will reverently make superb offerings to Them.’ This thought brings him great comforting joy. 
He then thinks, ‘When I make offerings to Buddhas, They will give me teachings. I will accept them respectfully and carry them out accordingly. I will definitely acquire the merits acquired by past, present, and future Bodhisattvas who train on Bodhisattva grounds.’ This thought brings him great comforting joy. 
He then thinks, ‘I will take Bodhisattva actions for an ineffable number of kalpas, and always be with all Buddhas and Bodhisattvas.’ This thought brings him great comforting joy. 
He then thinks, ‘In the past, before I activated the bodhi_mind, I had fears, such as the fear of inability to survive, of infamy, of death, of going down an evil life-path, and of the overwhelming presence of multitudes. As soon as I activated the bodhi mind, I left all fears behind. 
Neither shocked nor scared, neither terrified nor frightened, neither timid nor anxious, I will never be conquered by māras or those on the wrong paths.’ This thought brings him great comforting joy. 
He then thinks, ‘I will enable all sentient beings to attain the unsurpassed bodhi. 
After they become Buddhas, I will train in Bodhisattva actions under Them throughout Their lives, and with great faith make Them offerings fit for Buddhas. 
After They enter parinirvāṇa, I will erect countless memorial pagodas  to enshrine Their relics , and will guard and protect the Dharma They leave behind.’ This thought brings him great comforting joy. 
He then thinks, ‘I will use unexcelled adornments to adorn all worlds in the ten_directions, enabling them equally to have various wonderful purities. I will use various great transcendental_powers to abide in them and shake them in six different ways, and will illuminate them everywhere with radiance.’ This thought brings him great comforting joy. 
He then thinks, ‘I will open all sentient beings’ minds, purify their desires, eliminate their doubts and afflictions, and close their doors to evil life-paths. I will open the doors to good life-paths, dispel their darkness, and give them light. I will enable them to discard māra karmas and will lead them to a safe place.’ This thought brings him great comforting joy. 
He then thinks, ‘Tathāgatas are hard to encounter even in countless kalpas, as are udumbara flowers. However, I will see Tathāgatas in my future lives whenever I wish because Buddha-Tathāgatas never abandon me, but constantly stay with me and enable me to see Them, and ceaselessly expound the Dharma to me. 
After hearing the Dharma, my mind will be pure, upright, and true, staying far from sycophancy and crookedness. Thought after thought, I will constantly see Buddhas.’ This thought brings him great comforting joy. 
He then thinks, ‘I will become a Buddha in the future. Using a Buddha’s spiritual power, I will demonstrate attaining samyak-saṁbodhi to every sentient being in all worlds, roar the pure and fearless lion’s roar, beat the great Dharma drum, rain down the great Dharma rain, give great Dharma alms, and expound the true Dharma for countless kalpas. My body, voice, and mind karmas sustained by my great compassion will never tire.’ This thought brings him great comforting joy. 
“Buddha-Sons, these are a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ten kinds of great comforting joy. 
If a Bodhisattva always abides in them, he will have the great comforting joy of acquiring the unsurpassed wisdom arising from  true enlightenment.”     “43. 
How does he enter deep into the Buddha Dharma?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters deep into the Buddha Dharma through ten entrances . 
What are these ten? 
They are  ordinary-being dharmas, voice-hearer dharmas, Pratyekabuddha dharmas, Bodhisattva dharmas, and Tathāgata dharmas. He expounds various dharmas with no attachment to different dharma appearances, because all dharmas enter the dharma realm, though entering is no entering. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten entrances, he will enter the profound nature of great wisdom arising from anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi.”     “44. 
What does he rely on to take Bodhisattva actions?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva relies on ten things to take Bodhisattva actions. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the bodhi of all Buddhas. 
These are the ten. 
A Bodhisattva relies on these ten things to take Bodhisattva actions.”     “45. 
What are these ten? 
He activates the fearless mind  to take Bodhisattva actions for an ineffably ineffable number of kalpas without tiring. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in the fearless mind to do these ten things, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed fearless mind of great wisdom.”     “46. 
How does he activate the doubtless mind?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, to resolve all doubts about the entire Buddha Dharma, activates the doubtless mind in ten ways. 
What are these ten? 
He resolves, ‘I will use almsgiving, precepts, endurance, energetic progress, meditation, wisdom, lovingkindness, compassion, sympathetic joy, and equability, to draw in all sentient beings.’ When he makes this resolve, he has no doubts because it is not right to have any doubts. 
This is his first activation of the doubtless mind. 
He then resolves, ‘When future Buddhas appear in worlds, I will attend and make offerings to all of Them.’ When he makes this resolve, he has no doubts because it is not right to have any doubts. 
This is his second activation of the doubtless mind. 
He then resolves, ‘I will spread various webs of wonderful radiance to pervade and adorn all worlds.’ When he makes this resolve, he has no doubts because it is not right to have any doubts. 
This is his third activation of the doubtless mind. 
He then resolves, ‘I will train in Bodhisattva actions throughout all future kalpas, and teach, tame, and bring to  maturity all sentient beings in the dharma realm and the domain of space, whose numbers are countless, measureless, boundless, unequaled, uncountable, indefinable, inconceivable, immeasurable, ineffable, ineffably ineffable, and beyond calculation.’ When he makes this resolve, he has no doubts because it is not right to have any doubts. 
This is his fourth activation of the doubtless mind. 
He then resolves, ‘I will train in Bodhisattva actions, fulfill my great vows, and acquire all wisdom-knowledge and abide in it.’ When he makes this resolve, he has no doubts because it is not right to have any doubts. 
This is his fifth activation of the doubtless mind. 
He then resolves, ‘I will take Bodhisattva actions to benefit the whole world and will emit pure radiance to illuminate the entire Buddha Dharma.’ When he makes this resolve, he has no doubts because it is not right to have any doubts. 
This is his sixth activation of the doubtless mind. 
He then resolves, ‘I will expound to sentient beings that all dharmas are the Buddha Dharma, to enlighten them according to their minds.’ When he makes this resolve, he has no doubts because it is not right to have any doubts. 
This is his seventh activation of the doubtless mind. 
He then resolves, ‘I will acquire the hindrance-free door to all dharmas because I know that hindrances cannot be captured, and will abide in the true reality  of dharmas until I attain anuttara-samyaksaṁbodhi.’ When he makes this resolve, he has no doubts because it is not right to have any doubts. 
This is his eighth activation of the doubtless mind. 
He then resolves, ‘I will know that all dharmas are supra-worldly dharmas, and will stay far away from all inverted thinking, adorn myself with the one adornment of no adornment, and realize the truth on my own without others’ help.’ When he makes this resolve, he has no doubts because it is not right to have any doubts. 
This is his ninth activation of the doubtless mind. 
He then resolves, ‘I will in the midst of dharmas attain the supreme true enlightenment because I will remove all doubts, end inverted thinking, acquire wisdom in one attuning thought, know that sameness and difference cannot be captured, discard all calculations, know that all dharmas are asaṁskṛta, drop all discussions, and abide in the ineffable state.’ When he makes this resolve, he has no doubts because it is not right to have any doubts. 
This is his tenth activation of the doubtless mind. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in them, his mind will have no doubts about the entire Buddha Dharma.”     “47. 
What kinds of inconceivable things does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of inconceivable things. 
What are these ten? 
They are  inconceivable entry, thought after thought, into the Samādhi of Total Halt, inconceivable ending all his afflictions without entering parinirvāṇa or abandoning his flawed roots of goodness, inconceivable knowledge that his afflictions have ended forever though he understands that all dharmas are affliction free, and inconceivable knowledge that the Buddha Dharma is worldly dharmas and worldly dharmas are the Buddha Dharma, without using the Buddha Dharma to differentiate worldly dharmas or using worldly dharmas to differentiate the Buddha Dharma, that all dharmas enter the dharma realm because entering is no entering, and that all dharmas are the same , which never changes. 
These are a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ten kinds of inconceivable things. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in them, he will acquire all Buddhas’ unsurpassed inconceivable things.”     “48. 
What kinds of enlightening secret words does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of enlightening secret words. What are these ten? 
They are  those revealing that although one knows that one can realize the truth on one’s own without others’ help, one should revere Tathāgatas even more, unite with beneficent learned friends, never abandoning them, and develop roots of goodness and transfer them to his abiding in the same nature, work, transcendence , and spiritual attainment as theirs. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of enlightening secret words, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed enlightening secret words.”     “49. What kinds of skillful-differentiation wisdom-knowledge does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of skillfuldifferentiation wisdom-knowledge. 
What are these ten? 
They are skillfuldifferentiation wisdom-knowledge of  all Buddhas’ Dharma. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of skillful-differentiation wisdomknowledge, he will acquire all Buddhas’ unsurpassed skillful-differentiation wisdom-knowledge of dharmas.”     “50. 
How does he enter samādhi?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters samādhi in ten ways. 
What are these ten? 
He enters samādhi  upon using the hindrance-free wisdom-knowledge in one thought to fulfill all Bodhisattva action vows without rest. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten ways, he will acquire all Buddhas’ unsurpassed samādhis.”     “51. 
What kinds of places does he enter?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva enters ten kinds of places. 
What are these ten? 
They are the places of  various offerings to all Tathāgatas. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of places, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom-knowledge to enter all places.”     52. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten liberation doors. 
What are these ten? 
They are the liberation doors through which  he displays all Buddhas playing with Their transcendental powers. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten liberation doors, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed liberation door.”     “53. 
What transcendental powers does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten transcendental powers arising from his facilitation wisdom-knowledge. What are these ten? 
They are  the ability to demonstrate attaining anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi in an ineffable number of worlds according to sentient beings’ inconceivable minds. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten transcendental powers, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great skillful transcendental powers and will display various manifestations to all sentient beings, inspiring them to train .”     “54. What kinds of useful wisdom-knowledge does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of useful wisdomknowledge. 
What are these ten? 
They are  useful wisdom-knowledge of dependent arising  to constantly transform sentient beings, without tiring or going against worldly ways. 
Because he activates the anuttara-samyaksaṁbodhi mind to benefit all sentient beings, never omitting any work; because he knows all sentient beings’ births and deaths and that  they have neither birth nor death; because he knows their causes and conditions, affairs, states, actions, failures, faculties, speech, afflictions and end of afflictions, inverted views and end of inverted views, impurities and purities, saṁsāra and nirvāṇa, having or not having attachments, abiding or moving, leaving or returning, arising or not arising, coming to maturity, transcending the world, and what they can or cannot attain, as he tames, teaches, and transforms sentient beings according to their readiness, never forgetting Bodhisattva actions;  useful wisdom-knowledge to have no attachment to Buddhas, dharmas, worlds, or sentient beings; to teach, transform, and tame sentient beings, knowing that they are like illusions; never to abandon Bodhisattva actions, great compassion, or great vows; to see Buddhas, hear the Dharma, and train accordingly; to plant roots of goodness under Tathāgatas and reverently make offerings to Them without rest; to use transcendental powers to shake countless worlds in the ten directions because his vast mind equals the dharma realm; to know various ways to expound the Dharma; to know sentient beings, their numbers, their differences, the arising and ending of their suffering, and that all processes are like reflections; to take Bodhisattva actions to end the roots of rebirth forever; to take Bodhisattva actions to rescue and protect sentient beings, knowing that actions are no action; to continue the line of all Buddhas; to activate the mind as great as the king of mountains; to know all falsity and inversion ; to enter the door of  the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge to acquire the unchangeable vast wisdom; to attain true enlightenment and help and deliver equally all sentient beings drifting in the ocean of birth and death. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of useful wisdom-knowledge, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed useful wisdom-knowledge.”     “55. What kinds of liberation has he achieved?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has achieved ten kinds of liberation. 
What are these ten? 
They are  liberation through knowing in one thought all dharmas in the three time frames . 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of liberation, he will be able to do unsurpassed Buddha work, teach and transform all sentient beings, and bring them to  maturity.”     “56. 
What gardens does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten gardens. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the Bodhisattva garden of all places where he demonstrates, in one thought, attaining true enlightenment to all sentient beings, because his dharma body pervades everywhere in all worlds in the domain of space. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten gardens, he will have a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed carefree joyful garden.”     “57. 
What palaces does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten palaces. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the Bodhisattva palace of receiving from all Buddhas the prophecy of his becoming a king of all wisdom-knowledge, because he is adorned with the Ten Powers to do a Dharma King’s work with ease. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten palaces, he will receive from all Dharma Kings the prophecy of his attaining Buddhahood and use his spiritual powers with ease in the world.”     “58. 
What are his delights?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten delights. 
What are these ten? 
They are the delights in  turning the Dharma wheel, because he refutes all non-Buddhist doctrines. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten delights, he will acquire all BuddhaTathāgatas’ unsurpassed Dharma delight.”     “59. 
What adornments does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten adornments. 
What are these ten? 
They are  manifestations, because he manifests in one sentient being’s body bodies as numerous as all sentient beings, and because he enables all sentient beings to acquire the right knowledge and views to seek all wisdom-knowledge without regress. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten adornments, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed Dharma as adornment.”     “60. 
What resolute minds does he activate?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva activates ten resolute minds. 
What are these ten? 
They are the resolute minds  to hear all Bodhisattva teachings and to believe and accept them, without maligning them. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten resolute minds, he will acquire the resolute mind of the unsurpassed knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge.”     “61. What profound great minds does he never abandon?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva never abandons ten profound great minds. 
What are these ten? 
They are the profound great minds  to fulfill all Bodhisattva action vows and master the entire Buddha Dharma. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten profound great minds, he will never abandon the Buddha Dharma.”     “62. 
What observations does he make with wisdom?”     “Buddha-Son, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva makes ten observations with wisdom. 
What are these ten? 
They are observations with wisdom  to know that the Buddha Dharma and one’s radiant wisdom are hindrance free. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva makes these ten observations with wisdom, he will be able to make observations with a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “63. 
What are these ten? 
He reveals that all dharmas  have the same meaning because of their true nature. These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten ways, he will be able to skillfully describe all dharmas.”     “64. 
What purities does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten purities. 
They are the purities of  his roots of goodness, to accomplish all white  dharmas, attain the unsurpassed bodhi, and be adorned with the thirty-two physical marks of myriad merits. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten purities, he will acquire all Tathāgatas’ unsurpassed purities.”     “65. What seals of wisdom-knowledge does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten seals of wisdom-knowledge. 
What are these ten? 
He knows the three kinds of suffering: a) pain brought by a cause, b) deterioration of pleasure, and c) continuous change in every process. Therefore, he intently seeks the Buddha Dharma without tiring and takes Bodhisattva actions without indolence. Neither shocked nor scared, neither terrified nor frightened, never abandoning his great vows, he resolutely seeks all wisdom-knowledge without regress and eventually attains anuttara-samyaksaṁbodhi. 
When he sees sentient beings act in foolish and crazy ways, insult one another with vile and abusive words, or harm one another with knives, clubs, or stones, he never for this reason abandons the Bodhisattva mind. Enduring adversity with a gentle mind, he intently carries out the teachings in the Buddha Dharma, walks the supreme path, and enters the position of transcending karmic rebirth. This is his second seal. 
When he hears the profound Buddha Dharma, which accords with wisdom, he can use his own wisdom to believe it with endurance, understand it, and follow it. This is his third seal. 
He thinks, ‘Because I activate the profound mind to seek all wisdomknowledge, I will attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi and become a Buddha. 
I will enable all sentient beings transmigrating through the five life-paths and undergoing immeasurable suffering, to activate the bodhi mind, have joy and deep belief, and make energetic progress in training  without regress.’ This is his fourth seal. 
He never uses limited measures to gauge a Tathāgata’s wisdom, because he has heard from innumerable Buddhas that a Tathāgata’s wisdom is immeasurable. 
All words in the world have limitations and cannot describe a Tathāgata’s wisdom. 
This is his fifth seal. 
His desire to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi is supreme, profound, vast, great, myriad, unexcelled, resolute, indestructible by māras and those on the wrong paths, or their retinues, and unflinching from the quest for all wisdom-knowledge. He abides in such desire and trains to attain the unsurpassed bodhi without regress. This is his sixth seal. 
He takes Bodhisattva actions with no concern for his body and life, because his resolve to acquire all wisdom-knowledge is indestructible, because the nature of all wisdom-knowledge is always present, and because he has acquired the radiance of all Buddhas’ wisdom. He never abandons the path to Buddha bodhi and never abandons his beneficent learned friends. This is his seventh seal. 
When he sees good men or good women take to the Mahāyāna, he enables them to expand their minds to seek the Buddha Dharma, abide in all roots of goodness, acquire all wisdom-knowledge, and never regress from the resolve to attain the unsurpassed bodhi. This is his eighth seal. 
He enables all sentient beings to develop the impartial mind, persuades them to train diligently on the path to all wisdom-knowledge, expounds, with a great compassionate mind, the Dharma to them, and enables them never to regress from the anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi mind. 
He has the same roots of goodness as those of past, present, and future Buddhas, never ends the line of Buddhas, and will eventually acquire the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge. 
“Buddha-Sons, these are a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ten seals of wisdomknowledge. 
A Bodhisattva who uses them will quickly attain anuttara-samyaksaṁbodhi and acquire a Tathāgata’s seal of the unsurpassed wisdom-knowledge of all dharmas.”     “66. 
What kinds of radiant wisdom-knowledge does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of radiant wisdomknowledge. 
What are these ten? 
They are radiant wisdom-knowledge  to achieve all pāramitās. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of radiant wisdom-knowledge, he will acquire all Buddhas’ unsurpassed radiant wisdom-knowledge.”     “67. 
What kinds of unequaled abiding does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of abiding unequaled by those of all sentient beings, voice-hearers, and Pratyekabuddhas. 
What are these ten? 
Although he observes the true reality of dharmas, he does not verify it because he has not yet fulfilled all his vows. 
Although he trains in Bodhisattva actions, knowing that they are like illusions because all dharmas are in nirvāṇa, he has no doubts about the Buddha Dharma. This is his third kind of unequaled abiding. 
Although he discards all thoughts concerning the world, he intends to take Bodhisattva actions  for countless kalpas to fulfill his great vows, never tiring or becoming bored. This is his fourth kind of unequaled abiding. 
Although he has no attachment to any dharmas because the nature of all dharmas is nirvāṇa, he does not enter nirvāṇa. 
Why not? 
Because he has not yet completed walking the path to all wisdom-knowledge. This is his fifth kind of unequaled abiding. 
Although he knows that all kalpas are non-kalpas, he truthfully reveals the numbers of all kalpas. This is his sixth kind of unequaled abiding. 
Although he knows that all dharmas have no act, he does not abandon taking actions to seek the Buddha Dharma. This is his seventh kind of unequaled abiding. 
He knows that the Three_Realms_of_Existence are the mind, the three time frames are the mind, and the mind is immeasurable and boundless. This is his eighth kind of unequaled abiding. 
He, for the sake of even one sentient being, takes Bodhisattva actions for an ineffable number of kalpas to enable that sentient being to abide on the ground of all wisdom-knowledge. 
As he does this for one sentient being, so he does this for all sentient beings, never tiring or becoming bored. This is his ninth kind of unequaled abiding. 
Although he has completed his training, he chooses not to attain bodhi. 
Because he thinks, ‘What I do is for sentient beings. Therefore, I should stay in  birth and death for a long time to skillfully benefit them, enabling them to stay on the unsurpassed Buddha path.’ This is his tenth kind of unequaled abiding. 
“Buddha-Sons, these are a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ten kinds of unequaled abiding. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in them, he will acquire the unsurpassed great wisdom-knowledge and the unequaled abiding in the entire Buddha Dharma.” *** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 54 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  *** **** Notes ****     1. Udumbara, the ficus glomerata, a tree that produces fruit with hidden flowers. Hence the appearance of its bloom is likened to the rare appearance of a Buddha. 2. 
See “true_suchness” in the glossary, and “dharma body” defined in the glossary’s “three bodies of a Buddha.”      12. 
****      “68. What aspiring minds does a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva activate?”      “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva activates ten aspiring minds. 
What are these ten? 
He thinks, ‘I will subjugate all celestial māras and their retinues.’ This is his first aspiring mind. 
He then thinks, ‘I will conquer all those on the wrong paths and refute their evil doctrines.’ This is his second aspiring mind. 
He then thinks, ‘I will teach all sentient beings with good words to delight them.’ This is his third aspiring mind. 
He then thinks, ‘I will practice all pāramitās everywhere in the dharma realm.’ This is his fourth aspiring mind. 
He then thinks, ‘I will amass the store of merits.’ This is his fifth aspiring mind. 
He then thinks, ‘I will complete my training and attain the unsurpassed bodhi, though it is vast and hard to attain.’ This is his sixth aspiring mind. 
He then thinks, ‘I will teach, transform, and tame all sentient beings using unexcelled teachings and methods.’ This is his seventh aspiring mind. 
He then thinks, ‘I will attain  true enlightenment in countless bodies  because all worlds are different.’ This is his eighth aspiring mind. 
He then thinks, “When I train in Bodhisattva actions, if sentient beings come to ask for my hands, feet, ears, nose, blood, flesh, bone marrow, wife, children, elephants, horses, or even my throne, I will give them all these things, without even one thought of distress or regret. Led by great compassion and driven by great lovingkindness, I will seek only to benefit all sentient beings, not for receiving good requitals.’ This is his ninth aspiring mind. 
He then thinks, ‘I will, in one thought attuned to wisdom, know, perceive, and see various dharmas, such as all past, present, and future Buddhas, the Dharma of all Buddhas, all sentient beings, all worlds, the world of existences, all three time frames , all dharma realms, all language systems, the entire domain of space, and the entire realm of nirvāṇa. I will train to attain bodhi and verify the true reality of dharmas without differentiating them. Free from differentiation, dharmas have no varieties, differences, characteristics, or states, because they are neither existent nor nonexistent, neither the same nor different. 
Using the wisdomknowledge  that dharmas are non-dual, I will know all dualities; using the wisdom-knowledge that dharmas have no appearance, I will know all appearances; using the wisdom-knowledge that dharmas have no differentiations, I will know all differentiations; using the wisdom-knowledge that dharmas have no differences, I will know all differences; using the wisdom-knowledge that dharmas have no distinctions, I will know all distinctions; using the wisdomknowledge that nothing truly exists, I will know all existences in the world; using the wisdom-knowledge that time frames are false, I will know all time frames; using the wisdom-knowledge that sentient beings are empty, I will know all sentient beings; using the wisdom-knowledge to have no attachment to dharmas, I will know all attachments; using the wisdom-knowledge that dharmas abide nowhere, I will know all places where they abide; using the wisdomknowledge of purity, I will know all impurities; using the wisdom-knowledge of what is endless, I will know all endings of dharmas; using the wisdom-knowledge of the one dharma realm, I will manifest bodies in all worlds; using the wisdom-knowledge of what is beyond words and sounds, I will utter ineffable words and sounds; using the wisdom-knowledge that dharmas have one nature, I will enter no nature; using the wisdom-knowledge that dharmas have one state, I will display various states; using the wisdom-knowledge that dharmas are indescribable, I will describe them with great ease and stand on the ground of all wisdom-knowledge. 
To teach, transform, and tame all sentient beings, I will display in the entire world great transcendental powers and produce manifestations.’ This is his tenth aspiring mind. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva activates these ten aspiring minds. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in them, he will acquire the unsurpassed exalted Buddha Dharma.”     “69. 
What are his mountain-like higher minds?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten mountain-like higher minds resolved to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
What are these ten? 
This is his first mountain-like higher mind. He constantly observes that all dharmas are by nature empty and cannot be captured. This is his second mountain-like higher mind. 
He vows to train in Bodhisattva actions for countless kalpas and perform all pure dharmas. Abiding in pure dharmas, he knows and sees a Tathāgata’s immeasurable wisdom. This is his third mountain-like higher mind. 
Seeking the entire Buddha Dharma, with the impartial mind he respectfully makes offerings to his beneficent learned friends. Without ulterior motive or a thieving mind, he has respect for them and can give them all he has. This is his fourth mountain-like higher mind. 
If sentient beings scold, insult, slander, beat, club, torture, hack, or even kill him, he can accept such acts, and will never feel disturbed, angry, or vindictive. Nor will he abandon his vow or his great compassion. Instead, he will strengthen his vow and nurture his great compassion without rest. 
Because he has attained equability and truly transcends all dharmas, and because has realized the truth realized by all Tathāgatas, and can endure adversity with ease and a gentle mind. 
This is his fifth mountain-like higher mind. 
A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva performs works of higher merit, which bring higher requitals, such as higher rebirth as a god or human, higher form, higher strength, higher retinues, higher desires, higher kingship, higher mastery, higher merits, and higher wisdom. 
However, he is attached to none of them because he has no attachment to taste, desire, wealth, or retinue, and because he only seeks the Dharma, follows the Dharma, abides in the Dharma, strives to attain bodhi according to the Dharma, and reaches for the ultimate truth revealed in the Dharma. Taking the Dharma as his reliance, his rescue, his refuge, and his home, he delights in the Dharma, protects the Dharma, ponders the Dharma, and expounds the Dharma. 
Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva experiences various kinds of Dharma delight and always stays far away from māras’ states. 
Because in his past lives he resolved, ‘I will enable all sentient beings to leave behind māras’ states forever and abide in Buddhas’ states.’ This is his sixth mountain-like higher mind. 
A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva resolved to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi has diligently trained on the Bodhisattva_Way for countless asaṁkhyeya kalpas. Yet he still says, ‘I now activate the anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi_mind.’ He takes Bodhisattva actions, neither shocked nor scared nor terrified. 
Although he can attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi in one thought, for sentient beings’ sake he continues to take Bodhisattva actions for countless kalpas without rest. This is his seventh mountain-like higher mind. 
He knows that all sentient beings are by nature unkind and hard to tame and deliver, and that they neither acknowledge nor reciprocate kindness. Therefore, he makes a great vow to enable them to put their minds at ease, do things without hindrance, discard evil thoughts, and not be driven by their afflictions. This is his eighth mountain-like higher mind. 
He thinks, ‘No one makes me activate the bodhi_mind, nor do I rely on anyone to help me train to attain bodhi. 
I activate the bodhi mind of my own accord, acquire the Buddha Dharma, and make vows to drive myself to walk the Bodhisattva Way throughout all future kalpas and attain anuttara-samyaksaṁbodhi. 
Therefore, as I now train in Bodhisattva actions, I should purify my own mind and others’ minds, and should know my own states and others’ states. My states will equal those of past, present, and future Buddhas.’ This is his ninth mountain-like higher mind. 
He observes, ‘No dharma trains in Bodhisattva actions; no dharma completes Bodhisattva actions; no dharma teaches, transforms, or tames all sentient beings; no dharma reverently makes offerings to all Buddhas; no dharma attained, does attain, or will attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi; no dharma expounded, does expound, or will expound the Dharma. Neither the Dharma expounder nor the Dharma can be captured.’ However, he never abandons his resolve to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. Why not? 
Because a Bodhisattva seeks to realize that there is nothing to capture or attain. This is the way to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
Therefore, although he attains nothing, he diligently performs higher good works, purifies remedial methods, and acquires wisdom thought after thought. 
Neither shocked nor scared, he does not think, ‘If all dharmas are in nirvāṇa, why should I walk the unsurpassed bodhi path?’ This is his tenth mountain-like higher mind. 
“Buddha-Sons, these are a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ten mountain-like higher minds resolved to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in them, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s mountain-like higher mind of unsurpassed wisdom.”     “70. 
What kinds of ocean-like wisdom-knowledge does he have to attain the unsurpassed bodhi?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of ocean-like wisdomknowledge to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
What are these ten? 
He enters the realm of innumerable sentient beings. This is his first kind of ocean-like wisdom-knowledge. 
He enters all worlds without differentiating them. This is his second kind of ocean-like wisdom-knowledge. 
He enters all webs of different worlds in the ten_directions, knowing that the domain of space is immeasurable and hindrance free. This is his third kind of ocean-like wisdom-knowledge. 
He capably enters the dharma_realm because he knows that all dharmas are neither perpetual nor ceasing, and have neither birth nor death, neither hindrance nor measure. 
He knows in one thought the roots_of_goodness that were developed, are being developed, and will be developed by past, future, and present Buddhas, Bodhisattvas, Dharma masters, voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and ordinary beings; the roots of goodness of past, present, and future Buddhas who attained, do attain, and will attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi; the roots of goodness of past, present, and future Buddhas who expounded, do expound, and will expound the Dharma, to tame sentient beings. He deeply believes in these roots of goodness, expresses sympathetic joy over them, and delights in developing them, never satiated. This is his fifth kind of ocean-like wisdomknowledge. 
He, thought after thought, enters an ineffable number of past kalpas. He clearly sees in each kalpa the appearances of 100 koṭi, 1,000 koṭi, or 100,000 koṭi Buddhas, or the appearances of Buddhas whose numbers are countless, measureless, boundless, unequaled, uncountable, indefinable, inconceivable, immeasurable, ineffable, ineffably ineffable, and beyond calculation; he clearly sees the assemblies in Buddhas’ bodhimaṇḍas, in which They expound the Dharma to teach and transform voice-hearers and Bodhisattvas; he clearly sees all sentient beings’ different lifespans and the duration of the abiding of the Dharma . 
As it is with one kalpa, so it is with all kalpas. 
He knows the roots of goodness planted, in kalpas without Buddhas, by sentient beings to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
He also knows when sentient beings with mature roots of goodness will see Buddhas in the future. 
In this way he observes an ineffably ineffable number of past kalpas, never satiated. This is his sixth kind of ocean-like wisdom-knowledge. 
He enters the future and observes and differentiates countless and boundless kalpas. He knows which kalpas will have Buddhas and which kalpas will not have Buddhas. He knows the number of Buddhas who will appear in which kalpas, Their names, Their lifespans, Their resident worlds, the names of these worlds, and how many sentient beings They will deliver. 
Observing in this way, he knows the endless future, but never feels that he knows enough. This is his seventh kind of ocean-like wisdom-knowledge. 
He enters the present to observe and ponder. Thought after thought, he sees an ineffable number of countless kinds of worlds in the ten directions, where Buddhas attained, do attain, and will attain the unsurpassed bodhi. Each Buddha goes to His bodhimaṇḍa, sits on a seat of auspicious grass under a bodhi tree, subjugates māra legions, and attains anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
Then He rises, enters a city, ascends to a celestial palace, expounds the wondrous Dharma, turns the great Dharma wheel, displays transcendental powers, tames sentient beings, hands down the teachings on attaining anuttara-samyaksaṁbodhi, and enters parinirvāṇa. 
After His parinirvāṇa, His teachings collected in the Dharma store remain in the world for a long time, and majestic towers  are erected to enshrine His relics  so that sentient beings can make offerings. 
He also sees all sentient beings in any world encounter a Buddha, hear the Dharma, accept and recite His teachings, remember and ponder His teachings, and increase their understanding and wisdom. In this way he observes all worlds in the ten directions, without any misunderstanding of the Buddha Dharma. 
Because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva knows that Buddhas are like dreams. 
Therefore, he visits all Buddhas and reverently makes offering to Them, with no attachment to himself, Buddhas, Dharma assemblies, hearing the Dharma, or kalpas. He continues to see Buddhas, hear the Dharma, observe worlds, and enter kalpas, never satiated. This is his eighth kind of ocean-like wisdom-knowledge. 
He, in each of an ineffably ineffable number of kalpas, reverently makes offerings to an ineffably ineffable number of Buddhas, as he displays his death here and rebirth there. He makes offerings that surpass all those in the Three_Realms_of_Existence to Buddhas as well as Bodhisattvas, voice-hearers, and all multitudes. 
After each Buddha’s parinirvāṇa, he makes unexcelled offerings to His relics and widely gives alms to gratify sentient beings. 
Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva, to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi, uses the inconceivable mind, the not-reward-seeking mind, the ultimate mind, and the altruistic mind to make offerings to Buddhas, benefit sentient beings, uphold the true Dharma, and expound it, for an ineffably ineffable number of kalpas. This is his ninth kind of ocean-like wisdom-knowledge. 
He, in all places of Buddhas, Bodhisattvas, and Dharma masters, always intently seeks teachings on what a Bodhisattva should expound, learn, teach, practice, purify, develop, retain, transcend, and tame, and on how to remain impartial. 
Having received these teachings, he accepts, recites, and expounds them, never tiring, and enables innumerable sentient beings to activate the mind aspiring to all wisdom-knowledge in the Buddha Dharma, to enter the true reality of dharmas, and never to regress from the anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi mind. 
A Bodhisattva does these things for an ineffably ineffable number of kalpas, never feeling that he has done enough. This is his tenth kind of oceanlike wisdom-knowledge. 
“Buddha-Sons, these are a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ten kinds of ocean-like wisdom-knowledge to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in them, he will acquire all Buddhas’ ocean of unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “71. 
What kinds of precious abiding does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of precious abiding to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
What are these ten? 
He visits Tathāgatas in countless worlds, gazes upon Them, attends Them, and makes prostrations and offerings to Them. 
This is his first kind of precious abiding. He hears the Dharma from an inconceivable number of Tathāgatas, accepts and remembers it, never forgetting or losing it, differentiates and ponders its teachings, and increases his wisdom. He does this in all worlds in the ten directions. This is his second kind of precious abiding. 
He displays his death in this world and rebirths in other worlds, without confusion about the Buddha Dharma. This is his third kind of precious abiding. 
He knows that one dharma gives rise to all dharmas, and can expound all of them because various meanings of dharmas are of one meaning. This is his fourth kind of precious abiding. 
He knows how to turn away from his afflictions, stop them from arising, ward them off, and end them. However, he trains in Bodhisattva actions without verifying the true reality of dharmas, though its verification is required to arrive at the shore of true reality. He well learns skillful means to fulfill his original vows, never tiring. This is his fifth kind of precious abiding. 
He knows that differentiations made by sentient beings’ minds have no place, but he reveals their various places. 
Making no differentiation and taking no action, to tame all sentient beings he does spiritual training, which is no training. This is his sixth kind of precious abiding. 
He knows that all dharmas have the same nature, which means that they have no nature, no various natures, no countless natures, no countable natures, no definable natures, no form, and no appearance, and cannot be identified as one or many. However, he definitely knows Buddha dharmas, Bodhisattva dharmas, Pratyekabuddha dharmas, voice-hearer dharmas, ordinary-being dharmas, good dharmas, evil dharmas, worldly dharmas, supra-worldly dharmas, faulty dharmas, faultless dharmas, dharmas with afflictions, dharmas without afflictions, saṁskṛta dharmas, and asaṁskṛta dharmas. This is his seventh kind of precious abiding. He knows that Buddhas, Bodhisattvas, sentient beings, and dharmas cannot be captured. 
Why not? 
Because he makes skillful observations and knows all sentient beings’ states and roots of goodness. 
He guides them by skillful means to attain nirvāṇa, because he wants to fulfill his vow to transform sentient beings and to vigorously train in Bodhisattva actions. 
This is his eighth kind of precious abiding. 
He knows that skillful expositions of the Dharma, demonstrations of entering nirvāṇa, and skillful means for delivering sentient beings are established by the thinking mind and are not inverted or false. 
Because a Bodhisattva knows all dharmas, the equality of the three time frames, and that dharmas in true reality are motionless and abide nowhere. Therefore, he does not see even one sentient being that was transformed, is being transformed, or will be transformed. He also knows that his spiritual training is no training, and that the birth and death of any dharma cannot be captured. However, he relies on all dharmas so that his aspirations will not come to nothing. 
This is his ninth kind of precious abiding. 
He hears from every one of inconceivably innumerable Buddhas the ineffably ineffable prophecy of his attaining bodhi under different names, in different kalpas. 
He often hears this prophecy in one kalpa and even in an ineffably ineffable number of kalpas. Having heard it, he trains to attain bodhi, neither shocked nor scared, neither confused nor puzzled, because he knows that a Tathāgata’s wisdom is inconceivable, that His prophecy is unwavering, and that the power of his action vows is excellent. Therefore, he will enable those ready to be transformed to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi, thus fulfilling all his vows, which equal the dharma realm. This is his tenth kind of precious abiding. 
“Buddha-Sons, these are a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ten kinds of precious abiding to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in them, he will acquire Buddhas’ treasure, the unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “72. 
What vajra-like minds does he activate to fulfill the Mahāyāna vows?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva activates ten vajra-like minds to fulfill the Mahāyāna vows. 
What are these ten? 
He thinks, ‘Although all dharmas are countless and endless, I will use wisdom-knowledge throughout the three time frames to know them all, without omission.’ This is his first vajra-like mind to fulfill the Mahāyāna vows. 
He then thinks, ‘On the tip of one hair, there are innumerable and countless sentient beings, not to mention those in the entire dharma realm. 
I will enable them all to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi and enter parinirvāṇa.’ This is his second vajra-like mind to fulfill the Mahāyāna vows. 
He then thinks, ‘All worlds in the ten directions are countless, boundless, limitless, and endless. 
I will adorn them all with Buddha Lands’ supreme adornments, which will be real.’ This is his third vajra-like mind to fulfill the Mahāyāna vows. 
He then thinks, ‘All sentient beings in worlds in the ten directions are innumerable, countless, limitless, and endless. 
I will transfer all my roots of goodness to them and use the supreme wisdom light to illuminate them.’ This is his fourth vajra-like mind to fulfill the Mahāyāna vows. 
He then thinks, ‘All Buddhas are innumerable, countless, limitless, and endless. 
I will present to Them as an offering all the roots of goodness I have planted, without omission. Then I will attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi.’ This is his fifth vajra-like mind to fulfill the Mahāyāna vows. 
He sees all Buddhas, delights in hearing the Dharma They expound, and has no attachment to his body or Buddhas’ bodies, because he understands that a Tathāgata’s body is neither real nor unreal, and has neither nature nor no nature, neither form nor no form, neither appearance nor no appearance, neither birth nor death. 
Why not? 
Because one should have no attachment to appearances.’ This is his sixth vajra-like mind to fulfill the Mahāyāna vows. 
If sentient beings scold, slander, beat, or club a BodhisattvaMahāsattva, or cut off his hands, feet, ears, or nose, or dig out his eyes or take his head, he will endure all these things and never gets angry or vindictive. 
He will train in Bodhisattva actions for an ineffable number of kalpas and deliver sentient beings, never abandoning them. 
Because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva well observes that all dharmas have no duality . His mind undisturbed, he can disregard his body and endure suffering. 
This is his seventh vajra-like mind to fulfill the Mahāyāna vows. 
He then thinks, ‘Future kalpas are countless, boundless, limitless, and endless. 
In each kalpa, neither shocked nor scared, nor terrified, I will take Bodhisattva actions to teach and transform sentient beings in one world. As it is with one world, so it is with all worlds in the dharma realm and the domain of space. 
Because this is how one should walk the Bodhisattva Way, to train to attain bodhi in order to benefit all sentient beings. This is his eighth vajra-like mind to fulfill the Mahāyāna vows. He then thinks, ‘Anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi is founded on the mind. 
If one’s mind is pure, one can complete all roots of goodness, feel at ease with Buddha bodhi, and attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi at will. Therefore, I could end all the conditions for my continuing , and complete the one-way path. Although I aspire to Buddha bodhi, I choose not to attain it right away. 
Because, to fulfill my original vows, I take Bodhisattva actions in all worlds to transform sentient beings.’ This is his ninth vajra-like mind to fulfill the Mahāyāna vows. 
He knows that Buddhas, Bodhisattvas, sentient beings, dharmas, saṁskṛta dharmas, asaṁskṛta dharmas, all things in the world, actions, bodhi, the mind, past, present, and future, cannot be captured. 
Hence he abides in quietness, profoundness, no dispute, no speech, no comparison, no change, the unequaled , the true nature , the principle, liberation, nirvāṇa, and true_suchness. However, he never abandons his great vows, the resolve to realize sarvajña ], Bodhisattva actions, the pāramitās, attending Buddhas, expounding the Dharma, adorning all worlds, or teaching, transforming, and taming sentient beings. 
Why not? 
Because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has made great vows. Although he knows  all dharma appearances, his mind of great lovingkindness and compassion increases even more. He acquires immeasurable merits and draws in sentient beings, never abandoning them. 
Because he thinks, ‘All dharmas are nonexistent, but ordinary beings are confused and unaware of this. I will enlighten them and reveal dharma nature to them. 
Because, although all Buddhas abide in nirvāṇa, using the mind of great compassion, without rest They expound the Dharma in all worlds, teaching and transforming sentient beings. 
How can I now abandon my great compassion? 
Besides, I have already made a vast vow to benefit all sentient beings, develop all roots of goodness, skillfully transfer my merits, acquire profound wisdom, draw in all sentient beings, and see the equality of all sentient beings. 
I speak true words, not false words, because I wish to give sentient beings the unsurpassed great Dharma and never to allow the line of Buddhas to end. 
However, sentient beings have not yet achieved liberation, attained true enlightenment, or acquired the Buddha Dharma. As my great vow is not yet fulfilled, how can I abandon my great compassion?’ This is his tenth vajra-like mind to fulfill the Mahāyāna vows. 
“Buddha-Sons, these are the ten vajra-like minds a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva activates to fulfill the Mahāyāna vows. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in them, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s vajra-like wisdom-knowledge of unsurpassed great transcendental powers.”     “73. 
What great resolves does he make?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva makes ten great resolves. 
What are these ten? 
He thinks, ‘I will reverently make offerings to all Buddhas.’ This is his first great resolve. 
He then thinks, ‘I will nurture all Bodhisattvas’ roots of goodness.’ This is his second great resolve. 
He then thinks, ‘I will erect majestic pagodas after every Tathāgata’s parinirvāṇa, make offerings of flowers, chaplets, fragrances, solid perfumes, powdered incense, garments, canopies, banners, and cylindrical banners, and uphold and protect that Buddha’s true Dharma.’ This is his third great resolve. 
He then thinks, ‘I will teach, transform, and tame all sentient beings, and enable them to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi.’ This is his fourth great resolve. 
He then thinks, ‘I will adorn all worlds with Buddha Lands’ supreme adornments.’ This is his fifth great resolve. 
He then thinks, ‘I will elicit great compassion and, for even one sentient being, take Bodhisattva actions in all worlds throughout the endless future. 
As it is for one sentient being, so it is for all sentient beings. I will enable all to attain the unsurpassed Buddha bodhi.’ This is his sixth great resolve. 
He then thinks, ‘Tathāgatas are innumerable and countless. I will reverently make offerings to one Tathāgata for an inconceivable number of kalpas. 
As it is with one Tathāgata, so it is with all Tathāgatas.’ This is his seventh great resolve. 
He then thinks, ‘I will erect jeweled pagodas for every Tathāgata’s relics after His parinirvāṇa. The size of every pagoda equals an ineffable number of worlds. 
So is the size of the Buddha images I will produce. I will make offerings of jeweled banners, canopies, incense, flowers, and garments, without even one thought of tiredness or boredom. 
I will expound the Dharma because I want to establish, protect, and uphold the Buddha Dharma, make offerings to Buddhas, and teach and transform sentient beings.’ This is his eighth great resolve. 
He then thinks, ‘I will use these roots of goodness to attain the unsurpassed bodhi, enter the ground of all Tathāgatas, and become Their equal.’ This is his ninth great resolve. 
He then thinks, ‘After I attain true enlightenment, I will expound the true Dharma in all worlds for an ineffable number of kalpas, display inconceivable transcendental powers with ease, and my body, voice, and mind will never tire, because I will never be apart from the Dharma and will be supported by the power of Buddhas. 
Led by great lovingkindness and driven by great compassion, I will diligently carry out my great vows to benefit all sentient beings. Understanding that dharmas have no appearance and speaking truthful words, I verify that all dharmas are in nirvāṇa. 
Although all sentient beings cannot be captured, I know that karmas bring corresponding requitals. With the same dharma body as those of Buddhas in the dharma realm and the domain of space, I understand that dharmas have no appearance and have neither birth nor death. Equipped with the entire Buddha Dharma, I tame sentient beings through the power of my great vows and do great Buddha work without rest.’ This is his tenth great resolve. 
“Buddha-Sons, these are a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ten great resolves. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in them, he will never cease taking Bodhisattva actions and will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “74. 
What ultimate great things does he do?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva does ten ultimate great things. 
What are these ten? 
They are  hearing and retaining the true Dharma of all Buddhas. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten ultimate great things, he will attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi, acquiring the ultimate great wisdom.”     “75. 
What indestructible faiths does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten indestructible faiths. 
What are these ten? 
They are the indestructible faiths in  Bodhisattvas’ secret skillful means to teach, transform, and tame all sentient beings. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of indestructible faith, he will acquire Buddhas’ indestructible faith in the unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “76. 
What are these ten? 
They are  his mastery of all Bodhisattva actions. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten reasons, he will receive from all Buddhas the prophecy .”     “77. 
To what does he transfer his roots of goodness?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva transfers his roots of goodness to ten things. 
What are these ten? 
They are  achieving the same indestructibility as theirs, nothing else. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva transfers his roots of goodness to these ten things, he will be able to make the unsurpassed transference of his roots of goodness.”     “78. 
How does he acquire wisdom?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva acquires wisdom in ten ways. 
What are these ten? 
He acquires wisdom  by attaining all Buddhas’ bodhi, entering all dharma realms, hearing and retaining all Buddhas’ teachings, and entering deep into all Tathāgatas’ majestic words and tones. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva acquires wisdom in these ten ways, he will acquire all Buddhas’ unsurpassed presently verified wisdomknowledge.”     “79. 
When does he activate the boundless vast mind?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva activates the boundless vast mind when he does ten things. 
What are these ten? 
He activates it when he  listens to all Tathāgatas’ wondrous sounds. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten things, he will acquire the ocean of immeasurable boundless vast wisdom in the entire Buddha Dharma.”     “80. 
What are his stores ?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten stores . 
What are these ten? 
They are the stores of knowledge that  all Buddhas and Bodhisattvas bring joy and pure faith. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten stores , he will acquire all Buddhas’ Dharma store of the unsurpassed wisdom-knowledge and be able to tame all sentient beings.”     “81. 
What rules does he follow?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva follows ten rules. 
What are these ten? 
They are the rules  to achieve all pāramitās. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva follows these ten rules, he will acquire the unsurpassed great wisdom as his rule.”     “82. What kinds of masteries does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of masteries. 
What are these ten? 
They are masteries of  his wisdom-knowledge, to display, thought after thought, a Tathāgata’s attainment of true enlightenment and His Ten_Powers and Four Fearlessnesses. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of masteries, he will acquire all Buddhas’ mastery of pāramitās, spiritual powers, wisdom, and bodhi.” *** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 55 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  *** **** Notes ****     1. See “overall wisdom-knowledge” defined in the glossary’s “three kinds_of_wisdom-knowledge.”      2. 
Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment ***** *** Translated from Sanskrit into Chinese in the Tang Dynasty by The Tripiṭaka Master Śikṣānanda from Yütian *** ***** Fascicle 56  ****      “83. 
What kinds of hindrance-free works does a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva perform?”      “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva performs different kinds of hindrance-free works related to each of ten kinds of things. 
What are these ten? 
They are  other powers.”     “84. 
What kinds of hindrance-free works related to sentient beings does he perform?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva performs ten kinds of hindrancefree works related to sentient beings. 
What are these ten? 
They are  manifesting to all sentient beings Buddhas’ sublime bodies, the power of Their wisdom, and Their attainment of  true enlightenment. 
These are the ten.”     “85. 
What kinds of hindrance-free works related to worlds does he perform?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva performs ten kinds of hindrance-free works related to worlds. 
What are these ten? 
They are  displaying to all sentient beings worlds in all directions and their countless differences, whether the worlds are small, medium, large, vast, deep, facing up, facing down, facing sideways, or facing straight. 
These are the ten.”     “86. 
What kinds of hindrance-free works related to dharmas does he perform?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva performs ten kinds of hindrance-free works related to dharmas. 
What are these ten? 
They are  ceaselessly expounding to sentient beings for countless kalpas that all dharmas are hindrance free and have countless differences like  an illusory net. 
These are the ten.”     “87. 
What kinds of hindrance-free works related to bodies does he perform?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva performs ten kinds of hindrance-free works related to bodies. 
What are these ten? 
They are  revealing all sentient beings’ dharma bodies and manifesting all sentient beings’ physical bodies from their dharma bodies. 
These are the ten.”     “88. 
What kinds of hindrance-free works related to vows does he perform?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva performs ten kinds of hindrance-free works related to vows. 
What are these ten? 
They are  speaking one Dharma word to pervade the entire dharma_realm, forming the great Dharma cloud, flashing the Dharma lightning, clapping the Dharma thunder, showering down the Dharma rain of sweet dew, and filling the realm of all sentient beings with the power of his great vows. 
These are the ten.”     “89. 
What kinds of hindrance-free works related to various states does he perform?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva performs ten kinds of hindrance-free works related to various states. 
What are these ten? 
They are  abiding in the state of Tathāgatas taking all majestic actions to attain true enlightenment, and displaying the quiet deportments of all voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas. 
These are the ten.”     “90. 
What kinds of hindrance-free works related to wisdom-knowledge does he perform?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva performs ten kinds of hindrance-free works related to wisdom-knowledge. 
What are these ten? 
They are  using one sentient being’s sounds to understand all sentient beings’ speech. 
These are the ten.”     “91. 
What kinds of hindrance-free works related to transcendental powers does he perform?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva performs ten kinds of hindrance-free works related to transcendental powers. 
What are these ten? 
They are  guarding and protecting Tathāgatas’ Ten Powers, and the roots_of_goodness of gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, mahoragas, the Brahma-king Śikhin, the god-king Śakra, the four world-protecting god-kings, voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and Bodhisattvas. 
These are the ten.”     “92. 
What kinds of hindrance-free works related to miraculous powers does he perform?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva performs ten kinds of hindrance-free works related to miraculous powers. 
What are these ten? 
They are  expounding that all worlds are the same as the open sky and enabling all sentient beings to understand. 
These are the ten.”     “93. 
What kinds of hindrance-free works related to other powers does he perform?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva performs ten kinds of hindrance-free works related to other powers. 
What are these ten? 
They are  never abandoning any sentient beings through the power of his great compassion. 
These are the ten.”     “Buddha-Sons, just described are a Bodhisattva’s different kinds of hindrance-free works related to ten kinds of things . 
If a Bodhisattva performs them, he can choose to attain or not to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi at will. Even after he attains true enlightenment, he will not cease taking Bodhisattva actions. 
Why not? 
Because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has made a great vow to skillfully reveal and enter countless doors of hindrance-free works.”     “94. 
What games  does he play?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva plays ten games . What are these ten? 
They are  hearing the Dharma in one Buddha’s assembly and, through the power of samādhi, manifesting bodies in an ineffable number of Buddhas’ assemblies to ceaselessly hear and retain the Dharma, without leaving his seat, making copies of his body, or rising from samādhi. Thought after thought, each body in samādhi manifests an ineffably ineffable number of bodies in samādhi. Although all kalpas will end, these manifested Bodhisattva bodies in samādhi will never end. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva plays these ten Bodhisattva games , he will acquire a Tathāgata’s game of unsurpassed great wisdom-knowledge.”     “95. 
What excellent actions does he take?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva takes ten excellent actions. What are these ten? 
They are  enabling, in one thought, all sentient beings to activate the bodhi mind and each to manifest countless bodies attaining samyak-saṁbodhi. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva takes these ten excellent actions, he will be able to take a Tathāgata’s excellent actions guided by the unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “96. 
What powers does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten powers. 
What are these ten? 
They are the powers of  his turning the Dharma wheel, which reveals every Dharma word right for all sentient beings’ capacities and desires. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten powers, he will acquire Buddhas’ Ten Powers arising from the unsurpassed all wisdom-knowledge.”     “97. 
What fearlessnesses does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten fearlessnesses. 
What are these ten? 
He thinks, ‘If innumerable sentient beings come from  the ten directions to ask me about 100,000 great dharmas, I do not see even a tiny difficulty in answering their questions. 
Because I do not see any difficulty, my mind has no fear and I will eventually arrive at the shore of great fearlessness. Without timidity, I answer their questions to resolve their doubts.’ This is his first fearlessness. 
He has received Tathāgatas’ empowerment of unimpeded eloquence and can use all words and sounds to reveal the secret of how to arrive at the opposite shore. He thinks, ‘If innumerable sentient beings come from  the ten directions to ask me about countless dharmas, I do not see even a tiny difficulty in answering their questions. 
Because I do not see any difficulty, my mind has no fear and I will eventually arrive at the shore of great fearlessness. Without fear, I answer their questions to resolve their doubts.’ This is his second fearlessness. 
He knows that a dharma is empty, and has no self, no belongings of a self, no action, no doer, no knower, no owner of a life, no nurturer, no pudgala , no five_aggregates, no twelve fields, and no eighteen_spheres. Having forever discarded all wrong views, his mind like the open sky, he thinks, ‘I do not see that sentient beings have even a small appearance that can impair my body, voice, and mind karmas.’ Why? 
Because a Bodhisattva stays far away from the wrong view that one has a self and its belongings, and does not see dharmas with any characterizing appearances. 
Because he does not see any such appearance, his mind has no fear. With indestructible strong and bold valor, he will eventually arrive at the shore of great fearlessness. This is his third fearlessness. He is protected and sustained by the power of Buddhas. 
He abides in a Buddha’s majestic deportments, and his actions are real and unwavering. He thinks, ‘I do not see even a little part of my deportments that can be criticized by sentient beings.’ Because he does see any such thing, his mind has no fear. He calmly expounds the Dharma to huge multitudes. This is his fourth fearlessness. 
His body, voice, and mind karmas are pure, fresh-white, and gentle, far from evil. He thinks, ‘I do not see even a little part of my body, voice, and mind karmas that can be criticized by sentient beings.’ Because he does not see any such thing, his mind has no fear. He can enable sentient beings to abide in the Buddha Dharma. This is his fifth fearlessness. 
He is attended by two strong vajra-wielding guards, and Dharma protectors such as gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, and mahoragas, as well as the Brahma-king Śikhin, the god-king Śakra, and the four god-kings, and is protected and remembered by all Tathāgatas. 
He thinks, ‘I do not see even a tiny sign that māras, non-Buddhists, or sentient beings can obstruct my walking the Bodhisattva_Way.’ Because he does not see any such sign, his mind has no fear. He joyfully takes Bodhisattva actions and will eventually arrive at the shore of great fearlessness. This is his sixth fearlessness. 
He has attained the foremost mindfulness, and Buddhas delight in his not forgetting anything. He thinks, ‘I do not see even a tiny sign of forgetting Tathāgatas’ teachings on how to attain bodhi.’ Because he does not see any such sign, his mind has no fear. He accepts and retains the true Dharma of all Tathāgatas, and takes Bodhisattva actions. This is his seventh fearlessness. 
He has acquired wisdom, skillful means, and a Bodhisattva’s powers, and always diligently teaches and transforms all sentient beings. Although he has vowed to attain Buddha bodhi, out of compassion for sentient beings and desire to bring them to  maturity, he displays his rebirth in a turbid world characterized by  afflictions. As he is born into a distinguished clan, has perfect retinues, does things at will, and enjoys pleasures, he thinks, ‘Although I am with my retinues, I do not see anything about them that can cause me to have any attachments, which would sabotage my training on the Bodhisattva Way, such as training in meditation, liberation, samādhi, dhāraṇī, and eloquence.’ Why? 
Because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has mastered all dharmas to arrive at the opposite shore, vowed to train ceaselessly in Bodhisattva actions, and does not see even one object in the world that can confuse or disturb his walking the Bodhisattva Way. 
Because he does see any such object, his mind has no fear. He will eventually arrive at the shore of great fearlessness and use the power of his great vows to display his rebirths in all worlds. This is his eighth fearlessness. 
Riding the Mahāyāna to take Bodhisattva actions, he uses the power of the mind of all wisdom-knowledge to display the quiet deportments of all voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas. He thinks, ‘I do not see even a tiny sign of my riding the Two_Vehicles to leave the world.’ Because he does not see any such sign, his mind has no fear and he will eventually arrive at the shore of great fearlessness. He can display the paths of all vehicles to affirm their equality in the Mahāyāna doctrine. This is his ninth fearlessness. 
Abiding in the bodhi of Buddhas, he completes all Bodhisattva actions and receives from Buddhas the prophecy of his acquiring all wisdom-knowledge. However, he constantly transforms sentient beings as he walks the Bodhisattva Way. He thinks, ‘I do not see even a tiny sign of my inability to bring to spiritual maturity, with a Buddha’s ease, even one sentient being ready to be transformed.’ Because he does not see any such sign, his mind has no fear and he will eventually arrive at the shore of great fearlessness. Never ceasing Bodhisattva actions or abandoning Bodhisattva vows, he displays a Buddha’s state to deliver sentient beings ready to be transformed. 
“Buddha-Sons, these are a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ten fearlessnesses. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in them, he will acquire Buddhas’ unsurpassed great fearlessness without abandoning a Bodhisattva’s fearlessness.”     “98. 
What exclusive dharmas does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten exclusive dharmas. 
What are these ten? 
He, without being taught by others, naturally practices the six pāramitās: 
he always delights in giving great alms, without stinginess; he constantly observes the precepts with purity, never violating any; he fully endures adversity, with an unwavering mind; he makes energetic progress, never regressing; he capably enters dhyāna, never distracted; he skillfully acquires wisdom, discarding all wrong views. 
This is his first exclusive dharma, i.e., practicing the pāramitās without being taught by others. 
He draws in all sentient beings because he gives them as alms the Dharma and material things; because he speaks loving words with right mindfulness and a kind face; because he joyfully reveals to them the true reality of dharmas, enabling them to understand Buddha bodhi; because he impartially benefits them without likes or dislikes. 
This is his second exclusive dharma, i.e., diligently drawing in sentient beings using the Four Drawing-in_Dharmas, without being taught by others. 
He skillfully transfers his merits to not seeking rewards, to following Buddha bodhi, to having no attachment to worldly dhyāna or samādhi, to benefiting all sentient beings, and to never ending Tathāgata wisdom. 
This is his third exclusive dharma, i.e., transferring his merits, without being taught by others, to inspiring sentient beings to develop roots of goodness and seek Buddha wisdom. 
He uses skillful means to arrive at the opposite shore, but his mind constantly cares about all sentient beings. Not disgusted with the states of the worldly, ordinary, and foolish, not delighting in the Two Vehicles on their paths to leave the world, and not attached to his own happiness, he diligently transforms and delivers sentient beings. Well able to enter and exit dhyāna and samādhi for his liberation, he comes and goes between birth and death like visiting a garden, never tiring or becoming bored. 
He may manifest himself in all birthplaces, such as māras’ palaces, or manifests as the god-king Śakra, the Brahma-king Śikhin, or the Brahma-king Maheśvara, ruler of the Three_Realms of_Existence. 
He may manifest as a non-Buddhist who stays far away from all wrong views and renounces family life. 
He may display his mastery of worldly pursuits, such as literature, mathematics, incanting spells, making seals, and even singing, dancing, and playing games. 
He may manifest as a comely woman whose wisdom and ability are the foremost in the world. 
He can expound worldly and supra-worldly dharmas and give definitive answers to questions in order to resolve doubts. 
He fully masters all worldly and supra-worldly things and arrives at the opposite shore, and sentient beings come to him and look upon him with respect. 
Even when he displays a voice-hearer’s or Pratyekabuddha’s deportments, he never loses the Mahāyāna mind. 
Although thought after thought he demonstrates attaining true enlightenment, he never ceases Bodhisattva actions. 
This is his fourth exclusive dharma, i.e., arriving at the opposite shore by skillful means without being taught by others. 
He has acquired both pure wisdom and applied wisdom, and uses both the supra-worldly and worldly ways. Therefore, he abides in nirvāṇa yet displays his birth and death; he knows that sentient beings are no sentient being yet diligently teaches and transforms them; he abides in nirvāṇa yet displays arising of afflictions; he abides in the firm and secret dharma body of wisdom yet manifests countless sentient beings’ bodies; he constantly abides in profound meditation yet displays enjoying the pleasures of the desire realm; he transcends the Three Realms of Existence yet never abandons sentient beings; he constantly enjoys Dharma delight yet displays singing and frolicking with beautiful maidens; he adorns his body with excellent marks yet manifests himself in ugly and lowly forms; he constantly accumulates myriad goodness without faults yet manifests as a hell-dweller, an animal, or a hungry ghost; he has arrived at the shore of Buddha wisdom yet does not abandon a Bodhisattva’s wisdom body. 
A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has acquired such immeasurable wisdom. Even voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas cannot not know it, not to mention ignorant sentient beings. 
This is his fifth exclusive dharma, i.e., taking both the supra-worldly and worldly actions without being taught by others. 
All his body, voice, and mind karmas follow his wisdom and are pure. 
With great lovingkindness, he forever ends the killing mind. With the right understanding, he never holds the wrong views. 
This is his sixth exclusive dharma, i.e., his body, voice, and mind karmas following wisdom without being taught by others. 
He has great compassion and never abandons sentient beings. In their stead and to benefit them, he undergoes their suffering, such as the suffering of hell-dwellers, animals, and hungry ghosts, never tiring or becoming bored. 
Intent on delivering all sentient beings, he never indulges in the objects of the five_desires but diligently ends sentient beings’ suffering. 
This is his seventh exclusive dharma, i.e., constantly eliciting great compassion without being taught by others. 
Sentient beings delight in seeing him, just as they never tire of seeing the Brahma-king Śikhin, the god-king Śakra, or any of the four godkings. 
Because, since far back in the past, he has done pure karmas without faults. 
This is his eighth exclusive dharma, i.e., attracting sentient beings, without being taught by others, to delight in seeing him. 
Even if he is in the perilous places of ordinary beings, voice-hearers, or Pratyekabuddhas, he never loses all wisdom-knowledge, his pure mind-jewel. 
There is a jewel called pure majesty. Even when it is covered in mud, its colorful radiance does not change but can clarify murky waters. 
Likewise, although a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva is in the impure places of the ordinary and the foolish, he never loses his pure mind to seek all wisdom-knowledge, and can enable evil sentient beings to discard their wrong views, afflictions, and impurities in order to seek all wisdomknowledge, their pure mind-jewel. 
This is his ninth exclusive dharma, i.e., never losing all wisdom-knowledge, his mind-jewel, even in difficult places, without being taught by others. 
He has acquired the wisdom-knowledge of self-realization. Realizing the truth without a teacher, he eventually arrives at the opposite shore with ease. Tying around his head with the taint-free Dharma scarf, he never gives up staying close to his beneficent learned friends and always delights in and reveres Tathāgatas. This is his tenth exclusive dharma, i.e., acquiring the supreme Dharma and never leaving his beneficent learned friends, without being taught by others. 
“Buddha-Sons, these are a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s ten exclusive dharmas. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in them, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed vast exclusive dharmas.”     “99. 
What kinds of karmas does he do?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva does ten kinds of karmas. 
What are these ten? 
They are karmas related to  all supports, to manifest in one thought what sentient beings want, fulfilling all their wishes. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva does these ten kinds of karmas, he will be able to do a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed vast karmas.”     “100. 
What bodies does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten bodies. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the universal body, because it is the same as those of past, present, and future Buddhas. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten bodies, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed endless body.”     “101. What kinds of body karmas does he do?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva does ten kinds of body karmas. 
What are these ten? 
They are  manifesting in his body all pure Buddha Lands, where all sentient beings attain bodhi. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva does these ten body karmas, he will be able to do a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed Buddha karmas to enlighten all sentient beings.”     “102. 
What other bodies does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has another ten bodies. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the bodhi body, which attains true enlightenment at any time at will. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten bodies, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom body.”     “103. What kinds of speech does he use?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva uses ten kinds of speech. 
What are these ten? 
They are  enlightening speech, to enable all sentient beings to understand  according to their capacities and desires. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva uses these ten kinds of speech, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed wondrous speech.”     “104. 
What are these ten? 
They are  attending all Bodhisattvas and Dharma masters in order to receive the wondrous Dharma, with no concern for his body and life. 
These are the ten.”     “105. 
From whom does he receive protection?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who purifies his voice karmas in those ten ways receives the protection of ten groups. 
What are these ten? 
They are  Dharma masters, led by Tathāgatas, the Dharma Kings. 
These are the ten.”     “106. 
What great works does he accomplish?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who receives such protection can accomplish ten great works. 
What are these ten? 
These are the ten.”     “107. 
What minds does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten minds. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the mind like the open sky, which is immeasurable. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten minds, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great pure mind.”     “108. What resolves does he make?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva makes ten resolves. 
What are these ten? 
They are the resolves  to beat the unsurpassed Dharma drum in all worlds, enabling sentient beings to understand  according to their capacities and desires. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten resolves, he will be able to make a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great resolves.”     “109. What pervasive minds does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten pervasive minds. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the mind that pervades all dharmas with ease, because it displays attaining Buddhahood in one thought. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten pervasive minds, he will acquire the pervasive majesty of the unsurpassed immeasurable Buddha Dharma.”     “110. 
What roots does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten roots. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the no-hindrance root, because he enters a Tathāgata’s Ten Powers. These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten roots, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s perfect roots of the surpassed great wisdom.”     “111. 
What profound minds does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten profound minds. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the profound mind that trains in accordance with the Dharma of all Buddhas. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten profound minds, he will acquire the unsurpassed pure profound mind of all wisdom-knowledge.”     “112. What higher profound minds does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten higher profound minds. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the higher profound mind that never rests, because it brings all sentient beings to  maturity. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten higher profound minds, he will acquire all Buddhas’ unsurpassed pure higher profound mind.”     “113. What trainings does he diligently do?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva diligently does ten trainings. 
What are these ten? 
They are  turning the noregress Dharma wheel, to turn all sentient beings’ minds. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva diligently does these ten trainings, he will diligently train to acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “114. 
What definite understandings does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has definite understandings of ten things. 
What are these ten? 
They are  command, because he can attain Buddhahood at any time at will. 
These are the ten. If a Bodhisattva abides in definite understandings of these ten things, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed definite understanding .”     “115. 
What definite understandings of worlds does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten definite understandings of worlds. 
What are these ten? 
They are the definite understandings that  one Dharma tone pervades all worlds and enables sentient beings to understand it according to their capacities and to feel joyful. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten definite understandings of worlds, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s definite understandings of unsurpassed vast Buddha Lands.”     “116. 
What definite understandings of sentient beings does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten definite understandings of sentient beings. 
What are these ten? 
They are the definite understandings that  all sentient beings can manifest as a Tathāgata, who, adorned with excellent physical marks and quiet deportments, enlightens sentient beings. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten definite understandings of sentient beings, he will quickly acquire a Tathāgata’s definite understandings of the unsurpassed great powers.” *** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 56 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  *** **** Notes ****     1. 
For a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed vast exclusive dharmas, see Eighteen Exclusive_Dharmas in the glossary. 
What habits does a BodhisattvaMahāsattva have?”      “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten habits. 
What are these ten? 
They are  differentiating various states. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten habits, he will forever leave behind all his afflictions and their lingering traces, and acquire a Tathāgata’s great wisdom-knowledge , which is not a habit.”     “118. 
What things does he use?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva uses ten things in order never to cease taking Bodhisattva actions. 
What are these ten? 
They are  all dharmas, to understand them in every way with radiant wisdom. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva uses these ten things, he will acquire all Tathāgatas’ unsurpassed way to use nothing.”     “119. 
What trainings does he do?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva does ten trainings. 
What are these ten? 
They are  turning the wheel of the true Dharma. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva does these ten trainings, he will be able to do the unsurpassed training in all areas.”     “120. How does he master the Buddha Dharma?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva masters the Buddha Dharma in ten ways. 
What are these ten? 
They are  delighting in seeking the state of a Tathāgata’s Ten_Powers. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten ways, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “121. How does he lose the Buddha Dharma?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva can lose the Buddha Dharma in ten ways, which he should avoid. 
What are these ten? 
They are  resenting other Bodhisattvas. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva stays far away from these ten ways, he will enter the Bodhisattva path to transcend rebirth.”     “122. How does he transcend rebirth?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva transcends rebirth in ten ways. 
What are these ten? 
They are  having realized Buddha bodhi yet never abandoning Bodhisattva vows and actions. 
Buddha-Sons, a BodhisattvaMahāsattva transcends rebirth in the world in these ten ways, which are inaccessible to sentient beings, voice-hearers, and Pratyekabuddhas. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in them, he will acquire a Bodhisattva’s definite dharmas.”     “123. 
What definite dharmas does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten definite dharmas. 
What are these ten? 
They are  living with all Tathāgatas , without any difference. 
These are the ten.”     “124. 
How does he acquire the Buddha Dharma?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva acquires the Buddha Dharma in ten ways. 
What are these ten? 
They are  preserving the Tathāgata seeds, because he enables all sentient beings to delight in activating the bodhi mind and sustaining it with good dharmas. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten ways, he will receive the titles of a great man.”     “125. 
What are the titles of a great man?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten titles of a great man. 
What are these ten? 
They are  Inconceivable Sattva, because he attains Buddhahood in one thought. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva receives these ten titles, he completes walking the Bodhisattva Way.”     “126. What paths does he take?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva takes ten Bodhisattva paths. 
What are these ten? 
The one path, because he never abandons the bodhi mind as the unique path. 
The double path, because he develops wisdom and acquires skillful means. 
The triple path, because he enters emptiness, no appearance, and no wish , unattached to the Three Realms of Existence. 
The path of the four actions, because he repents of his sins, expresses sympathetic joy over others’ merits, reverently requests every Tathāgata to remain in the world, and skillfully transfers his merits without rest. 
The path of the Five Roots, because he abides in pure faith, makes energetic progress to complete his work, abides undistracted in right mindfulness, skillfully enters and exits samādhi, and capably differentiates the states of wisdom. 
The path of the six_transcendental_powers, because he has the god eye, to see myriad things in all worlds and that sentient beings die here and are reborn there; because he has the god ear, to hear Buddhas expound the Dharma, enabling him to accept and remember Their teachings, and to widely expound them to sentient beings according to their capacities; because he has the ability of telepathy, to know others’ minds hindrance free; because he has the ability to know everything throughout all past kalpas, as he expands his roots of goodness; because he has miraculous powers, to produce manifestations for sentient beings ready to be transformed; because he has the wisdom-knowledge that all his afflictions have ended, as he verifies the true reality of dharmas and ceaselessly takes Bodhisattva actions. 
The path of the seven memories, because he remembers the Buddha, the Dharma, the Saṅgha, almsgiving, the precepts, heaven, and sentient beings. 
He remembers the Buddha, because he sees in one pore innumerable Buddhas enlightening all sentient beings. 
He remembers the Dharma, because he receives the wondrous Dharma in all Tathāgatas’ assemblies without leaving even one Tathāgata’s assembly, and expounds it to sentient beings according to their capacities and desires. 
He remembers the Saṅgha, because he constantly sees Bodhisattvas everywhere in all worlds. 
He remembers almsgiving, because he does all Bodhisattva trainings in relinquishing all he has as alms, to expand his almsgiving mind. 
He remembers the precepts, because he never abandons the bodhi mind and always transfers all his roots of goodness to sentient beings. 
He remembers heaven, because he constantly thinks of Bodhisattvas in the palace of Tuṣita Heaven , who will demonstrate attaining Buddhahood in their next life. 
He remembers sentient beings, because he ceaselessly teaches, transforms, and tames them, using wisdom and skillful means.      The Eightfold_Right_Path to bodhi, because he follows right views, right thinking, right speech, right actions, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right samādhi. 
He holds the right views, because he stays far away from all the wrong views. 
He does the right thinking, because he follows all wisdom-knowledge and discards differentiation. 
He uses the right speech, because he follows the holy teachings and stays away from the four faults of speech. He takes the right actions, because he teaches, transforms, and tames sentient beings. 
He makes a right livelihood, because he knows the contentment of the dhūta way of ascetic life, displays proper deportments, follows the four ways of the holy to train to attain bodhi, and leaves all faults behind forever. 
He makes the right effort, because he diligently does all Bodhisattva trainings and enters a Buddha’s Ten Powers hindrance free. 
His mind abides in right mindfulness, because he remembers all words and sounds, and ends the worldly wandering mind. 
His mind abides in right samādhi, because he capably enters a Bodhisattva’s inconceivable liberation door, which leads from one samādhi to all samādhis. The path of entering the nine levels of samādhi, because he abides in meditation. 
In the first dhyāna, he discards desires and malice, and uses his voice to expound the Dharma hindrance free. 
In the second dhyāna, he discards coarse and fine thinking, and teaches and transforms sentient beings using the thinking arising from all wisdom-knowledge. 
In the third dhyāna, he discards the joy experienced in meditation and sees all Buddhas, with great joy in his heart. 
In the fourth dhyāna, he discards worldly happiness and enjoys the supra-worldly happiness of walking the Bodhisattva Way. 
Then, without moving, he enters  samādhi in the formless realm without abandoning his rebirth in the desire realm or the form realm. 
Even when he abides in the Samādhi of Total Suspension of Sensory Reception and Perception, he never ceases taking Bodhisattva actions. 
to know that all sentient beings have ended their desires, afflictions, and habits forever, without abandoning his Bodhisattva actions. 
“These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten Bodhisattva paths, he will acquire all Tathāgatas’ unsurpassed skillful paths. 
“Buddha-Sons, to attain bodhi, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva takes immeasurable paths, uses immeasurable aids, does immeasurable trainings, and adorns bodhi in immeasurable ways.”     “127. 
What immeasurable paths does he take?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva takes immeasurable Bodhisattva paths to bodhi, which are as immeasurable as ten things. 
What are these ten? 
These are the ten.”     “128. 
What immeasurable aids does he use?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva uses immeasurable aids to attain bodhi, which can be compared to ten things. 
What are these ten? 
as all wisdom-knowledge is immeasurable, so too are his aids. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in such immeasurable aids, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s immeasurable wisdom.”     “129. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva does ten immeasurable trainings to attain bodhi. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the training to abide equally in a Tathāgata’s Ten Powers, Four_Fearlessnesses, and knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge, because he has no doubts about  dharmas. These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva does these ten immeasurable trainings, he can then do the unsurpassed skillful training in order to acquire a Tathāgata’s wisdom-knowledge.”     “130. 
How does he adorn bodhi?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva adorns bodhi in ten immeasurable ways. 
What are these ten? 
Although he, without leaving the desire realm, enters dhyānas, liberations, and samādhis in the form realm and the formless realm, he will not for this reason be reborn there. This is his first way to adorn bodhi. 
Although his wisdom directs him to enter the path of voice-hearers, he does not ride their vehicle to leave the world. This is his second way to adorn bodhi. 
Although his wisdom directs him to enter the path of Pratyekabuddhas, he elicits great compassion without rest. This is his third way to adorn bodhi. 
Although he is surrounded by gods and humans as his retinue and entertained by the song-dance of 100,000 beautiful maidens, he never abandons even temporarily his practice of dhyāna, liberation, and samādhi. This is his fourth way to adorn bodhi. 
Although he enjoys gratification of desires and pleasures together with all sentient beings, he never abandons even for one thought a Bodhisattva’s Samādhi of Equality. This is his fifth way to adorn bodhi. 
Although he has arrived at the shore opposite this world of existences and has no attachment to worldly dharmas, he never abandons his efforts to deliver sentient beings. This is his sixth way to adorn bodhi. 
Although he abides in the right path, right wisdom-knowledge, and right views, he displays entering all evil paths and reveals the truth of his not accepting them and the purity of his not being attached to them, enabling sentient beings to turn away from evil ways. This is his seventh way to adorn bodhi. 
He always abides by and protects Tathāgatas’ pure precepts, and does body, voice, and mind karmas without faults. However, to teach and transform those who have violated the precepts, he displays ways of the ordinary and the foolish. Although he has accumulated pure merits and walks the Bodhisattva Way, he displays his rebirths as hell-dwellers, animals, or hungry ghosts, or  in perilous, difficult, or proverty-stricken places, to enable sentient beings to achieve liberation, though he is not actually reborn there. This is his eighth way to adorn bodhi. 
He is supported by the spiritual power of all Tathāgatas, and has the same dharma body as those of all Buddhas. Having mastered all radiant secret dharmas of a great man, he impartially abides in all vehicles. Buddhas’ states appear before him, and the radiance of his worldly wisdom-knowledge illuminates the realm of all sentient beings. Although he can be a Dharma teacher of sentient beings, he displays seeking the true Dharma without rest. 
Because a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva walks the Bodhisattva Way by skillful means and displays to sentient beings whatever they are ready to see. 
This is his ninth way to adorn bodhi. 
His roots of goodness and his actions complete, all Tathāgatas pour sweet dew on his head. He arrives at the opposite shore, where he is at ease with all dharmas. 
With the hindrance-free Dharma scarf tied around his head, he manifests everywhere a Tathāgata’s hindrance-free body, pervading all worlds. With the highest mastery of dharmas, he turns the hindrance-free pure Dharma wheel. 
Although he has completed all Bodhisattva trainings to achieve freedom, for sentient beings’ sake he displays his rebirths in all worlds. 
Although in the same states of all past, present, and future Buddhas, he never abandons Bodhisattva actions, never gives up Bodhisattva teachings, never slackens in doing Bodhisattva karmas, never leaves the Bodhisattva Way, never relaxes Bodhisattva deportments, never neglects what a Bodhisattva should use, never abandons Bodhisattva skillful means, never ends Bodhisattva work, never tires of rendering Bodhisattva services, and never stops using Bodhisattva powers to abide in the world. 
Why not? 
Because a Bodhisattva who wishes to quickly attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi observes the door of all wisdom-knowledge and trains in Bodhisattva actions without rest. 
This is his tenth way to adorn bodhi. 
“If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten ways, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great way to adorn bodhi without abandoning the Bodhisattva Way.”     “131. What feet does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten feet. 
What are these ten? 
They are  training, to stay far away from all evils. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva walks with these ten feet, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed supreme feet, which can reach all worlds in one step.”     “132. 
What hands does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten hands. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the hand that holds the jewel of wisdom-knowledge, to emit the radiance of the Dharma in order to dispel the darkness of sentient beings’ afflictions. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva uses these ten hands, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed hands, which cover all worlds in the ten_directions.”     “133. 
What abdomens does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten abdomens. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the abdomen that stays far away from opposite views , because he enables all sentient beings to enter a Buddha’s abdomen. These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva uses these ten abdomens, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed vast abdomen, which can hold all sentient beings.”     “134. 
What internal organs does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten internal organs. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the Bodhisattva organ that knows all sentient beings, all worlds, all dharmas, and all Buddhas, because he clearly sees everything in one thought. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva uses these ten Bodhisattva organs, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s internal organ of unsurpassed roots of goodness and indestructible great wisdom.”     “135. 
What hearts does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten hearts. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the heart adorned with the symbol of a swastika—an excellent organ as adamantine as vajra—because māras as numerous as sentient beings cannot move even one of his hairs. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva uses these ten hearts, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s heart, the radiant store of unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “136. 
What armors does he don?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva dons ten armors. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the resolute mind, to resolve all doubts about dharmas. 
These are the ten. 
If a bodhisattva dons these ten armors, he will don a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed armor, to subjugate all māra legions.”     “137. 
What weapons does he have?”     “Buddha-sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten Bodhisattva weapons. 
What are these ten? 
They are  all wisdom-knowledge, never to abandon Bodhisattva actions. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva uses these ten weapons, he will be able to eliminate all sentient beings’ afflictions accumulated over their long night.”     “138. 
What heads does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten heads. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the head that guards the Dharma of all Buddhas, because it enables the seeds of the Three_Jewels never to end. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva uses these ten heads, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s head, the unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “139. 
What eyes does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten eyes. 
They are  the all-wisdom-knowledge eye, which sees the dharma realm as the universal door. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva uses these ten eyes, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom eye.”     “140. 
What ears does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten ears. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the ear that constantly hears the true Dharma without rest from his initial activation of the bodhi mind to his arrival at his bodhimaṇḍa, never to abandon his work of transforming sentient beings. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva uses these ten ears, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom ear.”     “141. 
What noses does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten noses. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the nose that smells the fragrance of the state of all Buddhas’ wisdom and never abandons Bodhisattva actions. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva uses these ten noses, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s immeasurable boundless pure nose.”     “142. What tongues does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten tongues. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the tongue that subjugates all māras and those on the wrong paths, ends sentient beings’ afflictions and  birth and death, and enables them to attain nirvāṇa. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva uses these ten tongues, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed tongue, which covers all Buddha Lands.”     “143. 
What bodies does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten bodies. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the celestial body, to teach gods in the desire realm, the form realm, and the formless realm. 
the affliction-free dharma body, to effortlessly manifest all sentient beings’ bodies. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva uses these ten bodies, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed body.”     “144. What mental actions does he take?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva takes ten mental actions. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the mental action to master samādhi, to enter deep into a Buddha’s samādhi to see that one has no self and its belongings. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva takes these ten mental actions, he will be able to take all Buddhas’ unsurpassed mental actions.”     “145. 
What are these ten? 
He walks  to master the entire Buddha Dharma, because he never ceases taking Bodhisattva actions. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva does these ten things, he will be able to walk a Tathāgata’s walk, which neither comes nor goes.”     “146. Where does he stand still?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva stands still in ten places. 
What are these ten? 
They are  his bodhimaṇḍa, to possess the Ten Powers, the Four Fearlessnesses, and the entire Buddha Dharma. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva stands still in these ten places, he will stand still in the unsurpassed all wisdom-knowledge.”     “147. 
Where does he sit?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva sits on ten seats. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the vajra seat, to subjugate māras and those on the wrong paths. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva sits in these ten seats, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s seat of unsurpassed true enlightenment.”     “148. Where does he lie down?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva lies down in ten places. 
What are these ten? 
They are  effortlessness, because he has completed his effortful training. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva lies down in these ten places, he will lie down in a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great Dharma and enlighten all sentient beings.”     “149. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten abodes. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the equality of all dharmas, because he has received the prophecy of his attaining Buddhahood. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten abodes, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed hindrance-free abode.”     “150. In what areas does he train?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva trains in ten areas. 
What are these ten? 
They are  his bodhimaṇḍa, to acquire all wisdom-knowledge without ceasing Bodhisattva actions. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva trains in these ten areas, he will acquire the areas of a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “151. What kinds of observations does he make?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva makes ten kinds of observations. 
What are these ten? 
They are observations of  a Buddha’s samādhi, to do Buddha work everywhere in the ten directions. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva makes these ten kinds of observations, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom to make observations.”     “152. 
What are these ten? 
They are pervasive observations of  all sentient beings, never to abandon great compassion for them. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva makes these ten kinds of pervasive observations, he will be able to use a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom to make pervasive observations.”     “153. 
What are these ten? 
They are the thrusts of  a Tathāgata, to use all aids to acquire the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge, to acquire all he should acquire, to realize all he should realize in one thought attuned to wisdom, to sit on the lion throne to subjugate māras and enemies, and to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva makes these ten kinds of thrusts, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed thrust, which masters all dharmas.”     “154. What lion’s roars does he roar?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva roars ten lion’s roars. 
What are these ten? 
He declares, ‘I will acquire the sublime appearances of all Buddhas’ bodies, voices, and minds.’ This is the great lion’s roar of insatiable accumulation of merits. He declares, ‘I will acquire the wisdom of all Buddhas.’ This is the great lion’s roar of insatiable seeking of wisdom. He declares, ‘I will annihilate all māras and māra karmas.’ This is the great lion’s roar of doing the right training to end all his afflictions. He declares, ‘I will verify that a dharma has no self, is no sentient being, is no pudgala , does not own its lifespan, is empty, has no appearance, has no wish for rebirth, and is pure like the open sky.’ This is the great lion’s roar of enduring realization that dharmas have no birth. 
When a Bodhisattva ready to display his last life shakes all Buddha Lands and purifies them, the Brahma-king Śikhin, the god-king Śakra, and the four god-kings come to him and request, ‘We pray that you, Bodhisattva, will display being born though there is no birth.’ This Bodhisattva then observes the entire world with his hindrance-free eye and says, ‘No sentient being can compare with me.’ Then he displays his birth in a palace. 
He walks seven steps and roars the great lion’s roar, ‘I am the foremost supreme one in the world, and I will end sentient beings’ births and deaths forever.’ This is the great lion’s roar of what he will do. 
“If a Bodhisattva roars these ten lion’s roars, he will be able to roar a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great lion’s roar.” *** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 57 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  *** **** Notes ****     1. 
See Five Roots, Five Powers, and Seven Bodhi Factors listed in the glossary’s Thirty-seven Elements of Bodhi. 
What kinds of pure almsgiving does a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva do?”      “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva does ten kinds of pure almsgiving. 
What are these ten? 
They are  almsgiving comprising the three pure wheels—the almsgiver, the recipient, and the alms—because he observes with right_mindfulness that they are empty, like the open sky. 
If a Bodhisattva does these ten kinds of pure almsgiving, he will be able to do a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed vast pure almsgiving.”     “156. 
What pure precepts does he observe?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva observes ten pure precepts. 
What are these ten? 
They are the pure precepts for  safeguarding all sentient beings, to elicit great compassion for them. These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva observes these ten pure precepts, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed faultless pure precepts.”     “157. What pure endurance does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten pure endurances. 
What are these ten? 
They are  pure endurance in following a Bodhisattva’s true wisdom-knowledge that all dharmas have no birth, because he enters the state of all wisdom-knowledge without being taught by others. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva has these ten pure endurances, he will acquire, without being taught by others, all Buddhas’ unsurpassed endurance of dharmas.”     “158. 
What are these ten? 
They are pure energetic progress in  acquiring dharma illumination, because he transcends all  grounds, receives blessings with nectar poured on his head by Buddhas, and uses his affliction-free body to display universally worthy actions, such as disappearing from heaven, being born in the human world, renouncing family life, attaining bodhi, expounding the Dharma, and entering parinirvāṇa. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva makes these ten kinds of energetic progress, he will be able to make a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great pure energetic progress.”     “159. How does he practice pure meditation?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva practices pure meditation in ten ways. 
What are these ten? 
They are  using transcendental powers in a playful way, because he enters a Buddha’s samādhi and knows that a dharma has no self. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva practices pure meditation in these ten ways, he will be able to do a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great pure meditation.”     “160. 
What kinds of pure wisdom does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of pure wisdom. 
What are these ten? 
They are  pure wisdom that uses dhāraṇī, eloquence, and the skillful-means pāramitā ], because it reveals the supreme wisdom-knowledge;  pure wisdom that, in one thought attuned to vajra wisdom-knowledge, knows the equality of all dharmas, because it reveals the highest wisdom-knowledge of all dharmas. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of pure wisdom, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s hindrance-free great wisdom.”     “161. What kinds of pure lovingkindness does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of pure lovingkindness. 
What are these ten? 
They are  pure lovingkindness without conditions, because it enters Bodhisattva nature, which has neither birth nor death. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of pure lovingkindness, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed vast pure lovingkindness.”     “162. 
What kinds of pure compassion does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of pure compassion. 
What are these ten? 
They are  pure compassion, called true wisdom-knowledge, that arises from a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva’s knowledge that all dharmas are like bird tracks in the sky and that sentient beings cannot see this through the film of ignorance covering their eyes, because he gives them teachings on nirvāṇa. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of pure compassion, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed vast pure compassion.”     “163. What kinds of pure joy does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of pure joy. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the pure joy of practicing asceticism on the Bodhisattva_Way, and of acquiring a Buddha’s quiet immovable unsurpassed samādhi and wisdom. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of pure joy, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed vast pure joy.”     “164. What kinds of pure equability does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of pure equability. 
What are these ten? 
They are  the pure equability of staying far away from all differentiations, such as high and low, acceptance and rejection, by constantly abiding in right samādhi and endurance in his realization of the equality of dharmas. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of equability, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed vast pure equability.”     “165. What meanings does he master?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva masters ten meanings. 
What are these ten? 
They are the meanings of  the great parinirvāṇa, because he ends all his suffering without abandoning Bodhisattva actions. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva masters these ten meanings, he will acquire the unsurpassed meaning of all wisdomknowledge.”     “166. What dharmas does he follow?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva follows ten dharmas. 
What are these ten? 
They are  staying away from upādhinirvāṇa, because he takes all Bodhisattva actions and ceaselessly trains and learns. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva follows these ten dharmas, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed vast dharmas.”     “167. 
What are these ten? 
They are  giving all sentient beings, without anxieties or regrets but with a mind as vast as the open sky, his roots of goodness, developed in asaṁkhyeya kalpas, for him to attain the unsurpassed bodhi as easily as if it were in his palm, because he develops vast wisdom and attains great bodhi. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva acquires merits in these ten ways as aids to attain bodhi, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed vast merits.”     “168. 
What are these ten? 
He stays close to true beneficent learned friends, respectfully makes offerings and obeisance to them, and follows their teachings. This is his first way, because he is upright, free from falsity and pretense. 
He forever discards arrogance and is always humble and respectful, and his body, voice, and mind karmas are gentle and benevolent, never coarse, deceptive, or crooked. This is his second way, because he is naturally a Dharma vessel. 
He abides in mindfulness with awareness, never distracted or confused. With a sense of shame and a sense of dishonor, his mind is gentle and peaceful. He constantly holds the six_memories, honors the six_elements_of_harmony_and respect, and abides in the six firmnesses. This is his third way, because he uses the ten_kinds_of_wisdom-knowledge as skillful means. 
He delights in the Dharma and its meanings. As the Dharma is his joy, he insatiably listens to its teachings, abandoning worldly theories and statements. He intently listens to and accepts supra-worldly teachings, stays far away from the Small Vehicle, and enters the wisdom of the Mahāyāna. This is his fourth way, because his right mindfulness is never distracted. 
He persistently practices the six_pāramitās and brings his Four Immeasurable Minds  to maturity, training well in accordance with the radiant Dharma. He diligently consults the wise to stay far away from all evil paths and take the right path. He delights in observing with right mindfulness to tame his mind and protect others’ minds. This is his fifth way, because he resolutely trains in accordance with the true Dharma. 
He delights in renouncing family life and has no attachment to the Three Realms of Existence. He constantly observes his mind in order to be free from evil thoughts. Having eliminated the three evil feelings , all his body, voice, and mind karmas are good, and he definitely knows the true nature of his mind. 
This is his sixth way, because he can purify his mind and others’ minds. 
He observes that the five_aggregates are like illusions, the eighteen spheres are like venomous snakes, and the twelve_fields are like the open sky. He observes that all dharmas are like illusions, mirages, dreams, reflections, echoes, images, pictures in the sky, the colors of a rainbow, the moon in the water, a flaming wheel drawn by whirling a torch, sunlight, and moonlight. They have neither form nor shape, and are neither perpetual nor ceasing, neither coming nor going nor abiding. Observing in this way, he knows that all dharmas have neither birth nor death. 
This is his seventh way, because he knows that dharma nature is emptiness. 
He has heard the teachings that a dharma has no self, is no sentient being, no everlasting soul, and no pudgala , and has no mind, no mental objects, no greed, no anger, no delusion, no body, no action, no belongings, no master, no dependency on food and clothing, and no attachments, because all such things are in nirvāṇa. He deeply believes the teachings he has heard, has no doubts about them, and never maligns them. This is his eighth way, because he achieves total liberation. 
He constantly abides in śamatha and vipaśyanā with a quiet mind and without any thoughts, and realizes that he has no self, is no person, does not perform, does not take action, does not imagine having a self that does karmas, and has no ulcers or scars. And he has endurance in seeing that his realization is no attainment. He sees that one’s body, voice, and mind karmas neither come nor go, and that there is no energetic progress or bold valiance. As he observes all sentient beings and all dharmas, his mind remains impartial and abides in nothing, neither this shore nor that shore, because this or that comes from nowhere and goes to nowhere. 
This is his ninth way, because he arrives at that shore opposite this shore of differentiation. 
Because he sees the purity of the open sky, he sees the purity of the dharma realm. Because he sees the purity of the dharma realm, he sees the purity of wisdom. This is his tenth way, because he trains and acquires all wisdomknowledge. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva develops wisdom in these ten ways as aids to attain bodhi. 
If a Bodhisattva uses them, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s store of hindrance-free pure wondrous wisdom-knowledge of all dharmas.”     “169. 
What kinds of full illumination does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of full illumination. 
What are these ten? 
They are the full illumination  to acquire the wisdomknowledge of affliction-free transcendental powers and to end sentient beings’ afflictions. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva has these ten kinds of full illumination, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great radiance of the entire Buddha Dharma.”     “170. How does he seek the Dharma?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva seeks the Dharma in ten ways. 
What are these ten? 
They are  seeking the Dharma to master its entirety, because he does not delight in vehicles other than the Mahāyāna. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva seeks the Dharma in these ten ways, he will acquire the great wisdom-knowledge of the entire Buddha Dharma without being taught by others.”     “171. 
What are these ten? 
They are  developing vast wisdom, using keen faculties, delighting in delivering all sentient beings, diligently accumulating merit and wisdom as aids to attain bodhi, and acquiring a Tathāgata’s Ten_Powers and Four_Fearlessnesses, and all His virtues, in the way a Bodhisattva comes to understand the Dharma. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva comes to understand the Dharma in these ten ways, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom to understand the Dharma.”     “172. How does he train?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva trains in ten ways. 
What are these ten? 
They are  abiding in the boundless vast dharma realm and ending his afflictions to purify himself. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva trains in these ten ways, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed way to train.”     “173. 
What kinds of māras does he have?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has ten kinds of māras. 
What are these ten? 
They are  his wisdomknowledge of bodhi, because he can regard it as an attainment. 
These are the ten. 
A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should use skillful means to stay far away from these ten kinds of māras.”     “174. 
What are these ten? 
They are  increasing his arrogance, holding a disrespectful attitude, distressing or harming sentient beings, refusing to seek the true Dharma and true wisdom, or keeping his mind vile and closed. 
These are the ten. 
A Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva should quickly turn away from these ten kinds of māra karmas and diligently seek Buddha karmas.”     “175. 
What are these ten? 
They are  planting the same roots of goodness as those of all Bodhisattvas, without any difference. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva discards māra karmas in these ten ways, he can quit all māra paths.”     “176. How does he see a Buddha?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva sees a Buddha in ten ways. 
What are these ten? 
They are  seeing a wish-fulfilling Buddha by benefiting all sentient beings. 
If a Bodhisattva sees a Buddha in these ten ways, he will constantly see the unsurpassed Tathāgata.”     “177. 
What kinds of Buddha karmas does he do?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva does ten kinds of Buddha karmas. 
What are these ten? 
They are  diligently and insatiably accumulating merit and wisdom though he accepts without shock or fear that he and sentient beings are always in nirvāṇa; never dismissing dharma appearances though he knows that all dharmas have no actions; always delighting in seeing Buddhas and making offerings to Them though he has ended his greed for experiencing various states; using various skillful means to seek all wisdom-knowledge though he knows that he can realize the truth without others’ help; always delighting in adorning all Buddha Lands though he knows that they are like the open sky; teaching and transforming sentient beings without tiring or becoming bored though he constantly observes that one has no self and is no person; using his wisdom-knowledge of transcendental powers to produce changes though he knows that the dharma realm never changes; training in Bodhisattva actions without rest though he has acquired  the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge; turning the pure Dharma wheel to delight multitudes though he knows that dharmas are beyond words; never abandoning his Bodhisattva body though he can display Buddhas’ miraculous powers; displaying his rebirths everywhere though he demonstrates entering the great parinirvāṇa, thus using both relative and absolute ways . 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva does these ten kinds of Buddha karmas, he will be able to do the unsurpassed vast karmas without being taught by others.”     “178. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva can have ten kinds of arrogant behaviors. 
What are these ten? 
They are  with arrogance-shrouded mind, failing to get close to, revere, or make offerings to a Buddha who has appeared in the world, failing to cause new goodness to arise, causing existing goodness to end, speaking words he should not speak, or disputing what he should not dispute. He will definitely fall into a perilous deep pit in the future and be unable to encounter a Buddha in 100,000 kalpas, much less hear the Dharma, though he will eventually awaken because he activated the bodhi mind in the past. 
These are the ten. If a Bodhisattva stays away from these ten kinds of arrogant behaviors, he will be able to do all Buddhas’ ten unsurpassed pure mind-karmas.”     “179. 
What are these ten? 
They are  developing the ability, even if only one of his karmas is praised by Buddhas, to destroy all māras, to end his afflictions and disputes, to remove all hindrances and fetters, to teach, transform, and tame all sentient beings, to follow his wisdom to acquire the true Dharma, to purify all Buddha Lands, to acquire transcendental powers and the Three Clarities, and to train diligently without idleness or regress. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva does these ten wise karmas, he will acquire a Tathāgata’s skillful means to do the unsurpassed wise karmas.”     “180. 
What things are supported by māras?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva can do ten things supported by māras. 
What are these ten? 
They are  doubting and maligning the true Dharma. 
These are the ten.”     “181. What things are supported by Buddhas?”     “Buddha-Sons, if a Bodhisattva discards those ten things supported by māras, he can do ten things supported by Buddhas. 
What are these ten? 
They are  having acquired all wisdomknowledge yet continuing to take Bodhisattva actions, never allowing the Bodhisattva character-type to end. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva does these ten things supported by Buddhas, he will receive Buddhas’ unsurpassed support.”     “182. 
What are these ten? 
They are the knowledge that  one should end all thoughts, end all grasping, ignore past and future, and attain nirvāṇa. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva abides in these ten kinds of knowledge, he will be supported by the unsurpassed Dharma of all Buddhas.”     “183. 
What karmas does he do in Tuṣita Heaven ?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who abides in Tuṣita Heaven does ten karmas. 
What are these ten? 
To teach gods in the desire realm to tire of all dharmas, he says, ‘A life of ease is impermanent, and all pleasures will end.’ Then he persuades them to activate the bodhi mind. 
This is his first karma. 
He teaches gods in the form realm how to enter and exit dhyāna, liberation, and samādhi. If they become attached to any of them or if their attachment, out of their ignorance of the truth, gives rise to wrong views, such as the view that one has a self or other wrong views, he reveals to them the true reality of dharmas. 
If they have the inverted perception that all forms and non-forms are pure, he explains to them that they are impure and impermanent, and persuades them to activate the bodhi mind. 
This is his second karma. 
He enters the samādhi called Being Adorned with Radiance. His body emits radiance, illuminating everywhere in the Three-Thousand_Large Thousandfold_World, and he uses various sounds to expound the Dharma to sentient beings according to their minds. 
After they have heard the Dharma, their minds are purified and, after death, they will be reborn in Tuṣita Heaven, where he will persuade them to activate the bodhi mind. 
This is his third karma. 
He uses his hindrance-free eye to see all Bodhisattvas in Tuṣita Heavens in worlds in the ten directions, and they also see him. 
He then expounds to them the wondrous Dharma, and displays to them the majesty of descending into his mother’s womb, being born, renouncing family life, and going to his bodhimaṇḍa. 
He also displays to them his past actions, which have led to his great wisdom and all his merits. He does such things without leaving his seat . 
This is his fourth karma. 
He is respectfully surrounded by all Bodhisattvas who come from Tuṣita Heavens in worlds in the ten directions. 
After receiving his teachings, they greatly rejoice over gaining something they never before had, and return to their palaces in their own worlds. 
This is his fifth karma. 
When he is expounding the Dharma, the māra-king Pāpīyān, ruler of the desire realm, surrounded by his retinues, comes to visit him, intending to sabotage his Bodhisattva karmas. To subjugate the māra legions, he uses prajñāpāramitā , skillful means, and wisdom, encompassed in his vajra wisdom-knowledge, to expound the Dharma to them. He uses two kinds of words, gentle and harsh, to keep Pāpīyān from finding an opportunity. 
Seeing his command of awesome powers, all māras activate the anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi mind. 
This is his sixth karma. 
He knows that god-sons in the desire realm dislike hearing the Dharma. 
In a loud voice he tells all of them, ‘Today, I, a Bodhisattva, will display rare things in the palace. Those who wish to see them should come here quickly.’ After hearing his words, countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis of nayutas of god-sons assemble in Tuṣita Heaven. 
Seeing that they have assembled, he displays to them rare things in the palace, and those god-sons are elated and intoxicated by what they never before saw or heard. 
In the midst of their delight, he tells them, ‘Kindly ones, all processes are impermanent; all experiences come down to suffering; all dharmas have no self; nirvāṇa is silent and still.’ Then he tells them, ‘All of you should train in Bodhisattva actions and fully acquire  the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge.’ Having heard these Dharma words, those god-sons lament and feel disgusted , and all of them activate the bodhi mind. 
This is his seventh karma. 
Without leaving his seat, he can visit all Buddhas in worlds in the ten directions and stay close to Them, make obeisance to Them, and reverently listen to Their teachings. 
To enable him to receive the supreme blessings with nectar poured on his head, Buddhas reveal to him the Bodhisattva ground, called All Transcendental Powers, where in one thought attuned to wisdom, he can acquire all supreme merits and enter the position of possessing the knowledge of all wisdom-knowledge. 
This is his eighth karma. 
To make offerings to Tathāgatas, he uses great spiritual powers to manifest various offerings, called excellent and enjoyable, throughout the dharma realm, the domain of space, and all worlds. 
When innumerable sentient beings in his world see these offerings, they activate the anuttara-samyaksaṁbodhi mind. 
This is his ninth karma. 
He produces countless illusion-like and reflection-like Dharma Doors throughout all worlds in the ten directions, and manifests various colors, appearances, shapes and forms, deportments, enterprises, skillful means, analogies, and discourses, to delight sentient beings according to their minds. 
This is his tenth karma. 
“Buddha-Sons, these are the ten karmas that a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva does when he abides in Tuṣita Heaven. 
If a Bodhisattva does them, he will descend to the human world to be born.”     “184. 
How does he disappear from Tuṣita Heaven?”     “Buddha-Sons, when a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva is about to descend from Tuṣita Heaven, he presents ten displays. 
What are these ten? 
He emits from his soles vast radiance called being adorned with peace and joy, illuminating all sentient beings in difficult places or on evil lifepaths in this Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World. 
Those touched by this radiance leave their suffering behind and acquire peace and joy. 
With peace and joy, they know that an extraordinary great man will appear in the world. 
This is his first display. 
He emits, from the white hair between his eyebrows, vast radiance called realization, illuminating all Bodhisattvas in this Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World who walked with him in their past lives. Those touched by this radiance know that he will be born in the world. They manifest countless offerings, come to visit him, and make their offerings to him. 
This is his second display. 
He emits from his right palm vast radiance called pure state, purifying all Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold Worlds. If Pratyekabuddhas, who have ended all his afflictions, are aware of this radiance, they will abandon their lives . 
If unaware, through the power of this radiance they will be moved to worlds in other directions. 
All māras, those on the wrong paths, and sentient beings that hold the wrong view of existence will also be moved to worlds in other directions, except those supported by Buddhas’ spiritual power because they are ready to be transformed. 
This is his third display. 
He emits from his knees vast radiance called being adorned with purity, illuminating all celestial palaces, from those of  the four world-protecting god-kings to those of the pure-abode heavens , so all gods there know that he will descend from Tuṣita Heaven to be born in the human world. 
With adoration, regret, and anxiety, they each take various offerings, such as splendid chaplets, garments, solid perfumes, powdered incense, banners, canopies, and music, come to visit him, and respectfully make their offerings to him. Then they will follow him from his birth to his parinirvāṇa. 
This is his fourth display. 
He emits, from his chest adorned with the vajra symbol of a swastika, vast radiance called unsurpassable banner, illuminating vajra guards in all worlds in the ten directions. 
Then a hundred koṭi vajra guards assemble in this Tuṣita Heaven and will follow him  from his birth to his parinirvāṇa. 
This is his fifth display. 
He emits from all his pores vast radiance called differentiating sentient beings, illuminating all large thousandfold worlds and touching all Bodhisattvas, gods, and humans. 
All these Bodhisattvas think, ‘I should abide here, make offerings to this Tathāgata, and teach and transform sentient beings.’ This is his sixth display. 
He emits, from the celestial palace laden with great jewels, vast radiance called well abiding in observation, illuminating the royal place where he will be born. 
Then other Bodhisattvas  follow him to Jambudvīpa , where he will display his birth, whether in his home, a village, or a city, in order to teach and transform sentient beings. 
This is his seventh display. 
He emits, from the celestial palace and his huge tower, vast radiance called purifying and adorning all palaces, illuminating his mother’s abdomen and enabling her to have peace and joy, and to fully acquire all merits. 
This is his eighth display. 
He emits from his soles vast radiance called well established . 
If god-sons and Brahma gods whose lives are about to end are touched by this radiance, their lifespans will be extended, and they will make offerings to him from his birth to his parinirvāṇa. 
This is his ninth display. 
He emits, from the secondary marks on his body, vast radiance called being adorned with eyes, displaying his various karmas. 
Thus, gods and humans see various scenes, whether of his abiding in Tuṣita Heaven, entering his mother’s womb, being born, renouncing family life, attaining bodhi, subjugating māras, turning the Dharma wheel, or entering parinirvāṇa. 
This is his tenth display. 
“Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva emits from his body, seat, palace, and tower such millions of asaṁkhyeyas of beams of light, displaying various Bodhisattva karmas. 
After displaying them, because he has fully acquired all his merits, he descends from Tuṣita Heaven to be born in the human world.” *** —Mahāvaipulya Sūtra of Buddha Adornment, fascicle 58 Translated from the digital Chinese Canon  *** **** Notes ****     1. 
See “ten levels of transference of merit” on the Bodhisattva Way in the Sūtra of the Garland of a Bodhisattva’s Primary Karmas, fascicle 1, chapter 2, in Rulu’s The Bodhisattva Way. 
Why does a BodhisattvaMahāsattva display staying in his mother’s womb?”      “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva displays staying in his mother’s womb for ten reasons. 
What are these ten? 
He wants to bring to  attainment sentient beings with small minds and poor understanding . He does not want them to think, ‘This Bodhisattva is naturally born through miraculous formation, and his wisdom and roots_of_goodness do not come from his training.’ This is his first reason. 
He wants to ripen the roots of goodness of his parents and retinues, and those who walked with him in their past lives. 
When they see him in his mother’s womb, their roots of goodness will ripen. 
This is his second reason. 
He enters his mother’s with right_mindfulness and right thinking, without any confusion. 
When he stays his mother’s womb, his mind constantly abides in right mindfulness undistracted. 
This is his third reason. 
When he stays in his mother’s womb, he develops unimpeded eloquence and puts it to excellent use as he constantly expounds the Dharma to great Bodhisattvas from worlds in the ten_directions, the Brahma-king Śikhin, the god-king Śakra, and the four world-protecting god-kings, enabling them to acquire immeasurable spiritual power and boundless wisdom. 
This is his fourth reason. 
When he stays in his mother’s womb, he calls Bodhisattvas to a huge assembly, and teaches and transforms them through the power of his original vows. 
This is his fifth reason. 
For a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva to demonstrate attainment of Buddhahood amid humans, he must have a supreme birth in the human world. 
This is his sixth reason. 
When he stays in his mother’s womb, all sentient beings in this ThreeThousand_Large_Thousandfold_World see him, as clearly as if seeing their own faces in a mirror. 
Meanwhile, great-minded gods, dragons, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṁnaras, mahoragas, humans, and nonhumans come to visit him and reverently make offerings to him. 
This is his seventh reason. 
When he stays in his mother’s womb, from worlds in other directions, all Bodhisattvas in their mother’s wombs ready to display their final birth come to his assembly and expound the great collective Dharma Door called the store of vast wisdom. 
This is his eighth reason. 
When he stays in his mother’s womb, he enters the Samādhi of Discarding the Store of Impurities. Through the power of this samādhi, he manifests in his mother’s womb a great palace with various wonderful adornments, with which the palace of Tuṣita Heaven  cannot compare, and he enables his mother’s body to be peaceful and trouble free. 
This is his ninth reason. 
When he stays in his mother’s womb, he uses his awesome spiritual powers to manifest offerings, called opening the taint-free store of great merits, which pervade all worlds in the ten directions. He makes these offerings to all Buddha-Tathāgatas, and They reveal to him the store of countless Bodhisattva abodes in the dharma_realm. 
This is his tenth reason. 
“Buddha-Sons, these are the ten reasons a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva displays staying in his mother’s womb. 
If a Bodhisattva understands them, he will be able to display hard-to-discern actions.”     “186. 
What hard-to-discern actions does he display?”     “Buddha-Sons, when he stays in his mother’s womb, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva displays ten hard-to-discern actions. 
What are these ten? 
They are  other hard-to-discern actions, such as taking all Bodhisattva actions and using countless different doors of all Tathāgatas’ commanding spiritual powers. 
Buddha-Sons, these are the ten hard-to-discern actions a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva displays, while in his mother’s womb. 
If a Bodhisattva displays them, he will be able to display hardto-discern actions of a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed great wisdom.”     “187. 
How does he display his birth?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva displays his birth in ten ways. 
What are these ten? 
When he is born,  he shakes all Buddha Lands, liberates all sentient beings, destroys all evil paths, and eclipses the radiance of all māras, and innumerable Bodhisattvas assemble at his birth. 
Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva displays his birth in these ten ways because he wants to tame sentient beings.”     “188. 
Why does he display smiling at birth?”     “Buddha-Sons, at birth a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva displays smiling and makes vows for ten reasons. 
What are these ten? 
He thinks, ‘All in the world are sunk in the mire of desire. No one can rescue them except me.’ Knowing this, he joyfully smiles and makes vows. 
He then thinks, ‘All in the world are blinded by their afflictions, while I now possess wisdom. 
He then thinks, ‘Using this false body and this false name, I will realize a Tathāgata’s unsurpassed dharma body, which pervades the three time frames .’ Knowing this, he joyfully smiles and makes vows. 
He uses his hindrance-free eye to observe all Brahma-kings and all Maheśvaras in worlds in the ten directions, and thinks, ‘These sentient beings claim that they have the power of great wisdom.’ Knowing this, he joyfully smiles and makes vows. 
He sees that sentient beings with long-developed roots of goodness have regressed, and resolves to enable them to abide on the no-regress ground. 
Knowing this, he joyfully smiles and makes vows. 
He sees that sentient beings do few meritorious deeds but expect immeasurable returns. Knowing this, he joyfully smiles and makes vows. 
He sees that all sentient beings taught by Buddhas definitely benefit. 
Knowing this, he joyfully smiles and makes vows. 
He sees that Bodhisattvas who walked with him in their past lives are attached to worldly affairs and fail to acquire the vast virtues of the Buddha Dharma. 
Knowing this, he joyfully smiles and makes vows. 
He sees that gods and humans in the same Dharma assemblies in their past lives are still abiding on the ground of ordinary beings, and that they neither leave it nor tire of it. 
Knowing this, he joyfully smiles and makes vows. 
He is touched by all Tathāgatas’ radiance and feels increasing joy and comfort. Knowing this, he joyfully smiles and makes vows. 
“Buddha-Sons, at birth a Bodhisattva displays smiling to benefit sentient beings.”     “189. 
Why does he display walking seven steps at birth?”     “Buddha-Sons, at birth a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva displays walking seven steps for ten reasons. 
What are these ten? 
They are  to show that he is supreme and unsurpassed in the world. 
These are the ten. 
Buddha-Sons, at birth a Bodhisattva displays walking seven steps to tame sentient beings.”     “190. 
Why does he display training as a youth?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva displays training as a youth for ten reasons. 
What are these ten? 
They are  to show that he receives Buddhas’ support and abides in Dharma radiance. 
These are the ten.”     “191. 
Why does he display living in a royal palace?”     “Buddha-Sons, after a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has displayed training as a youth, he displays living in a royal palace for ten reasons. 
What are these ten? 
They are  to follow and protect the Dharma of Buddhas. 
These are the ten. 
A Bodhisattva in his final body, after displaying living in a royal palace, displays renouncing family life.”     “192. 
Why does he display renouncing family life?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva displays renouncing family life for ten reasons. 
What are these ten? 
They are  to show what a Bodhisattva in his final body naturally does. 
These are the ten.”     “193. 
Why does he displays practicing asceticism?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva displays practicing asceticism for ten reasons. 
What are these ten? 
They are  to inspire gods and humans with immature roots of goodness to bide their time for their maturity. 
These are the ten. 
A Bodhisattva displays practicing asceticism as a skillful means to tame all sentient beings.”     “194. 
Why does he go to his bodhimaṇḍa?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva goes to his bodhimaṇḍa for ten reasons. 
What are these ten? 
They are  to use his hindrance-free wisdom to observe that Buddha-Tathāgatas in all worlds attain true enlightenment through training in Bodhisattva actions. 
These are the ten. 
In this way a Bodhisattva teaches and transforms sentient beings.”     “195. 
What does he do while sitting in his bodhimaṇḍa?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva sitting in his bodhimaṇḍa does ten things. 
What are these ten? 
They are  using the power of his roots of goodness to support all sentient beings. 
These are the ten.”     “196. 
When he sits in his bodhimaṇḍa, what extraordinary things transpire?”     “Buddha-Sons, when a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva sits in his bodhimaṇḍa, ten unprecedented extraordinary things transpire. 
What are these ten? 
All Tathāgatas from worlds in the ten directions appear before him. They raise their right hands and praise, ‘Very good, very good! 
Unsurpassed Guiding Teacher!’ This is the first unprecedented thing. 
All Tathāgatas protect and think of him, and give him awesome power. 
This is the second unprecedented thing. All Bodhisattvas who walked with him in their past lives surround him and respectfully present to him various adornments as an offering. This is the third unprecedented thing. 
Grass, trees, thickets, and other non-sentient things in all worlds bend in the direction of his bodhimaṇḍa. This is the fourth unprecedented thing. He enters the samādhi called Observing the Dharma Realm. 
He acquires the dhāraṇī called Ocean Store of the Supreme Taint-Free Radiance, which enables him to receive all Buddha-Tathāgatas’ great Dharma rains. This is the sixth unprecedented thing. 
He uses the power of his awesome virtues to manifest wonderful offerings and present them to Buddhas in all worlds. This is the seventh unprecedented thing. 
He abides in the supreme wisdom-knowledge, which knows all sentient beings’ capacities, minds, and actions. 
He enters the samādhi called Excellent Awareness. It has the power to enable his body to fill all worlds in the entire domain of space throughout the three time frames. This is the ninth unprecedented thing. 
He acquires the radiant hindrance-free great wisdom-knowledge, which enables his body karmas to pervade the three time frames. This is the tenth unprecedented thing. “Buddha-Sons, when a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva sits in his bodhimaṇḍa, these ten unprecedented extraordinary things transpire.”     “197. 
Why does he display subjugating māras?”     “Buddha-Sons, when a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva is sitting in his bodhimaṇḍa, he displays subjugating māras for ten reasons. 
What are these ten? 
They are  to conform to the ways of a world with the five turbidities. 
These are the ten.”     “198. 
What powers does he use to become a Tathāgata?”     “Buddha-Sons, a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva uses ten kinds of powers to become a Tathāgata. 
What are these ten? 
They are  attaining the Samādhi of Excellent Awareness and acquiring a Tathāgata’s Ten Powers, from the wisdom-knowledge of right or wrong in every situation to the wisdom-knowledge that all his afflictions have ended forever. 
These are the ten. 
If a Bodhisattva uses these ten powers, he is called a Tathāgata, an Arhat, and a Samyak-Saṁbuddha.”     “199. How does he turn the Dharma wheel?”     “Buddha-Sons, after a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva has become a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, He does ten things to turn the Dharma wheel. 
What are these ten? 
They are  expounding the Dharma to bring forth the Five Roots, the Five Powers, the Seven Bodhi Factors, the Eightfold Right Path, dhyāna, liberation, and samādhi. 
Buddha-Sons, Buddhas do these immeasurable things to turn the Dharma wheel.”     “200. 
Why can he plant pure white dharmas as he turns the Dharma wheel?”     “Buddha-Sons, as a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, turns the Dharma wheel, because of ten things, without fail he plants pure white dharmas in sentient beings’ minds. 
What are these ten? 
They are  his using words of masterly wisdom to enlighten sentient beings. 
These are the ten.”     “201. 
Why does a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, display entering parinirvāṇa?”     “Buddha-Sons, after a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, has finished His Buddha work, He displays entering parinirvāṇa for ten reasons. 
What are these ten? 
They are  to show that it is natural for Buddha-Bhagavāns to enter the changeless great parinirvāṇa after They have finished Their Buddha work, fulfilled Their vows, turned the Dharma wheel, delivered those ready to be delivered, and conferred upon Bodhisattvas their honorific future titles . 
Buddha-Sons, These are the ten reasons a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, displays entering parinirvāṇa.” **** Persuading to Train Accordingly ****  “Buddha-Sons, this Dharma Door, called a Bodhisattva’s vast pure actions, is expounded by innumerable Buddhas. 
It can enable the wise to understand and delight in its immeasurable meaning, and enable all Bodhisattvas’ great vows and great actions to continue. 
Buddha-Sons, if sentient beings come to hear this dharma and if, after hearing it, they believe it, understand it, and train accordingly, they will quickly attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
Because they train according to its teachings. 
Buddha-Sons, if a Bodhisattva does not train accordingly, know that he will forever be far away from attaining Buddha bodhi. 
“Buddha-Sons, this chapter on the Dharma Door of transcending the world reveals the splendor of its definitive meanings and all Bodhisattvas’ areas of virtuous training. Inaccessible to all sentient beings, it leads to all dharmas, reveals all wisdom-knowledge, transcends the world, leaves the path of the Two_Vehicles behind, illuminates all Dharma Doors, and expands sentient beings’ roots of goodness for them to transcend the world. All of you should esteem it, hear and accept it, recite and retain it, ponder its meanings, delight in it, and train accordingly. 
Whoever does so will quickly attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi.”     As this chapter was being expounded, through the Buddha’s spiritual power and because of the way this Dharma Door naturally is, countless asaṁkhyeyas of worlds in the ten directions quaked tremendously and vast radiance illuminated everywhere. 
Then all Buddhas from worlds in the ten directions appeared before Samantabhadra Bodhisattva and praised, “Very good, very good! 
Buddha-Son, only you can expound this chapter on the Dharma Door of transcending the world, which reveals the splendor of its definitive meanings and Bodhisattvas’ areas of virtuous training, and enters the entire Buddha Dharma. 
Buddha-Son, you have learned and expounded this dharma well. 
As you use your awesome power to protect this dharma, we Buddhas express our sympathetic joy over your meritorious work. 
As we Buddhas express sympathetic joy, so too do all other Buddhas. 
Buddha-Son, we Buddhas, with one mind, protect and uphold this sūtra and enable future Bodhisattvas who have not heard it to come to hear it.” **** Summarizing Stanzas **** At that time Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, through the Buddha’s spiritual power, observed all multitudes  in the ten directions throughout the dharma realm, and spoke in verse: Practicing asceticism for countless kalpas, A true Buddha-son is born from the true Dharma of innumerable Buddhas, And enables innumerable multitudes to abide in bodhi. Hear me describe his unequaled actions. 
He makes offerings to innumerable Buddhas with no attachment to Them And widely delivers sentient beings without perceiving them . Seeking to acquire a Buddha’s merits, he mind relies on nothing. I now describe his excellent actions. 
Subjugating all māras and ending his afflictions, He acquires higher merits by taking the most excellent actions To end his ignorance  and abide in the quiet mind. I now describe the path that he walks. 
Having forever left behind the deceptions and illusions in the world, He produces various manifestations to show sentient beings that Things manifest because one’s thoughts appear, continue, and disappear. To delight multitudes, I now describe his abilities. 
Seeing sentient beings undergo birth, old age, and death, Fettered and oppressed by their afflictions and anxieties, To enable them to achieve liberation, he teaches them to activate the bodhi mind. Hear me describe his meritorious actions. 
For billions of kalpas, he constantly trains in The six pāramitās And cultivates the Four Immeasurable Minds Hear me describe his merits. 
For billions of kalpas, with no concern for his body and life, He seeks bodhi To benefit sentient beings, not just himself. I now describe his loving-kind and compassionate actions. 
Should someone describe his merits for countless koṭis of kalpas, It would be like a drop in the ocean Because his unparalleled merits are beyond analogy. Through the Buddha’s awesome spiritual power, I now briefly describe them. 
His mind does not differentiate between high and low, And he tirelessly seeks bodhi To enable sentient beings To abide in goodness and do more pure dharmas. 
Benefitting all, his wisdom is Like a tree, like a river, And like the great earth, Upon which everything relies. 
A Bodhisattva is like a lotus flower. Compassion is its roots, peace is its stem, Wisdom is its stamens, And the precepts are its fragrance. 
Buddhas emit Dharma radiance To open this flower, Which, untouchable by the water of causality, Delights all viewers. 
A Bodhisattva is like a tree of the wondrous Dharma. The upright mind is its ground, from which it grows, Faith is its seed, lovingkindness and compassion are its roots, Wisdom is its trunk, Skillful means are its branches, The six_pāramitās are its twigs, Samādhis are its leaves, transcendental powers are its flowers, And all wisdom-knowledge is its fruit. 
The supreme powers are birds perched in this tree, Whose shade covers the Three Realms of Existence. 
A Bodhisattva is like a lion-king. 
Pure white dharmas are its body, The Four Noble Truths are its feet, Right mindfulness is its neck, Lovingkindness is its eyes, and wisdom is its head, Which wears the scarf of liberation. In the deep valley of excellent meanings, It roars Dharma tones and terrifies māras. 
A Bodhisattva is like a merchant leader. He sees all sentient beings Following their afflictions to perilous evil places In the wilderness of birth and death. In their delusion and blindness, they have lost the right path And are captured by māra bandits. He shows them the right path And guides them to enter the city of fearlessness. 
A Bodhisattva sees that sentient beings Are afflicted with the three poisons  And undergo all kinds of suffering, Tormented and oppressed in their long night. 
He elicits great compassion for them And dispenses the antidote to them, Using 84,000 ways To end their myriad suffering. 
A Bodhisattva is a Dharma King. He uses the right way to transform sentient beings, Enabling them to stay away from evil, cultivate good, And intently seek Buddha bodhi. 
From all Buddhas He receives the honored prophecy of his attaining Buddhahood, As he widely gives away as alms noble treasures And, like precious jewels, the elements of bodhi. A Bodhisattva turns the same Dharma wheel That a Buddha turns. The precepts are its hub, and samādhi is its rim. Wisdom-knowledge is his adornment, and wisdom is his sword. He annihilates affliction bandits And māra foes, And scares away all those on the wrong paths When they see him. 
A Bodhisattva is like an ocean of wisdom, Deep, vast, and boundless. It is filled with the flavor of the true Dharma And replete with treasures, such as the Seven Bodhi Factors. The vast mind is its boundless shore, And all wisdom-knowledge is its tide. No one can measure it Or finish describing it. 
A Bodhisattva is like Mount Sumeru, Which towers over the world. His transcendental powers and samādhis are its peak, And his vast mind is immovable. 
Those who stay close to him Will acquire the same wisdom as his. Free from any states, It sees everything. 
A Bodhisattva is like vajra, Because he adamantly seeks all wisdom-knowledge. His faith and practice of asceticism Are unwavering and immovable. 
Without fear, He benefits sentient beings, And annihilates all māras And all his afflictions. 
A Bodhisattva’s great lovingkindness and compassion Are like thick and dense clouds. His Three_Clarities flash lightning, And his power of instant arrival anywhere claps thunders. Using the four kinds of unimpeded_eloquence, He showers down water_with_the_eight_virtues To nurture all sentient beings And extinguish the flames of their afflictions. 
A Bodhisattva is like a city of the true Dharma. Prajñā  is its walls, And a sense of shame and a sense of dishonor are its deep moat. Wisdom is its defense against foes, And its Three_Liberation_Doors open wide. Right mindfulness is its guard, The Four Noble Truths are its smooth thoroughfare, and The six_transcendental_powers are its weapons. 
The great Dharma banners Are erected everywhere, And no māra in the Three Realms of Existence Can enter it. 
A Bodhisattva is like a garuḍa. The Four Ways to Attain Samādhi are its sturdy feet, Skillful means are its brave wings, And lovingkindness and compassion are its bright pure eyes. It abides in the tree of all wisdom-knowledge And observes the immense ocean of the Three Realms of Existence. It snatches gods and humans, just as it snatches dragons, And settles them on the shore of nirvāṇa. 
A Bodhisattva’s true Dharma is like the sun Rising in the world. The precepts are its perfect orb, And it has the power of instant arrival anywhere. It radiates wisdom light To grow the medicinal tree that develops sentient beings’ capacities and strengths, To dispel the darkness of their afflictions, And to dry up the ocean of their loves and desires. 
A Bodhisattva’s wisdom-knowledge is like the moon, And the dharma realm is its orb. As it travels across ultimate emptiness, All in the world see it. 
It illuminates the Three Realms of Existence, Where one’s conscious mind fluctuates. 
It eclipses the stars, i.e., the Two Vehicles, And nothing can compare with it. 
A Bodhisattva is a great Dharma King, Adorned with his merits. Gods and humans respectfully gaze upon His body adorned with excellent marks. Skillful means are his pure eyes, And wisdom is his vajra. At ease with dharmas, He transforms sentient beings in accordance with the Dharma. 
A Bodhisattva is a great Brahma-king, Who transcends the Three Realms of Existence with ease. Having ended all his afflictions and karmic requitals, He is equipped with the Four_Immeasurable_Minds. He manifests his body everywhere And uses Dharma tones to enlighten sentient beings. In the Three Realms of Existence, He uproots the wrong views. 
A Bodhisattva is the Brahma-king Maheśvara, Who transcends the ground of birth and death. His  states are always pure, And his wisdom never regresses. Never taking the path of the lowly vehicles, He receives blessings with nectar poured on his head . He possesses merit and wisdom, And his good name is heard by all. 
A Bodhisattva’s wisdom mind is pure, Like the open sky. It has no nature and relies on nothing Because nothing can be captured. He has the power of command, And can accomplish worldly things. As he takes pure actions, He enables sentient beings to do the same. 
A Bodhisattva’s skillful means are like the earth, Which benefits all sentient beings. 
A Bodhisattva’s lovingkindness and compassion are like water, Which washes off their afflictions. 
A Bodhisattva’s wisdom is like fire, Which burns away the firewood of their habits. 
A Bodhisattva’s non-abiding is like wind, Which sweeps across the emptiness of the Three Realms of Existence. 
A Bodhisattva is like a treasure That can relieve the hardship of poverty. 
A Bodhisattva is like a vajra That can destroy inverted views. A Bodhisattva is like a garland That can adorn a body in the Three Realms of Existence. 
A Bodhisattva is like a  jewel That can complete all actions. 
A Bodhisattva’s merits are like flowers That are opened by the elements of bodhi. A Bodhisattva’s vows are like chaplets That adorn sentient beings’ heads. 
A Bodhisattva’s precepts are fragrant, Because they are observed without violation. 
A Bodhisattva’s wisdom is like perfume That suffuses the Three Realms of Existence. 
A Bodhisattva’s powers are like a tent That keeps out the affliction dust. 
A Bodhisattva’s wisdom-knowledge is like a cylindrical banner That can destroy the arrogance foe. 
A Bodhisattva uses his sense of shame and sense of dishonor as a garment, To cover all sentient beings. 
A Bodhisattva is like a hindrance-free vehicle That carries all riders to transcend the Three Realm of Existence. 
A Bodhisattva is like a strong elephant That has a well-tamed mind. 
A Bodhisattva’s ability of instant arrival anywhere is like a horse That gallops to transcend the Three Realms of Existence. 
A Bodhisattva’s expounding of the Dharma Is like a dragon’s pouring down rains to nurture sentient beings’ minds. 
A Bodhisattva is like the udumbara flower, Which is hard to encounter in the world. 
A Bodhisattva is a great valiant general Who subjugates all māras. 
A Bodhisattva turns the same Dharma wheel That a Buddha turns. 
A Bodhisattva is like a lamp that dispels darkness And enables sentient beings to see the right path. 
A Bodhisattva’s merits are like a river That flows along the right path. 
A Bodhisattva’s energetic progress is like a bridge That provides crossing for all sentient beings. 
A Bodhisattva’s great wisdom-knowledge and vast vows Serve as a sturdy ship, To carry sentient beings And settle them on the shore of bodhi. 
A Bodhisattva’s playful displays  are like a garden That truly delights sentient beings. 
A Bodhisattva’s liberation is like a flower That adorns the palace of wisdom. 
A Bodhisattva is like wonderful medicine That cures the affliction disease. 
A Bodhisattva is like a snow mountain That produces the wisdom medicine. 
A Bodhisattva equals a Buddha, Who enlightens sentient beings. What is in a Buddha’s mind Is only attaining true enlightenment and enlightening the world. 
However a Buddha comes, A Bodhisattva comes in the same way. 
He acquires all wisdom-knowledge To enter the universal door. 
A Bodhisattva capably guides All sentient beings. 
A Bodhisattva naturally attains The state of all wisdom-knowledge. 
A Bodhisattva’s immeasurable strength Is indestructible in the world. 
A Bodhisattva abides in fearlessness And knows dharmas and sentient beings. 
He can know All different forms and appearances In the world, And their sounds and names. 
Although he has transcended names and forms, He displays various appearances. 
No sentient being can measure His abilities. 
A Bodhisattva has acquired Such merits. Knowing that dharma nature is no nature, He is attached to neither existence nor nonexistence. 
His wisdom-knowledge Is endless and relies on nothing. I now will describe his profound actions, To delight sentient beings. 
Although he knows that dharma appearances Are like illusions and are empty, Using his compassionate vows and Buddhas’ awesome spiritual powers, He displays his transcendental powers And manifests countless different things. 
Such are his merits that You should hearken to my description. 
He can use one body to Manifest countless different bodies. Using no mind and no  state, He responds to all multitudes. 
He uses one sound to Produce all speech sounds, And speaks the languages of All kinds of sentient beings. 
Having forever left behind a body laden with afflictions, He manifests bodies with ease. Knowing that the Dharma is ineffable, He gives various teachings. 
Although his mind is always quiet, Pure like the open sky, He adorns all worlds And manifests all multitudes. 
With no attachment to his body, He manifests bodies. 
He displays his rebirths in worlds In response to sentient beings’ needs. 
Although he is reborn everywhere, He does not abide in any rebirth, Because he knows that his body is like the empty sky And appears as various bodies according to his mind. 
A Bodhisattva’s body is boundless And appears everywhere. He reverently makes offerings To the supreme one among all beings standing on two feet. 
Presenting incense, flowers, music, Banners, and jeweled canopies, Always using his profound pure mind, He makes these offerings to Buddhas. 
Without leaving any Buddha’s assembly, He is present before all Buddhas. In Their huge assemblies, He asks questions, and hears and accepts the Dharma. 
Because he hears the Dharma, He enters samādhi and countless Dharma Doors. As he rises from samādhi, He produces countless manifestations. 
Equipped with wisdom and skillful means, He knows that the world is like an illusion. Yet he manifests countless illusions In the world. 
He produces various forms, Sounds, and words. He enters sentient beings’ web of perceptions And has no attachment to them. 
He displays his initial activation of the bodhi mind To benefit the world, Or his doing for a long time Vast and endless training. He displays his almsgiving, observing the precepts, enduring adversity, Making energetic progress, doing meditation, and developing wisdom, Or his training in all excellent dharmas, Such as the Four Immeasurable Minds and the Four Drawing-in Dharmas. 
He displays completing his training, Acquiring endurance in making no differentiation, Waiting to become a Buddha in his next life, Or receiving blessings with nectar poured on his head by Buddhas. 
He manifests as a voice-hearer Or as a Pratyekabuddha, Or displays entering parinirvāṇa everywhere Without abandoning Bodhisattva actions. 
He manifests as the god-king Śakra Or as the Brahma-king Śikhin. He displays being surrounded by goddess-daughters Or sitting alone. 
He manifests as a bhikṣu Quietly taming his mind, Or as the Brahma-king Maheśvara, Who rules the world. 
He manifests as a woman with skills Or as an ascetic practicing asceticism. He displays enjoying the five_desires Or entering meditation. 
He displays being born, Young, old, or dead. 
Those who attempt to understand  Will harbor doubts and go wild. 
He displays abiding in a celestial palace, Descending to the world, Entering or staying in his mother’s womb, Attaining Buddhahood, or turning the Dharma wheel. 
He displays being born, entering parinirvāṇa, Going to school , Staying amid beautiful maidens, Or renouncing family life to practice meditation. 
He displays sitting under a bodhi tree, Naturally attaining true enlightenment, Turning the Dharma wheel, Or resolving for the first time to seek bodhi. 
He manifests as a Buddha, Who sits in meditation in countless worlds, Or displays training on the no-regress path, Using all aids to attain bodhi. 
He enters deep into countless kalpas And arrives at the opposite shore. He enters all kalpas in one thought, And one thought encompasses countless kalpas. 
Although kalpas are no kalpa, He manifests kalpas to the world. Neither coming anywhere nor accumulating anything, He accomplishes things for kalpas. 
In one dust particle He sees all Buddhas, Who are everywhere In worlds in the ten directions. 
He sees that Worlds and sentient beings Are endless Throughout countless kalpas. 
A Bodhisattva knows that The realm of sentient beings is vast and boundless, And that a sentient being’s body arises Through countless causes and conditions. 
As they are countless for one sentient being, So too are they for all sentient beings. 
He teaches the uneducated According to his understanding. 
He knows that sentient beings’ capacities Are high, middling, or low. 
He knows the changes in their capacities And whether they are ready to be transformed. 
All capacities are interdependent Through causes and conditions. He knows in a systematic way even their subtle differences Without making any mistakes. 
He knows sentient beings’ desires, understandings, Afflictions, and habits, As well as their past, present, and future Mental activities. 
Knowing all their mental activities, He expounds to them the unsurpassed Dharma. 
He understands that all actions Neither come nor go. 
He knows their pure And impure actions, Because he attains bodhi in one thought And acquires all wisdom-knowledge. 
Abiding in a Buddha’s Inconceivable ultimate wisdom mind, He knows in one thought All sentient beings’ actions. 
A Bodhisattva’s has the wisdom-knowledge of transcendental powers And uses them with ease. In one thought He goes to countless worlds. 
Although he quickly goes everywhere In all worlds For countless kalpas, He never leaves his seat. 
As a magician Manifests various forms, In his illusions One can find neither form nor non-form. 
In a similar way A Bodhisattva uses his wisdom-knowledge and skillful means, And produces various manifestations To fill the world. 
The pure sun or moon Is like a clear mirror in the open sky. Its reflection appears in all bodies of water, But untainted by the water. 
In a similar way A Bodhisattva turns the pure Dharma wheel That appears in mental waters in the world, But untainted by the world. 
A person in slumber Can fabricate many things in his dream. He passes a thousand koṭi years Before the night ends. 
A Bodhisattva who abides in dharma nature Manifests all things. Although countless kalpas will end, His wisdom-knowledge, even in one thought, never ends. 
Various echoes, whether they sound In mountain valleys Or palace halls, Have no differences. 
Likewise, a Bodhisattva who abides in dharma nature Uses his wisdom-knowledge to emit different sounds According to the kinds of sentient beings. Such sounds have no differences. 
He who perceives a mirage As water And pursues it for a drink Will become thirstier. 
Likewise are sentient beings Driven by their afflictions. 
A Bodhisattva elicits lovingkindness and compassion for them And rescues them from suffering. 
Form is like froth, Sensory reception is like bubbles on water, Perception is like a mirage in hot air, Mental processing is like a plantain tree, And consciousness is like an illusion That manifests various things. 
Knowing the five_aggregates  in this way, The wise have no attachment to them. 
The twelve_fields  are empty And move like the parts of a machine. 
The eighteen_spheres  have no real nature But falsely appear in the world. 
A Bodhisattva abides in the true reality of dharmas, Which is nirvāṇa. He widely declares this highest truth, His mind relying on nothing. 
Dharmas neither come nor go Nor abide. However, karmas driven by afflictions are the cause of suffering, And the three kinds of suffering constantly flow. 
Dependent arising of dharmas is neither existent nor nonexistent, Neither real nor unreal. Thus he enters the Middle Way And expounds it with no attachment to it. 
A Bodhisattva can enter The three time frames in one thought And all kinds of things In the desire realm, the form realm, and the formless realm. 
He observes the three kinds of precepts And expounds the Three Liberation Doors. He reveals the paths of the Three_Vehicles And acquires all wisdom-knowledge. 
He knows the right or wrong action in every situation, All stages of meditation, sentient beings’ karmas, capacities, Natures, and understandings, And the consequences of all actions. 
He has the god eye, knows his and others’ past lives, And ends all his afflictions. He knows a Buddha’s Ten Powers, Though he has not yet acquired them. 
He understands that dharmas are empty, Yet constantly seeks the wondrous Dharma. He is never driven by his afflictions, Yet does not end them completely. He fully knows the path to transcend the world And uses it to deliver sentient beings . 
He abides in fearlessness And never ceases taking Bodhisattva actions. 
He trains in accord with bodhi without making mistakes And never loses right mindfulness. His aspiration, samādhi, energetic progress, And wisdom arising from observation never diminish. 
He observes with purity the three clusters of Bodhisattva precepts And clearly understands the three time frames. He elicits great lovingkindness and compassion for sentient beings, And all his actions are hindrance free. 
It is through these Dharma Doors that He completes such actions. I can describe only a small part of The magnificence of his merits. 
Throughout countless kalpas, one can never finish describing His meritorious actions. The small part I now have described Is like one dust particle of the vast earth. 
Relying on a Buddha’s wisdom, A Bodhisattva thinks extraordinary thoughts. He trains in the most excellent actions And possesses great lovingkindness and compassion . 
Diligently and serenely He teaches and transforms sentient beings. Abiding in the precepts with purity, He receives blessings with nectar poured on his head. 
He acquires a Buddha’s virtues And knows worlds, sentient beings, and their actions. He differentiates past, present, and future kalpas Without tiring or becoming bored. 
Using differentiation wisdom-knowledge and the power of dhāraṇī, He achieves profound understanding of the true meanings . He ponders and expounds the unparalleled Dharma, And attains nirvāṇa and true enlightenment. 
He activates the universally worthy mind And trains to fulfill his universally worthy action vows. Through his lovingkindness and compassion, and the power of causes and conditions, He strives to attain bodhi with a pure mind. 
He practices the pāramitās And acquires the wisdom-knowledge arising from enlightenment. He achieves mastery of powers And attains the unsurpassed bodhi. 
He acquires the wisdom-knowledge of the equality , And expounds the supreme Dharma. Upholding the Dharma with unimpeded eloquence, He reaches the place of a Dharma King. 
Staying far away from attachments, He expounds the impartiality of the true mind. His wisdom is born And turns into the unexcelled bodhi. 
Upholding the Dharma throughout all kalpas, This wise one feels great comforting joy. He enters deep into and relies on the profound Dharma Without fear or doubt. 
He understands the inconceivable truth And skillfully differentiates dharmas. He capably enters samādhi And acquires all wisdom-knowledge. 
He fully achieves liberation And playfully displays his transcendental powers and Three Clarities. Having cut off all fetters forever, He plays in the taint-free garden. 
White dharmas being his palace, He takes various enjoyable actions. As he manifests countless adornments, His mind remains immovable by the world. 
His profound mind capably observes sentient beings’ minds, And he expounds the Dharma with wonderful eloquence. His bodhi seal is pure, And his wisdom light illuminates all. 
He abides in what is unequaled, And his mind is exalted. He makes his resolve like a huge mountain And accumulates merits like a deep ocean. 
He abides in the Dharma like a treasure And dons the armor of his vows. He accomplishes great things That are indestructible. 
He receives the prophecy of his attaining Buddhahood And abides in his vast mind. He acquires a Buddha’s endless store  And realizes  all dharmas. 
He masters worldly knowledge And uses it hindrance free. 
He manifests in the world Sentient beings, worlds, Dharmas, bodies, Vows, states, Wisdom, and transcendental powers By the countless hundreds of thousands of koṭis. 
His playful displays of his states and transcendental powers Are masterly and hindrance free. His powers and fearlessness are unavailable to sentient beings, And his karmas are his adornments. 
Because he guards His body and body karmas, And his voice and voice karmas, He accomplishes ten great things. 
A Bodhisattva activates the bodhi mind, Which pervades everywhere. His faculties never wandering, He acquires the most excellent faculties. 
His profound and aspiring mind Is free from deception and sycophancy. 
With various kinds of definite understandings, He enters everywhere in the world. 
He discards his afflictions and habits, And takes the supreme path. He skillfully completes his training And acquires all wisdom-knowledge. 
Without regress he enters the right position And definitely realizes nirvāṇa. He establishes the path of the Buddha Dharma And receives virtuous titles. 
Abiding in profound wisdom, He successively walks one path, countless paths, And even the majestic path, With no attachment . 
His hands, feet, internal organs, abdomen are stores of wisdom, And his heart is made of vajra. He dons the armor of lovingkindness and compassion And uses wisdom as weapons. 
Wisdom-knowledge being his head, the Three Clarities being his eyes, Bodhi actions being his ears, And pure precepts being his nose, He dispels the darkness  hindrance free. 
Unimpeded eloquence being his tongue, The power of instant arrival anywhere being his body, And the supreme wisdom being his mind, He trains in doing good karmas as he walks or stands still. 
He walks to his bodhimaṇḍa, sits on a lion throne, Lies down in the Brahma way of life, and stands still in emptiness. His actions and observations Illuminate a Tathāgata’s states. 
He discards greed and does pure almsgiving, And discards arrogance and observes the precepts with purity. He discards anger and endures adversity, And discards indolence and makes energetic progress. He achieves mastery of meditation, And his wisdom spontaneously arises. He tirelessly relieves sentient beings using lovingkindness and compassion, Delights in the Dharma, and discards all his afflictions. 
In the midst of various dharmas, He knows their meanings and that they are the Dharma. 
He completes his accumulation of merits, And acquires wisdom like a keen sword. He delights in hearing much of the Dharma And strives to master the Dharma. 
He knows māras and the māra path And vows to stay away from them. 
He sees Buddhas and Buddha karmas And resolves to follow Them. He discards arrogance to develop wisdom, Never under the control of māras’ powers. 
He is supported by Buddhas And by the Dharma. 
He displays abiding in Tuṣita Heaven And disappearing from it. 
He displays staying in his mother’s womb, Where he takes hard-to-discern actions. 
He displays being born, smiling, And walking seven steps. 
He displays learning various skills And living in the palace. 
He displays renouncing family life, practicing asceticism, And going to his bodhimaṇḍa. He displays sitting properly, emitting radiance, And enlightening sentient beings. He displays subjugating māras, attaining true enlightenment, And turning the unsurpassed Dharma wheel. These displays finished, He displays entering the great parinirvāṇa. 
The Bodhisattva actions in which he trains For countless kalpas Are vast and boundless. I now have described only a small part. 
Although he enables innumerable multitudes To abide in a Buddha’s virtues, He has no attachment To sentient beings or his Dharma actions. 
Having completed his training, He playfully displays his transcendental powers And puts countless worlds on the tip of one hair. 
He holds countless worlds in his hand And travels to all other worlds For countless kalpas, without tiring. 
A Bodhisattva uses various things To adorn Buddha Lands. He puts them into one pore And enables sentient beings to see them. 
As he puts all seas Into one pore, They neither increase nor decrease, And sentient beings are not harmed. 
He uses his hand to crush Countless Iron Mountain Ranges into dust particles. He drops one dust particle onto one world Until he finishes all dust particles. 
Then he crushes into dust particles The worlds that have received the dust particles. 
While the number of all these dust particles can be known, A Bodhisattva’s wisdom-knowledge can never be measured. 
He emits from one of his pores Immeasurable radiance That eclipses the radiance of The sun, the moon, the stars, The flaming jewels, And gods. To end the suffering on the evil life-paths, He expounds the unsurpassed Dharma to sentient beings. 
There are various different sounds In the world of all existences. 
A Bodhisattva can use one sound To produce all sounds. 
He gives different definitive teachings On the Dharma of all Buddhas, Enabling all sentient beings to delight in What they hear. 
He puts all past kalpas Into the present and the future. 
He puts all present and future kalpas Into the past. 
He manifests countless worlds In formation, continuation, or destruction by fire. 
He puts all sentient beings Into one pore. 
All past, present, and future Buddhas In worlds in the ten directions Clearly appear In his body. 
He deeply knows how to produce manifestations In response to sentient beings’ minds, And he manifests various bodies With no attachment to them. 
He manifests the bodies of All sentient beings taking the six life-paths, The bodies of the Brahma-king Śikhin, the god-king Śakra, or the god king world protectors, The bodies of gods, The bodies of voice-hearers or Pratyekabuddhas, The bodies of Buddha-Tathāgatas, Or the bodies of Bodhisattvas, As he trains to acquire all wisdom-knowledge. 
He capably enters the web of perceptions of Sentient beings with high, middling, and low capacities. He manifests Buddha Lands And his attaining bodhi there. 
He knows the web of perceptions And masters his perception. He displays training in Bodhisattva actions And doing all things by skillful means. 
He produces Such vast miraculous manifestations, And the entire world Cannot know such states. 
However, his manifestations are no manifestation As he multiplies them According to sentient beings’ minds, Enabling them to walk the true path. 
His body, voice, and mind Equal the open sky. He uses the pure precepts as solid perfumes, Great actions as garments, The Dharma as a silk scarf that adorns his topknot, And all wisdom-knowledge as a jewel. Fully adorned with his merits, He receives blessings with nectar poured on this head and ascends to the king’s throne. 
He uses the pāramitās as the gold wheel, Transcendental powers as the elephant, The power of instant arrival anywhere as the horse, Wisdom as the divine jewel, Wonderful actions as the exquisite maidens, The Four Drawing-in Dharmas as the treasure minister, And skillful means as the military minister. He uses samādhi as his city, Emptiness as his palace, Lovingkindness as his armor, wisdom as his sword, Mindfulness as his bow, and clarity as his arrows. 
He sets up the transcendental-power canopy And erects the wisdom banner. The power of his endurance  being immovable, He annihilates the legions of the māra-king. 
He uses dhāraṇī as the level ground, Actions as river waters, Pure wisdom-knowledge as a gushing spring, Wondrous wisdom as a cool forest, Emptiness as a pure pond And the elements of bodhi as lotus flowers. 
He adorns himself with transcendental powers And enters samādhi for recreation. 
He uses pondering the Dharma as beautiful maidens, Sweet dew  as fine food, And the flavor of liberation as syrup, As he playfully rides the Three Vehicles. 
For countless kalpas, He trains in Bodhisattva actions That subtly multiply, Never tiring or feeling that he has done enough. 
He makes offerings to all Buddhas, Purifies all worlds, And enables all multitudes To abide in all wisdom-knowledge. 
The number of the dust particles in all worlds Can be known. 
A grain of sand in the entire domain of space Can be measured. 
The number of thoughts in All sentient beings’ minds can be counted. 
One can never finish describing The merits of a Buddha-son. 
If you want to acquire such merits And the wondrous Dharma, If you want to enable sentient beings To end their suffering and have peace and joy, And if you want your body, voice, and mind To equal those of Buddhas, You should activate the vajra mind And take such meritorious actions. 

Mahāyāna Sūtra of Consciousness Revealed 
Translated in the Tang Dynasty by The Tripiṭaka Master Divākara
Thus I have heard: At one time the Bhagavān was in the Karaṇḍa Bamboo Garden of the city of Rājagṛha, together with 1,250 great bhikṣus. All of them were Arhats, who had ended their afflictions and the discharges thereof, and achieved freedom. With their minds completely liberated and their wisdom fully unfolded, like the great dragon, they saw the past, future, and present, hindrance free. 
Taught by the Buddha, they had completed their undertaking  and shed the enormous heavy burden. They had acquired benefits for themselves, having ended their suffering in transmigrating through their cycle of birth and death. With the power of true knowledge, they were adept in identifying the proclivities of sentient beings. At the head of the multitude of such great voice-hearers was the Elder Śāriputra. 
Also in this assembly was an innumerable multitude of Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas. 
In the presence of the World-Honored One, the bhikṣus were tired and drowsy, losing their color and too exhausted to hold up. 
Then the face of the World-Honored One lit up like a blooming lotus flower. 
Forthwith the bhikṣus all became alert, each straightening up and thinking: “The Buddha-Bhagavān now looks resplendent, his face glowing with light. 
What dharma-eye will He open to give us great benefits?” The youth  Worthy Protector Superior, complete with fine qualities, such as robust good looks, gentleness, and radiance, surrounded by 60,000 merchant lords, together with attendants, with rumbling sounds like an earthquake, came to the Buddha. 
Seeing the Buddha-Bhagavān silent and peaceful as the store of virtues, and majestic and radiant like a towering golden tree, he pondered as he joined his palms with profound faith and reverence. He thought: “As praised by all, the Buddha, who is all-knowing and all-seeing, is truly the Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha. 
It is not false.” He bowed his head down at the feet of the Buddha then gazed at Him. 
Worthy Protector then acquired fearlessness. He circled the Buddha three times, and again bowed his head down at the Buddha’s feet. He said to the Buddha, “I pray only that the World-Honored One will teach me with compassion. It is only today that I have acquired pure faith here, where the Buddha is. 
The World-Honored One is all-knowing and all-seeing. The appearance of a Buddha in the world is rare and hard to encounter. As a wish-fulfilling jewel can give happiness to sentient beings, the Buddha is the greatest wish-fulfilling jewel. 
All sentient beings depend upon the Buddha to acquire great peace and bliss. 
He is the great parent and sentient beings’ root of goodness. Because of the Buddha-parent, one will be able see the right path. 
I pray only that, out of sympathy, He will remove my doubts and darkness.” The Buddha told Worthy Protector, “You may ask anything about your doubts. 
I will resolve them separately for you.” Worthy Protector, having received the Buddha’s permission, stood on one side to concentrate on his questions. 
Meanwhile, the Elder Ānanda, seeing the radiance and good features of the youth Worthy Protector, said to the Buddha, “A sight never encountered before! 
This youth Worthy Protector has great merit, whose radiance and glow outshine the awesome appearances of kings.” The Buddha told Ānanda, “This youth Worthy Protector Superior, because of his meritorious karma, enjoys splendid celestial-life requital while living in the human world. He can frolic and enjoy peace and pleasure totally at will, like the god-king Śakra. 
No one in Jambudvīpa can compare with him, except for the youth Moon Reality.” Ānanda asked the Buddha, “I pray only that we be told about the youth Worthy Protector, concerning his current resources as karmic requital and the roots of goodness he has planted in the past.” The Buddha told Ānanda, “You should hear the pleasure-requital in the form of enormous resources that Worthy Protector now enjoys and learn the contributing causes from his past. 
Ānanda, this youth Worthy Protector is attended by 60,000 merchant lords who have an abundance of assets and an accumulation of gold and jewels. They respectfully accept his instructions and follow him at his service. 60,000 beds with well-arranged bedding, blankets, fine linens, and pillows, in various colors, beautiful and magnificent. All around are columns, jeweled carvings, colorful silk curtains, and other decorations, as gorgeous as those in a painting. 
There are 60,000 artistic ladies, dressed in silk in a variety of colors, adorned with golden jewelry and necklaces in dazzling colors, so fine and delicate to the touch that they are like celestial crystal. Their weight can be light or heavy, suiting the wearer’s mood. Playing, laughing, talking, singing, these ladies entertain and serve their master with gentleness, prudence, and respect. They withdraw their love and desire for others, lowering their heads with humility or covering their heads for modesty. 
Moreover, there are 60,000 women who serve him food, such as rice, bread, and so forth, in various colors. The aromas and flavors are as wonderful as those of celestial food. As requital for his merit, such food cooked without labor arrives at his wish. The water there has the eight virtues, pleasing to one’s mind and soothing to one’s body, and it cleanses filth and removes diseases. 
“His mansions and towers are adorned with 60,000 beautifully arranged jewels, such as precious gems and aquamarine. Bells suspended from ribbons jingle harmoniously in the winds. The ground is like aquamarine, showing myriad reflections, with various flowers scattered around. is cool and pleasant, inviting leisurely strolls to relax one’s mind. 
There are musical instruments, such as paṇava drums, sitars, pipes, and brass cymbals, playing 60,000 kinds of melodies. The beautiful sounds are harmonious and loud, resonating far and wide. Joy and happiness brought by meritorious karma flow non-stop. 
Doves and other birds are flying around, their various calls enjoyable to one’s mind and pleasant to one’s ear. Flowering vines climb up on the towers, adorning them with bright flowers and lush leaves. The tones of bells and musical instruments sound like those in a celestial palace. The halls are spacious like a cavern of Mount Sumeru, where divine medicine flows. 
The raucous sounds of trade shake the entire city. “In the lush gardens and forests, there are large and small trees, vines, medicinal herbs, and flowers in full bloom. the clear waters of which reflect shimmering light, like a sheet of colorful brocade. Hundreds and thousands of elephants, horses, and carriages move endlessly throughout the city. 
Ānanda, in these 60,000 cities, the noble and the famous, as well as the wealthy and the merchant lords, praise the youth Worthy Protector every day, broadcasting his merit. They respectfully join their palms and make obeisance to him in reverence. 
“Prasenajit, the king of Kauśala, is wealthy because of the power of his merit, but he is poor in comparison with Worthy Protector. 
The youth Moon Reality is surrounded by 100,000 artistic attendants, serving him respectfully and entertaining him with music and frolics. Even the god-king śakra is a billion times less fortunate than Moon Reality. 
Likewise the youth Worthy Protector, with his robust, high-colored good looks, wealth, ease, peace, and pleasures, is also a billion times less fortunate than Moon Reality. 
Their fortunes, in each case, are not acquired by force, but are a response to their past merits. 
“Ānanda, the youth Worthy Protector has a wish-fulfilling carriage inlaid with celestial jewels, radiating bright light like celestial gold or vajra. It is decorated with various kinds of treasures, mixed as beautifully as stars. It moves swiftly, like the wind, like the flight of the golden-winged bird. Riding this jeweled carriage, he arrives at any treasure island on a thought. 
He asked the Buddha, “What roots of goodness did the youth Worthy Protector plant and what meritorious karma did he do, now to own enormous assets and to enjoy this great pleasure-requital, living in such magnificent mansions decorated with extraordinary treasures?” The Buddha told Ānanda, “The youth Worthy Protector, because he planted in the past meritorious karma in the Buddha Dharma, has now received this enormous pleasure-requital. 
In the past, there was a Buddha called Blissful Light, the Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, Knowledge and Conduct Perfected, Sugata, Understanding the World, Unsurpassed One, Tamer of Men, Teacher to Gods and Humans, Buddha the World-Honored One. Worthy Protector renounced family life and became a bhikṣu, called Dharma Topknot, in the Dharma of that Buddha. He was inadequate in observing the precepts for conduct. 
However, he clearly understood the profound teachings in the Tripiṭaka—the Sūtras, the Vinaya, and the Abhidharma—and he excelled in expounding them. He always pronounced the teachings to sentient beings in solemn, beautiful tones, endlessly giving the Dharma as alms. He was forthright and brilliant in his eloquent exposition, and the hearers delighted in the Dharma they heard. They pondered the teachings and trained themselves accordingly, and those who saved themselves from taking the evil life-journeys were innumerable. 
Ānanda, the bhikṣu Dharma Topknot, because of his merit of giving the Dharma, enjoyed the celestial-life requital for ninety kalpas. 
In addition, when Dharma Topknot saw thin and frail bhikṣus who observed their precepts purely, he always gave them food, drink, shoes, and so forth. Because he gave alms courteously and sincerely with a pure mind, he now has received this pleasure-requital in the form of great wealth, magnificent mansions, and extraordinary jeweled carriages. 
Moreover, Dharma Topknot later encountered Kāśyapa Tathāgata, who gave him teachings and guidance, and told him, ‘You will receive a prophecy from the future Buddha Śākyamuni.’ Hence he is seeing me now, and I will pronounce the Dharma to him to bring him to maturity.” Ānanda said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, the youth Worthy Protector Superior has command of such an abundance of riches, gold, and treasures. 
It is extraordinary that he is gentle and modest, without any pride or arrogance.” The Buddha said, “Ānanda, one with great wisdom does not become arrogant because of wealth, treasures, and sensory pleasures. Worthy Protector has long trained in good works. 
Supported by good dharmas, he always has fortune fruits to eat.” Worthy Protector, having been praised by the Buddha and Ānanda, joined his palms reverently and bowed down at the feet of the Buddha. 
He implored the Buddha, “Please pity, accept, and protect all sentient beings. 
I request permission to ask a few questions.” The Buddha told Worthy Protector, “You have my permission. You may ask me about your doubts. 
I will explicate them to you.” Worthy Protector said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, although sentient beings know that there is consciousness, it is like a jewel kept in a box, unrevealed and unknowable. 
World-Honored One, I do not know the form of this consciousness, nor the reason that it is called consciousness. 
When a person dies, his hands and feet may convulse, and the look of his eyes changes uncontrollably. As one’s faculties perish, the four domains—earth, water, fire, and wind—disperse. Where does one’s consciousness go after it has left the current body? 
What is its essence? 
What is its form? 
How does it assume the next body after leaving this body? 
After this body is abandoned, how does consciousness carry one’s faculties in order to accept the next requital, which can be a body of any kind? 
World-Honored One, how does a sentient being grow new faculties after the expiration of this body? 
Why does one accumulate meritorious karma in this life, only to receive its requital in the next life: 
The current body does meritorious karma, and the next body will eat ? 
How does one’s consciousness nourish one’s body and keep it alive? 
How do consciousness and faculties develop according to one’s body?” The Buddha said, “Very good! 
Very good! 
Worthy Protector, these are good questions. 
Ponder this well. 
I will explain to you.” Worthy Protector said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, affirmatively I accept Your teachings.” The Buddha told Worthy Protector, “The process and transference of  consciousness are like the wind, which is formless, shapeless, and unidentifiable. 
However, the wind can activate myriad things and display myriad conditions, whether making loud sounds as it shakes the forest or breaks off branches, or causing pleasure or pain as it touches with cold or hot the bodies of sentient beings. The wind does not have hands, feet, face, or shape. Nor does it have various colors, such as black, white, red, or yellow. 
Worthy Protector, the same is true for the domain of consciousness. It is formless, shapeless, not revealed by light. However, through causes and conditions, it can manifest various kinds of functions. 
Know that the dharma realms of sensory reception and perception are also formless and shapeless. Through causes and conditions, various functions manifest. 
“Worthy Protector, after the death of a sentient being, the dharma realms of sensory reception and perception and the domain of  consciousness abandon the body. The way  consciousness carries the dharma realms of sensory reception and perception to accept another body is like a gust of wind sweeping across wonderful flowers. The flowers stay put, but their fragrance will flow far. The wind in essence does not grasp the fragrance of the flowers. 
Worthy Protector, after a person’s death, his  consciousness carries the dharma realms of sensory reception and perception to the next rebirth, which is conditioned upon his parents entrusted by his  consciousness. In this way the dharma realms of sensory reception and perception accompany  consciousness. 
Because of the quality of the flowers, one’s nose can detect their scent. Because of one’s olfactory power, one smells fragrance, a sense object. 
The wind touches the flowers because of its power. Because of the power of the wind, fragrance can flow far. 
Likewise, from consciousness, sensory reception arises; from sensory reception, perception arises; and by perception, mental objects are differentiated. Then one knows good and evil. 
“Worthy Protector, by analogy, a painter applies pigments to the wall, and he can paint pictures as neatly and properly as he wishes. The consciousness and intellect of the painter are both formless and shapeless, but they can create various kinds of extraordinary images and shapes. 
Thus one’s consciousness and intellect project the six percepts. 
The eye sees sights, and the eye consciousness is formless and shapeless; the ear hears sounds, which are formless and shapeless; the nose detects odors, which are formless and shapeless; the tongue tastes flavors, which are formless and shapeless; and the body knows tactile sensations, which are formless and shapeless. 
As one’s faculties and perceptions are formless and shapeless, so too one’s consciousness is formless and shapeless. 
“Worthy Protector, when  consciousness abandons one’s current body to accept another life, it is still bound by karma hindrances at the moment of one’s death. When one’s current requital ends with death,  is as if in the Samādhi of Total Halt. When an Arhat enters the Samādhi of Total Halt, his sensory reception and perception are suspended. 
Thus, when  consciousness of the dying one abandons the body and its  domains, it does so with the power of memory. 
Upon dying, one’s consciousness replays clearly from memory all the karmas one has done in one’s entire life. Both body and mind are under stress. 
“Worthy Protector, what is the meaning of consciousness? 
consciousness means seed, which can sprout a karmic body of any kind. Perception, thinking, and memory are also sprouted from  consciousness. It is called consciousness because it knows pleasure, pain, good, and evil, as well as good and evil objects. 
You ask me how one’s  consciousness leaves this body to accept the next requital. 
Worthy Protector, each body sprouted from one’s  consciousness is like the reflection of a face in a mirror, like the markings in the mud, imprinted by a stamp. 
“As an analogy, the light of sunrise removes darkness, which returns after sunset. Darkness has no mass, no shape, neither permanent nor impermanent, but it is always there. 
The same is true for consciousness. Having no mass and no shape, it is revealed through sensory reception and perception. 
Nor does she know whether it looks black, white, or yellow, whether it has complete faculties, whether it has normal hands, feet, ears, and eyes. However, stimulated by hot food and drink , the fetus will move, because it feels pain. The presence of consciousness is evident as sentient beings come or go, bend or extend, stare or blink, speak or laugh, carry heavy loads, or do things. However, they do not know the whereabouts of consciousness in their bodies, nor its form. 
Worthy Protector, the consciousness in essence permeates the sensory fields, but it is not tainted by them. Consciousness permeates the six faculties, the six sense objects, and the the five aggregates, but it is not tainted by them. Through them, the functions of consciousness are evident. 
Worthy Protector, it is like a mechanism which enables a wooden machine to perform various kinds of tasks, whether talking, leaping, jumping, or dancing. 
What is your opinion? 
By whose power is this wooden machine enabled to work?” Worthy Protector replied to the Buddha, “My wisdom and knowledge are too shallow to determine this.” The Buddha told Worthy Protector, “We should know that it is by one’s power to do karmas. 
The power for doing karmas is formless but directed by one’s intellect. 
Thus, a body-machine can do things with the power of consciousness. Whether ṛṣis, gandharvas, dragons, humans, asuras, or sentient beings on other life-journeys, all depend on it to do karmas. consciousness can form the body as a work machine. “Consciousness, without any form or mass, can uphold the dharma realm. 
By analogy, the pervasive sunlight shines equally on sentient beings with evil karma, corpses, impure things, and stinking things, but it is not tainted by evils. Neither is  consciousness. 
Even when it is in the body of a dog or a pig, which eats impure things, or in the body of anyone taking an evil life-journey, it is never tainted. 
“Worthy Protector,  consciousness abandons this body and moves away to accept the next requital according to good or evil karma. 
By analogy, when the wind exits a remote mountain or a steep gorge and sweeps across a forest of fragrant campaka trees, it carries fragrance. When the wind sweeps across a place of feces, corpses, rot, or filth, it carries stench. When it passes through both places, it carries both fragrance and stench. The stronger scent will be manifested first. 
Yet the wind can carry both fragrance and stench far. Likewise,  consciousness abandons this body, carrying good and evil karmas, to accept the next requital. It is just like the wind carrying fragrance and stench to another place. 
It is also like a dreamer who sees myriads of images and does various kinds of karmas in a dream, unaware that he is lying asleep. When a virtuous person dies, the transference of his  consciousness is peaceful and unconscious, in the same way as his going somewhere in a dream without any fear. The exit of  consciousness is not through one’s throat, mouth, or other orifices. Its exit and route are unknown.” The youth Worthy Protector Superior bowed down at the feet of the Buddha. 
He asked the Buddha, “Where does  consciousness enter into the embryo inside the egg of a chicken or goose, the shell of which is impenetrable? 
If the embryo dies within the egg and if the eggshell has no crack or hole, where does  consciousness exit?” The Buddha replied to Worthy Protector, “By analogy, if black sesame seeds are processed with campaka flowers, the oil will become aromatic and be called campaka oil. 
It is far superior to ordinary sesame oil. The oil initially does not contain any aroma but becomes aromatic after the seeds have been processed with the flowers. The fragrance does not crack the sesame seeds in order to enter or to exit, nor does it leave any substance in the oil. However, because of the force of causes and conditions, the fragrance is blended into the oil and the oil becomes aromatic. 
The way  consciousness moves into or out of the embryo of a chicken or a goose despite the eggshell is like the infusion of the campaka fragrance into the oil. 
The transference of  consciousness is like the way the sun shines, a jewel sparkles, or wood blazes. 
When a seed is planted and transformed in the ground, its sprouts, stem, branches, and leaves will successively emerge above the ground. Then flowers in a variety of colors, such as white, off-white, and red, will appear; fruits in a variety of flavors will ripen. The same great earth, providing the four domains—earth, water, fire, and wind—grows different things according to their seeds. Similarly, the dharma realm of  the one consciousness manifests a sentient being successively reborn with black, white, yellow, or red skin, with different characters, gentle or violent, to undergo birth and death. 
Worthy Protector, consciousness has neither hands nor feet, neither joints nor speech. In its dharma realm, the power of memory is strong. Upon the death of a sentient being,  consciousness abandons the current body and, with the power of memory, it becomes the seed for the next life. Apart from consciousness, there is no dharma realm; apart from dharma realm, there is no consciousness. 
consciousness moves away along the  wind, together with the dharma realm, including the realms of memory and sensory reception.” Worthy Protector further asked the Buddha, “If so, why does World-Honored One say that consciousness is formless?” The Buddha replied, “Worthy Protector, there are two kinds of form, the internal and the external. 
Eye consciousness is internal, and eye is external. 
Similarly, ear consciousness is internal, and ear is external; nose consciousness is internal, and nose is external; tongue consciousness is internal, and tongue is external; body consciousness is internal, and body is external. 
Worthy Protector, suppose a person born blind dreams of a beautiful woman, and he clearly sees her hands, feet, and beautiful features. He loves the sights as he dreams. When the night’s sleep is over and daylight arrives, the blind man describes to a crowd the pleasing things in his dream, saying, ‘I saw a beautiful woman whose features were uniquely exquisite, a garden with lush flowers, and hundreds and thousands of well-adorned people, who frolicked merrily. Their skin was lustrous, their shoulders were plump, and their arms were long and rounded like an elephant trunk. 
I gained great happiness from my dream, and my heart was gladdened.’ Worthy Protector, this man was born blind, who has never seen anything with his eyes. 
Why can he perceive sights in his dream?” Worthy Protector replied, “I pray that You will indicate the reason.” The Buddha told Worthy Protector, “What one sees in a dream are internal eye objects, differentiated by one’s intellect, not through the physical eye. These internal eye objects manifest temporarily in the blind man’s dream because of the power of memory. 
He also recalls the dream with the power of memory. 
With the right memory at death, one sees internal forms projected by consciousness. 
“Furthermore, Worthy Protector, the transference of consciousness upon one’s death is like a seed discarded on the ground. With the support of the four domains, it gradually transforms into sprout, seedling, stem, branches, and leaves. Likewise, one’s consciousness is supported by these four dharmas: memory, receptiveness, good, and evil. 
By analogy, a crystal jewel placed alongside something black or white will appear black or white. Likewise,  consciousness supported by good or evil karmas will transfer somewhere to receive corresponding requitals, good or evil.” Worthy Protector next asked the Buddha, “Where does one’s body hold consciousness?” The Buddha replied, “Worthy Protector, consciousness neither accumulates nor gathers, nor does it grow. is like the birth of a sprout. 
The sprout is born neither before the seed is transformed nor after the seed is destroyed. 
Worthy Protector, what is your opinion? 
Where does the seed stay? 
A seed giving birth to a sprout is likened to consciousness becoming dimly aware . The formation of flower buds is likened to consciousness becoming receptive. The stage from blooming of flowers to bearing of fruits is likened to  consciousness forming a body. The way  consciousness forms a body is throughout all parts of the body. 
Worthy Protector, by what force does the reflection appear in a mirror?” Worthy Protector replied to the Buddha, “It is by the decision of the person. 
Because of his face, there is its reflection. The form of the reflection is like that of the person’s face. Its sense organs, whether complete or incomplete, are like those on his face.” The Buddha said, “The person’s face is the cause of the reflection, and the mirror is the condition of the reflection. 
The reflection appears because of the convergence of causes and conditions. Likewise,  consciousness is the cause of one’s sensory reception, perception, mental processing, and mental functions, and the parents are the conditions. As the causes and conditions converge, a body appears . 
As for the person and the mirror, when the person moves away, his mirror reflection is also gone. The person may cast his reflection elsewhere, perhaps in the water. 
Similarly, carrying good and evil karmas,  consciousness abandons this body and moves away to accept the next requital. 
“As another analogy, the seed of a banyan tree or a ficus tree is small, but it can grow a huge tree. The tree again bears seeds. The new seed then abandons the old tree to grow a new tree. As the old tree grows weak over time, with its sap exhausted, it will dry out and decay. 
After  consciousness abandons the body of a sentient being,  it will accept a huge body of some kind according to karma. 
It is also like many kinds of seeds, such as barley, wheat, sesame, mung bean, and legume. Because a seed is planted, sprout, stem, flowers, and fruits will grow and ripen. 
Similarly, because  consciousness has moved into a sentient being of some kind, this being has awareness and sensory reception. “The way  consciousness, holding good and evil karmas, successively accepts a variety of bodies is also like a bee that stops over flowers. 
With love, pleasure, and attachment, it sucks the flavor of a flower for nourishment. The bee then abandons this flower to seek other flowers at other places. Whether it abandons fragrance for stench or it abandons stench for fragrance, it cannot help loving and coveting the object it stops over. Likewise,  consciousness may acquire a celestial body to enjoy the fortune fruit of meritorious karma. 
It may then abandon the celestial body to enter into hell to accept the misfortune fruit of evil karma. As saṁsāra turns, various kinds of bodies are  formed. “ consciousness is like the white seed of a red or blue tulip or a puṇḍarīka flower. If one cracks open the seed, one will find no sprout, no flower, and no color. 
consciousness abandons a dead body, including its fleshy frame, facial features, faculties, and sensory fields, because it no longer sees the convergence of their causes and conditions. With its special vision, hearing, smelling, tasting, and tactility, as well as its memory,  consciousness knows the good and evil karmas one has done, according to which it will accept a requital body. “As a silkworm constructs a cocoon, binding itself by its own doing, so too does  consciousness construct a body to bind itself. It will then abandon that body and transfer into a new body as the next requital. 
Because of a flower seed, there will be a new plant with colorful and fragrant flowers. Likewise, after  consciousness has abandoned a body, wherever it goes, along with it goes the dharma realm, including faculties and sensory reception. 
Wherever a wish-fulfilling jewel is, it is accompanied by pleasing objects. Wherever the sun is, it is accompanied by bright light. 
Likewise, wherever consciousness transfers to, it is accompanied by the dharma realm, including sensory reception and perception. 
After abandoning a body,  consciousness, without a body of flesh and bones, takes the cause of form as its body. It has faculties, sensory reception, and subtle thinking, and can grasp good or evil. “Various kinds of fruits, such as dates, pomegranates, mangoes, and the like, may taste pungent, bitter, sour, sweet, salty, or tart. With a distinct flavor, each fruit serves a different purpose. 
Thus, as the  consciousness-seed transfers, it is accompanied by sensory reception, memory, and good and evil karmas. It is called consciousness because it knows that it has abandoned this body in order to accept the next requital body. 
It is called consciousness because it knows that it is accompanied by good and evil karmas and that, carrying these karmas, it transfers to accept  requital. 
It is called consciousness because it knows all about what the body does. 
By analogy, the wind has no form to grasp and no mass to get hold of but, through causes and conditions, it can do karmas: The wind can carry cold or hot, carry fragrance or stench, shake the woods, or violently devastate anything in its path. 
Likewise, consciousness has no form or mass, and cannot be detected by sight or hearing. However, through causes and condition, the appearance of consciousness is revealed. Because one’s consciousness maintains one’s body, the body knows pain or pleasure. Looking radiant and energetic, one’s body can walk or stand, speak or laugh, and feel happy or sad. 
Seeing clearly the karmas done, we should know that there is consciousness.” Fascicle 2  At that time in the assembly, the youth Moon Reality Superior rose from his seat and joined his palms. 
He asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, how does one see the cause of form? 
How does one see the cause of desire? 
How does one see the cause of perception? 
How does one see the cause of grasping certain precepts?” The Buddha told Moon Reality, “The wise see objects wisely; the foolish see objects foolishly. When the wise see an attractive body, they understand that it is filth, only an assemblage of flesh bundles, tendons, bones, membranes, pus, secretion, and blood, with large veins, small veins, and hollow and solid organs, such as large intestine, small intestine, bladder, stomach, spleen, gall bladder, liver, brain, heart, kidneys, and lungs, as well as hair and nails. Also wrapped in a thin skin are abominable, disgusting impure discharges, such as bile, phlegm, mucus, saliva, feces, and urine. “A form is composed of the four domains, and they are the cause of form. 
Moon Reality, taking the body born from parents as an example, its solidity is in the earth domain; its moisture in the water domain; its warmth in the fire domain; and its motion in the wind domain. Its perception and memory, as well as its sensory fields, such as sounds, scents, flavors, and tactile sensations, are all in the consciousness domain.” The youth Moon Reality next asked the Buddha, “Why does one’s consciousness abandon the current body upon its death? 
How does it transfer into the next body? 
How does it know when to abandon this body?” The Buddha told Moon Reality, “A sentient being receives requital according to karma, and the stream of consciousness continuously maintains each requital body. 
Using watery milk as an example, when it is heated with fire, milk, water, and fat will separate. 
Thus, Moon Reality, when a sentient being’s life ends, because of dissolution of the karmic force, the physical form, consciousness, faculties, and their spheres all separate from one another. As the only reliance,  consciousness then carries the dharma realm, including memory and one’s good and evil karmas, and goes on to accept the next requital. 
“Moon Reality, taking the highly auspicious butter as an example, when  butter is cooked with various good medicines, it turns into the highly auspicious butter with medicinal flavors and healing power. Shedding its ordinary quality, the butter now holds the strength of good medicine with six flavors: pungent, bitter, sour, salty, tart, and sweet. With its substance, aromas, and flavors, it can benefit one’s body. 
Similarly, after abandoning the body,  consciousness, carrying its dharma realm and good and evil karmas, moves away to accept the next requital. Moon Reality, the substance of the butter is like one’s body. 
Blending medicines with the butter, turning it into the highly auspicious butter is like joining sense objects and faculties to do karma. The medicinal flavors mixed into the butter are like good karma that supports consciousness. If one eats the highly auspicious butter, one will look robust, energetic, radiant, fine, and peaceful, without any trouble. It is like enjoying a pleasure-requital because good karma is stored in one’s consciousness. 
If one eats butter made with the wrong medicine, one’s features will turn grim, without healthy colors, chalky like the dead. It is like receiving a pain-requital because evil karma is stored in one’s consciousness. 
“Moon Reality, the auspicious precious butter does not have hands, feet, or eyes, but it can retain the strength of the substance, aromas, and flavors of good medicines. 
It can see the six desire heavens and the sixteen hells. It can see its  body with shapely hands and feet and fine sense organs. It also can see the abandoned corpse and recognize it as the body of its former life. It also can see tall magnificent celestial palaces with various kinds of adornments, surrounded by flowers, fruits, and trees, and covered with vines so radiant and gorgeous that they are like new gold chains set with jewels. 
Having seen these things, it will be very joyous. Because of great joy and love,  consciousness will entrust itself to this . “When a person with good karma abandons his body to assume another body, it is peaceful and painless. It is like a horseman abandoning one horse to ride another. 
It is like a warrior armed with military strategy. When the enemy troops approach, he puts on his sturdy armor and fearlessly rides off on his steed. Likewise,  consciousness, supported with one’s roots of goodness, abandons the inhalation and exhalation of this body as well as its spheres, and moves away to experience fabulous pleasures by rebirth in heaven, whether a Brahma heaven or even the top heaven heaven in the form realm.” At that time in the assembly, Prince Great Medicine rose from his seat and joined his palms. 
He asked the Buddha, “What form and image does consciousness assume after it has abandoned the body?” The Buddha replied, “Very good! 
Great Medicine, what you now ask is in the great profound realm of a Buddha. 
Except for the Tathāgata, no one can understand.” Then the youth Worthy Protector Superior said to the Buddha, “Prince Great Medicine’s question is very profound. 
His wisdom is wonderful, keen, and brilliant.” The Buddha told Worthy Protector, “This prince Great Medicine has planted his roots of goodness under Vipaśyin Buddha. For five hundred lives, he was reborn in non-Buddhist families. When he was a nonbeliever, he often pondered the meaning of consciousness: what consciousness is and why it is consciousness. 
For five hundred lives, he was unable to solve his problem, unable to find clues as to the coming and going of consciousness. 
I will today shatter his web of doubts and make him understand.” Then the youth Worthy Protector Superior said to Prince Great Medicine, “Very good! 
Very good! Your question is wonderful and profound. The meaning of Moon Reality’s questions is shallow and narrow, like a child whose mind wanders in the midst of external objects, not knowing his internal realm. It is rare to hear the true Dharma and it is hard to encounter a Buddha, whose vast knowledge and profound wisdom are unfathomable. 
We should especially request the Buddha to give the utmost wonderful teachings.” Seeing the Buddha’s radiant and pleasant features like an autumn lotus flower opening, Prince Great Medicine was exuberant and joyful. He joined his palms single-mindedly and said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, I love the profound Dharma and I thirst for the profound Dharma. 
I always have the fear of the Tathāgata entering parinirvāṇa and of my not hearing the true Dharma. Then I would have to be among the sentient beings in the world of the five turbidities, too ignorant to know good versus evil, too ignorant to be aware of the good versus the evil and of maturity versus immaturity . 
I would have to transmigrate in confusion through the painful journeys of birth and death.” The Buddha told Prince Great Medicine, “The true Dharma of the Tathāgata is hard to encounter and hard to acquire. In a past life, for the sake of half a stanza , I climbed up a mountain and plunged down, abandoning my life. For the sake of the true Dharma, I underwent immeasurable millions of koṭis of various kinds of suffering and tribulations. Great Medicine, you may ask all the questions you wish. 
I will explicate them to you.” Prince Great Medicine said to the Buddha, “Affirmatively I accept Your teachings. 
World-Honored One, what is the appearance of consciousness? 
I pray that You will grant me an explanation.” The Buddha told Great Medicine, “Its appearance is like a person’s reflection in the water. Indistinguishable as existent or nonexistent, it cannot be grasped. 
It is like the shape of a cloud, like an image of  thirsty love.” Prince Great Medicine asked the Buddha, “What is thirsty love?” The Buddha replied, “When one’s eyes follow a pleasing sight, it is called thirsty love. 
When one holds a mirror, one sees the reflection of one’s face. When the face in front of the mirror is gone, so is its reflection. 
The transference of  consciousness is similar, and consciousness and good and evil karmas have no form or shape to see. 
As a person who is born blind does not know sunrise, sunset, night, day, light, or dark, likewise one cannot see one’s consciousness. 
Nor can one see in one’s body thirsty love, sensory reception, perception, or memory. The  domains, the  faculties, and the  aggregates, constituting a sentient being, are all consciousness. The physical eyes, ears, nose, tongue, and body, together with sights, sounds, scents, flavors, and tactile sensations, as well as the nonphysical experience of pain or pleasure, are all consciousness. 
Great Medicine, for example, one tastes food with one’s tongue to detect all six flavors: sweet, bitter, pungent, sour, salty, and tart. The tongue and the food have shapes and forms, but flavors are formless. One detects sensations because of one’s body, with its bones, marrows, flesh, and blood. 
Through one’s body one can know consciousness as well as the fortune fruit or misfortune fruit it holds.” At that time the youth Worthy Protector Superior bowed down at the feet of the Buddha and asked, “World-Honored One, can one see one’s consciousness and know one’s fortune or misfortune in store?” The Buddha replied, “Hearken well! 
No one can see consciousness without first seeing the truth. Unlike a mango in one’s palm, consciousness cannot be seen. Consciousness is not inside one’s sense organs, such as the eye. If consciousness were inside any sense organ, such as the eye, one would be able to see it by dissecting the eye. 
Worthy Protector, as Buddhas as numerous as the sands of the Ganges all see that consciousness is formless, so too I see that consciousness is formless. Consciousness cannot be seen by the ordinary and the foolish. It can be revealed  only by analogy. 
“Worthy Protector, to know one’s sin or merit stored in consciousness, you now should hearken. 
Suppose a person is possessed, whether by a deity, such as a gandharva, or by a spirit, such as a skandha. 
Worthy Protector, what is your opinion? 
Can one see the possessor, whether a deity or a spirit?” Worthy Protector replied to the Buddha, “No, World-Honored One, the possessor, a deity or a spirit, has no form or shape. 
One cannot see it inside or outside that person’s body.”  “Worthy Protector, if a person is possessed by a great deity with superb merit, he will receive fragrant flowers and choice incense, and will have aromatic fine food and drink, served properly with handsome clean offering paraphernalia. Likewise, because  consciousness has a store of merits, one will receive  fruit in the form of dignity, peace, and happiness, whether as a king among men, a state minister, a dignitary with reputation, a person in command of wealth, an elder, a merchant lord, or a god who enjoys splendid celestial life. One’s body receiving pleasure-requital because one’s consciousness has a store of merits is like a person possessed by a benign deity. 
When the deity receives an offering of wonderful flowers, choice incense, and aromatic, fine food and drink, he will be delighted and the possessed patient will be soothed. Therefore, if a person acquires command of rank and wealth in life, we should know that his body enjoys fortune fruit because his consciousness has stored merit. 
“Worthy Protector, if a person is possessed by a sordid evil spirit, such as a pūtana, which loves feces, spit, rot, filth, and other impure things, offering these to the spirit’s pleasure will suit that person. Because of the power of the spirit, the possessed patient follows its desires and loves impurity, stench, rot, and feces. 
Likewise, if  consciousness is laden with sin, one will be reborn  in poverty or will take an evil life-journey of some kind, as a hungry ghost or an animal that eats filthy things. 
“Worthy Protector, one who is possessed by a superior deity, a formless and shapeless entity, receives various kinds of fragrant and pure offerings. Similarly, one receives pleasure-requital because one’s  consciousness is stored with meritorious karma. 
By contrast, one who is possessed by an evil spirit, such as a pūtana, receives impure, filthy, gross food and drink. Similarly, one receives pain-requital because one’s  consciousness is laden with sinful karma. 
Worthy Protector, we should know that a body possessed by a deity or a spirit receives fine or gross food and drink is like one who receives pleasure-requital or pain-requital for one’s merit or sin stored .” Prince Great Medicine asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, how does one see the cause of desire?” The Buddha replied, “Great Medicine, desire is born from complementary causes, like two pieces of wood rubbed against each other by human effort to produce fire. 
Thus desire is born from consciousness, together with male and female sights, sounds, scents, flavors, and tactile sensations. 
As an analogy, fruit is born from flower. However, there is no fruit in a flower. When the fruit is born, the flower has perished. 
Although consciousness is evident because of the body, it cannot be seen by searching throughout the body. When the  karmic fruit is born in consciousness, the body perishes. Bones, marrow, and impure things will all decompose along with the body. 
“For example, carrying the form, aroma, flavor, and feel of the future fruit, a seed leaves the tree to grow. 
Likewise,  consciousness abandons the current body, carrying good and evil karmas, sensory reception, perception, and thinking, to accept the next life as requital. 
The process is also like a man and a woman who go separate ways after their pleasure meeting of love and desire. Consciousness, joined with karma, engages in love, attachment, play, craving, greed, and stinginess. When the current karmic requital is exhausted, consciousness will accept the next requital according to karma. With the conditions of the parents matched during the intermediate state , karmic force will enable  consciousness to acquire a body fruit . 
These are the cause of desire. “Great Medicine, what is the cause for one to grasp the precepts? 
These precepts—no killing, no stealing, no sexual misconduct, no lying, and no drinking alcohol—are stipulated by a teacher. 
Grasping these precepts is caused by a  view that, because of observing these precepts, one will achieve holy fruits, becoming a Srotāpanna, a Sakṛdāgāmin, or an Anāgāmin. However, because of grasping, one will instead gain a good rebirth, assuming human form or celestial form. 
is goodness with discharges , not goodness without discharges, because goodness without discharges will not yield such a fruit, a body composed of the five aggregates. Therefore, grasping the precepts means planting an impure seed. Consciousness that holds both good and evil karmas is impure, and it suffers from feverish distress because of afflictions. 
This is the cause of grasping the precepts.” Great Medicine asked the Buddha, “How does consciousness assume the form of a god or a hell-dweller?” The Buddha replied, “Great Medicine,  consciousness in the intermediate state has extraordinary vision, which does not depend on the physical eye for sight. 
This special vision, joined with a fortunate condition, sees merrymaking with desire and pleasure in a celestial palace. Consciousness will delight in and be attached to what it sees, and will think: ‘I should go there.’ Impure love and attachment are the cause of being. When consciousness sees its dead body lying in the place for corpses, it will then think: 
Because it has accumulated good karmas, I now will receive the celestial-life requital.’” Great Medicine asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, this consciousness deeply loves the corpse. 
Why does it not use it?” The Buddha asked Great Medicine, “Taking the cut hair and beard as an analogy, although they are still black and lustrous, can you plant them on the body to make them grow again?” Great Medicine replied to the Buddha, “No, World-Honored One, the abandoned hair and beard cannot be planted on the body to make them grow again.” The Buddha said, “Likewise, Great Medicine, the corpse that  consciousness has abandoned cannot be reused as the next requital.” Great Medicine further asked the Buddha, “This consciousness is invisible and profound, without any mass or shape to find. 
How does it maintain the large body of a sentient being, such as an elephant, which is hard, like vajra? 
How does it enter into and maintain the body of a strong man who can fight off nine elephants?” The Buddha replied, “Great Medicine, the wind, without mass or shape, stays in a hidden valley or crevice. 
It can break out with violent force, breaking Mount Sumeru into dust. 
Great Medicine, what are the form and appearance of the wind that can destroy Mount Sumeru?” Great Medicine replied to the Buddha, “The wind is intangible, without mass or shape.” The Buddha said, “Great Medicine, as the wind is intangible, without mass or shape, so too is  consciousness without mass or shape. 
However, it can maintain a body, whether large or small, whether of an elephant or of a mosquito. 
As a bright lamp dispels darkness in a large or small room, likewise consciousness maintains a large or small body according to karma.” Great Medicine asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, what is the appearance of karma? 
Through what causes and conditions does it manifest?” The Buddha replied, “Great Medicine, one’s rebirth in a celestial palace to eat wonderful celestial food in peace and happiness is the appearance of a karmic fruit. 
As an analogy, two thirsty people wander in wilderness. One of them finds cool, good water; the other finds nothing and has to endure thirst and suffering. One of them acquires cool water, not given by anyone; the other in thirst is not obstructed by anyone from finding water. Each person receives pleasure-requital or pain-requital for karmic reasons. 
Great Medicine, this is the way to see one’s good or evil karma, which is white or black, like the two distinct phases of the moon in the sky. It is also like the color of a fruit, which changes as the fruit ripens with the power in its fire domain. Thus, because of abundance of merit, one is reborn into a noble family, with an outstanding physical appearance, plentiful assets, and an overflow of gold and treasures. Or one may be reborn in a celestial palace to enjoy happiness and ease. 
“As an analogy, a seed is planted in the ground, but fruits appear at the top of the tree. The seed does not go from branch to branch to reach the tree top, nor does anyone place the seed on a branch. One cannot find the seed by cutting open the tree trunk. Even if the tree is chopped down, one still cannot find the seed. 
As an analogy, the seed is the cause of the flower, but inside the seed there is no flower. The flower is the cause of the fruit, but inside the flower there is no fruit. As the flower and the fruit grow, neither growth shows its cause. 
Likewise, because of the body there is karma, and because of karma there is the body. 
When the flower falls at maturity, the fruit with its seed will appear; when the body expires at maturity, the karmic seed will leave it. As the seed is the cause of flowers and fruits, likewise is the body the cause of good and evil karmas. Karma has no shape, no appearance of maturity, like the shadow of one’s body, with neither mass nor obstruction. 
The shadow is not held by or fastened to a person, but it moves along with the person. Never has anyone seen the shadow coming out of his body. 
Likewise, there are body and karma, but karma cannot be seen as something attached to the body. Yet, without the body, there cannot be karma. 
“As an analogy, medicine, which tastes pungent, bitter, or tart, can purge all diseases and make one’s body glow with healthy color and radiance, and people will know on sight that  has taken good medicine. The flavor of medicine can be experienced, but its curative merit is formless, cannot be seen, and cannot be captured. However, it can improve a person’s skin tone and glow. 
Likewise, good karma, which has no mass or shape, can enrich one’s body. 
One who is fortified with good karma is endowed with food, drink, and plentiful internal and external assets. One has facial features and shapely, normal hands and feet, lives in a luxurious house piled up with treasures, such as jewels, gold, and silver, and enjoys peace, happiness, and merriment at will. We should know that this is the appearance of good karma. 
“By contrast, if one is reborn with repulsive features, stays in a squalid place in a fringe country, in poverty and lowliness, subsists on gross food and drink or has nothing to eat, lacks resources, envying others’ enjoyment, we should know that this is the appearance of evil karma. 
As a clear mirror displays the fineness or grossness of one’s face, the reflection in the mirror has no mass and cannot be captured. As  consciousness has a store of good and evil karmas, accordingly one is reborn as a god or a human, or is reborn as an animal or a hell-dweller. 
Great Medicine, this is the way to see karma and  consciousness transfer together.” Great Medicine asked, “World-Honored One, how does amazing consciousness acquire a large body and maintain its sense organs?” The Buddha replied, “Great Medicine, as an analogy, a hunter goes into a mountain forest and shoots an elephant with a poisonous arrow. 
The poison on the arrow enters into the blood stream of the elephant, disables the body, and destroys its faculties. The poison is lethal and the body turns blue-red like clotted blood. Having killed the elephant, the poison is spent. 
What is your opinion? 
How does the quantity of poison compare with the size of the elephant’s body? 
Can they compare?” Great Medicine replied to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, the poison and the elephant have too wide a disproportion to compare quantity or size. 
It is like comparing a mustard seed with Mount Sumeru.” “Great Medicine, likewise,  consciousness abandons the current body and its spheres and moves on to develop the faculties  according to karma.” Great Medicine further asked the Buddha, “Why is the subtle consciousness not fatigued by maintaining a large body?” The Buddha replied, “Great Medicine, Sumeru, the king of mountains, stands at 84,000 yojanas. 
The two dragon-kings Nanda and Upananda each circle it three times. They then shake Mount Sumeru with a huge breath, turning the waters of its surrounding sea into poison. 
These two dragon-kings are gigantic and strong, and the two dragon-kings Vāsuki and Takṣaka are their equals. 
What is your opinion? 
Is there any difference in quantity between the consciousness of any of the four dragon-kings and that of a mosquito?” Great Medicine replied, “World-Honored One, there is no difference between the consciousness of any of the four dragon-kings and that of a mosquito.” “Great Medicine, if a small drop of deadly poison enters the mouth of each of the four dragons, they all will die. 
What is your opinion? 
Between a small drop of deadly poison and the venom in the mouth of a dragon, which is stronger?” Great Medicine replied to the Buddha, “The venom in the dragon’s mouth is stronger, and the strength of a small drop of poison is weaker.” “Great Medicine, even for a strong sentient being that can fight off nine elephants, amazing consciousness, with neither form nor shape, not measurable by quantity, maintains its body according to karma. 
Although the seed of a banyan tree is tiny, after being planted, it can grow into a magnificent huge tree with hundreds and thousands of branches. 
What is your opinion? 
Are the seed and the tree of the same size?” Great Medicine replied, “World-Honored One, the seed and the tree have a vast difference in size, like that between a hole in the lotus root and the domain of space.” “Thus, Great Medicine, the seed cannot be found in the tree. 
Yet, without the seed, the tree cannot be born. 
As a tiny banyan seed can grow a huge tree, so too amazing consciousness can grow a huge body. One cannot find consciousness in the body. 
Yet, without consciousness, the body cannot be.” Great Medicine further asked the Buddha, “Why does consciousness, which is indestructible like an adamantine vajra, stay in a fragile quick-to-decay body?” The Buddha replied, “Great Medicine, as an analogy, a poor man acquires a wish-fulfilling jewel. 
By the power of the jewel, spontaneously appear resources and pleasure objects, such as ornately sculpted towers, splendid palatial mansions, lush gardens full of flowers and fruits, elephants and horses, and female attendants. 
Later, he loses the wish-fulfilling jewel, and all the resources and pleasure objects vanish. Although the wish-fulfilling jewel is so strong and durable that it cannot be destroyed by a thousand vajras, the resources it produces are false and impermanent, which quickly disperse and perish. 
Likewise,  consciousness is strong and indestructible, but the body it produces quickly decays and perishes.” Great Medicine asked, “World-Honored One, how does gentle consciousness penetrate a dense hard form?” The Buddha said to Great Medicine, “Water is a gentle substance, but its flow can penetrate mountain rocks. 
What is your opinion? 
How do you compare the quality of softness and hardness in water and rock?” Great Medicine replied, “World-Honored One, the quality of a rock is hard, like vajra. 
The quality of water is soft, pleasant to the touch.” “Great Medicine, Consciousness is like water, most wondrous and most soft, but it can penetrate a strong large body, accepting it as requital.” Great Medicine next asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, after sentient beings have abandoned their bodies, how are they reborn in heaven, and how are they reborn in hell?” The Buddha replied to Great Medicine, “Upon the death of a person, if he has stored meritorious karma, he will abandon his original eyesight and acquire the wonderful celestial vision. 
With the wonderful celestial vision, he will see the six desire heavens, the six life-journeys, and the movement of his body. He will see celestial palaces with all amenities, and joyous gardens where flowers are always in bloom. He will also see beautiful goddess-attendants make merry in the lotus hall, wearing flowers and silk garments, adorned with bangles, bracelets, and other ornaments. Once he sees the goddess-daughters in a heaven, his mind will be filled with happiness and gratification as well as attachment. 
As a good sign, he will see a huge hall in the sky, lined with hundreds and thousands of colorful columns with beautiful carvings. The magnificent jeweled hall will be decorated with various kinds of fragrant flowers, and draped with nets, from which hang bells playing beautiful refreshing tones to gentle winds. Frolicking in the hall will be celestial youths adorned with jewels. “Having seen these things, he will smile contentedly, showing his teeth like flowers in a painting. 
He might even see, with delight and reverence, the honored visage of a Buddha. He will joyfully bid farewell as if to take a short trip. Then he will return to comfort his family and friends, helping them not to mourn the way existence flows, telling them not to have sorrow caused by differentiation, because where there is birth, there must be death. 
Great Medicine, a person with good karma, before his death, will delight in giving alms, in reciting various stanzas and praises, and in understanding various explanations and teachings of the true Dharma. He will abandon his life peacefully, not in sleep but as if in sleep. “As the person is about to abandon his life, his celestial parents-to-be will be seated together on one seat. 
Flowers will naturally appear in the hands of his goddess mother-to-be. Seeing these flowers, she will say to his father-to-be, ‘What an auspicious, extraordinary victory fruit! You should know that a time is approaching for joyful celebration for a son.’ His goddess mother-to-be will then shake the flowers with her hands. As she plays with the flowers, the person’s life will end. 
It is like wood producing fire. It is like the moon casting its reflection in clear water. His  consciousness with a store of good karmas will accept a celestial life a requital. It will be swiftly delivered by  wind into a flower, and his celestial parents-to-be, seated together on one seat, will both look at the flower. 
After the wind of desire blows sweet dew on the flower for seven days, a bright clean god-child, adorned with jewels, will appear lively and radiant in the hands of his goddess-mother.” Great Medicine asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, how does formless consciousness bring a form into being through the power of causes and conditions? 
Fire is born from the convergence of causes and conditions. Without causes and conditions, fire cannot be produced. Examining the wood, one cannot find the appearance of fire. Yet one can see fire rising from the wood. 
Indeed, Great Medicine,  consciousness brings a physical form into being through one’s parents as the conditions. Searching through one’s body, one cannot find consciousness. Yet, apart from one’s body, there is no consciousness. 
Great Medicine, before the kindling of fire, the appearance of fire is not there. Nor are there such qualities as heat that can be felt. 
Thus, without a body, Great Medicine, there cannot be consciousness, sensory reception, perception, or mental processing. 
Great Medicine, when ordinary beings see the bright light of the sun, they do not see the substance of the sun, whether it is black, white, yellow white, or yellow red. They know only that the sun, alternately rising and setting, radiates light and heat. 
They know the sun through its functions. 
Consciousness too is known by its functions.” Great Medicine asked the Buddha, “What are the functions of consciousness?” The Buddha replied to Great Medicine, “Sensory reception, perception, mental processing, thinking, and feeling anxiety, agony, or distress are functions of consciousness. 
Furthermore, habitual good and evil karmas become seeds stored in consciousness, which manifest as functions.” Great Medicine asked the Buddha, “How does  consciousness leave one body and quickly accept another body? 
If it has abandoned one body but has not yet accepted a new body, what appearance does consciousness assume during this interval?” The Buddha replied, “Great Medicine, as an analogy, a warrior with long arms, clad in sturdy armor, rides a horse, swift as the wind, into a battle formation and fights bravely with his weapon. Although he falls off his horse in a moment of inattention, he immediately jumps back on because of his good training in martial arts. 
Likewise,  consciousness abandons one body and immediately accepts another body. It is also like a coward who, upon seeing the enemy, out of fear, immediately rides his horse to escape. Likewise, when  consciousness with a store of good karmas sees its celestial parents-to-be seated together on the same seat, it quickly entrusts its rebirth to them. 
“Great Medicine, you ask what appearance consciousness assumes during the interval after it has abandoned its old body but has not yet accepted a new body. 
Great Medicine, by analogy, a person’s reflection in the water has no mass to grasp. Yet its hands, feet, facial features, and other shapes are no different from the person’s. The reflection has no mass, nor does it do karmas. It has neither sense of hot or cold nor sense of touch. 
Great Medicine, this explains how  consciousness with a store of good karmas is reborn in heaven.” Great Medicine asked the Buddha, “How is  consciousness reborn in hell?” The Buddha replied, “Great Medicine, in regard to how those who have done evil karmas enter into hell, you should hearken. 
Great Medicine, sentient beings that have accumulated roots of evil will have this thought upon dying: ‘I now die here with immense anxiety and suffering, abandoning my beloved parents, relatives, and friends.’ They will see hells and see themselves doomed to fall into them headfirst. They will see a place covered with blood and will relish its flavor on sight. Conditioned upon their appetite for blood, they will be reborn in hell. 
The way  consciousness deposits itself in the midst of such conditions as putrid evil water and stinking filth is analogous to the birth of maggots through the power of such conditions as feces, filth, spoiled cream, and putrid liquor, in a stinking place. 
Likewise those who enter into hell are reborn there through foul things.” The youth Worthy Protector Superior joined his palms and asked the Buddha, “What forms and appearances do hell-dwellers assume? 
Those who are reborn in a moat will have bodies like black clouds. Those who are reborn in a milk river will have bodies dotted in various colors, and their bodies will be very delicate, like an infant of nobility. Their bodies will measure more than eight elbows in height, with long head hair and body hair trailing behind. Their hands, feet, and facial features will be crooked and incomplete. 
People in Jambudvīpa will die if they see them in the distance.” Great Medicine asked the Buddha, “What food do hell-dwellers eat?” The Buddha replied, “Great Medicine, sentient beings in hell receive no pleasure from eating food. 
Running about with fear, they will see in the distance red molten copper. Mistaking it for blood, they will rush for it. 
They will also hear a call saying that the hungry can come quickly to eat. They will then go there and hold their hands as cups before their mouths. The hell warden will pour hot molten copper into their cupped hands and force them to drink it down into their abdomens. Their bones and joints will burst and crack open, their bodies entirely in flames. 
Great Medicine, the food eaten by sentient beings in hell only augments their suffering, without affording even a little comfort or happiness. 
Such are the agonies of sentient beings in hell! However, one’s  consciousness never gives up, nor is it damaged. 
“Pressed by the agony of hunger and thirst, they will see a lush green garden with an abundance of thriving trees, flowers, and fruits. Seeing this, they will laugh and say to one another, ‘This lush garden is green and the wind is cool.’ The multitude will hasten into the garden, seeking a moment of pleasure. However, the tree leaves, flowers, and fruits will all change into knives and swords to hack and slash these sinners. While some of them will be hit and their bodies cut in two, others will scream as they run in the four directions. 
Chasing after the sinners, the wardens will say to them, ‘Where are you going? 
You can stay here. How can you escape to the east or the west? 
This garden is adorned with your karmas. 
Is it possible to leave?’ “Indeed, Great Medicine, sentient beings in hell undergo various kinds of suffering. They die every seven days and are reborn again in hell. Because of the power of karma, they are like worker bees that return to their original place after collecting honey from flowers. 
Sentient beings with sinful karma are doomed to enter into hell. As they begin to die, they will see death agents arrive, who will lasso their necks and pull them. As if being captured by bandits, they will experience immense suffering in body and mind as they enter vast darkness, wailing these words: ‘Oh, oh! 
Disaster! I now abandon relatives, friends, and various kinds of loves in Jambudvīpa, to enter into hell. I now do not see the road to heaven but see wretched things. Like a silkworm that produces silk to bind itself to death, I am bound by my own sinful karma. 
With a noose fastened around my neck, I am dragged and driven into hell.’ Worthy Protector, such are the miserable appearances of sentient beings with sinful karma, being reborn in hell!” Worthy Protector and Prince Great Medicine, having heard these words, were astounded, their hair standing on end. They rose together, joined their palms, and said, “We today take refuge in the Buddha and entreat for His rescue and protection. 
We pray that, because of the merit of hearing this Dharma, before we are liberated from the stream of existence under the wheel of birth and death, we will not go down the three evil life-paths, never into hell.” Worthy Protector further implored the Buddha, “I pray only that You will grant our wish.” The Buddha said, “You may ask anything you wish.” Worthy Protector asked the Buddha, “What is accumulation? 
What is gathering? 
What are the aggregates? 
What is the meaning of no transference into a body?” The Buddha replied, “Worthy Protector, the body is composed of four realms: 
intellect, perception, mental faculty, and ignorance. Including these four realms in one’s consciousness is called accumulation. 
Gathering refers to the six domains, and the six faculties with their six corresponding objects. There are three causes of existence in the Three Realms, and there are two causes for understanding. “Gathering also means the assemblage of hair, beard, nails, skin, flesh, pus, blood, mucus, saliva, bile, phlegm, secretion, fat, marrow, and fluids, as well as hands, feet, face, and large and small joints. It is called gathering because it is like grain, legume, sesame, and wheat, collected and amassed into large piles. 
The six domains are earth, water, fire, wind, space, and consciousness. 
The six faculties are eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mental faculty; their corresponding objects are sights, sounds, scents, flavors, tactile sensations, and mental objects. 
“The three causes of one’s existence in the Three Realms are greed, anger, and delusion, while the three causes  are wind, bile, and phlegm. 
The two causes for understanding are precepts and faith; another two are equability and almsgiving; another two are energetic progress and samādhi; and another two are good and evil. 
“Sensory reception, perception, mental processing, and consciousness are called the four formless aggregates. Sensory reception leads to experiencing pain, pleasure, or neither of the two. Perception refers to cognition of pain or pleasure. Mental processing refers to thinking, attention, and sensory contact. 
“No transference  pertains to one’s attainment of the bodhi fruit because one’s body, voice, and mind are purified. After death, one’s  consciousness abandons the aggregates of existence and moves away joyfully. It no longer undergoes  existence, transmigrating through life-journeys. 
No more transference  is called no transference.” Then Worthy Protector and Prince Great Medicine bowed down at the feet of the Buddha and said, “World-Honored One, this Dharma nugget pronounced by the Buddha, the Omniscient One, will bring great benefits, peace, and joy to sentient beings in the future.” The Buddha said, “The Dharma store of the Tathāgata abides for eternity, never ceasing. 
The omniscient one knows everything because I have developed wisdom light through immeasurable assiduity and suffering. I now pronounce this sūtra on this true-Dharma day to shine brilliant light on sentient beings and to let virtue and renown flow everywhere from the ocean of omniscience. I pronounce it for the sake of those who are able to control their mind streams. Wherever this sūtra is, wherever it is being recited or explained, gods, spirits, asuras, and mahoragas will all come to make obeisance and to give support. 
Bhikṣus, from this day forward, do not pronounce this sūtra to nonbelievers. Nor should you show it to those who intend to find fault with this sūtra. Nor should you pronounce it to non-Buddhists, such as Nirgranthaputra and the Nirgrantha group. Nor should you pronounce it to those who request it with disrespect. 
Those who disobey my instructions damage Dharma work and in effect damage the Tathāgata. 
Bhikṣus, if there are those who make obeisance and offerings to this sūtra, you should respect them and honor them with gifts because they uphold the Tathāgata store.” Then the World-Honored One spoke in verse: 
Be brave to transcend the burden of afflictions. Train assiduously in the true teachings of the Buddha. Annihilate the legions of death, Like the elephant trampling on reeds. Uphold the Dharma, observe its precepts, And progress single-mindedly, without negligence or indolence, In order to cease the flow of rebirth, Reaching the edge of agonizing existence. 
After the Buddha pronounced this sūtra, the youth Worthy Protector Superior, Prince Great Medicine, bhikṣus, and Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas, as well as gods, humans, asuras, gandharvas, and others in the huge assembly, having heard the Buddha’s words, rejoiced and reverently carried out the teachings. 

Vaipulya Sūtra of Śrīmālā’s Lion’s Roar That Reveals the Great Skillful Means of the One Vehicle 
Translated in the Liu Song Dynasty by The Tripiṭaka Master Guṇabhadra
Chapter 1 – A Tathāgata’s Virtues 
 Thus I have heard: At one time the Buddha was outside Śrāvastī , staying in the Jetavana garden, which was purchased for the Buddha from Prince Jeta by Anāthapiṇḍika the Elder. 
At that time King Prasenajit and his queen Mallikā had not been believers in the Dharma for long. He said to his queen, “Queen Śrīmālā  is our daughter. She is kind, intelligent, and endowed with a keen capacity. If she sees the Buddha, she will quickly understand the Dharma without harboring doubts. 
We should send her a letter at the right time to inspire her to seek the Dharma.” The queen said, “Now is the time.” Then the king and queen wrote a letter, briefly praising the Tathāgata’s immeasurable virtues. 
They ordered a palace attendant named Candra to deliver the letter to Śrīmālā. Upon arriving in the kingdom of Ayodhyā, Candra entered the palace and respectfully handed the letter to Queen Śrīmālā. She joyfully accepted it with the highest reverence by touching it to the crown of her head. 
After reading it, inspired by its rare information, Śrīmālā spoke to Candra in verse: I have heard that a Buddha’s voice Is hard to encounter in the world. 
If this letter reveals the truth, I should make an offering to you . If that Buddha-Bhagavān Has appeared in the world to benefit all, He should pity me And enable me to see Him. 
As soon as she had this thought, the Buddha appeared in the sky, in His unparalleled body, and emitted vast radiance. 
Śrīmālā and her retinue prostrated themselves at His feet. 
With a pure mind, they praised the Buddha’s virtues as she spoke in verse: The Tathāgata’s sublime body Is unequaled, unparalleled, And inconceivable in the world. So I now pay homage. 
As the Tathāgata’s physical form is endless, So too is His wisdom, And His Dharma is ever abiding. 
You have removed the faults of Your mind And the four faults of Your body, And arrived on the inconceivable ground . So I now pay homage to the Dharma King. 
You have learned jñeya , And Your wisdom body is hindrance free And encompasses all dharmas. So I now pay homage. 
I pay homage to Your immeasurable virtues. I pay homage to Your unequaled virtues. I pay homage to Your boundless Dharma. I pay homage to Your inconceivable . 
I pray that You will pity and protect me, And enable the Dharma seeds to grow in me. 
I pray that You will accept and support me In this life and future lives. 
I have performed meritorious works And will continue in this life and future lives. 
With these roots of goodness, I pray that You will accept and support me. 
Then Śrīmālā and her retinue bowed down to the Buddha. In their midst, the Buddha bestowed upon her a prophecy, “Because of the roots of goodness you have acquired by praising the Tathāgata’s virtues, you will be reborn as a commanding king of gods and humans for countless asaṁkhyeyas of kalpas. Wherever you will be reborn, you will always see me and praise me as you do now. You will make offerings to innumerable asaṁkhyeyas of Buddhas. 
After 20,000 asaṁkhyeya kalpas, you will become a Buddha called Universal Light, the Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha. 
In His Buddha Land, there will be no evil life-paths and no suffering, such as old age, illness, deterioration, distress, or unpleasant experiences, nor will there be evils or the names of evil karmas. Sentient beings in that world will have good appearances and strength, live long lives, and enjoy the five desires. Their happiness will surpass that of gods in Paranirmita-vaśa-vartin Heaven , and they will ride only the Mahāyāna . 
Those in the Three Realms of Existence who cultivate roots of goodness will gather there.” When Śrīmālā received this prophecy, innumerable sentient beings, such as gods and humans, aspired to be reborn in that world. 
Then the World-Honored One bestowed upon them the prophecy of their rebirth there. Chapter 2 – Accepting Ten Precepts After Śrīmālā received the prophecy, she stood respectfully and accepted ten vast precepts. She vowed: 
World-Honored One, from now on until I attain bodhi, I will never entertain the thought of violating the precepts I have accepted. 
World-Honored One, from now on until I attain bodhi, I will never harbor arrogance toward my teachers. 
World-Honored One, from now on until I attain bodhi, I will never harbor anger toward sentient beings. 
World-Honored One, from now on until I attain bodhi, I will never harbor jealousy of others’ appearances or things. 
World-Honored One, from now on until I attain bodhi, I will never harbor stinginess about giving away internal or external things. 
World-Honored One, from now on until I attain bodhi, I will never accept or accumulate things for myself. Anything I accept will be for relieving sentient beings in need. 
World-Honored One, from now on until I attain bodhi, I will practice the Four Drawing-in Dharmas, never for receiving good requitals, but for benefiting all sentient beings. My mind free from greedy desire, complacency, and hindrances, I will draw in sentient beings. 
World-Honored One, from now on until I attain bodhi, when I see sentient beings in forlornness, confinement, shackles, sickness, tribulation, or hardship, I will not abandon them even for a short while, but will properly benefit them until they are free from suffering. 
World-Honored One, from now on until I attain bodhi, when I see those who make an evil livelihood, such as hunting or raising animals , or those who violate a Tathāgata’s pure precepts, I will not abandon them. 
Wherever I see such sentient beings, if I have the power , I will tame those who should be tamed and draw in those who should be drawn in. 
Because taming them and drawing them in will enable the Dharma to abide in the world for a long time. 
If the Dharma abides in the world for a long time, there will be more gods and humans, and fewer sentient beings taking the evil life-paths. Then all will be able to follow the Dharma wheel a Tathāgata turns. Because I see this benefit, I will draw them in, not abandoning them. 
World-Honored One, from now on until I attain bodhi, I will uphold the true Dharma  and never forget or lose it. 
Because forgetting or losing the Dharma means forgetting the Mahāyāna. Forgetting the Mahāyāna means forgetting the pāramitās. Forgetting the pāramitās means not wanting to ride the Mahāyāna. 
If a Bodhisattva is indecisive about riding the Mahāyāna, he has no motivation to accept the true Dharma and enter it with delight. Then he will never be able to transcend the ground of ordinary beings. 
As I see this immeasurable loss, I also see the immeasurable benefits received by a Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva who accepts the true Dharma. 
Therefore, I accept these ten vast precepts. “May the Dharma King, the World-Honored One, be my present witness, because at present only the Buddha-Bhagavān knows . 
Sentient beings have small and weak roots of goodness. They form a web of doubts because these ten vows are hard to carry out, or they do evil karmas in the long night and suffer the dire consequences. 
To settle their minds, before the Buddha I now make a truthful vow: 
‘If I fully observe these ten vast precepts, this multitude will see a rain of celestial flowers and hear celestial sounds.’” As soon as she spoke these words, the open sky rained down celestial flowers, and wonderful sounds were heard saying, “Indeed, indeed! 
What you say is true, not false.” Upon seeing the celestial flowers and hearing the celestial sounds, all in the assembly removed their doubts. They rejoiced exuberantly and said that they wished always to be with Śrīmālā and to do the same as she would. 
Then the World-Honored One bestowed upon the multitude the prophecy of the fulfillment of their wish. 
Chapter 3 – The Three Vast Vows Then Śrīmālā made three vast vows before the Buddha. She said, “I will benefit endless innumerable sentient beings through the power of these true vows: In all my lives, I will use my roots of goodness to acquire the wisdom-knowledge  of the true Dharma. This is my first vast vow. 
After I have acquired the wisdom-knowledge of the true Dharma, I will tirelessly expound it to sentient beings. This is my second vast vow. 
I accept the true Dharma and will relinquish my body, life, and wealth to protect and uphold it. This is my third vast vow. 
Then the Buddha said to Śrīmālā, “Your three vast vows are like the domain of space, which encompasses all dharmas. 
Hence a Bodhisattva’s vows as numerous as the sands of Ganges are all encompassed in these three vast vows. 
These three vast vows are truly vast.” Chapter 4 – Accepting the True Dharma Then Śrīmālā said to the Buddha, “Through the Buddha’s awesome power, I would like to condense my vast vows into what they truly are.” The Buddha said, “You have my permission to speak.” Śrīmālā said to the Buddha, “All vows as numerous as the sands of the Ganges, which are made by a Bodhisattva, are encompassed in one vast vow, the vow of accepting the true Dharma. 
Accepting the true Dharma is truly a vast vow.” The Buddha praised Śrīmālā, “Very good, very good! 
Your wisdom and skill are profound and wonderful because you have planted roots of goodness in the long night. Of future sentient beings, only those who have long planted roots of goodness can understand your words. 
You can expound  accepting the true Dharma, just as past Buddhas expounded it, present Buddhas do expound it, and future Buddhas will expound it. 
As I now have attained the unsurpassed bodhi, I too often expound  accepting the true Dharma. Indeed, I say that as the merit acquired by accepting the true Dharma is boundless, so too a Tathāgata’s wisdom and eloquence are boundless. 
Because accepting the true Dharma has great virtues and great benefits.” The Vast Meaning of Accepting the True Dharma Śrīmālā said to the Buddha, “Through the Buddha’s spiritual power, I would like to expound the vast meaning of accepting the true Dharma.” The Buddha said, “Speak.” Śrīmālā said, “The vast meaning of accepting the true Dharma is immeasurable. 
Accepting the true Dharma means acquiring the entire Buddha Dharma and gathering 84,000 Dharma Doors . 
As an analogy, when a new kalpa begins, vast clouds form and send down colorful rains and various treasures. 
Likewise, accepting the true Dharma rains down immeasurable fortunate requitals and countless roots of goodness. 
“World-Honored One, as another analogy, when a new kalpa begins, vast waters gather and form a Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World with 400 koṭi continents of different kinds. 
Likewise, accepting the true Dharma gives rise to the Mahāyāna’s store of immeasurable realms, the transcendental powers of all Bodhisattvas, worldly security, happiness, gratification, and ease, supra-worldly peace and joy, and even virtues gods and humans have never before had. 
What are these four? 
They are  sentient beings. Likewise a good man or woman who accepts the true Dharma can, like the great earth, perform four heavy tasks. 
What are these four? 
They are  giving the Mahāyāna to those who seek it. 
These are the four heavy tasks that a good man or woman who accepts the true Dharma can, like the great earth, perform. 
Indeed, World-Honored One, a good man or woman who accepts the true Dharma can, like the great earth, perform these four heavy tasks, befriend sentient beings unasked, pity and comfort sentient beings with great compassion, and become a Dharma mother of the world. “As another analogy, the great earth has four treasure stores. 
What are these four? 
They are treasures of  pricelessness. These are the great earth’s four treasure stores. Likewise a good man or woman who accepts the true Dharma has, like the great earth, four supreme treasures. 
What are these four? 
They are  giving the Mahāyāna to those who seek it. 
From a good man or woman who accepts the true Dharma, a sentient being can receive such great treasures, which are extraordinary and rare benefits. 
“World-Honored One, producing great treasure stores is accepting the true Dharma. 
World-Honored One, what is meant by accepting the true Dharma? accepting the true Dharma is no different from the true Dharma. The true Dharma is  accepting the true Dharma. 
Practicing the Pāramitās Is Accepting the True Dharma “World-Honored One, practicing the pāramitās is no different from accepting the true Dharma. Accepting the true Dharma means practicing the pāramitās. 
“For those who should be brought to  maturity through almsgiving, he or she gives them alms, not even sparing his or her body parts, to bring them to  maturity according to their mentalities and enable them to abide in the true Dharma. 
This is called dāna-pāramitā . “For those who should be brought to  maturity through observing the precepts, he or she protects his six faculties, purifies his or her body, voice, and mind karmas, and displays the four majestic deportments , to bring them to  maturity according to their mentalities and enable them to abide in the true Dharma. This is called śīla-pāramitā . 
“For those who should be brought to  maturity through enduring adversity, he or she endures their abusive words, insults, slanders, and threats with an altruistic mind and the foremost endurance, without anger or even changing color, to bring them to  maturity according to their mentalities and enable them to abide in the true Dharma. 
This is called kṣānti-pāramitā . “For those who should be brought to  maturity through making energetic progress, he or she helps them with a tireless mind, makes the foremost energetic progress with great aspirations, and displays the four majestic deportments, to bring them to  maturity according to their mentalities and enable them to abide in the true Dharma. This is called vīrya-pāramitā . 
“For those who should be brought to  maturity through practicing meditation, he or she uses an undisturbed mind, an undistracted mind, and the foremost right mindfulness that never forgets what he or she did or said long ago, to bring them to  maturity according to their mentalities and enable them to abide in the true Dharma. 
This is called dhyāna-pāramitā . “For those who should be brought to  maturity through developing wisdom, he or she uses a fearless mind to answer their questions about all meanings of the Dharma and expounds to them all doctrines, all studies, and even various technical skills, to bring them to  maturity according to their mentalities and enable them to abide in the true Dharma. This is called prajñā-pāramitā . 
“Therefore, World-Honored One, practicing the pāramitās is no different from accepting the true Dharma. 
Accepting the true Dharma means practicing the pāramitās. 
Relinquishing Three Things to Accept the True Dharma “World-Honored One, through the Buddha’s awesome spiritual power, I would like to further expound the vast meaning .” The Buddha said, “Speak.” Śrīmālā said to the Buddha, “What is meant by accepting the true Dharma? 
A good man or woman who accepts the true Dharma is  accepting the true Dharma. “Why? 
Because to accept the true Dharma, a good man or woman relinquishes three things. 
What are these three? 
They are  wealth. He or she relinquishes his or her body throughout future births and deaths, leaving behind old age, illness, and death, to acquire a Tathāgata’s indestructible, ever-abiding, and changeless dharma body  with inconceivable virtues. 
He or she relinquishes his or her life throughout future births and deaths, to become absolutely free from death, acquire the limitless, ever-abiding, and inconceivable virtues, and fully understand the entire profound Buddha Dharma. 
He or she relinquishes his or her wealth to acquire the endless, never-diminishing, ever-abiding, and inconceivable virtues unavailable to other sentient beings, and to receive excellent offerings from other sentient beings. 
World-Honored One, a good man or woman who relinquishes these three things to accept the true Dharma is remembered by all Buddhas and respected by all sentient beings. 
“World-Honored One, when the Dharma is ending, while bhikṣus, bhikṣuṇīs, upāsakas, and upāsikās will destroy the Saṅgha, split into factions, dispute, and disperse, a good man or woman who accepts the true Dharma without sycophancy, deceit, or falsity will delight in the true Dharma and join Dharma friends. 
Joining Dharma friends means that he will definitely receive a good prophecy from Buddhas. 
“World-Honored One, I see the great power of accepting the true Dharma. I also know and see that the Buddha is the true eye, the one with true wisdom-knowledge, the root of the true Dharma, the imparter of the true Dharma, and the reliance of the true Dharma.” Immeasurable Virtues and Benefits of Accepting the True Dharma Then the World-Honored One expressed sympathetic joy over Śrīmālā’s words about the great awesome power of accepting the true Dharma. He said, “Indeed, Śrīmālā, indeed as you say, accepting the true Dharma has great awesome power. 
As an analogy, whoever is even lightly touched by a strong man feels a great deal of pain. 
Likewise, Śrīmālā, accepting even a little of the true Dharma can distress māras. 
Indeed, Śrīmālā, I do not see any other good dharmas that can worry māras as can accepting even a little of the true Dharma. 
“As another analogy, the shape and color of the ox-king are unparalleled and surpass those of all other oxen. 
Likewise the roots of goodness of a rider of the Mahāyāna who accepts even a little of the true Dharma surpass those of riders of the Two Vehicles. Because accepting the true Dharma has vast virtues. 
“As another analogy, Mount Sumeru, king of mountains, surpasses all other mountains in size and majesty. 
Likewise the roots of goodness of a new rider of the Mahāyāna who accepts the true Dharma with an altruistic mind, not even sparing his life or wealth, surpass those of longtime riders of the Mahāyāna who are attached to their lives and wealth, not to mention those of riders of the Two Vehicles. 
Because accepting the true Dharma has vast virtues. 
“Therefore, Śrīmālā, you should expound  accepting the true Dharma to teach and establish sentient beings. 
Indeed, Śrīmālā, accepting the true Dharma brings such great benefits, such great blessings, and such great spiritual fruits. 
Śrīmālā, for countless asaṁkhyeyas of kalpas, I expounded the virtues and benefits of accepting the true Dharma but never reached their limit. 
Indeed, accepting the true Dharma has immeasurable and limitless virtues.” Chapter 5 – The One Vehicle The Buddha told Śrīmālā, “You now should further expound  accepting the true Dharma, as expounded by all Buddhas.” Śrīmālā said to the Buddha, “Very good, World-Honored One, I gladly obey Your command.” Accepting the True Dharma Is Accepting the Mahāyāna Then she said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, accepting the true Dharma is accepting the Mahāyāna. 
Because the Mahāyāna brings forth all voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and worldly and supra-worldly good dharmas. 
World-Honored One, as Lake Anavatapta  issues eight great rivers, likewise the Mahāyāna brings forth all voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and worldly and supra-worldly good dharmas. 
World-Honored One, as all seeds depend on the ground to grow, likewise all voice-hearers, Pratyekabuddhas, and worldly and supra-worldly good dharmas depend on the Mahāyāna to grow. 
Therefore, World-Honored One, abiding in and accepting the Mahāyāna are abiding in and accepting the Two Vehicles and all worldly and supra-worldly good dharmas. “World-Honored One, You have expounded six things. 
What are these six? 
To expound the Mahāyāna, You have expounded these six things. 
“To expound the Mahāyāna, You have expounded the abiding of the true Dharma because the abiding of the Mahāyāna is the abiding of the true Dharma. 
To expound the Mahāyāna, You have expounded the end of the true Dharma because the end of the Mahāyāna is the end of the true Dharma. 
Prātimokṣa and the Vinaya have the same meaning but have different names. The Vinaya is Mahāyāna teachings. 
Because one relies on a Buddha to renounce family life and accept the complete monastic precepts. Therefore, Mahāyāna precepts encompass the Vinaya, renouncing family life, and accepting the complete monastic precepts. 
However, an Arhat has no need to renounce family life and accept the complete monastic precepts. 
Because an Arhat has taken refuge in a Tathāgata to renounce family life and accept the complete monastic precepts. 
Only a Tathāgata Has Attained Nirvāṇa “An Arhat takes refuge in a Buddha because he has fear. 
Because an Arhat has fear even as he abides in freedom from actions , as if someone would harm him with a sword. Therefore, an Arhat has no ultimate joy. Because he relies on the one who never seeks refuge . 
Just as sentient beings that have no reliance have various fears, and seek refuge because of their fears, likewise an Arhat has fear, and relies on a Tathāgata because of his fear. 
“World-Honored One, an Arhat or a Pratyekabuddha has fear. Because his changeable birth and death are not ended, his rebirth continues. 
Because his Brahma way of life is not fully established, his training on the path is not entirely pure. 
Because his undertaking to attain nirvāṇa is not fully accomplished, he still has something to do . 
Because he has not fully crossed the ocean of birth and death, he still has something  to end. 
Because he has not ended certain afflictions, he is still far from the realm of nirvāṇa. 
“Only a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, has attained nirvāṇa because He has acquired all merits, while an Arhat or a Pratyekabuddha has not acquired all merits. 
Saying that he has attained nirvāṇa is a Buddha’s skillful means of expression. 
Only a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, has attained nirvāṇa because He has acquired immeasurable merits, while an Arhat or a Pratyekabuddha has acquired measurable merits. 
Saying that he has attained nirvāṇa is a Buddha’s skillful means of expression. 
Only a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, has attained nirvāṇa because He has acquired inconceivable merits, while an Arhat or a Pratyekabuddha has acquired conceivable merits. 
Saying that he has attained nirvāṇa is a Buddha’s skillful means of expression. 
Only a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, has attained nirvāṇa because He has removed all faults that should be removed and has achieved the foremost purity, while an Arhat or a Pratyekabuddha has remaining faults and has not achieved the foremost purity. 
Saying that he has attained nirvāṇa is a Buddha’s skillful means of expression. 
Only a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, has attained nirvāṇa and is revered by all sentient beings, and His state surpasses that of any Arhat, Pratyekabuddha, or Bodhisattva. 
Therefore, an Arhat or a Pratyekabuddha is still far from the realm of nirvāṇa. Saying that an Arhat or a Pratyekabuddha observes his level of liberation, acquires the four kinds of wisdom-knowledge, and arrives at the reviving rest place  is also a Tathāgata’s skillful means of expression, which has something remaining unsaid, and is not definitive. The Two Kinds of Birth and Death “Why? 
Because there are two kinds of birth and death. 
What are these two? 
They are  changeable birth and death, which are inconceivable. 
An ordinary being undergoes karmic birth and death. 
An Arhat, a Pratyekabuddha, or a holy Bodhisattva undergoes the inconceivable changeable birth and death in his mind-created bodies  until his eventual attainment of the unsurpassed bodhi. 
“Because an Arhat or a Pratyekabuddha has ended his karmic birth and death, he declares that his rebirth is ended. 
Because he has attained nirvāṇa with remnants, he declares that his Brahma way of life is established. 
Because he has ended certain afflictions, which all ordinary beings cannot end and voice-hearers in the first seven ranks have not yet completely ended, he declares that his undertaking is accomplished. 
Because has ended the afflictions that drive his karmic rebirths, he declares that he will not undergo a subsequent existence. 
However, although he declares that he will not undergo a subsequent existence, he has ended neither all afflictions nor all rebirths. 
Because there are certain afflictions that an Arhat or a Pratyekabuddha cannot end. The Ground-Abiding Afflictions and Their Ensuing Afflictions “There are two kinds of afflictions. 
What are these two? 
They are  their ensuing afflictions. 
There are four kinds of ground-abiding afflictions. 
What are these four? 
They are  ground-abiding love of existence. From these four kinds of ground-abiding afflictions ensue all afflictions, which respond to one’s mind from moment to moment. 
ground-abiding ignorance  without a beginning, the root affliction, which does not respond to one’s mind. 
World-Honored One, the power of these four kinds of ground-abiding afflictions is the relied-upon seed for all ensuing afflictions to grow. However, it cannot compare with the power of ground-abiding ignorance by any measure or analogy. 
“Indeed, World-Honored One, ground-abiding ignorance is far more powerful than the four ground-abiding afflictions. As an analogy, the appearance, strength, lifespan, retinue, accouterments, and transcendental powers of the celestial māra-king Pāpīyān surpass those of gods in Paranirmita-vaśa-vartin Heaven . 
Likewise the power of ground-abiding ignorance surpasses that of the four ground-abiding afflictions. Ensuing afflictions as numerous as the sands of the Ganges depend on ground-abiding ignorance to arise, and it enables the four ground-abiding afflictions to abide for a long time. 
The wisdom of an Arhat or a Pratyekabuddha cannot end it. Only a Tathāgata’s bodhi wisdom can end it. 
Indeed, World-Honored One, ground-abiding ignorance is the strongest. 
“World-Honored One, through grasping as the condition, and affliction-driven karmas as the cause, an ordinary being transmigrates in different karmic bodies in the Three Realms of Existence. 
Likewise, through ground-abiding ignorance as the condition, and affliction-free karmas as the cause, an Arhat’s, a Pratyekabuddha’s, or a holy Bodhisattva’s three kinds of mind-created body appear. His affliction-free karmas and three kinds of mind-created body depend on his ground-abiding ignorance to arise, not without conditions. 
Indeed, World-Honored One, his ground-abiding ignorance is the condition for his affliction-free karmas and three kinds of mind-created body to arise. 
Only a Tathāgata Can End His Ground-Abiding Ignorance “Indeed, World-Honored One, the four ground-abiding afflictions and affliction-driven karmas are different from ground-abiding ignorance. 
Because ground-abiding ignorance is apart from the four ground-abiding afflictions, it can be ended only on the Buddha Ground by a Buddha’s bodhi wisdom. 
Because an Arhat or a Pratyekabuddha has ended his four kinds of ground-abiding afflictions but has not completely ended all his afflictions, has not acquired the power to end them, and has not attained nirvāṇa. 
That his afflictions are not completely ended means that his ground-abiding ignorance remains. 
“World-Honored One, because an Arhat, a Pratyekabuddha, or a holy Bodhisattva in his final body  is still hindered by his ground-abiding ignorance, he does not clearly know or see the truth of various dharmas. 
Because he does not clearly know or see it, he cannot completely end what should be ended. 
Therefore, he achieves liberation with remaining faults, not liberation free from all faults; he achieves purity with remnants, not total purity; he acquires merits with remnants, not all merits. 
Because he achieves liberation with remnants, achieves purity with remnants, and acquires merits with remnants, his knowledge of suffering has remnants , the end of his accumulation of afflictions has remnants, the cessation of his suffering upon attaining nirvāṇa has remnants, and the completion of his training on the path has remnants. 
Therefore, he attains lesser nirvāṇa, called toward the realm of nirvāṇa. 
“If one knows all suffering, ends all one’s accumulations of afflictions, ends all one’s suffering upon attaining nirvāṇa, and completes one’s training on all paths, one will attain the ever-abiding nirvāṇa in a world plagued by destruction through impermanence and by the disease of impermanence, and become the protection and refuge for a world without protection and refuge. 
Because one attains nirvāṇa when one sees that dharmas are equal , neither good nor bad; wisdom is equal ; liberation is equal ; purity is equal . 
Therefore, nirvāṇa has one flavor, the same flavor, called the liberation flavor. 
“World-Honored One, if one’s ground-abiding ignorance is not completely ended, one cannot attain nirvāṇa, which has one flavor, the same flavor, the liberation flavor. 
Why not? 
Because if one’s ground-abiding ignorance is not completely ended, afflictions that should be ended, which are more numerous than the sands of the Ganges, cannot be completely ended. Because these afflictions that should be ended are not completely ended, one cannot acquire or attain virtuous dharmas that should be acquired or attained, which are more numerous than the sands of the Ganges. 
“One’s ground-abiding ignorance accumulates, and brings forth all afflictions and their ensuing afflictions, both of which should be ended through one’s spiritual training. 
It brings forth afflictions that arise from one’s mind, śamatha, vipaśyanā, meditation, samāpatti, skillful means, wisdom-knowledge, spiritual fruit, attainment, power, and fearlessness. Such ensuing afflictions more numerous than the sands of the Ganges can be ended only by a Tathāgata’s bodhi wisdom . 
All ensuing afflictions are established on one’s ground-abiding ignorance, arise from one’s ground-abiding ignorance as their cause and condition, and respond to one’s mind from moment to moment. 
World-Honored One, one’s ground-abiding ignorance without a beginning does not respond to one’s mind. 
“World-Honored One, all one’s afflictions, which are more numerous than the sands of the Ganges and can be ended only by a Tathāgata’s bodhi wisdom , are established on and sustained by one’s ground-abiding ignorance. 
As an analogy, all seeds depend on the ground to arise, establish themselves, and grow. If the ground is destroyed, the seeds are destroyed as well. 
Likewise one’s afflictions, which are more numerous than the sands of the Ganges and can be ended only by a Tathāgata’s bodhi wisdom , depend on one’s ground-abiding ignorance to arise, establish themselves, and grow. 
If one’s ground-abiding ignorance is ended, one’s afflictions are ended as well. 
When all one’s ground-abiding afflictions and all their ensuing afflictions are ended, one acquires all virtuous dharmas acquired by a Tathāgata, which are as numerous as the sands of the Ganges, acquires hindrance-free transcendental powers, acquires all wisdom-knowledge and views, removes all faults, acquires all merits, becomes a Dharma King, a Dharma Master, masters all dharmas, and ascends to the ground where all dharmas are hindrance free. 
One roars the lion’s roar of a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, declaring, ‘My rebirth is ended; my Brahma way of life is established, my undertaking is accomplished; I will not undergo a subsequent existence.’ Indeed, World-Honored One, this lion’s roar based on the definitive meaning has always been remembered and expounded . 
Two Kinds of Wisdom-Knowledge of Freedom from a Subsequent Existence “World-Honored One, there are two kinds of wisdom-knowledge that one will not undergo a subsequent existence. 
a Tathāgata, who uses an unsurpassed tamer’s power to subjugate the four māras, transcends the world, and is revered by all sentient beings. 
He realizes the inconceivable dharma body, and acquires mastery of all dharmas on the jñeya  ground, above which there is nothing more to do or to attain. 
Equipped with the Ten Powers, He valiantly ascends to the foremost unsurpassed fearless ground , and uses His hindrance-free wisdom to observe all dharmas, without others’ help. With the wisdom-knowledge that He will not undergo a subsequent existence, He roars a lion’s roar. 
“World-Honored One,  an Arhat or a Pratyekabuddha, who overcomes his fear of birth and death and, step by step, comes to enjoy the happiness of liberation. He thinks, ‘I have left behind my fear of repeated birth and death, and will no longer undergo the suffering of repeated birth and death.’ World-Honored One, as he observes his freedom from a subsequent existence, he also observes the foremost reviving rest place, the nirvāṇa ground. 
World-Honored One, abiding on the ground he has reached before, he is neither ignorant of the Dharma nor dependent on others. 
The One Vehicle “Why? 
Because both the Voice-Hearer Vehicle and the Pratyekabuddha Vehicle are encompassed in the Mahāyāna. The Mahāyāna is the Buddha Vehicle. Therefore, the Three Vehicles are the One Vehicle. 
Whoever rides the One Vehicle to seek bodhi will attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. Anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi is the realm of nirvāṇa. The realm of nirvāṇa is a Tathāgata’s dharma body. Realizing the ultimate dharma body is reaching the ultimate destination of the One Vehicle. 
A Tathāgata is the dharma body. realizing the ultimate dharma body is reaching the ultimate destination of the One Vehicle. ‘Ultimate’ means boundless and endless . 
The One Refuge in a Tathāgata “World-Honored One, the abiding of a Tathāgata has no time limit because a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, abides throughout the endless future. 
As a Tathāgata’s abiding has no limit, so too His compassion for the world has no limit. 
His limitless great compassion limitlessly comforts the world. These words are a good description of a Tathāgata. 
If someone says that a Tathāgata is the endless dharma, the ever-abiding dharma, and the refuge for the whole world, his words are also a good description of a Tathāgata. 
Therefore, for a world that has not been delivered and has no refuge, the one who serves as its endless, ever-abiding, and ultimate refuge throughout the endless future is a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha. “The Dharma is the path of the One Vehicle. The Saṅgha is the multitude that rides the Three Vehicles. 
The two refuges, the Dharma and the Saṅgha, are not the ultimate refuge. 
Because the Dharma, which is the path of the One Vehicle, leads to realization of the ultimate dharma body, which does not address the Dharma affairs of the One Vehicle . And the Saṅgha, which is the multitude that rides the Three Vehicles, has fear, takes refuge in a Tathāgata to seek liberation, and trains and learns to attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. Therefore these two refuges are not the ultimate refuge, but a limited refuge. “Suppose that a sentient being tamed by a Tathāgata takes refuge in Him and tastes the Dharma flavor. Faith and delight arising in his mind, he takes refuge in the Dharma and the Saṅgha. 
His two refuges are not merely these two refuges, but the refuge in a Tathāgata. 
Taking refuge in the highest sense  is taking refuge in a Tathāgata. 
The two refuges in the highest sense are the ultimate refuge in a Tathāgata. 
Because a Tathāgata is no different from the two refuges. 
The refuge in a Tathāgata is the Three Refuges. 
A Tathāgata, who has acquired the Four Fearlessnesses, reveals it in a lion’s roar. If a Tathāgata gives provisional teachings by skillful means according to sentient beings’ desires, they are in essence Mahāyāna teachings. 
There are no Three Vehicles because they are encompassed in the One Vehicle. The One Vehicle is the vehicle in the highest sense. 
Chapter 6 – The Boundless Holy Truth “World-Honored One, when a voice-hearer or Pratyekabuddha first observes the holy truth, he does not use only one kind of wisdom-knowledge to end his four ground-abiding afflictions by meeting the four conditions—knowing the suffering of repeated birth and death, completing his virtuous training on the path, ending his accumulation of afflictions, and attaining nirvāṇa to end all his suffering—although he knows well their meaning. 
World-Honored One, he does not have the highest supra-worldly wisdom-knowledge. While his four kinds of wisdom-knowledge come gradually as he gradually meets the four conditions, a Tathāgata’s highest supra-worldly wisdom-knowledge comes immediately, not gradually. 
“World-Honored One, the wisdom-knowledge of the highest truth is likened to vajra . 
It is not the initial wisdom-knowledge of the holy truth acquired by a voice-hearer or Pratyekabuddha, who cannot end his ground-abiding ignorance. 
World-Honored One, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, whose state is not that of a voice-hearer or Pratyekabuddha, uses His inconceivable wisdom-knowledge of the emptiness of dharmas to destroy His store of all afflictions. 
World-Honored One, the ultimate wisdom-knowledge that destroys one’s store of all afflictions is called the wisdom-knowledge of the highest truth. 
The initial wisdom-knowledge of the holy truth is not the ultimate wisdom-knowledge, but is the wisdom-knowledge that leads to anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
It does not describe a voice-hearer or Pratyekabuddha, though he is called a holy being, because of the measurable and meager virtue . 
The holy truth is not the truth realized by a voice-hearer or Pratyekabuddha, nor is it founded on the meager virtue . World-Honored One, the holy truth is first realized by a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, and then He reveals it to a world shrouded in the store of ignorance. 
The Tathāgata Store “The holy truth reveals the profound meaning of dharmas, which is subtle, hard to know, and beyond the thinking mind. 
Only a wise man  knows it, and the whole world cannot believe it. 
Because it reveals the profound Tathāgata store . 
The Tathāgata store is a Tathāgata’s state, unknown to any voice-hearer or Pratyekabuddha. 
The Tathāgata store reveals the meaning of the holy truth. 
Because the Tathāgata store is profound, the holy truth revealed is also profound, subtle, hard to know, and beyond the thinking mind. Although a wise man knows it, the whole world cannot believe it. 
A Tathāgata’s Dharma Body “If one has no doubts about the Tathāgata store being sheathed in one’s store of immeasurable afflictions, one will have no doubts about a Tathāgata’s dharma body leaving behind one’s store of immeasurable afflictions . 
If one has no doubts about one’s Tathāgata store, a Tathāgata’s dharma body, a Buddha’s inconceivable state, and a Buddha’s provisional teachings by skillful means, one will believe in and understand the two ways to realize the holy truth, which are hard to know and hard to understand. 
What are these two? 
They are  not through an undertaking. 
“The holy truth realized through an undertaking reveals the measurable meaning of the Four Noble Truths. 
Because one relies on another  and fails to  complete one’s training on all paths. 
One does not know that there are saṁskṛta birth and death versus asaṁskṛta birth and death, nor nirvāṇa with remnants versus nirvāṇa without remnants. “The holy truth realized not through an undertaking reveals the immeasurable meaning of the Four Noble Truths. 
Because one uses one’s own power  to  complete one’s training on all paths. 
“Of these two ways to realize the Four Noble Truths, a Tathāgata reveals only the first way because only a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, can fully verify the Four Noble Truths not through an undertaking, which is beyond the ability of an Arhat or a Pratyekabuddha. 
Because nirvāṇa is not attained gradually through practicing low, middle, and high dharmas. 
Because a Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, fully verifies the meaning of the Four Noble Truth not through an undertaking. He fully knows all future suffering, ends all His accumulations of afflictions and their ensuing afflictions, eliminates all His mind-created bodies , and ends all His suffering upon attaining nirvāṇa. 
“World-Honored One, cessation of one’s suffering upon attaining nirvāṇa does not destroy anything, but reveals one’s ever-abiding inherent pure nature , which has no beginning, no action, no arising, no end, and no expiring, and is apart from one’s store of all afflictions. 
World-Honored One, what is not separate, detached, or different from the inconceivable Buddha Dharma  more numerous than the sands of the Ganges is called a Tathāgata’s dharma body. 
World-Honored One, when a Tathāgata’s dharma body is not free from one’s store of afflictions, it is called the Tathāgata store. 
A Limited Understanding of Emptiness Conceals the Truth “World-Honored One, the wisdom-knowledge of the Tathāgata store is a Tathāgata’s wisdom-knowledge of the emptiness of dharmas. 
World-Honored One, no Arhat, Pratyekabuddha, or holy Bodhisattva has ever seen his Tathāgata store or realized that he possesses it. 
“World-Honored One, there are two kinds of wisdom-knowledge of the emptiness of one’s Tathāgata store. 
The first kind is the wisdom-knowledge of the empty Tathāgata store, which is separate, detached, or different from one’s store of all afflictions. 
The second kind is the wisdom-knowledge of the not-empty Tathāgata store, which is not separate, detached, or different from the inconceivable Buddha Dharma  more numerous than the sands of the Ganges. 
“World-Honored One, only great Arhats can believe in a Tathāgata’s teachings on these two kinds of wisdom-knowledge of the emptiness of one’s Tathāgata store. 
For all Arhats and Pratyekabuddhas, their wisdom-knowledge of emptiness revolves around the four inverted views. Therefore, they have never known or realized . 
Only a Buddha has verified the cessation of all His suffering, destroyed His store of all afflictions, and completed His training on all paths to end all His suffering. 
One of the Four Noble Truths Is the One Truth and the One Reliance “World-Honored One, of the Four Noble Truths, three are impermanent, and one is permanent. 
Because three noble truths have the appearances of a saṁskṛta dharma, and anything with the appearances of a saṁskṛta dharma is impermanent. 
Impermanent dharmas are destructible, not a place of refuge. 
Therefore, the three noble truths—suffering, accumulation of afflictions, and the path—are not the highest truth, because they are impermanent and are not a place of refuge. 
“The noble truth of cessation of one’s suffering upon attaining nirvāṇa is free from the appearances of a saṁskṛta dharma, and anything free from the appearances of a saṁskṛta dharma is permanent. 
A permanent dharma is indestructible. 
This noble truth is permanent and a place of refuge. 
Therefore, it is the highest truth to rely on. 
Wrong Views Invert the Truth “The noble truth of cessation of one’s suffering upon attaining nirvāṇa is inconceivable, beyond the capacity of all sentient beings’ minds and beyond the wisdom of all Arhats and Pratyekabuddhas. 
As an analogy, the born-blind cannot see sights, and a seven-day-old infant cannot see the sun. 
Likewise the noble truth of cessation of one’s suffering upon attaining nirvāṇa is not an object in an ordinary being’s mind, nor is it an item in the wisdom-knowledge of riders of the Two Vehicles. 
An ordinary being’s consciousness is dictated by two opposite views, while the  wisdom-knowledge of all Arhats and Pratyekabuddhas is pure. 
“An ordinary being holds the wrong view that there is a self  in the five aggregates that constitute a sentient being and, from that view, derives two opposite views, perpetuity and cessation. 
When he sees that all processes are impermanent, he holds the view of cessation , which is not the right view. 
When he seeks nirvāṇa, he holds the view of perpetuity , which is not the right view. 
His view of cessation is based on deluded perception. 
When he sees that his thinking continues, he does not know that each thought instantly expires. His view of perpetuity is based on deluded perception. 
Following deluded perception, he cannot see the truth because he shuttles between this view of perpetuity and that view of cessation, according to his differentiation. 
Thus a deluded sentient being entertains four inverted perceptions of the five aggregates, taking impermanence as permanence, suffering as joy, a nonexistent self as a self, and impurity as purity. 
The pure wisdom-knowledge of all Arhats and Pratyekabuddhas has never known a Tathāgata’s wisdom state or dharma body. “If a sentient being, because of his belief in a Buddha’s words, perceives a Tathāgata as eternity, bliss, a  self, and purity, this is not an inverted view, but the right view. 
Because a Tathāgata’s dharma body is the eternity pāramitā, the bliss pāramitā, the true-self pāramitā, and the purity pāramitā. This view of a Buddha’s dharma body is the right view. 
Whoever holds the right view is a Buddha’s true son, born from His mouth , from pondering the Dharma, and from being transformed by the Dharma, who will acquire the remaining wealth of the Dharma. “World-Honored One, what is meant by pure wisdom-knowledge? 
It is the wisdom-knowledge pāramitā  of all Arhats and Pratyekabuddhas. However, their wisdom-knowledge, though called pure wisdom-knowledge, cannot know the true meaning of the noble truth of cessation of one’s suffering upon attaining nirvāṇa, much less can his four kinds of wisdom-knowledge that depend on  the Four Noble Truths. 
Because if novice riders of the Three Vehicles were not ignorant of the Dharma, they would realize and acquire the true meaning of this noble truth. 
Therefore, the World-Honored One has expounded the Four Noble Truths for them to rely on. 
However, the Four Noble Truths  are worldly dharmas. 
The one reliance for all, the supreme supra-worldly reliance in the highest sense, is the noble truth of cessation of one’s suffering upon attaining nirvāṇa. 
One’s Tathāgata Store and Inherent Pure Nature “World-Honored One, one’s birth and death depend on one’s Tathāgata store, but the beginning of one’s Tathāgata store is unknowable. 
World-Honored One, saying that one has birth and death because of one’s Tathāgata store is a good explanation. 
World-Honored One, birth and death mean that one’s faculties expire and one’s new faculties have not arisen. 
World-Honored One, one’s birth and death depend on one’s Tathāgata store. 
According to worldly descriptions of death and rebirth, death means the expiring of one’s old faculties; rebirth means the arising of one’s new faculties. However, one’s Tathāgata store has neither birth nor death. 
It does not have the appearances of a saṁskṛta dharma, and is ever abiding and changeless. 
Therefore, dharmas depend on the Tathāgata store to establish themselves, and are sustained by it. 
Not only the inconceivable Buddha Dharma, which is not separate, detached, split, or different from the wisdom-knowledge of liberation, depends on the Tathāgata store to establish itself, but all saṁskṛta dharmas, which are separate, detached, split, and different from the wisdom-knowledge of liberation, depend the Tathāgata store to establish themselves. 
“World-Honored One, without one’s Tathāgata store, one cannot come to tire of suffering and to delight in seeking nirvāṇa. 
Why not? 
Because, World-Honored One, one’s seven dharmas—one’s first six consciousnesses and their perceptions—neither abide for a single moment nor retain one’s experience of suffering. Then one cannot come to tire of suffering and to delight in seeking nirvāṇa. 
World-Honored One, one’s Tathāgata store has no beginning, neither arising nor expiring, but retains one’s experience of suffering. Then one can come to tire of suffering and to delight in seeking nirvāṇa. 
“One’s Tathāgata store is not a self, not a person, not a sentient being, and not an everlasting soul. It is incomprehensible to those who hold the wrong view that one has a self, those who hold inverted views, and those who misunderstand the emptiness of dharmas. 
“World-Honored One, one’s Tathāgata store is the store of the dharma realm , the store of the dharma body, the supreme store of supra-worldly dharmas, and the store of one’s inherent pure nature . 
How one’s Tathāgata store, the store of one’s inherent pure nature, is tainted by one’s visitor-like afflictions  and their ensuing afflictions can be known only through a Tathāgata’s inconceivable wisdom. 
Because one’s good or evil mind arising from moment to moment is not tainted by one’s afflictions. 
One’s afflictions do not touch one’s mind, and one’s mind does not touch one’s afflictions. Then how can one’s mind be tainted without touching anything? 
Yet, World-Honored One, one has afflictions, and one’s mind is tainted by afflictions. It is hard to know why one’s inherent pure mind can be tainted. 
Only a Buddha-Bhagavān, who has the true eye and true wisdom-knowledge, is the root and the reliance of the true Dharma, and has a full understanding of the Dharma, can truly know it.” After Śrīmālā raised this hard-to-answer question, the Buddha expressed His sympathetic joy, saying, “Indeed, indeed! 
The reason why one’s inherent pure mind is tainted is hard to know. 
There are two things that are hard to know: its being tainted by afflictions. 
Only you and Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas with great attainments can hear and accept these two hard-to-know things. Voice-hearers can only believe in a Buddha’s words. 
A Buddha’s True Son “If a disciple of mine follows his growing faith, he can rely on his right faith to follow the dharma wisdom-knowledge to master it. 
Following the dharma wisdom-knowledge means that he makes five observations, which are observations of  the transcendental powers of an Arhat, a Pratyekabuddha, and a holy Bodhisattva. 
He should become accomplished in these five skillful observations . 
“After I have entered parinirvāṇa, if my disciples in the future follow their growing faith and rely on their right faith to follow the dharma wisdom-knowledge, they will fully understand that an ordinary being’s inherent pure mind is tainted by his afflictions. This full understanding will be the cause of their entering the path of the Mahāyāna. 
Believing in a Tathāgata brings such great benefits that they will not malign the profound meaning of the Dharma.” Śrīmālā’s Lion’s Roar Then Śrīmālā said to the Buddha, “There are other great benefits. 
I would like to expound them through the Buddha’s awesome spiritual power.” The Buddha said, “Speak.” Śrīmālā said, “There are three kinds of good men and women who will never malign the profound meaning of the Dharma and, with this great merit, will enter the path of the Mahāyāna. 
Who are these three? 
They are  those who do not know the profound Dharma but rely on a World-Honored One. It is not my place to know how they rely on a Tathāgata, because only the Buddha knows. 
Aside from these good men and women, for other sentient beings who, like rotten seeds, obstinately misinterpret the profound Dharma, go against the true Dharma, and follow the wrong paths, they should be tamed by the power of the king and Dharma protectors, such as gods, dragons, and ghosts.” Then Śrīmālā and her retinue prostrated themselves at the Buddha’s feet. 
The Buddha said, “Very good, very good! 
You protect and safeguard the profound Dharma by skillful means, and appropriately subjugate its enemies. 
You can expound this meaning because you have stayed close to 100,000 koṭi Buddhas.” Then the World-Honored One emitted vast radiance that illuminated the multitude. He rose into the open sky to the height of seven tāla  trees and walked across the open sky back to Śrāvastī. 
Meanwhile Śrīmālā and her retinue joined their palms and insatiably gazed at the Buddha, without moving their eyes even temporarily, until He was out of their sight. 
Then they exuberantly rejoiced and praised the Tathāgata’s virtues. Intently thinking of the Buddha, they entered the city of Ayodhyā and persuaded King Mitrayaśas to establish the Mahāyāna. 
He used the Mahāyāna to transform, in his kingdom, men and women over seven years of age. All subjects in his kingdom turned toward the Mahāyāna. 
Chapter 7 – Entrusting This Sūtra with Fifteen Names At that time the World-Honored One returned to the Jetavana garden. He summoned the venerable Ānanda and thought of the god-king Śakra. In response to His thought, Śakra and his retinue immediately arrived and stood before the Buddha. 
Then the World-Honored One broadly expounded this sūtra to the venerable Ānanda and the god-king Śakra. 
After He finished expounding it, He told Śakra, “You should accept, uphold, and read and recite this sūtra. 
Kauśika, suppose that a good man or woman trains to attain bodhi and practices the six pāramitās for kalpas as numerous as the sands of the Ganges. 
Then suppose that a good man or woman hears, accepts, reads and recites, and upholds this sūtra. The merit acquired by the latter surpasses that of the former, not to mention that the latter widely expounds it to others. 
Therefore, Kauśika, you should read and recite this sūtra, and widely expound it to gods in your Thirty-three Heavens .” Then He told Ānanda, “You too should accept, uphold, and read and recite this sūtra, and widely expound it to my four groups of disciples.” Then the god-king Śakra asked the Buddha, “World-Honored One, what is the name of this sūtra? 
How should we uphold it?” The Buddha said to him, “This sūtra has immeasurable boundless virtues. No voice-hearer or Pratyekabuddha can fully observe, know, or see them. 
Kauśika, know that this sūtra is an aggregate of profound wondrous great virtues. I now will reveal some of its names. Hearken, hearken. 
Ponder them well.” The god-king Śakra and the venerable Ānanda said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, we gladly accept your instruction.” The Buddha said, “This sūtra praises a Tathāgata’s virtues in the highest sense. 
“Moreover, Kauśika, the teachings in this sūtra end all doubts and reveal the definitive meaning of entering the path of the One Vehicle. 
Kauśika, I now entrust you with this Sūtra of Queen Śrīmālā’s Lion’s Roar. 
You should accept, uphold, and read and recite it as long as the Dharma abides in the world.” The god-king Śakra said to the Buddha, “Very good, World-Honored One, I accept your instruction with the highest reverence.” Then the god-king Śakra, the venerable Ānanda, and all others in this huge assembly, such as gods, humans, asuras, gandharvas, having heard the Buddha’s words, rejoiced and carried out His teachings. 

Buddha Pronounces the Sūtra of Amitāyus Buddha Translated from Sanskrit into Chinese in the Cao Wei Dynasty by The Tripiṭaka Master Saṅghavarman from India Fascicle 1  Preface Thus I have heard: At one time the Buddha was staying on the Gṛdhrakūṭa Mountain, near the city of Rājagṛha, together with 12,000 great bhikṣus, who all had acquired great transcendental powers. Such venerable ones included Ājñātakauṇḍinya, Aśvajit, Bāṣpa, Mahānāma, Bhadrajit, Yaśodeva, Vimala, Subāhu, Pūrṇa-Maitrayāṇīputra, Uruvilvākāśyapa, Nadīkāśyapa, Gayākāśyapa, Kumārakāśyapa, Mahākāśyapa, Śāriputra, Mahāmaudgalyāyana, Mahākauṣṭhila, Mahākapphiṇa, Mahācunda, Aniruddha, Nandika, Kampila, Subhūti, Revata, Khadiravaṇika, Vakula, Svāgata, Amogharāja, Pārāyaṇika, Patka, Cullapatka, Nanda, Rāhula, and the blessed Ānanda. Holy bhikṣus such as these were at the head of the assembly. 
In attendance as well was a multitude of Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas, such as Samantabhadra Bodhisattva, Mañjuśrī Bodhisattva, and Maitreya Bodhisattva. Also present were all Bodhisattvas of this Worthy Kalpa, including the sixteen Upright Ones: 
Worthy Protector Bodhisattva, Good Deliberation Bodhisattva, ], Faith and Wisdom Bodhisattva, Emptiness Bodhisattva, Transcendental Power Bloom Bodhisattva, Brilliant Hero Bodhisattva, Wisdom Superior Bodhisattva, Knowledge Banner Bodhisattva, Silent Faculty Bodhisattva, Vow and Wisdom Bodhisattva, Fragrant Elephant Bodhisattva, Jewel Hero Bodhisattva, Center Abiding Bodhisattva, Restrained Action Bodhisattva, and Liberation Bodhisattva. They all cultivate the virtues of Samantabhadra Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva. Equipped with immeasurable Bodhisattva action vows, they stand firm in all virtuous ways. They visit worlds in the ten directions, skillfully carrying out suitable missions. 
Then he leaves the celestial palace and descends into his mother’s womb. He is born from the right side of his mother and walks seven steps as his dazzling radiance illuminates innumerable Buddha Lands in the ten directions. 
As the earth quakes in six different ways, he declares aloud, “I will be the unsurpassed honored one in this world.” The Bodhisattva is attended by the god-king Śakra and Brahma-kings, and gods and humans take refuge in him. 
As a demonstration, he learns mathematics, literature, archery, and horsemanship, masters sacred arts, and studies voluminous texts. Playing in the garden, he discusses martial arts and tests his ability. 
Even as he manifests enjoyment of sense objects in his palace, such as sights and flavors, he perceives old age, illness, and death, and realizes the impermanence of the world. Abandoning his kingdom, riches, and status, he goes into mountain forests, seeking bodhi. He rides off on his white horse then sends it back with his jeweled crown and necklaces. 
Shedding his regal garment, the Bodhisattva puts on the Dharma robe and shaves off his hair and beard. 
He meditates under trees, training arduously as he should for six years. 
Because he has appeared in the world of the five turbidities, he conforms to the way of the multitudes and displays dirt on his body. He then bathes in  the river of gold. 
Gods bend the tree branches so that he can hold them to get out of the river. Intelligent birds follow him to his bodhimaṇḍa. The youth who offers him grass is an auspicious sign of the fullness of his merit and endeavor. 
Out of compassion, the Bodhisattva accepts this offering of grass and makes a seat under the bodhi tree, upon which he sits cross-legged. Alerted by his great radiance, the celestial māra-king leads māra legions to harass and test him. 
However, he subjugates them all with his wisdom and power. Then he realizes the wondrous Dharma and attains anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi. 
The god-king Śakra and Brahma-kings all beseech Him to turn the Dharma wheel. As a Buddha, He walks the Buddha steps and roars the Buddha roar. He beats the Dharma drum, blows the Dharma conch shell, wields the Dharma sword, and erects the Dharma banner. He rumbles the Dharma thunder, flashes the Dharma lightning, pours down the Dharma rain, and gives the Dharma alms. 
As the Buddha illuminates everywhere in innumerable Buddha Lands with His radiance, the entire world quakes in six different ways, reaching the māra’s dominion, and the māra’s palace is shaken. The māras in multitudes are intimidated and terrified, and none of them fails to fall under submission. 
He shatters the web of evils and crushes the wrong views. He expels  afflictions, which enslave their body and mind, and destroys their pit of desires. He cleanses their impurities to reveal purity. 
He protects the Dharma fortress and opens Dharma Doors. 
He illuminates the Buddha Dharma and widely disseminates it to transform all . 
The Buddha enters towns to beg for food and receives offerings in abundance. Revealing Himself as a fortune field, He enables the almsgivers to accumulate merit acquired from their planting. He smiles as He expounds the Dharma. He heals with Dharma medicine the three kinds of suffering. 
He teaches the immeasurable merit of the resolve to attain bodhi. He bestows upon Bodhisattvas the prophecy that they all will attain Buddhahood. 
By His demonstration of entering parinirvāṇa, He helps innumerable multitudes to eradicate their afflictions and plant their roots of virtue. 
The merit He has acquired is wondrous and immeasurable as he visits Buddha Lands, giving everyone the teachings for attaining bodhi. His actions are pure and untainted. 
Like a master of illusion who conjures up various images, He manifests Himself as male or female, or in any suitable form. With perfect understanding of what He has learned, He manifests Himself at will. 
The Bodhisattva Way The Bodhisattvas  do the same. To learn all Dharmas , they collect them and train accordingly. The truth they uphold can inspire and transform all sentient beings. Fully equipped with ways to help sentient beings compassionately, they manifest themselves everywhere in innumerable Buddha Lands, never acting arrogant or domineering. 
They thoroughly understand the essentials of Bodhisattva scriptural texts. As their names spread everywhere, their virtuous ways prevail in the ten directions. They are protected and remembered by innumerable Buddhas. 
They abide in the truths that Buddhas abide in, and they establish the teachings that great holy ones have established. Under Tathāgatas’ guidance, they are Bodhisattvas and great teachers, who each can proclaim the Way. 
With wisdom arising from profound meditation, they educate and guide multitudes of sentient beings. Penetrating dharma nature, they understand sentient beings’ appearances and their lands. When such Bodhisattvas make offerings to Buddhas, they magically manifest themselves like flashes of lightning. 
They skillfully learn the way of fearlessness and fully understand that dharmas are illusory. 
They annihilate the webs of māras and liberate sentient beings from bondage and fetters. 
Transcending the ground of voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas, they attain the Three Samādhis: emptiness, no appearance, and no wish. 
By skillful means, they present the Three Vehicles. 
For those of middling or low capacity, they demonstrate parinirvāṇa. Knowing that  there is neither action nor existence, neither arising nor ceasing, they realize the truth of equality and fully attain innumerable dhāranīs and hundreds and thousands of samādhis. 
As their faculties and wisdom remain in boundless silence, they delve into the store of the Bodhisattva Dharma and attain the Samādhi of Buddha Adornment. While they remain inside the profound Samādhi Door, they see Buddhas before them. 
Then they promote and expound the Dharma in all the sūtras. In the instant of a thought, they visit everywhere in all Buddha Lands, rescuing those in extreme suffering, both those who do and those who do not find respite from suffering. 
As they explicate the true reality of dharmas, they acquire a Tathāgata’s eloquence. 
With mastery of the languages of the multitudes, they educate and transform them all. 
Having transcended the dharmas of the world, their minds abide in ways to deliver the world. 
With command of all things in the world, they are the unasked friends to multitudes of sentient beings, and they carry the heavy load of sentient beings . 
As such Bodhisattvas accept and uphold Tathāgatas’ profound Dharma store, they protect those of the Tathāgata character-type and help them to carry on this character-type. 
Exuding great compassion for sentient beings, they speak to them with lovingkindness to open their dharma-eye. As they block the three evil life-paths, they open the door to the good life-paths and, unasked, they teach the Dharma to the multitudes. Like a dutiful son who loves and respects his parents, they regard sentient beings as they do themselves. 
All their roots of goodness contribute to their crossing over to the shore of nirvāṇa, as they acquire the immeasurable merit, inconceivable wisdom, and holy knowledge of Buddhas. 
The Request for Teachings Innumerable such Bodhisattva-Mahāsattvas came to this assembly. 
At that time the World-Honored One looked vigorous and joyful, His appearance pure, radiant, and majestic. 
The venerable Ānanda, at the Buddha’s unspoken holy command, rose from his seat, bared his right shoulder, and fell on both knees. With palms joined, he said to the Buddha, “World-Honored One, You look vigorous and joyful today, Your appearance pure, radiant, and majestic, like a clear mirror that reflects images inside and is shiny outside. Your sublime visage is resplendent, unparalleled, and indescribable. Never have I beheld such wondrous splendor as You now display. 
Indeed, Great Holiness, my mind has these thoughts: ‘Today the World-Honored One abides in the extraordinary Dharma. Today the Hero of the World abides in the truth in which all Buddhas abide. Today the Eye of the World carries on as the guiding teacher. 
As Buddhas of the past, present, and future think of one another, does the present Buddha not think of other Buddhas? 
Why is His awesome presence so radiant?’” The World-Honored One asked Ānanda, “Why Ānanda? 
Did the gods tell you to ask the Buddha? 
Do you ask about my sublime visage based on your own perception?” Ānanda replied to the Buddha, “No god told me to. 
I ask about this meaning based on my own perception.” The Buddha said, “Very good! Ānanda, your question is opportune. 
You have developed profound wisdom and truly wonderful eloquence and, out of compassion for sentient beings, you wisely ask about this meaning. 
“The Tathāgata, out of inexhaustible great compassion for sentient beings in the Three Realms of Existence, has appeared in the world to expound the teachings for attaining bodhi, to rescue sentient beings, and to give them true benefits. 
Like an udumbara flower, the auspicious, wonderful flower that appears only once in a long while, He is hard to encounter in innumerable koṭis of kalpas. 
What you ask now will greatly benefit and transform all gods and humans. 
“Ānanda, know that immeasurable is the Tathāgata-Saṁbuddha’s wisdom, which leads and guides. His knowledge and views are hindrance free and indestructible. 
With the power of one meal, He can make his life last 100,000 koṭi kalpas or even innumerable, countless kalpas, His faculties undiminished in vigor and His appearance unchanged in radiance. 
What is the reason? 
Because the Tathāgata, with His boundless and endless samādhi and wisdom, has command of all dharmas. Hearken, Ānanda, I now will explain to you.” “Indeed, I would be glad to hear,” responded Ānanda. 
The Teachings The Fifty-four Buddhas Who Appeared in Succession The Buddha told Ānanda, “In the distant past, innumerable, countless inconceivable kalpas ago, a Tathāgata called  Lamp Lighter appeared in the world. 
He taught and delivered innumerable sentient beings, enabling them to attain bodhi, and then entered parinirvāṇa. After Him, Tathāgatas that appeared in succession included Distant Light, Moonlight, Sandalwood Scent, Fine Mountain King, Sumeru Celestial Crown, Sumeru Equal Brilliance, Moon Color, Right Mindfulness, No Affliction, No Attachment, Dragon God, Nocturnal Light, Peaceful Bright Summit, Immovable Ground, Wonderful Aquamarine Flower, Golden Aquamarine Color, Gold Store, Flaming Light, Flaming Faculty, Earth Seed, Moon Image, Sun Tone, Liberation Flower, Splendid Radiance, Transcendental Power in the Ocean of Enlightenment, Water Light, Great Fragrance, Freedom from Sense Objects, Abandoning Aversion, Jewel Flame, Wonderful Summit, Valiant Stand, Merit Held in Wisdom, Outshining the Sun-Moon Light, Sun-Moon Aquamarine Light, Unsurpassed Aquamarine Light, Foremost Position, Bodhi Flower, Moon Radiance, Sunlight, Flower Color King, Water-Moon light, Removing the Darkness of Delusion, Action to Remove Hindrance, Pure Faith, Fine Constellation, Awesome Spirit, Dharma Wisdom, Bird Tone, Lion Tone, Dragon Tone, and Staying in the World. These Buddhas have all passed away. “Next appeared a Buddha called  World Sovereign King, the Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-Saṁbuddha, Knowledge and Conduct Perfected, Sugata, Understanding the World, Unsurpassed One, Tamer of Men, Teacher to Gods and Humans, Buddha the World-Honored One. 
Dharmākara on the Cause Ground His Resolve to Form a Splendid Buddha Land “At that time there was a king who heard that a Buddha was expounding the Dharma. With joy in his heart, he immediately activated the anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi mind. He abandoned his kingdom and throne and became a śramaṇa named Dharmākara. Exceptionally intelligent and valiant, he was outstanding in the world. 
He went to World Sovereign King Tathāgata. He made obeisance at that Buddha’s feet, then circled Him to the right three times. Kneeling on both knees, he joined his palms and praised in verse: Sublime is the radiant visage. 
The sun-moon jewel That shines with flaming brilliance Is obscured Like pooled ink. 
The Tathāgata’s features are Unrivaled, beyond the world. His great tones of true enlightenment Flow to and resound in the ten directions. 
His achievement of precepts, knowledge, energetic progress, Samādhi, wisdom, And awesome virtue are Unequaled, supreme, and rare. 
His profound contemplation and deliberation of The ocean of the Buddha Dharma Unravel its profound secrets and Penetrate to its bottom. 
Nevermore has the World-Honored One Ignorance, greed, or anger. 
He, the hero and lion among men, Has immeasurable spiritual virtue, Immense merit, And profound, wondrous wisdom. His radiance and awesome appearance Shake the Large Thousandfold World. 
I resolve to become a Buddha, Equal to the holy Dharma King, To deliver others from their cycle of birth and death, Enabling them all to achieve liberation. 
I will give alms and control my mind, Observe precepts, endure adversities, make energetic progress, Abide in samādhi, And unfold wisdom, as the foremost training. 
I vow to attain Buddhahood And completely fulfill this vow To give great peace to Those living in fear. 
Suppose there are Buddhas A billion koṭi in number And great holy beings as Numerous as the sands of the Ganges. Making offerings to Buddhas such as these Is inferior to seeking bodhi Resolutely without retreat. 
Buddha Lands are as numerous as The sands of the Ganges. Although they are countless, Beyond reckoning, My radiance will illuminate everywhere In all these lands. As I make energetic progress, My awesome spirit is measureless. 
After I become a Buddha, My land will be foremost in splendor, Adorned with myriad wonders, And its bodhimaṇḍa will be supreme. 
My land will be like nirvāṇa, Peaceful beyond comparison. With compassion, I will deliver all . 
Those from worlds in the ten directions who are reborn in my land Will have joyful pure minds. Upon arrival in my land, They all will have peace and bliss. 
May the Buddha’s pure trust Be my true witness. Before Him, I make my vow And strive to achieve my goal. 
Just as World-Honored Ones  in the ten directions Have hindrance-free wisdom, So does this World-Honored One know My mind and actions. 
Even if I am in the midst of Pain and anguish, I persist in my energetic progress And endure without regrets. 
“Having spoken these stanzas, the bhikṣu Dharmākara said to that Buddha, ‘Indeed, World-Honored One, I have activated the anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi mind, and I pray that the Buddha will fully expound to me the Dharma in the sūtras. 
I will train myself and collect the pure adornments of innumerable Buddha Lands, so that I will quickly attain the perfect enlightenment and uproot the suffering of repeated birth and death.’” The Buddha told Ānanda, “Then, World Sovereign King Buddha said to the bhikṣu Dharmākara, ‘You should know how to train yourself and adorn your Buddha Land.’ The bhikṣu replied to that Buddha, ‘This profound significance is beyond my state. 
World-Honored One, I pray that You will fully expound to me the way Buddha-Tathāgatas form their Pure Lands. 
Having heard it, I will train according to what You say and fulfill my vow.’ “At that time World Sovereign King Buddha knew this bhikṣu’s exceptional capacity, and the profundity and immensity of his resolve. He then said to the bhikṣu Dharmākara, ‘As an analogy, a person keeps drawing water from an ocean with a small container. After kalpas of work, he can reach its bottom and obtain the treasures there. 
Likewise, if a person makes earnest, energetic progress to seek bodhi unceasingly, he will definitely harvest the holy fruit. 
No wish will fail to come true.’ “Then, World Sovereign King Buddha fully described to him 210 koṭi Buddha Lands. In response to his request, that Buddha also displayed all lands, coarse or fine, and the gods and humans there, good or evil. “At that time the bhikṣu heard that Buddha’s description of magnificent Pure Lands and also beheld them all. 
He made the unsurpassed supreme resolve. His mind was silent and free from attachment, and no one in the entire world could compare with him. 
For five kalpas, he contemplated and collected the pure actions to adorn a Buddha Land.” Ānanda asked the Buddha, “What was that Buddha’s lifespan?” The Buddha replied, “That Buddha lived for forty-two kalpas, during which time the bhikṣu Dharmākara collected the pure actions taken to adorn those 210 koṭi wonderful Buddha Lands. 
Having trained himself in this way, he went to that Buddha. He made obeisance at that Buddha’s feet and circled Him three times. Standing properly with his palms joined, he said to that Buddha, ‘World-Honored One, I have collected the pure actions to adorn my Buddha Land.’ “That Buddha told the bhikṣu, ‘You now may declare your vows. 
Know that now is the right time to delight all multitudes. 
After I become a Buddha, if the number of voice-hearers in my land should be known by calculation, and be obtained through calculating for 100,000 kalpas by sentient beings in the Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World that all have become Pratyekabuddhas, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, if the lifespan of gods in my land should have a limit, except being shortened by their own wish, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, if gods in my land should ever hear of any wrongdoings there, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, if innumerable Buddhas in worlds in the ten directions should not praise my name, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. 
They visit Buddha Lands, train in the Bodhisattva Way, and make offerings to Buddha-Tathāgatas  in the ten directions. 
They develop and transform as many sentient beings as the sands of the Ganges, setting them on the Way to the unsurpassed bodhi. 
After I become a Buddha, if Bodhisattvas in my land should fail to arrive, by virtue of my spiritual power, in the time of a meal, in innumerable, countless koṭis of nayutas of Buddha Lands to make offerings to those Buddhas, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, Bodhisattvas in my land will demonstrate their roots of virtue before Buddhas. If they should fail to manifest at will their intended offerings to their satisfaction, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, if Bodhisattvas in my land should be unable to expound  the overall wisdom-knowledge, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. 
After I become a Buddha, all things in my land will be radiant and splendid in extraordinary forms and colors, beyond description. If sentient beings in my land, including those with the god-eye, should know and distinguish them all by their names and numbers, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, if Bodhisattvas in my land, including those with a meager store of merits, should fail to know and see in my bodhimaṇḍa the innumerable radiant colors of the  tree, which is four million lis tall, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, if Bodhisattvas in my land who read, recite, uphold, and expound sūtras should fail to acquire eloquence and wisdom, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. 
If this should not come true, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, in my land, from the ground to the open sky, there will be palaces, towers, ponds, streams, flowers, and trees. Myriad things in my land will be made of innumerable varieties of treasures and 100,000 kinds of fragrances, and these wonderful adornments will surpass those of gods. As the fragrances suffuse all worlds in the ten directions, Bodhisattvas who smell them will all train in the Buddha Way. 
If this should not come true, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, in innumerable inconceivable Buddha Lands in the ten directions, all sentient beings touched by my radiance will become gentle in body and mind, surpassing gods. 
If this should not come true, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, in innumerable inconceivable Buddha Lands in the ten directions, if sentient beings that hear my name should fail to achieve the Bodhisattva Endurance in the Realization of the No Birth of Dharmas and to acquire profound dhāranīs, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, in innumerable inconceivable Buddha Lands in the ten directions, women who hear my name will have faith and delight, activate the bodhi mind, and tire of their female form. If, after their death, they should be reborn in female form, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. 
If this should not come true, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, in innumerable inconceivable Buddha Lands in the ten directions, Bodhisattvas who hear my name will prostrate themselves in obeisance and, with faith and delight, train in the Bodhisattva Way, and gods and humans will salute them. 
If this should not come true, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, gods in my land, by a single thought, will be able to make appear on their bodies garments, which are as wonderful as Buddhas say. 
If their garments should require sewing, dyeing, or laundering, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, if the bliss experienced by gods in my land should be inferior to that of bhikṣus with no more afflictions to discharge, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, Bodhisattvas in my land who wish to see innumerable splendid, pure Buddha Lands in the ten directions will see them all displayed in the jeweled trees as they wish, like one’s facial image in a clear mirror. 
If this should not come true, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, if multitudes of Bodhisattvas in other lands who hear my name should remain incomplete in their faculties until their attainment of Buddhahood, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, multitudes of Bodhisattvas in other lands who hear my name will all attain the Samādhi of Pure Liberation and abide in it. By a single thought, they will be able to make offerings to innumerable inconceivable Buddha-Bhagavāns without losing their samādhi state. 
If this should not come true, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, multitudes of Bodhisattvas in other lands who hear my name will, after their death, be reborn into a noble family. 
If this should not come true, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, multitudes of Bodhisattvas in other lands who hear my name will, with delight and exuberance, train in the Bodhisattva Way and fully develop their roots of virtue. 
If this should not come true, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, multitudes of Bodhisattvas in other lands who hear my name will all attain the Samādhi of Universal Equality and abide in it until their attainment of Buddhahood. They will constantly see innumerable inconceivable Buddhas. 
If this should not come true, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, Bodhisattvas in my land will hear the Dharma according to their wishes and preferences. 
If this should not come true, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, if multitudes of Bodhisattvas in other lands who hear my name should not soon attain  the spiritual level of no regress, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment. After I become a Buddha, if multitudes of Bodhisattvas in other lands who hear my name should not achieve the first, second, or third of the Three Endurances in the Dharma, and thus fail to attain the level of no regress from the Buddha Dharma, I would not attain the perfect enlightenment.’” The Buddha told Ānanda, “After the bhikṣu Dharmākara finished declaring his vows, he spoke in verse: Making vows to transcend the world, I will definitely attain the unsurpassed bodhi. 
If I am not a great almsgiver who, For innumerable kalpas, Universally relieves all those in poverty and suffering, I vow not to attain samyak-saṁbodhi. 
After I attain Buddha bodhi, My renown will spread  in the ten directions. If there are those who never hear my name, I vow not to attain samyak-saṁbodhi. 
Leaving behind desires and keeping the right mindfulness, I will train in the Brahma way of life with pure wisdom. Resolved to attain the unsurpassed bodhi, I will become the teacher to gods and humans. 
I will display vast radiance with my spiritual power, Universally illuminating innumerable lands, To dispel the darkness of the three afflictions And rescue those in tribulations. 
I will open their wisdom-eye And dispel the darkness of their blindness. I will close the evil life-paths And open the door to the good life-paths. 
When my meritorious work is completed, My awesome radiance will shine in the ten directions. The double luminosity of the sun and the moon will be eclipsed And the light of the skies will be withdrawn. 
I open the Dharma store to the multitudes And lavish upon them the treasure of merits. In the midst of the multitudes, I expound the Dharma with the lion’s roar. 
I make offerings to all Buddhas, Fully developing my roots of virtue. I wish to unfold my wisdom in full, To become the hero in the Three Realms, Like the Buddha, whose immeasurable wisdom Penetrates everything everywhere. I wish that the power of my merit May equal that of the Supreme Honored One. 
If my vows are to bear fruit, The Thousandfold World will be moved, And gods in the open sky Will shower splendid flowers. 
“As soon as the bhikṣu spoke these stanzas, the earth quaked in six different ways, and the sky rained wonderful flowers down upon him. Music sprang up in the sky, praising, ‘He will definitely attain anuttara-samyak-saṁbodhi.’ Then the bhikṣu Dharmākara completely fulfilled these great vows. 
Truly he transcended the world, for he deeply delighted in nirvāṇa.” His Accumulation of Merits from Virtuous Actions The Buddha said, “Ānanda, the bhikṣu Dharmākara made these great vows before that Buddha, amid multitudes of celestial māras, Brahma gods, and the eight classes of Dharma protectors, such as gods and dragons. 
Having made his vows, he intently worked on the adornment of his Buddha Land so that it should be open and vast, superb and uniquely wonderful, as well as everlasting, without decay or change. 
“For inconceivable trillions of kalpas, the bhikṣu engaged in immeasurable virtuous Bodhisattva actions. He permitted neither thoughts nor perceptions of greed, anger, or harm to arise in his mind. He was not attached to the sense objects: sights, sounds, scents, flavors, tactile sensations, and mental objects. 
He was accomplished in endurance, never disheartened by myriad tribulations. 
With few desires and much contentment, he had no greed, anger, or delusion. Silently abiding in samādhi, his wisdom was hindrance free. 
Free from the mind of falsehood and sycophancy, he spoke loving words with a kind face and considerately asked the questions for those who hesitated to ask. “He made boldly energetic progress, never feeling weary. 
He sought only the pure dharmas to benefit sentient beings. He revered the Three Jewels and served his teachers and elders. 
With great adornments , he completed many works and enabled sentient beings to acquire merit. 
He abided in the Three Samādhis: emptiness, no appearance, and no wish. With no act and no arising in his mind, he saw that dharmas are illusory. 
Keeping far away from abusive speech, which can harm self, others, and both, he trained in speaking virtuous words to benefit self, others, and both. 
“He abandoned his kingdom and throne, wealth, and women to practice the six pāramitās and teach others to practice them as well. 
After countless kalpas of accumulation of merit and virtue, in any place where he was reborn, innumerable treasure stores were spontaneously uncovered at his wish. 
He manifested himself as elders, laypeople, people with a great family name, or dignitaries, as kings in the kṣatriya caste or Wheel-Turning Kings, and as god-kings of the six desire heavens or even god-kings of Brahma heavens. 
He always reverently offered the four necessities to all Buddhas. Such merit is beyond description and acclaim. 
“His breath was fragrant and fresh, like utpala flowers. The pores of his body emitted sandalwood scent, which suffused innumerable worlds. 
His facial features were even and comely and his appearance superb. Manifested from his hands were inexhaustible treasures, clothing, food and drink, and adornments, such as splendid flowers, incense, and silky canopies and banners. 
Things such as these surpass those of gods. 
He achieved command of all dharmas.” Dharmākara as Amitāyus Buddha Ānanda asked the Buddha, “Has Dharmākara Bodhisattva already attained Buddhahood and entered parinirvāṇa? Has he not yet attained Buddhahood? 
Is he now somewhere?” The Buddha replied to Ānanda, “Dharmākara Bodhisattva has already attained Buddhahood. He is now in the west, 100,000 koṭi lands away from here. 
His Buddha Land is called Peace and Bliss.” Ānanda next asked, “How long has it been since that Buddha attained bodhi?” The Buddha replied, “It has been ten kalpas since He attained Buddhahood. 
The Virtues of His Land “His Buddha Land naturally has the seven treasures. Its ground is made of gold, silver, aquamarine, coral, amber, conch shell, and emerald, and it is open, vast, and boundless. 
The treasures intermingle and combine with one another, dazzling and sparkling. They are wonderful, beautiful, pure, and splendid, surpassing those in all worlds in the ten directions. These treasures, the best of all treasures, are like those in the sixth desire heaven. 
“His land does not have the four seasons. In spring, autumn, winter, or summer, the temperature is neither cold nor hot, but constantly pleasant and comfortable. 
Nor does it have immense oceans, small seas, streams, channels, wells, or valleys.” Then Ānanda asked the Buddha, “If that land does not have Mount Sumeru, upon what do Heaven of the Four God-Kings  and Trayastriṁśa Heaven  rely?” The Buddha replied to Ānanda, “Upon what do other heavens, from Yāma Heaven, the third desire heaven, up to  the Ultimate Form Heaven, rely?” Ānanda said to the Buddha, “One’s karmas and their corresponding requitals are inconceivable!” The Buddha told Ānanda, “As karmas and corresponding requitals are inconceivable, so too are Buddha Lands inconceivable. 
For sentient beings in any land, their merits and powers are grounded in their karmas.” Ānanda said to the Buddha, “I have no doubts regarding this Dharma. It is for removing the doubts of sentient beings of the future that I ask about this meaning.” His Infinite Light The Buddha told Ānanda, “Amitāyus Buddha’s radiance is dignified and supreme, with which other Buddhas’ radiance cannot compare. 
There are Buddhas whose radiance reaches a distance of seven feet, or one, two, three, four, or five yojanas, or to a distance extended to illuminate one Buddha Land. There are Buddhas whose radiance illuminates 100 or 1,000 Buddha Lands. 
Therefore, Amitāyus Buddha is also called Infinite Light Buddha, Boundless Light Buddha, Hindrance-Free Light Buddha, Matchless Light Buddha, Flame-King Light Buddha, Pure Light Buddha, Joyful Light Buddha, Wisdom Light Buddha, Ceaseless Light Buddha, Inconceivable Light Buddha, Ineffable Light Buddha, and Outshining the Sun-Moon Light Buddha. “If sentient beings are touched by His radiance, their three afflictions will be eliminated and their bodies and minds will become gentle. They will be filled with joy and exuberance as benevolence arises in their minds. 
If those who are in extreme suffering, taking any of the three evil life-journeys, see this radiance, they can rest, no more pain or distress. 
After their death, they will be saved . “Amitāyus Buddha’s radiance gloriously illuminates Buddha Lands in the ten directions, and no one fails to hear of it. 
As I now praise His radiance, so too do all Buddhas, Bodhisattvas, Pratyekabuddhas, and voice-hearers. 
“If sentient beings that have heard of His radiance, awesome spirit, and merit, unceasingly praise Him day and night with an earnest mind, they will be reborn in His land as they wish. There, multitudes of Bodhisattvas and voice-hearers will praise their merit. 
In addition, Buddhas and Bodhisattvas  in the ten directions, just as they now praise , will praise these sentient beings’ radiance until their eventual attainment of Buddha bodhi.” The Buddha continued, “I could describe the majesty and wonder of Amitāyus Buddha’s radiance and awesome spirit day and night for a kalpa, but still could not finish my narration.” His Infinite Life The Buddha told Ānanda, “Amitāyus Buddha’s lifespan is so long that it is beyond calculation. 
Suppose innumerable sentient beings in worlds in the ten directions all assume human form and become voice-hearers or Pratyekabuddhas. Suppose they assemble and single-mindedly calculate, for a billion kalpas, with all the power of their intellect, the length of His lifespan in terms of kalpas. They can never find its end or know its limit. 
The lifespan of the multitude of Bodhisattvas, voice-hearers, and gods there is also not a number that can be known by calculation or analogy. 
The Countless Numbers of the Holy Multitudes “In addition, the numbers of voice-hearers and Bodhisattvas are hard to calculate and describe. They have superb spiritual knowledge and command of awesome powers. 
They can hold the entire world in their hands.” The Buddha told Ānanda, “The number of voice-hearers and Bodhisattvas who attended that Buddha’s first assembly is beyond calculation. 
Suppose there are innumerable, countless billions of koṭis of people just like Mahāmaudgalyāyana, and they all calculate for asaṁkhyeya nayuta kalpas until they enter parinirvāṇa. 
They can never find this number, which is like the immeasurable depth of the immense ocean. Suppose someone cuts a hair into a hundred pieces and uses a piece to draw a drop of water from the ocean. 
What is your opinion? 
Is this drop more than the water in the immense ocean?” Ānanda replied to the Buddha, “The quantity of water in the immense ocean can never be gauged by the drop of water taken by the person. 
It cannot be known by skillful calculation or described by words.” The Buddha told Ānanda, “The number of voice-hearers and Bodhisattvas who attended the first assembly as calculated by Maudgalyāyana for a billion koṭi nayuta kalpas is like a drop of water. The number unknowable to him is like the water in the immense ocean. The Jeweled Trees “In addition, all over that land are trees made of the seven treasures, such as gold trees, silver trees, aquamarine trees, crystal trees, coral trees, emerald trees, and conch shell trees. Some trees are made of two, three, or even seven treasures. 
Some gold trees have silver leaves, flowers, and fruits. 
Some silver trees have gold leaves, flowers, and fruits. 
Some aquamarine trees have crystal leaves, flowers, and fruits. 
Some crystal trees have aquamarine leaves, flowers, and fruits. 
Some coral trees have emerald leaves, flowers, and fruits. 
Some emerald trees have aquamarine leaves, flowers, and fruits. 
Some conch shell trees have leaves, flowers, and fruits made of several treasures. 
“Some jeweled trees have purple-tinged gold roots, silver trunks, aquamarine branches, crystal twigs, coral leaves, emerald flowers, and conch shell fruits. 
Some jeweled trees have silver roots, aquamarine trunks, crystal branches, coral twigs, emerald leaves, conch shell flowers, and purple-tinged gold fruits. 
Some jeweled trees have aquamarine roots, crystal trunks, coral branches, emerald twigs, conch shell leaves, purple-tinged gold flowers, and silver fruits. 
Some jeweled trees have crystal roots, coral trunks, emerald branches, conch shell twigs, purple-tinged gold leaves, silver flowers, and aquamarine fruits. 
Some jeweled trees have coral roots, emerald trunks, conch shell branches, purple-tinged gold twigs, silver leaves, aquamarine flowers, and crystal fruits. 
Some jeweled trees have emerald roots, conch shell trunks, purple-tinged gold branches, silver twigs, aquamarine leaves, crystal flowers, and coral fruits. 
Some jeweled trees have conch shell roots, purple-tinged gold trunks, silver branches, aquamarine twigs, crystal leaves, coral flowers, and emerald fruits. 
“These trees in lines are matched line to line, trunk to trunk, branch to branch, leaf to leaf, flower to flower, and fruit to fruit. Their splendid colors and radiance are beyond the capacity of one’s eyesight. 
When cool breezes blow, these trees play music in the five tones, and their wonderful melodies are naturally in harmony. The Bodhi Tree in His Bodhimaṇḍa “In addition, the bodhi tree in Amitāyus Buddha’s bodhimaṇḍa is four million lis tall. The tree trunk is 5,000 yojanas in circumference, with branches and leaves spreading 200,000 lis in the four directions. 
All are naturally made of various treasures and adorned with the kings of jewels, such as the moonlight jewel and the ocean wheel jewel. 
Hanging from the twigs are garlands of jewels in a billion changing colors, radiating boundless beams of glowing light. 
Covering this tree are wonderful jeweled nets that manifest all kinds of adornments at one’s wish. 
They emit wondrous Dharma tones as breezes gently stir. These tones flow to all Buddha Lands in the ten directions. 
Those who hear them achieve the profound Endurance in Dharmas, abiding in the spiritual level of no regress. Even before they attain Buddhahood, they will not encounter tribulations. 
Although their eyes see sights, ears hear sounds, noses smell scents, tongues taste flavors, bodies touch the light, and minds perceive mental objects, they acquire purity in their six faculties, which will trouble them no more. 
“Ānanda, when gods in that land see this bodhi tree, they achieve the Three Endurances in the Dharma. First, the Endurance in Hearing the Sounds; second, the Endurance in Accord; third, the Endurance in the Realization of the No Birth of Dharmas. 
They achieve these endurances entirely by virtue of Amitāyus Buddha’s awesome spiritual power and by virtue of the power of His original vows, the fulfillment of these vows, the clarity of these vows, the firmness of these vows, and the ultimacy of these vows.” The Musical Trees The Buddha told Ānanda, “A king in the human world is entertained by 100,000 kinds of music, and music is also played in the palace of a Wheel-Turning King and in each of the six desire heavens. 
The music in each place is ten million koṭi times superior to that in the preceding place. However, the 10,000 musical tones in the sixth desire heaven are 1,000 koṭi times inferior to even a single tone from the trees made of the seven treasures, in Amitāyus Buddha’s land. 
These trees naturally play 10,000 kinds of instrumental music. The sounds of music are none other than Dharma tones, which are pure and resonant, wonderful and harmonious. They are foremost among all the sounds in worlds in the ten directions. The Palaces and Towers “The auditoriums, ashrams, palaces, and towers in that land are made of the seven treasures by magic. 
The Jeweled Ponds “Inside and outside of these structures are bathing ponds 10, 20, or 30 yojanas, or even 100,000 yojanas in size. Each pond’s length, width, and depth are equal. They are filled with water with the eight virtues, pure and fragrant, tasting like sweet nectar. 
The beds of emerald ponds are covered with conch shell dust. The beds of white jade ponds are covered with purple-tinged gold dust. The beds of purple-tinged gold ponds are covered with white jade dust. Some ponds are made of two, three, or even seven treasures. 
“On the banks of these ponds stand sandalwood trees covered with leaves and flowers, wafting fragrances everywhere. 
All over the surfaces of the waters are lotus flowers, such as celestial utpalas, padmas, kumadas, and puṇḍarīkas, all gleaming with colorful light. “When Bodhisattvas and voice-hearers enter a jeweled pond, if they wish the water to cover their feet, the water will cover their feet. 
If they wish the water to reach their knees, the water will rise to their knees. 
If they wish the water to reach their waist, the water will rise to their waist. If they wish the water to reach their chest, the water will rise to their chest. 
If they wish the water to reach their neck, the water will rise to their neck. 
If they wish the water to shower on their body, the water will shower on their body. 
If they wish the water to return to its former level, the water will return to its former level. 
The water temperature can be adjusted at will to either cool or warm. The water vitalizes the spirit, delights the body, and cleanses the mind of filth. 
The ripples merge and separate, vanishing peacefully, neither too slow nor too fast. 
“The ripples produce innumerable wonderful sounds. No one fails to hear the sounds suiting his needs, whether the sounds of the Buddha, the Dharma, the Saṅgha, silence, emptiness, no self, great lovingkindness and compassion, the pāramitās, the Ten Powers, the Four Fearlessnesses, the Eighteen Exclusive Dharmas, the overall wisdom-knowledge, no act, no arising or ceasing, the Endurance in the Realization of the No Birth of Dharmas, or even sweet nectar pouring on one’s head. Such wonderful Dharma sounds that suit one’s needs delight one beyond measure. 
They accord with the true meaning of purity, freedom from desires, and nirvāṇa; with the power of the Three Jewels, the Fearlessnesses, and the Eighteen Exclusive Dharmas; and with the path and wisdom of Bodhisattvas and voice-hearers. 
That land does not have even the names of the three evil life-journeys; it has only joyful tones. 
Therefore, that land is called Peace and Bliss.” The Inhabitants “Ānanda, those who are reborn in that land are endowed with pure physical bodies, wonderful voices, and the virtue of transcendental powers. “The palaces in which they live, their clothing, food and drink, and adornments, such as wonderful flowers and incense, are like those in the sixth desire heaven. 
When they desire to eat, bowls made of the seven treasures spontaneously appear before them. Such bowls, made of gold, silver, aquamarine, conch shell, emerald, coral, amber, or the moonlight jewel, appear at their wish. The bowls are naturally filled with food and drink of one hundred flavors. 
Although such food is present, there are no eaters. Gentle in body and mind, they are naturally satiated merely by seeing the food and smelling its aroma. They take their intention of eating as food, with no attachment to flavors. 
The bowls vanish when the meal is over, and reappear in due time. The purity, peace, and wonderful pleasures of that Buddha Land are below only the state of nirvāṇa, which is free from causes and conditions. 
“The Bodhisattvas, voice-hearers, and gods of that land have superb wisdom and marvelous transcendental powers. 
They all appear in the same form, without any difference. To conform to the way of other lands, the name ‘gods’ is used for them. 
They have wonderful appearances, with even facial features, extraordinary and unearthly. 
Being neither gods nor humans, they all are endowed with bodies that are naturally ethereal and boundless.” The Buddha told Ānanda, “As an analogy, when a poor beggar in the world stands beside a king, can you compare his features with those of the king?” Ānanda replied to the Buddha, “If this person stands beside the king, his features, ugly and sordid beyond analogy, are reckoned as a billion koṭi times inferior to the king’s. 
Why is he so? 
The poor beggar is lowly, and his clothes can barely cover his body. He can hardly feed himself to stay alive. He is always hungry, cold, and in distress, having lost all human standards. 
All his tribulations stem from his past lives, during which he did not plant roots of virtue. Wealthy and miserly, he did not give any of his accumulated riches to others. He desired to acquire things unearned, never tiring of his greedy pursuits. He did not believe in cultivation of virtue, and the evil he did piled high, like a mountain. 
In this way, he died, and his wealth and treasures all dispersed. The wealth amassed by his toiling body, which caused him concern and distress, did not benefit him, but went to others in the end. 
Without goodness or virtue to depend upon, after death he went down an evil life-path to undergo long suffering. 
After his sins have been purged, although he is reborn as a human, he is lowly and extremely stupid and sordid. 
“A king in the world is honored among men because of the merit he has accumulated in his past lives. Caring and generous, he gave alms to the needy with lovingkindness. He honored his trust and cultivated virtue, never disputative. 
After his death, supported by his merit, he is reborn to go up a good life-path. He can even be reborn  in a heaven to enjoy myriad pleasures. 
With a wealth of accumulated credit, he is reborn as a human into a royal family. Noble by birth, he has even, comely features. Respected and served by the multitudes, he enjoys wonderful garments and choice delicacies served at his command. 
Supported by the merit acquired in his past lives, a king lives a king’s life.” The Buddha told Ānanda, “What you say is true. 
Although a king is dignified and noble among men, his even, comely features, in comparison with those of a Wheel-Turning King, are lowly and sordid, just like the beggar standing beside the king. 
The Wheel-Turning King’s awesome appearance is the foremost one in the world. However, he is ugly in the presence of the god-king of Trayastriṁśa Heaven, 10,000 koṭi times uglier by comparison. 
If this god-king is compared with the god-king of the sixth desire heaven, he is 100,000 koṭi times inferior in appearance. 
If the god-king of the sixth desire heaven is compared with Bodhisattvas and voice-hearers in Amitāyus Buddha’s land, his radiant features and colors are a billion koṭi times inferior.” The Splendors of His Land The Buddha told Ānanda, “Gods in Amitāyus Buddha’s land, by a single thought, can instantly manifest clothing, food and drink, flowers and incense, necklaces, silky canopies and banners, and wonderful music, as well as dwellings, palaces, and towers, made of one, two, or even innumerable treasures, in desired shapes, colors, heights, and sizes. 
“Spread all over the ground are wonderful garments made with jewels. Gods step on them as they walk. 
Canopying that Buddha Land are innumerable jeweled nets, made of gold threads and precious gems and adorned with 100,000 varieties of jewels and wonderful treasures. Hanging from the four sides of these nets are jeweled bells, which sparkle with colorful light, extremely beautiful. 
“Breezes of virtue naturally stir, and they are gentle and pleasant, neither hot nor cold, but warm or cool. 
Neither too weakly nor too strongly, they sweep across the jeweled nets and the jeweled trees, which sound innumerable wonderful Dharma tones and waft 10,000 kinds of gentle fragrances of virtue. 
When these winds touch their bodies, they experience bliss like that of a bhikṣu in the Samādhi of Total Suspension of Sensory Reception and Perception. “Moreover, the breezes carry flowers all over that Buddha Land, which fall orderly, according to their colors, not chaotically. They are soft and lustrous, with a strong perfume. When one steps on them, the foot sinks down four inches. 
According to schedule, the breezes disperse the flowers in this way six times a day. “Moreover, there are jeweled lotus flowers all over that world, and each jeweled flower has 100,000 koṭi petals. The petals in innumerable colors are radiant. The blue colors gleam with blue light; the white colors, with white light. 
Each flower emits 3,600,000 koṭi beams of light. 
Manifested in each beam are 3,600,000 koṭi Buddhas, each with a purple-tinged golden body and an extraordinary, superb appearance. 
Each Buddha emits 100,000 beams of light as He expounds the wondrous Dharma  in the ten directions. 
These Buddhas each set innumerable sentient beings on the right path to Buddhahood.” Fascicle 2  The Certainty of Buddhahood The Buddha told Ānanda, “Those who are reborn in that land all belong in the group of sentient beings that definitely progress on the right path to bodhi. 
Because in that Buddha Land, there is neither the group that definitely is not on the bodhi path nor the group that is indecisive about its paths. The Three Classes to Be Reborn “Buddha-Tathāgatas in worlds in the ten directions, who are as numerous as the sands of the Ganges, each praise Amitāyus Buddha’s inconceivable awesome spirit and merit. 
If sentient beings that hear His name elicit faith and joy in but one thought and, with an earnest wish for rebirth in that land, transfer their merits to others, they will be reborn there and attain the spiritual level of no regress. 
Excepted are those who have committed any of the five rebellious sins or maligned the true Dharma.” The Buddha told Ānanda, “Gods and humans in worlds in the ten directions who earnestly wish to be reborn in that land are grouped into three classes. 
In the high class are those who have renounced family life, abandoned desires, and become śramaṇas. They should activate the bodhi mind and constantly think only of Amitāyus Buddha. They should accumulate merit and resolve to be reborn in His land. 
“When they die, Amitāyus Buddha, together with a holy multitude, will appear before them, and they will follow that Buddha to His land. They will be naturally reborn in lotus flowers made of the seven treasures, and they will abide in the spiritual level of no regress. Their wisdom will be keen, and they will have command of transcendental powers. 
Therefore, Ānanda, if there are sentient beings that wish to see Amitāyus Buddha in their present life, they should activate the unsurpassed bodhi mind, accumulate merit, and resolve to be reborn in His land.” The Buddha told Ānanda, “In the middle class are gods and humans in worlds in the ten directions who earnestly wish to be reborn in that land, but are unable to become śramaṇas and to accumulate merit on a large scale. They should activate the unsurpassed bodhi mind and constantly think only of Amitāyus Buddha as they cultivate goodness on a smaller scale. 
They should observe the pure precepts, erect memorial towers, enshrine Buddha images, offer food to śramaṇas, hang silk screens, light lamps, scatter flowers, and burn incense. With a wish for rebirth in that land, they should transfer their merits to others. 
“When they die, Amitāyus Buddha will magically manifest a copy of Himself, who is just as radiant and splendid as a real Buddha, to appear, together with a holy multitude, before them. They will follow this magically manifested Buddha to His land, and will abide in the spiritual level of no regress. 
Their merit and wisdom will be below those in the high class.” The Buddha told Ānanda, “In the low class are gods and humans in worlds in the ten directions who earnestly wish to be reborn in that land. Although they are unable to acquire various merits, they should activate the unsurpassed bodhi mind and, with a wish for rebirth in that land, single-mindedly think ten thoughts of Amitāyus Buddha. 
If they hear the profound Dharma, they should delight and believe in it without raising doubts. Even if they think only one thought of that Buddha, with utmost sincerity they should resolve to be reborn in His land. 
When they die, they will dream of that Buddha and will be reborn in His land. 
Their merit and wisdom are below those in the middle class.” Praises by Buddhas and Homage by Bodhisattvas The Buddha told Ānanda, “Amitāyus Buddha’s awesome spirit is boundless. None of the innumerable, countless inconceivable Buddha-Tathāgatas in worlds in the ten directions fails to praise Him. 
Innumerable, countless multitudes of Bodhisattvas in Buddha Lands in the east, which are as numerous as the sands of the Ganges, together with multitudes of voice-hearers, all go to Amitāyus Buddha, to make offerings reverently to Him and the Bodhisattvas and voice-hearers there. They hear and accept the Dharma, in order to disseminate the Dharma and transform sentient beings. 
As they do these things, so too do Bodhisattvas in worlds in the south, west, and north, in the in-between directions, toward the zenith, and toward the nadir.” At that time the World-Honored One spoke in verse: Buddha Lands in the east, Their numbers are like the sands of the Ganges. Multitudes of Bodhisattvas in those lands Visit Amitāyus Buddha reverently. 
In the south, west, and north, in the four in-between directions, Toward the zenith, and toward the nadir, Multitudes of Bodhisattvas in those lands Also visit Amitāyus Buddha reverently. 
Every Bodhisattva Carries wonderful celestial flowers, Choice incense, and priceless garments To make offerings to Amitāyus Buddha. 
Celestial music plays harmoniously, Exquisite tones in concert. 
They praise the Supreme Honored One in hymns As an offering to Amitāyus Buddha, Who has fully attained wisdom and spiritual power, Gone through profound Dharma Doors, And completed His store of merits. 
His unparalleled wondrous wisdom-knowledge Shines on the world like the sun of wisdom, And removes the clouds of birth and death. They reverently circle Him three times And bow down to the Unsurpassed Honored One. 
Seeing that His well-adorned Pure Land is So wondrous and inconceivable, They hereupon activate the unsurpassed bodhi mind, Each wishing the land  to be the same. 
Then Amitāyus Buddha is moved, And he smiles joyfully. His mouth emits innumerable beams of light, Illuminating everywhere in worlds in the ten directions. 
The returning beams of light circle His body three times And enter into the crown of His head. The entire multitude of gods is Exuberant and exultant. 
Avalokiteśvara Bodhisattva-Mahāsattva Arranges his garment, bows his head, and asks Why the Buddha is smiling. 
To the request for an explanation, that Buddha replies, “Brahma sounds reverberate like thunders, The eight tones resonating wonderful melodies, An accompaniment to my bestowal of prophecies upon Bodhisattvas! I now explain and you should hearken. 
The Upright Ones have come from worlds in the ten directions, And I know all their wishes. They resolve to form and adorn their Pure Lands And to attain Buddhahood. 
Realizing that all dharmas are Like dreams, illusions, and echoes, They will fulfill their wonderful wishes, Definitely to form such lands as mine. 
Knowing that dharmas are like lightning and reflection, They will eventually complete the Bodhisattva Way, Perfect their roots of virtue, And attain Buddhahood. 
Thoroughly understanding dharma nature, They know that everything is empty and has no self. Intently seeking pure Buddha Lands, They definitely will form such lands.” All Buddhas tell Bodhisattvas to visit That Buddha in the Land of Peace and Bliss, To hear the Dharma, accept it joyfully and train accordingly, And quickly attain the state of purity. 
Upon arrival in that well-adorned Pure Land, One will quickly acquire transcendental powers And will definitely receive from Amitāyus Buddha The prophecy of attaining Buddhahood. By virtue of the power of that Buddha’s original vows, Those who hear His name and resolve to be reborn  Will all arrive in that land And attain the spiritual level of no regress. 
Bodhisattvas who make earnest vows, Wishing that their own lands be no different from that land, Remember and deliver all sentient beings. Their renown spreads across worlds in the ten directions. 
To serve koṭis of Tathāgatas, They fly to all lands. After joyfully paying homage to Tathāgatas, They return to the Land of Peace and Bliss. 
Those who do not have roots of goodness Cannot hear this sūtra. 
Only those who are pure and observe their precepts Will come to hear the true Dharma. 
Only those who have seen a World-Honored One before Will believe this explanation. Humble and reverent, they hear and carry out the Dharma With exuberance and great joy. 
For those who are arrogant and indolent, It is difficult to believe in the Dharma. 
But those who have seen Buddhas in their past lives Delight in hearing these teachings. 
Voice-hearers and Bodhisattvas are unable To fathom the mind of the Holiest One, Just as a person who is born blind Tries to guide others. 
The ocean of the Tathāgata’s wisdom is Deep and vast, without a bottom. Those riding the Two Vehicles can never measure it. Only Buddhas themselves can understand. 
Suppose that all people Have attained bodhi  and Acquired the pure wisdom that everything is empty. For koṭis of kalpas, they ponder the wisdom of a Buddha, Trying to describe it with all their strength. They still do not know it at the end of their life. 
Buddha wisdom is boundless, And it brings the ultimate state of purity. As a long lifespan is hard to obtain, Even harder is to encounter a Buddha appearing in the world. 
It is difficult for people to have faith and wisdom. Those who energetically seek to hear the Dharma And do not forget the Dharma they have heard Will face that Buddha and receive great benefits. Therefore, my good kinfolk and friends, You should resolve To hear the Dharma Even if the world is in flames. 
Then you will definitely attain Buddha bodhi To rescue all those in the flow of birth and death. 
The Sublime Bodhisattvas The Buddha told Ānanda, “All Bodhisattvas in that land will eventually be in the holy position of waiting to attain Buddhahood in their next life, except those whose original vows put sentient beings first. They adorn themselves with the merit of their great vows, hastening to deliver all sentient beings everywhere. 
“Ānanda, in that Buddha Land, a voice-hearer’s body light is one yojana across, and a Bodhisattva’s radiance reaches a distance of one hundred yojanas. 
There are two foremost Bodhisattvas, who are most honored. Their awesome spiritual radiance shines everywhere in the Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World.” Ānanda asked the Buddha, “What are these two Bodhisattvas’ names?” The Buddha replied, “One is called Avalokiteśvara and the other  Great Might Arrived. 
These two Bodhisattvas trained in the Bodhisattva Way in this land. After their death, they have been reborn in that Buddha Land. 
“Ānanda, sentient beings reborn in that land are all endowed with a great man’s thirty-two physical marks. Fulfilled in wisdom, they delve into dharmas and understand their essence. Their transcendental powers are hindrance free, and their faculties are brilliant and keen. 
Those of inferior capacity achieve the first two of the Three Endurances, and those of superior capacity achieve the asaṁkhyeya Endurance in the Realization of the No Birth of Dharmas. 
“In addition, these Bodhisattvas, on their way to Buddhahood, will never again go down the evil life-journeys. They have command of transcendental powers and know the past lives of themselves and others. 
However, if they choose to be reborn elsewhere, in an evil world with the five turbidities, resembling my world, they will manifest themselves to resemble the inhabitants there.” The Buddha told Ānanda, “Bodhisattvas in that land, by virtue of that Buddha’s power, in the time of a meal, can visit innumerable worlds in the ten directions to make offerings to the Buddha-Tathāgatas there. According to their thoughts, innumerable, countless offerings instantly appear like magic, such as flowers, incense, instrumental music, silky canopies, and banners, which are precious and extraordinary, not of this world. 
These Bodhisattvas offer such objects to the multitude of Buddhas, Bodhisattvas, and voice-hearers there, which then change into flower canopies in the sky. The flower canopies are radiant and colorful, wafting fragrances everywhere. 
Each flower canopy is 400 lis in circumference, and continues to double in size until it covers the Three-Thousand Large Thousandfold World. These flower canopies then vanish, one after another. 
Delighted, these Bodhisattvas play celestial music in the sky and, with wonderful tones, they hymn Buddhas’ virtues. They hear and accept the Dharma with infinite joy. 
After making offerings to those Buddhas, before mealtime, they effortlessly lift off and return to their own land.” Pronouncement of the Dharma and Presentation of Offerings The Buddha told Ānanda, “When Amitāyus Buddha pronounces the Dharma to Bodhisattvas, voice-hearers, and gods, they all assemble in the auditorium made of the seven treasures. As He widely expounds the wondrous Dharma, no one fails to understand and accept with delight the teachings for attaining bodhi. 
“Meanwhile, winds arise from the four directions, blowing across trees made of the seven treasures, which sound the five tones. The winds scatter innumerable wonderful flowers everywhere. These natural offerings continue endlessly. 
All gods take 100,000 celestial flowers and fragrances, and play 10,000 kinds of instrumental music, to make offerings to that Buddha and the multitude of Bodhisattvas and voice-hearers. Scattering flowers and incense, playing music, they walk to and fro and quickly get out of one another’s way. 
During that time, their harmony and delight are beyond words.” The Merit of the Bodhisattvas The Buddha told Ānanda, “When Bodhisattvas reborn in that Buddha Land speak, they always pronounce the true Dharma in accord with their wisdom, with no contradictions or mistakes. 
For the myriad things in that land, they hold no concept of belonging or attachment. Without emotional bondage, they come and go, move or stop, completely at ease. Unfettered by endearment or alienation, with no sense of self versus others, neither competitive nor disputative, they have the altruistic mind of great lovingkindness and compassion for sentient beings. 
Never weary or indolent, they retain in their minds equality, excellence, profundity, and concentration, as well as love, appreciation, and joy of the Dharma. Having eradicated afflictions and purified the mind bent on the evil life-journeys, they take all Bodhisattva actions and acquire immeasurable merit. “Equipped with profound samādhi, transcendental powers, and illuminating wisdom, they practice the Seven Bodhi Factors, training their minds in accordance with the Buddha Dharma. Their physical-eye is pure and perceptive, able to distinguish all things. 
“With hindrance-free wisdom, they expound the Dharma to others. Seeing that all things in the Three Realms of Existence are equal in their emptiness, they resolve to seek the Buddha Dharma. Equipped with eloquence, they annihilate the afflictions that trouble all sentient beings. 
Born from the Tathātaga, they understand the true suchness of dharmas. 
Equipped with a good understanding of nirvāṇa and with verbal skills, they do not enjoy worldly talks but delight in true discussions . They develop their roots of goodness and resolve to attain Buddha bodhi. 
Knowing that all dharmas are in nirvāṇa, they end both their afflictions and their cycle of birth and death. 
When they hear the profound Dharma, they have no fears or doubts in their minds and are able to train themselves accordingly. 
Their great compassion is so profound, far-reaching, and wonderful that it embraces all sentient beings without exception, and they carry them all aboard the ultimate One Vehicle to the opposite shore. 
“As they resolutely shatter the web of doubts, wisdom arises in their minds, completely encompassing the Buddha Dharma. 
Their wisdom is like the immense ocean, and their samādhi is like the king of mountains. The radiance of their wisdom surpasses that of the sun and the moon, as they master the pure ways. 
“They are like the snow mountain because they sparkle with merits that are equal in purity; like the great earth because they do not discriminate between purity and impurity, good and evil; like the pure water because they wash away afflictions, like filth; like the fire-king because they burn way afflictions, like firewood; like the powerful wind because they travel across worlds unhindered; like the open sky because they are not attached to anything; like the lotus flower because they live in the world untainted; like the Mahāyāna because they carry sentient beings out of their cycle of birth and death; like the thick clouds because they rumble the great Dharma thunder to awaken those asleep; like the torrential rain because they pour down sweet nectar to water sentient beings; like the vajra mountain because they cannot be moved by māras or non-Buddhists; like the Brahma-kings because they are foremost in upholding virtuous dharmas; like the banyan tree because they shelter all; like the udumbara flower because they are rare to encounter; like the golden-winged garuḍa because they subdue adherents of the wrong views; like the soaring birds because they do not accumulate things; like the ox-king because they are invincible; like the elephant-king because they are skilled tamers; like the lion-king because they are fearless; like the vast sky because their lovingkindness is given equally. 
“They annihilate the mind of jealousy, not wanting to overtake others. 
They delight in seeking the Dharma, never satiated. 
They widely expound the Dharma, never tiring. 
They invoke the sun of wisdom to shine and dispel the darkness of delusion. They live by the six elements of harmony and respect. They always give the Dharma as alms. They make boldly energetic progress, never feeling weak or discouraged. 
They serve as the world-illuminating lamp and as the supreme fortune field. They serve as the guiding teacher who teaches all equally without likes or dislikes. 
They delight in only the true Way without elation or dejection. They pull out the thorns of desire to give comfort to sentient beings. Their merit is so outstanding that no one fails to respect them. They destroy the hindrances caused by the three afflictions and playfully demonstrate their transcendental powers. 
“They have the power of causes, conditions, mind, resolve, skillful means, persistency, virtue, samādhi, wisdom, hearing much of the Dharma, and the six pāramitās—almsgiving, observance of precepts, endurance of adversity, energetic progress, meditation, and wisdom—and the power of right mindfulness, right observation, the six transcendental powers, the Three Clarities, and taming sentient beings in accordance with the Dharma. 
Such power is complete in them! “Adorned with merit and eloquence, their physical features are majestic. No one can compare with them. 
They reverently make offerings to innumerable Buddhas, and they are always praised by Buddhas. 
They perfect their practice of pāramitās required for Bodhisattvas as they train in the Three Samādhis—emptiness, no appearance, and no wish—and go through Samādhi Doors, such as no birth and no death. They stay far away from the ground of voice-hearers and Pratyekabuddhas. 
“Ānanda, those Bodhisattvas are adorned with such immeasurable merit, which I have only briefly described to you. 
If I elaborate, I cannot finish even in a billion kalpas.” Encouragement to Achieve Rebirth in That Land The Buddha told Maitreya Bodhisattva, gods, and humans, “The merit and wisdom of the voice-hearers and Bodhisattvas in Amitāyus Buddha’s land are beyond description. 
If one makes energetic progress seeking bodhi, one definitely will transcend this world and be reborn in the Land of Peace and Bliss. 
If one decisively rejects the five evil life-paths, they will be closed to one. 
However, although the limitless  ascension is easy to achieve, no one wants to go that way. 
Although that land poses no obstructions, people are tethered to their world. Why does one not give up one’s worldly matters to walk the virtuous Way in order to acquire an extremely long life and infinite delight? 
The Evil Ways of the World “However, people of the world are shallow and earthly, and they fight over minor matters. 
In extreme suffering, they toil to support themselves. 
Noble or base, rich or poor, young or old, male or female, they all are concerned about money. Whether or not they have money, they worry about it just the same. 
If they own houses, they worry about their houses. In addition, their slaves, riches, clothing, food, sundry goods, and the six kinds of livestock, such as cows and horses, are all their concerns. Thinking and panting, they live in anxiety and fear. “Unexpectedly, floods, fires, bandits, enemies, and creditors wash, burn, and take away their goods. 
When the objects of their concern are all destroyed or dispersed, their toxic anxiety and anguish can find no release. Anger stays in their minds, together with concern and distress. Obstinately attached to their belongings, they refuse to let go of them. Some live out the rest of their lives as ruined men. 
“The poor and lowly are constantly in destitution. Those who do not own farmland desire to own farmland; those who do not own houses desire to own houses; those who do not own slaves, riches, clothing, food, sundry goods, or the six kinds of livestock, such as cows and horses, desire to own them. They may have one item, lacking another; they may have some items, lacking others. They think about getting all of them. 
Even as they get everything, these objects soon are dispersed. 
With anxiety and pain, they seek but cannot get what they want. Their thinking is futile, which only tires their body and mind. Plagued by their concerns, they are restless in their conduct. They cannot help toiling in cold or hot weather, living in pain. 
They carry on in this way until they die. “They refuse to do good, walk the right path, or cultivate virtue. After death, each of them will travel long distances alone, taking the next life-journey, unable to know whether it is good or evil. “People of the world—parents, children, siblings, spouses, and close or distant relatives—should have love and respect for one another, not hatred. 
The fortunate should be generous to the unfortunate, not stingy. 
People should be kind and gentle to one another in their speech and manners, not hostile. 
However, those who are in dispute harbor anger, and their anger in the present life will become an enormous feud in a future life. 
Because although mutually harmful acts in one’s present life may not immediately result in a deadly fight, the poisonous anger and hardened fury remain in one’s  consciousness, not going away. 
“People live in the loves and desires of the world. However, everyone is born alone, dies alone, comes alone, and goes alone. One must complete one’s own life-journey of pain or pleasure, and no one else can take one’s place. 
One’s good or evil karmas lead one to fortune or misfortune. 
As one’s past karmas relentlessly await, one must go alone on one’s next life-journey to a distant place that cannot be known. 
Family members, each accompanied by good and evil karmas, which are hidden from them, will be separated by their different life-paths for a long time. 
It will be extremely difficult for them to meet again. Why do people not give up their worldly pursuits and not strive to cultivate virtue while they are still healthy and strong? If they strive to cultivate virtue and make energetic progress, aiming to transcend the world, they can acquire infinite life. 
What other delight can they possibly desire? 
“However, people of the world do not believe that doing good karmas reaps good requitals or that seeking bodhi leads to attainment of bodhi. They do not believe in rebirth after death. Nor do they believe that generous giving yields good fortune or that requitals match good or evil karmas. They contend that it is not so and that there is no such thing. 
Just like their deceased fathers and forefathers, who neither did good nor recognized morality, these descendants, with their delusions, closed minds, and dark spirits, are of course unable to distinguish between good and evil ways, or to understand the resultant journeys of birth and death. 
Whether good or evil, fortunate or unfortunate, they race to do anything as they please, and no one finds it disturbing. 
Parents weep for the loss of their children; children weep for the loss of their parents. Siblings and spouses weep for their respective losses. Death does not occur according to any order. Under the law of impermanence, nothing can stay forever and all things will pass away. 
Even when people are told or taught this, few believe it. “Therefore, one’s transmigration through birth and death is endless. But in their ignorance, people still refuse to believe in the Dharma  in the sūtras. Without any forethought, they each desire instant gratification. 
Stupefied in their loves and desires, they disregard morality. 
They are lost in anger and hatred, and greedy for wealth and carnal pleasures. 
They continue to undergo birth and death endlessly, suffering through their evil life-journeys. 
How agonized and pathetic they are! “If there is a death in a family, whether a parent, a child, a sibling, or a spouse, the survivors mourn their loss. They think of their loved one, and their thoughts of grief form a knot. Enduring days and years of pain in their hearts, they still cannot release themselves from their attachment. 
Even when they are given the true teachings, their minds stay closed because their thoughts are not apart from sensual desires. Dazed and blocked, their minds are mired in delusion. 
In this bustling world, a place upon which one cannot rely, whether dignified or humble, high or low, rich or poor, noble or base, each toils in his work, harboring malice and dark, evil energy. 
They attract evils to follow them, which let them do as they please until their sins have peaked. Before the end of their natural lifespans, they die sudden deaths. 
Then they go down the evil life-paths life after life, for thousands of koṭis of kalpas, not knowing when release will come. 
Their suffering is indescribable. 
How pathetic they are!” The Solemn Admonition The Buddha told Maitreya Bodhisattva, gods, and humans, “I now have described to you the affairs of the world. Those who are involved cannot attain bodhi. 
One should carefully reflect on one’s life, stay far away from evils, and diligently do well-chosen good deeds. 
Love, desire, rank, and wealth are impossible to preserve. They are not pleasurable, and they all will depart. 
When one encounters a Buddha in the world, one should make energetic progress. Those who earnestly resolve to be reborn in the Land of Peace and Bliss will acquire illuminating wisdom and excellent merit. 
One should not allow self-indulgence or fail the teachings and the precepts, thus falling behind others. 
If you have any doubts about this sūtra, you may ask the Buddha. 
I will explain to you.” Maitreya Bodhisattva fell on both knees and said, “The Buddha is revered for His awesome spirit. His words are direct and virtuous. Having heard the Buddha’s teachings, we each should thoroughly think them over. 
People of the world act just as described by the Buddha. Out of His lovingkindness and compassion, the Buddha now has indicated the great Way. One’s ear and eye are opened and cleared because of one’s deliverance. None of those who have heard the Buddha fails to rejoice. 
By His lovingkindness, gods, humans, and even wriggly insects are all liberated from anxiety and suffering. 
The Buddha’s admonition is profound and virtuous. His wisdom clearly sees all things of the past, present, and future, everywhere  in the ten directions, hindrance free. 
The reason we have deliverance bestowed upon us is that the Buddha in His past lives arduously sought bodhi with humility. 
His kindness is all-embracing and his merit majestic. His radiance shines through the limitless emptiness , opening the entrance to nirvāṇa. 
He ceaselessly teaches, tames, commands, transforms, and inspires all  in the ten directions. 
The Buddha is the Dharma King revered above all multitudes of holy beings. As the teacher to all gods and humans, He enables them to attain bodhi as they wish. 
No one fails to rejoice and open his mind wide.” The Buddha told Maitreya Bodhisattva, “What you say is true. 
Reverence for the Buddha is a great virtue. 
Only once in a long, long time will a Buddha appear in the world. I now have become a Buddha in this world to expound the Dharma, giving the teachings for attaining bodhi, to shatter the web of doubts, to pull out the roots of love and desire, and to destroy the source of evils, as I visit the Three Realms of Existence unhindered. 
With all-encompassing wisdom, I teach the essentials of the right path and explain its guidelines. I reveal the five life-journeys and deliver those who have not been delivered, enabling them to take the right path that goes from saṁsāra to nirvāṇa. “Maitreya, know that you have trained in the Bodhisattva Way for innumerable kalpas. It has been a long time since you first resolved to deliver sentient beings. 
“You, gods and humans in worlds in the ten directions, and my four groups of disciples have been transmigrating through the five life-paths since time without a beginning. Your anxiety, suffering, and toil are beyond description. Up to the present life, you have not ended your cycle of birth and death. Nevertheless, you have encountered a Buddha, and have heard and accepted the Dharma. 
This is delightful and excellent. I express my sympathetic joy. You all should be tired of the pain of birth, old age, illness, and death,  discharging impurities, nothing enjoyable. 
It would be wise to resolve to organize yourselves for the right actions—to do good karmas, to purify your body and mind, and to speak and act truthfully in accord with your mind. 
“One can deliver oneself then help and rescue others. 
To fulfill one’s wish energetically, one should develop one’s roots of goodness. 
Although one has to toil arduously in one’s entire life, it would be like an instant in comparison . One will then enjoy infinite bliss after one’s rebirth in Amitāyus Buddha’s land. One will always act in accord with virtue and will have forever pulled out the roots of birth and death, freed from the trouble of afflictions, such as greed, anger, and delusion. 
One’s lifespan can last for one kalpa, 100 kalpas, 1,000 kalpas, or 10,000 koṭi kalpas, according to one’s wish. 
“You each should make energetic progress, striving to fulfill your wish. Doubts and regrets would be a blunder, which would cause one’s rebirth on the edge of that land. 
There, one would be confined for 500 years in a palace made of the seven treasures, undergoing tribulations.” Maitreya Bodhisattva said, “Having received the Buddha’s solemn admonition, we will intently train and learn, carrying out His teachings. 
We dare not have any doubts.” The Five Evils and the Five Virtues The Buddha told Maitreya Bodhisattva, “If you each can rectify your minds and intentions and refrain from doing evil, this is the highest virtue, unparalleled in worlds in the ten directions. 
Because gods and humans in many Buddha Lands spontaneously do good, not evil, and they easily develop and transform themselves. 
I now have become a Buddha in this world of the five evils, the five pains, and the five burns, and I teach sentient beings in extreme suffering to discard the five evils, remove the five pains, and stay away from the five burns. 
I transform their minds, enabling them to uphold the five virtues and acquire merits, so that they will live a long life  and eventually attain nirvāṇa.” The Buddha asked, “What are the five evils, the five pains, and the five burns? 
How does one destroy the five evils and uphold the five virtues in order to acquire merit, live a long life, and attain nirvāṇa?” The First Evil and the First Virtue The Buddha explained, “The first evil is this. 
Sentient beings, from gods and humans down to wriggly insects, do evil without exception. 
As the strong crush the weak, they harm, kill, and eat one another. They do not know how to cultivate virtue, but do evil without compunction. Evildoers receive punishment as they head for the next life-journey. 
The evils lodged in their  consciousnesses find no pardon. That is why there are those who are poor and lowly, deprived and forlorn, those who are deaf, blind, mute, or stupid, and those who are vicious and violent. 
Then there are those who are dignified, noble, wealthy, or capable and brilliant, because in their past lives they were kind and dutiful, and acquired merit and cultivated virtue. 
“Although the world has its regular systems of law and prison, there are those who do not fear them, and they commit crimes. Then, by law, they receive punishment from which it is hard to escape or to be absolved. This kind of punishment takes place in their present life. 
The consequence in their next life is even more intense and severe. Each of them enters darkness and assumes a body in a new life to undergo torture, as if enforced by human law. 
“Hence, there naturally are the three evil life-journeys with immeasurable suffering and distress. The sinners change bodies, forms, and life-paths. Whether a lifespan is long or short, one’s  consciousness cannot help heading for it. 
One goes alone in one’s rebirth, timed with enemies’ rebirths to continue mutual revenge endlessly. Until the purging of one’s horrible sins, one is unable to leave the evil life-journeys. One continues to trudge through them, not knowing when release will come. As liberation is hard to achieve, one’s pain is indescribable. 
Such things do take place between heaven and earth. Although requitals are not always immediate, virtuous and evil ways will be returned in due time. 
These are the first enormous evil, the first pain, and the first burn. “As one toils painfully, it is like a huge fire burning one’s body. In its midst, if one can control one’s mind and harness one’s body only to do good, not evil, one will achieve liberation, acquire merit, transcend the world, and attain nirvāṇa. 
People of the world—parents, children, siblings, and spouses—neither follow honorable principles nor comply with regulations. 
They revel in extravagance and dissipation for gratification. Self-centered and self-willed, they deceive one another. 
Their mouth and mind contradict each other; their words and thoughts are dishonest. Sycophantic and untrustworthy, they flatter others with cunning words. They slander the worthy and the virtuous, incriminating them of wrongdoings. 
“Unwise rulers appoint deceitful and conniving ministers, who size up the situations and implement their schemes. 
Those in a shaky position are deceived by them. Against the law of conscience, they purposely slander the loyal and the upright. 
Ministers deceive their kings; children deceive their parents. Likewise, siblings, spouses, and close or casual friends deceive one another. Afflicted with greed, anger, and delusion, each desires to benefit himself. Dignified or humble, high or low, people have the same mentality. 
They disregard the consequences of their actions, bringing about the destruction of their families and their own deaths. Both close and distant relatives may be implicated, and the entire clan may be annihilated. 
“Sometimes, they engage in enterprises involving family, friends, villagers, townsfolk, fools, and the uncivilized. They exploit one another, and their anger becomes a grudge. The wealthy are miserly and refuse to give alms. 
Greedy for and attached to riches, they continue to fatigue their bodies and minds. Yet, at the end of their lives, they have nothing to depend upon. As they each have come alone, they each will go alone, and no one will accompany them. 
Good or evil, fortune or misfortune, follows them as each begins the next life-journey, pleasant or painful. Their remorse comes too late. 
“People of the world are stupid and unwise. Instead of admiring the virtuous, they hate and slander them. They desire to do evil and willfully do unlawful deeds. Thievery is in their minds as they covet others’ wealth. 
Although they fear others’ detection of their evil motives, they act without any foresight, and regret after they are caught. 
The world now has law and prison. Evildoers are punished for their crimes. 
In their present life, they do evil. Gods even record their names. After death, they go down the evil life-paths. “Hence, there naturally are the three evil life-journeys with immeasurable suffering and distress. 
While liberation is hard to achieve, their pain is indescribable. These are the second enormous evil, the second pain, and the second burn. “As one toils painfully, it is like a huge fire burning one’s body. In its midst, if one can control one’s mind and harness one’s body only to do good, not evil, one will achieve liberation, acquire merit, transcend the world, and attain nirvāṇa. 
People of the world, who have limited lifespans, depend upon one another and the environment as they live together between heaven and earth. 
At the top are wise elders, the dignified, the noble, and the wealthy. At the bottom are the poor, the lowly, the vile, and the foolish. In the middle are the depraved, who are evil and lustful. Filled with chaotic loves and desires, they are restless in their conduct. 
They leer at objects of lust, displaying their evil manners. They detest their own wives and go out to seek adventures. They squander family assets and perform unlawful deeds. They band together and launch lawless warfare, attacking, killing, and pillaging. 
Their evil minds target external objects, unconcerned about improving their karmas. They obtain things by robbery or thievery. To evade prosecution by law, they give their loot to their wives. They seek gratification in physical pleasure, abusing even their own relatives. 
People, whether dignified or humble, loathe them, as they cause trouble and anguish to their families. They do not fear the law or other prohibitions. 
Touching humans and ghosts, their evils are exposed under the sun and the moon and lodged in their  consciousnesses. “Hence, there naturally are the three evil life-journeys with immeasurable suffering and distress. 
While liberation is hard to achieve, their pain is indescribable. These are the third enormous evil, the third pain, and the third burn. “As one toils painfully, it is like a huge fire burning one’s body. In its midst, if one can control one’s mind and harness one’s body only to do good, not evil, one will achieve liberation, acquire merit, transcend the world, and attain nirvāṇa. 
This is the third great virtue.” The Fourth Evil and the Fourth Virtue The Buddha said, “The fourth evil is this. People of the world do not think of cultivating virtue. Instead, they teach one another to do evil. 
With divisive speech, abusive speech, false speech, and suggestive speech, they dispute with and slander others. They hate the virtuous and find pleasure in maligning the worthy. 
They are neither dutiful nor respectful to their parents, and they disdain their teachers and elders. They betray their friends’ trust and find it hard to become honest. Conceited and self-aggrandizing, they claim that they are righteous. 
Lacking self-knowledge, they brutally assault and terrorize others. Considering themselves tough, they do evil shamelessly, making it impossible to earn others’ respect. They have no fear of the law between heaven and earth, under the sun and the moon. Unwilling to do good karmas, they are hard to tame. 
Obstinate and mentally blocked, they claim that their ways can last. With nothing to worry or fear, they are arrogant. 
All their evils are noted by gods. “They rely on the merit they acquired in their past lives and use their little virtue for protection and support. 
Then, in the present life they do evil and deplete their store of merits. Benign spirits all leave them, and they are left alone without any support. 
After they die, their evils spontaneously return to them and overpower them. 
Because their evils are lodged in their  consciousnesses, their horrible sins will drag them toward inescapable requitals. 
They must move forward into a cauldron of fire. When their bodies are consumed and their minds in agony, their remorse at that moment comes too late. 
“Hence, there naturally are the three evil life-journeys with immeasurable suffering and distress. 
While liberation is hard to achieve, their pain is indescribable. These are the fourth enormous evil, the fourth pain, and the fourth burn. “As one toils painfully, it is like a huge fire burning one’s body. In its midst, if one can control one’s mind and harness one’s body only to do good, not evil, one will achieve liberation, acquire merit, transcend the world, and attain nirvāṇa. 
This is the fourth great virtue.” The Fifth Evil and the Fifth Virtue The Buddha said, “The fifth evil is this. People of the world wander in indolence and negligence. They are unwilling to do good karmas, harness their bodies, and earn a livelihood, though their families are in hardship, hungry and cold. 
When their parents instruct them, they stare and respond in defiance, and argue and contradict, acting like enemies. Parents are better off without such children. 
They are takers who know no limit, and people loathe them. They take others’ kindness and friendship for granted and have no intention of reciprocating. 
Unable to alter their poverty and hardship, they resort to thievery and vagrancy, and live on what is not earned. 
They revel in drinking and debauchery, eating and drinking without moderation. Rude and aggressive, they do not understand human rapport and willfully deny it. 
When they see virtue in people, they envy and hate them. Without any scruples or manners, they have no misgivings. 
They do as they please, beyond admonition. 
They have no concern about the means of their six branches of family, never thinking of the kindness of their parents and teachers, or the fellowship of their friends. Devoid of a single virtue, their minds think evil, their mouths speak evil, and their bodies do evil. 
They disbelieve the Dharma taught by Buddhas and holy ones. They disbelieve that walking the Way leads to transcendence of the world; that after one’s death one’s  consciousness heads for rebirth; or that good karmas reap fortune and evil karmas reap misfortune. 
They desire to kill the virtuous, damage the Saṅgha, and harm their parents, siblings, and dependents. Their six branches of family are appalled by them, wishing them dead. “Thus, many people of the world have the same mentality. Stupid and ignorant, they think that they are wise. 
They know neither whence they are born nor where they will go after death. Cold-hearted and rebellious, they do evil between heaven and earth. They hope to get lucky and live a long life, but only end in death. 
If someone kindly teaches them to think of virtue and explains to them the good and evil life-journeys, they refuse to believe him. 
Painstaking advice cannot benefit them because their minds are entirely blocked and impossible to open. 
Upon the ending of their life, they are crushed by fear and remorse. They refuse to cultivate virtue, only to regret in the end. What good is their remorse to their next life? 
“Between heaven and earth, the five life-paths are distinct, extensive, profound, and vast. One’s good and evil requitals, manifested as fortune and misfortune, respond without fail to one’s good and evil karmas. One must personally bear them, and no one else can take one’s place. The karmic law responds to one’s actions, and requitals chase one’s life, never relenting. 
While a virtuous person who does good karmas goes from pleasure to pleasure, from light to light, an evil person who does evil karmas goes from pain to pain, from dark to dark. 
Who, besides a Buddha, knows all this? 
However, few believe and carry out the teachings. As one’s cycle of birth and death and the evil life-journeys are endless, so too people of the world are endless. 
“Hence, there naturally are the three evil life-journeys with immeasurable suffering and distress. 
While liberation is hard to achieve, their pain is indescribable. These are the fifth enormous evil, the fifth pain, and the fifth burn. “As one toils painfully, it is like a huge fire burning one’s body. In its midst, if one can control one’s mind and harness one’s body to think the right thoughts, to act according to one’s words with utmost sincerity, to keep one’s words in accord with one’s mind, and to do good, not evil, one will achieve liberation, acquire merit, transcend the world, and attain nirvāṇa. 
This is the fifth great virtue.” Another Solemn Admonition The Buddha told Maitreya Bodhisattva, “As I say to you all, people of the world toil painfully in the five evils. As a result, they suffer the five pains and, in turn, the five burns. They do myriad evils but do not develop roots of goodness, so they naturally go down the evil life-journeys. 
As witnessed by the multitudes, some, even in their present life, suffer prolonged illness brought about by their sins, and are unable either to die or to live. 
Then, after death, they go down the three evil life-paths to experience immeasurable horrendous suffering, burning in fire. 
“These people bear each other grudges that begin small but, after a long time, grow into an enormous evil. Because of their greed for wealth, they cannot give alms. Mired in delusion, they can neither think straight nor liberate themselves from the bondage of afflictions. They fight for self-benefit, never stopping to reflect. 
As they seek fleeting pleasures in wealth and rank, they can neither endure adversity nor cultivate virtue. The little power they hold is soon spent. Their longtime toil only leads to severe consequences. 
The law of karma prevails, and the net of requitals is accordingly spread. 
From ancient times to the present, there are such deplorable pains.” The Buddha told Maitreya Bodhisattva, “All Buddhas are sad over the ways of the world. 
With their awesome spiritual power, they annihilate evils, enabling people to drop their habitual thoughts, uphold sūtras and precepts, and practice the Dharma without misunderstandings or violations. 
